Proceedings of the Society for Psychical Research, Vol. XXXIV (1924)
Public domain. Sourced from Internet Archive: scan of the 1924 Glasgow: Robert MacLehose and Co. edition (Parts LXXXIX-XCII) (https://archive.org/details/proceedingsofsoc34soci). The Society for Psychical Research's journal of record — the central archive of the 1882-1930 evidential debate on telepathy, apparitions, and mediumship.
Hosted by the Tower of Babel library, antarctic-labs.com.

==============================================================================

PROCEEDINGS

OF  THE

Society  for  Psychical  Research


VOLUME  XXXIV

(CONTAINING  PARTS  LXXXIX,  XC,  XCI  &  XCII)

1924


Tke  responsibility  for  both  the  facts  and  the  reasonings  in  papers
published  in  the  Proceedings  rests  entirely  with  their  authors


PRINTED  FOR  THE  SOCIETY  BY

ROBERT  MACLEHOSE  &  COMPANY  LIMITED  ..

UNIVERSITY  PRESS,  GLASGOW
1925

Igtnts  for  the  sale  of  publications  :

LONDON  :  FRANCIS  EDWARDS,  83  High  Street,  Marylebone,  W.  i.
GLASGOW  :  JACKSON,  WYLIE  &  CO.,  73  West  George  Street
AMERICA:  THE  F.  W.  FAXON  CO.,  83  Fr.incis  Street,  Boston,  Mass.


A /I  riglits  j-eserved


NTED  IN  GREAT  BRITAIN  BV  ROBERT  MACLEIIOSE  AND  CO.  LTD.
THE  UNIVERSITY  PRESS,  GLASGOW


CONTENTS.


PART  LXXXIX.

October,  1923.

Frontispiece. M.  Camillb  Flammarion
I.  Presidential  Address. By  CAmLi.E  Flammarion ...  1
II.  On  Hindrances  and  Complications  in  Telepathic  Communication.

By  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick  28

Supplement  :  Review  :

Prof.  Charles  Richet's  Traite  de  Metapsychique  "  (Eng.  Trans.
"Thirty  Years  of  Psychical  Research").  Review  and
Critique. By  Sir  Oliver  Lodge  70


PART  XC.

May,  1924.

For  and  Against  Sitrvival.

The  Difficulty  of  Survival  from  the  Scientific  Point  of  View.

\, By  Professor  Charles  Riohet  107

"The  Possibility  of  Survival  from  the  Scientific  Point  of  View.

J By  Sir  Oliver  Lodge  113

''^

>  PART  XCI.

^  JCTLY,  1924.

1.  Presidential  Address.  By  J.  G.  Piddington  .  .  .131
II.  Elucidation  of  Two  Points  in  the  "  One-Horse  Dawn  Scripts

I.  The  Herb  Moly. By  W.  H.  Salter . . .  .153
II.  The  Precocious  Olive. By  J.  G.  Piddington . .  159
[II.  The  Mechanism  of  the  So-Called  Mediumistic  Trance. By  Dr.

Sydney  Alrxitz jgg

[V.  A  Method  of  Scoring  Coincidences  in  Tests  with  Playing  Cards.

By  R.  A.  Fisher,  M.A. 181

jiirrppLEMENT  :  Reviews  :

"  The  '  Oscar  Wild  '  Script."  By  Mrs  Henry  Sidgwick  .  .186
Dr.  F.  C.  S.  Schiller's  "Problems  of  Belief." By  G.  Lowes


Dickinson


196


Sir  Oliver  Lodge's  "  Making  of  Man." By  W.  Whately  Smith  199

2i790S


iv


«»••'•■';•-■'  "  "  *'

"i  /:rv-'"i>iM'-kciL »  •

Deoembee,  1924.

PAOE

I.  In Memoriam — Gustave  Geley. 1868-1924. By  Sir  Oliver

Lodge,  F.R.S. 201

II.  Report  on  Further  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  carried
out  by  Professor  Gilbert  Murray,  LL.D.,  Litt.D.  By  Mrs.
Henry  Sidgwick  212

III.  Some  Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years'  Psychical  Research. By  Sir

William  Barrett,  F.R.S  275

IV.  Some  Further  Consideration  of  the  Modus  Operandi  in  Mediumistic

Trance. By  Una,  Lady  Troubridge  298

Supplement.

The  Life  of  Crookes.  By  Sir  Oliver  Lodge,  F.R.S.  .  .  .310
Teleldnetic  and  Teleplastic  Mediumship.  By  F.  J.  Dingwall  .  324
Review  :

Dr.  Osty's  "  Supernormal  Faculties  in  Man." By  Dr.  F.  C.  S.

Schiller  333

Appendix  II.  to  Mis.  Sidgwick's  Paper  336


APPENDIX  TO  PART  XCII.

Officers  and  CouncU  for  192.5 343

List  of  Members  and  Associates 344

Index  to  Vol.  XXXIV 383


1


PROCEEDINGS

OF  THE

Society  for  Psychical  Research

PART  LXXXIX.
OCTOBER,  1923.

■  i.

DISCOURS  PRESIDENTIEL 1
DE  Monsieur  Camille  Flammarion

Fondateur  et  premier  President  de  la  Socii^Ti  AsTRONOMiiiUE

DE  France,
Directeur  de  I'Observatoire  de  Juvisy,
Coramandeur  de  la  Legion  d'Hoiineur.

Mbsdames,  Messieurs,  Chers  Collegues.

MoN  plus  vif  desir  eut  ete  de  me  rendre  personnellement
aupres  de  vous  pour  vous  presenter  mes  profonds  et
sympathiques  remerciements  de  I'honneur  que  vient  de  me
faire  la  celebre  Society  for  Psychical  Research,  mais  il
me  serait  extremement  difficile  de  m'eloigner  en  ce  moment
de  Paris  et  de  Juvisy,  et  je  tiens  tout  d'abord  a  vous
en  exprimer  mes  tres  sinceres  regrets.  Heureusement,
nous  pouvons  converser  ensemble,  de  loin  comme  de
pres,  et,  en  reahte,  je  suis  aupres  de  vous,  par  I'esprit
et  par  le  coeur.

J'ai  lu  un  grand  nombre  de  discours  academiques,  et
notamment  les  24  que  la  Psychical  Society  a  pubhes
dans  son  beau  volume  des  Presidential  Addresses,  et  j'ai

^  The  English  translation  of  this  Address  was  read  by  Sir  W.  F.  Barrett  at  a
General  Meeting  of  the  Society  on  June  26,  1923.


2


Camille  Flammarion.


[PABT


constate  qu'en  general  celui  qui  a  rhonneur  d'etre  reQU
dans  le  cenacle  d'une  illustre  Societe  commence  son
discours  de  reception  en  exprimant  son  humble  recon-
naissance d'etre  admis  dans  une  compagnie  dont  il  n'est
pas  digne.  Ce  serait  assurement  mon  devoir  particulier
ici,  plus  que  pour  aucun  de  mes  predecesseurs,  puisque  je
suis,  avec  mon  savant  ami  Charles  Richet  et  avec  le
philosophe  Henri  Bergson,  I'un  des  rares  etrangers  qui
ont  ete  appeles  a  cette  presidence,  depuis  41  ans  que  votre
Societe  existe.  J'avoue  que  je  suis  un  peu  ebloui  par
votre  constellation  d'astres  de  premiere  grandeur,  oti
brillent  les  noms  de  William  Crookes,  de  Balfour  Stewart,
d'Arthur  Balfour,  de  WilHam  James,  d'Oliver  Lodge,  de
William  Barrett,  de  Frederic  Myers,  d'Henry  Sidgwick,  de
Gerald  Balfour  et  de  leurs  emules.

Parmi  ces  discours,  la  premiere  phrase  de  celui  du
spirituel  philosophe  William  James  m'a  particulierement
frappe,  parce  qu'elle  repondait  exactement  a  mon  im-
pression lorsque  votre  eminent  fondateur  et  ancien  presi-
dent Sir  William  Barrett  est  venu  dans  ma  retraite
d'astronome  solitaire  me  proposer  cet  honneur  assurement
inattendu.  J'y  ai  repondu,  comme  Sir  Oliver  Lodge  en
1901  :  "  It  is  the  wish  of  your  Council,"  mais  en  ajoutant,
comme  William  James,  en  1896,  que  c'etait  la  .  .  .  un
piege  a  souris,  "  a  mouse-trap,"  et  que  quand  on  y
entre  on  est  pris,  sans  se  douter  de  ce  qui  vous  arrive  !

Ai-je  une  excuse  de  m'etre  laisse  prendre  1  Peut-etre.
L'annee  meme  oil  cette  Societe  de  Recherches  a  ete
fondee — en  1882 — j'ai  fonde  moi-meme,  en  France,  I'As-
tronomie.  Revue  des  Recherches  astronomiques,  d'oii  est
sortie,  cinq  ans  apres,  la  Societe  Astronomique  de
France,  ou  j'ai  eu  comme  successeurs  a  la  presidence  les
plus  celebres  astronomes  de  I'lnstitut,  Faye,  Janssen,
Tisserand,  Callandreau,  Poincare,  LipjDmann,  Deslandres,
Baillaud,  Puiseux,  Appell,  savants  illustres,  dignes  d'etre
compares  aux  gloires  de  votre  Conseil.  En  meme  temps
que  vous,  je  travaillais  done  a  la  fondation  d'une  oeuvre
ayant  pour  mission  d'elever  les  hommes  au-dessus  des
interets  materiels  et  de  les  inviter  a  vivre  dans  la  con-
templation de  I'infini.


LXXXix.]  Discours  Presidentiel.


Animes  du  nieme  esprit,  nous  voulions,  vous  comme  moi,
le  progres  et  le  developpement  des  connaissances  humaines,
sachant  que  :

Croire  tout  decouvert  est  une  erreur  profonde  ;
Cast  prendre  I'horizon  pour  les  bornes  du  monde.

Peut-etre  me  rattachai-je  a  vous  par  des  liens  encore
plus  anciens.  En  1869,  vos  predecesseurs  en  recherches
psychiques  avaient  fonde  a  Londres  la  Societe  dialectique,
avec  le  concours  de  Alfred  Russel  Wallace,  de  I'ingenieur
Varley,  du  Prof.  De  Morgan,  de  William  Crookes,  qui
me  demanda  un  article  astronomique  pour  son  Qtiarterly
Journal  of  Science,  et  precisement  aussi,  en  cette  meme
annee,  pronon9ant  un  discours,  le  jour  de  ses  obseques,
siir  la  tombe  d'Allan  Kardec,  grand  maitre  du  Spiritisme
en  France,  j'ai  pris  soin  de  dire  que  le  spiritisme  ne
doit  pas  etre  considere  comme  une  religion,  mais  repre-
sente  I'aurore  d'une  science  nouvelle,  tout  entiere  a
creer.  L'affaire  de  la  science  n'est  pas  la  croyance,
mais  I'investigation.

Ainsi,  mes  chers  CoUegues,  il  me  semble  que  nous
sommes  freres  depuis  longtemps  et  que  nous  marchons  la
main  dans  la  main.

Un  souvenir  plus  ancien  encore  se  rappeUe  en  ce
moment  a  ma  pensee.  En  1861,  j'etais  eleve  astronome
a  rObservatoire  de  Paris,  et  je  passais  tous  les  jours
pres  de  I'Odeon,  pour  revenir  au  domicile  de  mes  parents
habitant  I'interieiu"  de  Paris,  et  comme  tous  les  amateurs
de  livreSj  je  m'arretais  sous  les  galeries  de  ce  theatre  pour
feuilleter  les  publications  interessantes.  J'en  ouvre  une,
et  mes  yeux  tombent  sur  une  page  portant  pour  titre
Pluralite  des  mondes.  Or,  precisement,  a  cette  epoque,
je  travaillais  a  mon  ouvrage  sur  ce  sujet,  public  I'annee
suivante.  Je  regarde  le  titre  du  volume  et  je  lis  Le
Livre  des  E sprits,  par  Allan  Kardec.  Le  chapitre  qui
m'interessait  etait  presente  comme  "  dicte  par  des  Es-
prits."  Cette  enigme  pouvait  intriguer  un  etudiant  de  19
ans.  J'allai  rendre  visite  a  I'auteur,  qui  m'inscrivit  (le
15  Novembre  1861)  dans  sa  Societe  parisienne  des  Etudes
Ispirites,  et  j'assistai  aux  reunions  hebdomadaires  ou
s'exer9aient diverses formes de mediumnite,  notamment


4  Camille  Flammarion.  [part

I'ecriture  automatique.  J'essayai  moi-meme,  et,  de  se-
maine  en  semaine,  j'ecrivis,  dans  une  demi-conscience,
plusieurs  dissertations  astronomiques  signees  Galilee,  que
Allan  Kardec  a  publiees  plus  tard  dans  son  livre  La
Genese.  Un  etudiant  plus  age  que  moi,  qui  se  fit  auteur
dramatique  et  membra  de  I'Academie  frangaise,  Victorien
Sardou,  s'exenjait,  de  son  cote,  a  un  autre  genre  de
mediumnite,  et  dessinait  des  habitations  imaginaires  sur
la  planete  Jupiter,  signees  Bernard  Palissy,  dessins  fort
curieux  que  Ton  peut  voir  dans  mon  ouvrage  sur  les
Forces  naturelles  inconnues.  A  cette  epoque,  les  astro-
nomes  pensaient  que  Jupiter  etait  un  monde  habitable,
superieur  a  la  Terre  par  son  printemps  perpetuel  et  ses
annees  douze  fois  plus  longues  que  les  notres.  Je  ne
tardai  pas  a  remarquer  que  nos  communications  medium-
niques  refletaient  simplement  nos  idees  personnelles,  et
que  Galilee  pour  moi  et  les  habitants  de  Jupiter  pour
Sardou  etaient  etrangers  a  ces  productions  inconscientes
de  notre  esprit.

C'etait  en  1861,  au  temps  de  Napoleon  III.  et  de  la
reine  Victoria.  C'est  deja  loin ;  mais  nous  pouvons  re-
monter  plus  haut  encore.

Puisqu'on  I'a  rappele  recemment  a  la  fete  officielle  dont

les  Savants  Fran§ais  m'ont  honore  a  la  Sorbonne  au  mois

de  juin  dernier,  je  me  permettrai  de  me  souvenir  ici  que

le probleme de la survivance de Fame m'a  preoccupe

depuis ma plus tendre enfance. Le Ministre  Reibel,

representant le Gouvernement, a raconte que dans  le

village  ou  je  suis  ne,  voyant,  a  I'age  de  sept  ans,  passer

un  convoi  funebre, j'ai  interroge  un  camarade  plus  age

qui  m'apprit  qu'on  allait  enterrer  un  homme  mort  et  que

je  lui  ai  replique  : "  Cesser  de  vivre,  ce  n'est  pas  possible

.  .  .  on  ne  meurt  pas." En  rapportant  ce  souvenir  dans

mes Memoires, j'ajoutais  : "J'ai reve plusieurs  heures,

plusieurs jours, plusieurs semaines,  plusieurs mois  ;  la

conviction  que  la  mort  n'existe  pas  a  continue  de  dominer

mon  esprit  ; nous  ne  pouvons  pas  etre  detruits."

*  *  *  *

Si  je  rappelle  ces  souvenirs,  chers  CoUegues,  c'est  pour
m'excuser  d'avoir  accepte  cette  presidence  et  pour  vous


LXXXIX.]


Discours  Presidentiet.


5


dire  que  nous  travaillons  dans  la  meme  voie.  Vos  fon-
dateurs  etaient  Sir  William  Barrett  et  Frederic  Myers,
auxquels  ne  tarderent  pas  a  s'associer  Henry  Sidgwick,
BaKour  Stewart,  Edmond  Gurney,  Stainton  Moses,  Massey,
Podmore,  Sir  William  Crookes,  Sir  Oliver  Lodge,  Arthur
Smith  et  d'autres  chercheurs.  Le  premier  de  ces  fondateurs
est  toujours  la,  dans  son  infatiguable  activite,  et  nous
admirons  tous  sa  permanente  jeunesse.  Le  nom  de
Frederic  Myers  reste  uni  au  sien  comme  le  symbole  du
travailleur  independant  auquel  la  science  metapsychique
a  du  ses  principaux  progres.  Vous  avez  tenu,  Messieurs,
a  appliquer  des  I'origine  a  vos  recherches  les  principes
severes  et  absolus  de  la  methode  experimentale  proclaniee
par  votre  Bacon.

Vos  progres  ne  se  sont  pas  realises  sans  luttes  et  sans
obstacles.  Personnellement,  je  les  ai  affrontes  de  pres,
meme  a  Paris,  la  surtout  peut-etre,  car  dans  le  pays  de
Voltaire,  on  a  un  peu  I'habitude  de  se  moquer  de  tout.
Tandis  que  vous  luttiez  contre  Faraday,  nous  luttions
contre  Babinet.  Ces  deux  physiciens  avaient  tort  de  nier.
Tout  le  monde  salt  qu'il  y  a  des  imposteurs,  des  farceurs,
des  menteurs,  et  egalement  des  credules,  des  illusionnes,
des  faibles  d'esprit,  et  meme  des  imbeciles.  Est-ce  une
raison  pour  ne  pas  etudier  les  problemes  non  resolus  ?

Plusieurs  d'entre  vous  peuvent  se  souvenir  d'un  ecrivain
charmant,  le  Prof,  de  Morgan,  le  subtil  auteur  du  Budget
of  Paradoxes.  J'ai  ete  en  relation  avec  lui  dans  le
cours  des  annees  1864-1867,  lorsque  je  redigeais  le  Cosmos.
Nous  pouvons  dire  avec  lui,  comme  avec  luon  ami  re-
grette  A.  de  Rochas,  auquel  notre  science  doit  tant
d'observations  ingenieuses,  que  :  refuser  de  s'occuper  de
certains  phenomenes  quand  on  est  convaincu  de  leur
realite,  par  crainte  du  QiCen  clira-t-on,  c'est  a  la  fois
s'abaisser  soi-meme  en  obeissant  a  une  faiblesse  de  car-
actere  meprisable,  et  trahir  les  interets  de  I'humanite  tout
entiere.  Nul  ne  saurait,  en  effet,  prevoir  les  consequences
d'une  decouverte,  quand  il  s'agit  de  forces  nouvelles.
L'ambre  des  Grecs,  qui  a  donne  son  nom  a  I'electricite,
ne  paraissait  qu'un  jeu  d'enfant,  et  les  grenouilles  de
Galvani  ne  paraissaient  qu'une  curiosite  insignifiante.


6  Gamille  Flammarion.  Fpaet

u

La  connaissance  des  forces  de  la  nature  a  avance
graduellement,  lentement,  avec  des  flux  et  des  reflux,,
depuis  les  temps  les  plus  anciens,  et  sous  toutes  les
latitudes,  sans  distinction  de  patries.  Les  separations
geograpliiques  sont  aussi  inexistantes  devant  la  science  que
les  limites  des  constellations  dans  la  carte  du  ciel.  II
n'y  a  pas  de  separations  entre  les  peuples,  pour  les
astronomes — meme  pour  les  aeronautes.  Dans  mes  voyages
aeriens,  j'ai  plus  d'une  fois  traverse  des  frontieres,  et  j'ai
toujours  eu  la  plus  grande  difficulte  a  les  discerner  sur
le  sol  glissant  a  mes  pieds.  Cependant,  il  est  agreable
de  rencontrer  des  compatriotes  partout  oil  Ton  va,  et  je
suis  particulierement  heureux  et  fier  de  saluer  ici  mes
predecesseurs  en  cette  noble  presidence,  MM.  Bergson  et
Richet,  qui,  depuis  longtemps  aussi,  font  planer  les  etudes
de  I'esprit  au-dessus  de  tons  les  fugitifs  interets  materiels.
Tons  les  presidents  de  cette  Association  ont  suivi  le
meme  programme  philosophique.

On  travaille  partout  a  la  recherche  de  la  verite  ;  mais
la  branche  des  etudes  psychiques  est  encore  la  plus
faible,  la  plus  jeune.  L'arbre  de  la  science  classique  est
un  chene  qui  domine  tout  superieurement,  et  la  science
nouvelle  n'est  qu'un  roseau.  Mais  ce  roseau  deviendra
un  arbre,  et  le  vieux  chene  se  transformera,  au  point  de
n'etre  plus  du  tout  le  meme  arbre,  avant  cent  ans  seule-
ment.  Nous  avons  encore  quelques  luttes  a  soutenir
contre  les  habitudes  inveterees. Tout  est  a  renouveler.

Votre  association  scientifique,  si  independante,  si  loyale,
si  active,  a  joue  un  role  important  dans  cette  evolution,
et  elle  est  universellement  estimee.  Pour  ma  part,  dans
tons  les  ouvrages  psychiques  que  j'ai  ecrits  depuis  sa
fondation,  je  me  suis  fait  un  devoir  et  un  plaisir  de
celebrer  ses  travaux,  ses  conquetes,  ses  precieuses  observa-
tions.

Avouons  qu'il  faut  avoir  un  courage  souvent  mal  recompense
pour  agir  envers  et  contre  les  opinions  dominantes,  qui
sont  celles  de  I'ignorance.

Nous  Savons  que  la  science  classique  n'a  pas  decouvert
toute  la  verite  contenue  dans  I'univers  et  que  presque
tout reste, au contraire, a decouvrir. Non  seulement


txxxix.]


Discours  Presidentiel.


7


toutes  les  forces  de  la  nature  ne  sont  pas  connues,  mais
la  plupart  echappent  a  nos  sens  imparfaits  et  incomplets.
Ce  qu'il  importe  de  ne  jamais  perdre  de  vue,  e'est  I'ap-
preciation  exacte  de  la  nature  de  nos  connaissances.  Les
analystes  scientifiques  savent,  depuis  plus  d'un  siecle,  que
I'observation  s'arrete  a  I'apparence,  au  phenomene  sensible,
sans  jamais  pouvoir  penetrer  la  substance,  ni  rien  con-
naitre  de  I'essence  reelie  des  choses.  Malebranche  avait
etabli  ce  principe  avant  Emmanuel  Kant.  Mais  la
science  avance  graduellement  dans  ses  investigations.
Elle  avance  vite,  surtout  actuellement  par  les  applications
merveilleuses  des  ondes  invisibles,  de  la  telegraphic  et  de
la  telephonie  sans  fil.  Avant  un  demi-siecle  les  decou-
vertes  depasseront  autant  nos  connaissances  actuelles  que
I'aviation  et  la  radiotelepiionie  de  1923  depassent  I'aero-
station  et  la  telegraphic  d'il  y  a  50  ans.

*  H=

La  curiosite  est-elle  un  defaut  ?  Je  ne  le  pense  pas,
quoique  Ton  ait  fait  un  crime  a  notre  mere  Eve  d'avoir
voulu  gouter  au  fruit  defendu,  malgre  la  defense  de
Jehovah,  ou  plutot,  sans  doute,  a  cause  de  cette  defense  !
La  curiosite  est  la  source  de  toutes  les  decouvertes,  et
nous  ne  pouvons  qu'y  applaudir.  Pourtant  d'eminents
savants  ne  ressentent  pas  ce  sentiment  subtil,  et  meme  le
desapprouvent.  Un  jour,  le  fondateur  actuellement  sur-
vivant  de  votre  belle  Societe  psychique,  I'emment  pro-
fesseur  Sir  Wilham  Barrett,  ayant  eu  des  preuves  per-
sonnelles  des  transmissions  psychiques  a  distance,  amena
la  conversation  sur  ce  sujet  avec  le  celebre  physiologiste
allemand  Helmholtz,  alors  a  Dublin.—"  Je  ne  puis  y  croire,
lui  rephqua  celui-ci  ;  ni  le  temoignage  de  tous  les  membres
de  la  Societe  Royale,  ni  meme  celui  de  mes  propres  sens
ne  pourraient  m'amener  a  admettre  la  transmission  de
pensee  d'une  personne  a  une  autre,  en  dehors  de  I'opera-
tion  de  nos  sensations  normales,  car  c'est  evidemment
impossible."  Nous  pouvons  remarquer  avec  Sir  Wilham
Barrett  que  La^Dlace  raisonnait  plus  sagement  en  distant,
dans  sa  TMorie  analytique  des  probabilites  :  "  ISlous  sommes
si  loin  de  connaitre  tous  les  agents  de  la  nature  et  leurs
divers modes d'action qu'il  serait  peu  philosophique  de


8


Camille  Flammarion.


nier  les  phenomenes  uniquement  parce  qii'ils  sont  inex-
plicables  dans  I'etat  actuel  de  nos  connaissances.  Seule-
ment,  nous  devons  les  examiner  avec  une  attention
d'autant  jilus  scrupuleuse  qu'il  parait  plus  difficile  de
les  admettre  ;  et  le  calcul  des  probabilites  devient  indis-
pensable pour  determiner  jusqu'a  quel  point  il  faut
multiplier  les  observations  afin  d'obtenir  en  faveur  des
agents  qu'elles  indiquent  une  probabUite  superieure  aux
raisons  que  Ton  pent  avoir,  d'ailleurs,  de  ne  pas  les
admettre."  ^

Ces  reflexions  de  Laplace  s'appliquent  exactement  a
nos  reclierches  metapsychiques  et  nous  confirment  dans
notre  interpretation  de  la  valeur  du  nombre  des  observa-
tions. Remarquons  que  I'illustre  geometre  les  a  emises  a
propos  du  Magnetisme  animal  et  de  la  baguette  divina-
toire,  alors  particulierement  discutes.

Or,  la  continuite  des  etudes  scientifiques  nous  a  conduits
a  penser  que  tout  est  dynamisme.  Le  djmamisme
cosmique  reagit  les  mondes.  Newton  lui  a  donne  le  nom
d'attraction.  Mais  cette  interpretation  est  insuffisante  :
s'il  n'y  avait  que  I'attraction  dans  I'univers,  les  astres  ne
formeraient  qu'un  seul  bloc,  car  elle  les  aurait  reunis
depuis  longtemps,  depuis  toujours  ;  il  y  a,  de  plus,  le
mouvement.  Le  dynamisme  vital  regit  les  etres  :  dans
I'homme  evolue,  le  dynamisme  psychique  est  constamment
associe  au  dynamisme  vital.  Au  fond,  tous  ces  dyn-
amismes  n'en  font  qu'un  :  c'est  I'esprit  dans  la  nature,
sourd  et  aveugle  pour  nous  dans  le  monde  immateriel
et  meme  dans  I'instinct  des  animaux,  inconscient  dans
la  majorite  des  ceuvres  humaines,  conscient  dans  un
petit  nombre.

J'ai  ecrit  dans  Uranie  (1888)  :  "  Ce  que  nous  appelons
matiere  s'evanouit  lorsque  I'analyse  scientifique  croit  la
saisir.  Nous  trouvons  comme  soutien  de  I'univers  et
principe  de  toutes  les  formes,  la  force,  I'element  dynamique.
L'etre  humain  a  pour  principe  essentiel  I'ame.  L'univers
est  un  dynamisme  intelligent  inco7inaissable."

J'ai  ecrit  dans  les  Forces  Naturelles  inconnues  (1906) :
"  Les manifestations psychiques confirment ce que  nous

1  Laplace. Thcorie  analytiquc  des  prohabilitis.  Introduction.


Lxxxix.]


l)iscoiifs  Presidentiel.


9


Savons  d'autre  part,  que  I'explication  purement  mecanique
de  la  nature  est  insuffisante  et  qu'il  y  a  dans  I'univers
autre  chose  que  la  pretendue  matiere.  Ce  n'est  pas  la
matiere  qui  regit  le  monde  :  C'est  un  element  dynamique
et  psychique."

Depuis  les  annees  ou  ces  lignes  ont  ete  ecrites,  le  progres
des  observations  psycMques  les  a  surabondamment  con-
firmees. Votre  Societe  est  a  la  tete  de  ce  mouvement.

Mais  revenons  au  professem:  Barrett  et  a  Helmholtz.

Helmholtz  n'etait  pas  curieux.  Comme  beaucoup  d'autres,
il  avait  sur  certains  points  I'esprit  hermetiquenient  ferme.
Nous  entendons  assez  souvent  des  hommes  relativement
intelligents  nous  dire  :  Je  le  verrais  que  je  ne  le  croirais
pas.  II  y  en  a,  d'ailleurs,  qui  n'aiment  pas  se  dornier  la
peine  de  reflechir.  Le  professeur  Barrett  raconte  aussi
que  Sir  W.  Rowan  Hamilton,  apres  avoir  publie  sa  fam-
euse  decouverte  matliematique  des  quaternions,  en  parla
a  I'astronome  royal  Airy  et  voulut  lui  exposer  cette  tlieorie.
Apres  quelques  instants,  Airy  I'arreta  :  "  Je  ne  vols  pas
cela  du  tout"  fit-il.  "  J'ai  etudie  le  sujet  pendant  plusieurs
mois,"  repliqua  Hamilton,  "  et  je  suis  certain  du  theoreme."
"  Oh  !  "  repondit  Airy,  "  je  viens  d'y  penser  pendant  deux  ou
trois  minutes  et  je  vols  qu'il  n'y  a  rien  la."  II  en  est
souvent  ainsi  dans  nos  etudes.

J'ai  eu  moi-meme  I'occasion  de  voir  a  Greenwich  le
Directeur  de  I'Observatoire  George  Biddel  Airy,  et  j 'admi-
rals sa  verte  vieillesse  ;  mais  je  ne  pouvais  m'empecher  de
penser  a  la  decouverte  de  Neptune  par  Le  Verrier.  Cette
decouverte  ne  serait  pas  frangaise  si  Airy  avait  ete  plus
curieux,  car  il  avait  le  Memoire  d'Adams  dans  son  tiroir
depuis  plusieurs  mois  lorsque  Le  Verrier  annonga  sa
decouverte  a  1' Academic  des  Sciences  le  31  x4out  1846.

D'ailleurs,  Le  Verrier  avait  fait  cette  decouverte  porte
par  sa  passion  mathematique,  et,  en  dehors  des  mathe-
matiques,  n'etait  pas  tres  curieux  lui-meme.  Un  soir,  de
I'annee  1876,  j'observais,  au  grand  equatorial  de  I'Observa-
toire de  Paris,  une  etoile  double  qui,  par  hasard,  etait
voisine  de  la  planete  Neptune.  Par  curiosite,  apres  avoir
mesure  mon  etoile  double,  je  dirigeai  la  lunette  sur
Neptune,  et  cherchai  a  en  apprecier  le  diametre.  L'illustre


10


Camitle  Flammarion.


Directeur  etait  monte,  ce  soir-la,  sur  la  terrasse,  et  me
questionna  sur  mes  observations  :  "  Vous  mesurez  vos
etoiles  doubles  ?  "  fit-il.  "  Oui,  Monsieur  le  Directeur,  mais
savez-vous  ce  que  j'ai  en  ce  moment  dans  le  champ  ?  .  .  .
Votre  planete  Neptune  !  EUe  est  curieuse ;  elle  est
bleue.  Voulez-vous  la  voir  ?  " — "  Oh  !  non,"  me  repondit-il.
"  Du  reste,  je  ne  I'ai  jamais  vue."

Etait-ce  une  boutade  ?  Etait-ce  vrai  ?  Ce  qui  est
certain,  c'est  que  I'astronomie  physique  ne  I'interessait
pas  du  tout.

Tout  le  monde  salt  que  Le  Verrier  et  Adams  ont
decouvert  par  le  calcul  la  position  de  Neptune  dans  le
ciel,  et  que  c'est  un  jeune  astronome  de  Berlin,  Galle,
qui,  sur  I'invitation  de  Le  Verrier,  dirigea  une  lunette
vers  cette  region  du  ciel  dont  il  construisait  precisement
la  carte,  et  ay  ant  reyu  une  lettre  de  Le  Verrier,  le  23
Septembre,  constata  le  soir  meme,  la  presence  de  I'astre
inconnu.

L'Astronomie,  la  noble  science  du  ciel,  n'est  pas  seule-
ment  I'etude  aride  des  mouvements  celestes  et  des  lois  de
la  gravitation.  Ce  n'est  pas  seulement  la  position  des
astres  dans  I'espace  infini,  qui  nous  interesse,  c'est  encore,
et  c'est  surtout,  leur  constitution,  leur  nature  ;  nous  ne
voulons  pas  seulement  savoir  ou  Us  sont,  mais  ce  qu'ils
sont.  L'astronomie  physique  est  le  complement  de  I'astro-
nomie mathematique. Qu'est-ce  que  I'Univers  ?

L'homme  est  un  atome  pensant  au  sein  de  I'infini  et
de  I'eternite,  vivant,  sur  la  Terre,  entre  I'infiniment
grand  et  I'infiniment  petit.  Les  dernieres  decouvertes  astro-
nomiques  sont  plus  eloquentes  que  tous  les  poemes.
Qu'est-ce  que  tous  les  peintres,  tous  les  poetes  devant  la
realite  astronomique  ?

Vos  travaux  ont  apporte  a  la  science  les  plus  heureux
resultats.  Le  23  Avril  1887,  votre  President  le  Professeur
BaKour  Stewart,  membre  de  la  Societe  Royale,  a  fonde
avec  vous  un  Comite  special  dans  le  but  de  verifier  "  the
reahty  of  such  alleged  spiritualistic  phenomena  as  may
be  brought  before  them,"  comite  compose  de  William
Crookes,  Oliver  Lodge,  William  Barrett,  E.  Gurney
et E. Myers. Tout le monde connait aujourd'hui  les


LXXXIX.]


Discours  Presidentiel.


11


conquetes  obtenues  par  ces  investigateurs  independants.
Les  faits  dont  vous  avez  etabli  I'authenticite  sent  irre-
cusables.  II  y  a,  assurement,  des  observations  qui  par-
aissent  contradictoires  ;  mais  mille  faits  negatifs  n'infir-
ment  pas  un  seul  fait  positif.

H»  "I^

Nous  venons  de  dire  que  Fhomme  est  un  atome  pensant,
vivant  au  sein  de  I'infini,  et  que  les  decouvertes  astro-
nomiques  sont  plus  eloquentes  que  tous  les  poemes.

Cette  realite  sublime,  personne  ne  s'en  doutait  au  temps
d'Homere,  au  temps  d'Hesiode,  au  temps  de  Pytliagore,
au  temps  de  Moise,  au  temps  de  Jesus-Christ,  ni  meme
au  temps  de  Copernic.  Hesiode  croyait  donner  une
grande  idee  de  I'etendue  de  I'univers  en  disant  que
renclume  de  Vulcain  avait  mis  9  jours  et  9  nuits  a
tomber  du  ciel  sur  la  Terre,  et  qu'il  lui  en  faudrait
autant  pour  tomber  jusqu'aux  enfers.  On  pent  calculer
que  cette  pretendue  hauteur  du  ciel  ne  represente  guere
plus  que  la  distance  de  la  Lune,  I'astre  le  plus  proche  de
nous  ;  elle  est  de  400.000  kilometres  et  notre  satellite
gravite  a  384.000,  trente  fois  seulement  la  largeur  de
notre  globe.  Au  temps  de  Copernic,  les  etoiles  etaient
supposees  appartenir  a  une  sphere  equidistante  de  la  Terre.
Les  cometes  etaient  encore  des  meteores  terrestres.  Or,
pensons,  jugeons.

Le  Soleil  est  400  fois  plus  loin  de  nous  que  la  Lune  ;
la  derniere  planete  de  notre  systeme  est  30  fois  plus  loin
de  nous  que  le  Soleil ;  I'etoile  la  plus  proche  est  9330
fois  plus  loin  ou  a  280.000  rayons  de  I'orbite  terrestre.
Ces  mesures  sont  d'hier,  historiquement  parlant,  ne  datant
meme  pas  de  cent  ans.  Le  beau  chant  de  la  Bible  :
Coeli  enarrant  gloriam  Dei,  est  centuple  dans  la  pensee
moderne.  Un  palais  prodigieux  s'est  substitue  a  une
chetive  cabane.

Supposons  qu'au  sein  du  spectacle  silencieux  d'une  nuit
etoilee  notre  esprit  s'eleve  dans  la  contemplation  celeste.
Nous  Savons  aujourd'hui  que  chaque  etoile  est  un  soleil
et  que  la  plus  proche  plane  a  une  distance  telle  que  la
lumiere,  a  la  vitesse  de  300.000  kilometres  par  seconde,
emploie  4  ans  et  3  mois  a  parcourir  I'espace  qui  nous  en


12


Camille  Ftammarion.


[part


separe.  Nous  savons  aussi  que  le  Soleil  est  1.300.000
fois  plus  volumineux  que  notre  planete,  et  que  les  etoiles
sont  de  meme  ordre.  Ainsi  notre  esprit  se  forme  une
premiere  idee  des  espaces  celestes  et  des  grandeurs.

Parmi  les  etoiles  qui  frappent  le  mieux  nos  regards
dans  les  belles  nuits  d'ete,  ohoisissons  I'une  de  celles  que
toutes  les  contemplatrices  du  ciel  ont  le  plus  souvent
remarquee,  la  radieuse  Vega  de  la  Lyre,  de  premiere
grandeur.  Elle  plane  a  237  millions  de  kilometres,  a
25  annees  de  lumiere.  C'est  une  splendide  etoile  blanche,
dans  laquelle  I'liydrogene  domine,  plus  blanche  que  notre
soleil  d'or.  Pouvons-nous  imaginer  atteindre  cette  dis-
tance, par  la  pensee,  en  quelques  secondes  ?  Peut-etre.

Soit  !  Allons  plus  loin  dans  la  meme  direction.  Re-
gardons  cette  petite  constellation  de  la  Lyre.  Elle  est
principalement  composee  de  5  etoiles  (4  en  losange  formant
une  petite  lyre  dont  Vega  serait  la  tete).  Entre  les
deux  plus  eloignees  (/3  et  j  de  3"  grandeur),  il  y  a  une
nebuleuse  particulierement  curieuse,  en  forme  d'anneau.
Elle  est  invisible  a  I'oeil  nu,  mais  en  dirigeant  notre
regard  vers  ce  point  du  ciel,  nous  la  traversons.  Au
telescope,  elle  est  "  splendidissima."  C'est  un  anneau
elliptique  (sans  doute  circulaire,  vu  obliquement)  avec
une  etoile  au  milieu  de  son  disque  central.  L'analyse
spectrale  y  montre  des  vapeurs  de  fer  et  de  zinc.  C'est
une  genese  de  systeme  de  monde  en  formation,  qui  git  a
une  distance  immense  au-dela  de  Vega.

Non  loin  de  la ;  notre  regard  pent  plonger  vers  une
autre  nebuleuse,  ou  plutot  vers  un  amas  d'etoiles,  le
celebre  amas  d'Hercule,  voisin  de  la  Lyre  ;  la  merveille
des  merveilles.  C'est  une  agglomeration  de  soleils.  .  .  .
De  combien  de  milliers  ?  .  .  .  Une  pose  photographique
d'une  minute  en  enregistre  820,  une  pose  de  six  minutes
35.000.  .  .  . C'est  inenarrable  !

Sa  distance  parait  etre  de  cent  mille  annees  de  lumiere —
946  quatrillions  de  kilometres, — univers  lointain,  different
du  notre,  dont  le  diametre  est  comparable  a  celui  de
notre  Voie  Lactee  : mille  annees  de  lumiere  !  .  .  .

Eh  bien,  de  Vega  nous  avons  franchi,  par  la  nebuleuse
annulaire  de  la  Lyre  et  par  I'amas  d'Hercule,  des  milliards


LXXXIX.]


Discours  Presidentiel.


13


et  des  milliards  de  kilometres,  nous  avons  traverse  d'im-
menses  deserts  sideraux,  nous  avons  parcouru  des  regions
stelliferes,  nous  avons  salue,  au  passage,  des  mondes
defunts  et  des  cimetieres  d'astres,  des  tombes  et  des
berceaux,  et  toujours  devant  nous  les  espaces  sans  fin
se  sont  succede  .  .  .  384.000  kilometres  d'ici  a  la  Lune,
4.500.000.000  d'ici  a  Neptune,  237.000.000.000.000  d'ici
a  Vega,  946.000.000.000.000.000  d'ici  a  I'univers  lointain
d'Hercule,  abimes  apres  abimes,  immensites  apres  immen-
sites,  la  Terre  est  perdue  de  vue  depuis  longtemps,  et
tout  notre  systeme  planetaire  et  le  Soleil  s'est  eloigne  au
rang  d'etoile  imperceptible.
Oil  sommes-nous  ?

Nous  n'avons  pas  avance  d'un  seul  pas.  Nous  sommes
toujours  au  centre  de  Vinfini.

Pasteur  etait  dans  le  vrai  en  r appelant  dans  son  dis-
cours de  reception  a  I'Academie  Fran9aise  les  aspirations
de  la  curiosite  humaine  cherchant  a  tout  connaitre  :
"  Qu'y  a-t-il  au-dela?  L'esprit  hvimain,  pousse  par  une
force  invincible,  ne  cessera  jamais  de  se  demander  :  "  Qu'y
a-t-il  au-dela  ?  Veut-il  s'arreter  soit  dans  le  temps,  soit
dans  I'espace  ?  Comme  le  point  oil  il  s'arrete  n'est  qu'une
grandeur  finie,  plus  grande  seulement  que  toutes  celles
qui  I'ont  precedee,  a  peine  commence-t-il  a  I'envisager,  que
revient  I'implacable  question  et  toujours,  sans  qu'il  puisse
faire  taire  le  cri  de  sa  curiosite.  II  ne  sert  de  rien  de
repondre,  au-dela  sont  des  espaces,  des  temps  ou  des
grandeurs  sans  limites.  Nul  ne  comprend  ces  paroles.
Celui  qui  proclame  I'existence  de  I'infini,  et  personne  ne
pent  y  echapper,  accumule  dans  cette  affirmation,  plus
de  surnaturel  qu'il  n'y  en  a  dans  tous  les  miracles  de
toutes  les  religions  ;  car  la  notion  de  I'infini  a  ce  double
caractere  de  s'imposer  et  d'etre  incomprehensible."

Apres  I'etendue,  incommensurable  et  sans  bornes,  con-
siderons  les  grandeurs.

Si  nous  prenons  le  globe  terrestre  comme  terme  de
comparaison,  nous  voyons  que  :

Jupiter  est  1295  fois  plus  gros  que  la  Terre  ;

Le  Soleil  est  1.300.000  fois  plus  gros  que  la  Terre.

C'est  la  proportion  d'une  boule  de 18  centimetres  de


14


Camille  Flammarion.


[part


diametre  pour  la  Terre,  d'une  boule  de  2  metres  pour
Jupiter  et  d'une  coupole  de  20  metres  pour  le  Soleil
(celle  du  Pantheon  de  Paris).

On  est  arrive  recemment  malgre  d'extremes  difficultes,
a  mesurer  le  diametre  de  quelques  etoiles,  et  Ton  a
trouve :

Pour  Arcturus  24  fois  le  Soleil.
. Pour  Betelgeuse,  248  fois  le  Soleil.

Pour  Antares  460  fois  le  Soleil.  Done  500,000,000  fois
la  Terre.

C'est-a-dire  que,  dans  la  proportion  precedente,  le  soleil
Antares  serait  represente  par  un  dome  de  9  kilometres  de
diametre.

Qu'est-ce  que  le  monde  terrestre  a  cote  du  monde
d'Antares  ?  Et  que  peut  etre  le  systeme  d'Antares  ?
Vous  pouvez  observer  cette  etoile  du  Scorpion,  rouge  et
rutilante,  les  beaux  soirs  d'ete,  et  decouvrir  a  son  contact,
un  petit  compagnon  vert  emeraude  de  T  grandeur,
soleil  vert  associe  a  un  soleil  rouge. Et  quel  soleil !  !  !  !

Ces  grandeurs  nous  stupefient.  Nous  avons  peine  a
nous  les  representor.  Que  dirons-nous  de  Vetendue  des
amas  stellaires  et  des  nebuleuses !

Pour  ces  valeurs  numeriques,  nous  ne  pouvons  plus
nous  limiter  aux  evaluations  kilometriques.  Qu'est-ce
qu'un  kilometre  ?  Que  sont  les  12.742  kilometres  du
diametre  de  la  Terre  devant  les  horizons  infinis  que  nous
considerons  ici  ?  Rien  ou  a  peu  pres.  L'unite  des
mesures  celestes  n'est  plus  le  kilometre,  ni  le  diametre
terrestre,  ni  la  distance  d'ici  au  Soleil  (de  149.500.000
kilometres)  :  c'est  trop  peu.  Cette  unite  de  mesure  est
le  parsec,  c'est-a-dire  la  parallaxe  d'une  seconde,  la  distance
de  laquelle  on  verrait  le  rayon  de  I'orbite  terrestre
(149.500.000  kilometres)  sous  Tangle  d'une  seconde  (I'epais-
seur  d'un  cheveu  eloigne  a  vingt  metres  de  I'oeil).  Cette
longueur  egale  30.800  milliards  de  kilometres  ou  3,26
annees  de  lumiere.

Jugeons,  si  nous  le  pouvons.  Nous  avons  vu,  tout  a
I'heure,  que  le  diametre  de  I'amas  d'Hercule  est  estime
a  mille  annees  de  lumiere  ou  308  parsecs.  Ce  diametre
est  de  I'ordre  de  celui  de  la  Voie  Lact^e,  composee  de


> ^ '  -,'1,1.  ' ' 3  J ^ >  »  J , » •>  1  >

'  ' ' ' ' 1  ' ^ > ' '  J '  ^  ) » 1 ■> 3 ) -> »  1

[f LXXXIX.]  Discours  PrestdenUeV  '  "  >  15

[  millions  de  soleils,  dont  ee}m  qmi  npus  ,'»(3feir®  \i^'esf;,'qu'une

I  modeste  etoile.  '  ...

[  Certaines  nebuleuses  sont  incomparablement  plus  vastes
,  que  I'amas  d'Hercule.

I I  Dans  la  celebre  nebuleuse  australe  connue  sous  le  nom
de  Nuee  de  Magellan,  cinq  amas  globulaires  de  la  meme
grandeur  apparente  se  montrent  en  la  region  nord  et  font,
sans  aucun  doute,  partie  du  Grand  Nuage. Leur  distance

s ;  a  ete  estimee  par  I'etude  des  Ceplieides  de  cette  region.

jXe  diametre  moyen  de  ces  cinq  amas  est  de  l',8,  et  leur
li  parallaxe  a  ete  calculee  de  0", 000029,  ce  qui  correspond
i<  k  35000  parsecs  ou  110,000  annees  de  lumiere.

Le  rayon  lumineux  qui  nous  en  arrive  aujourd'hui  est
e  I  done  parti  a  une  epoque  oil  I'liumanite  terrestre  en  etait
! !  encore  a  I'age  de  la  pierre.  Quel  sera  I'etat  de  I'humanite
t  lorsque  le  rayon  qui  s'envole  actuellement  de  cette  nuee
;,  I  celeste  arrivera  ici  ?

',  Remarquons  que  Ton  determine  aujourd'hui  la  position
!  I  d'un  astre  dans  I'espace  avec  la  precision  de  I'epaisseur
a  d'un  cheveu  vu  a  mille  metres  de  distance,
s  I  Et  les  masses  !  Ne  vient-on  pas  de  peser  une  etoile
j  binaire  spectroscopique  de  la  Licorne  dont  la  masse  est
s  160  fois  superieure  a  ceile  du  Soleil,  c'est-a-dire,  surpasse
e  i  de  5  millions  de  fois  le  poids  du  globe  terrestre  !
a  Or,  tous  ces  univers  lointains  sont  en  mouvement  de
s  translation,  en  mouvement  rapide.

15  Comment  nous  representer  ces  mouvements  ?  Que
e  penser du mouvement fantastique, inimaginable, de  ces

0  creations  siderales  ?

1  Telle  nebuleuse  en  spirale  vient  d'etre  mesuree  toiirnant
e  sur  elle-meme  en  45.000  ans,  telle  autre  en  58.000,  telle
e  autre  en  85.000,  telle  autre  en  160.000.  .  .  .

i-  Les  vitesses  de  translation  revelent  800,  900,  1000  et
e  jusqu'a  1200  kilometres  par  seconde,  pour  certaines  nebu-
(i  leuses  en  spirale.  1.200.000  metres  par  seconde!  Figurons-
nous,  si  nous  en  sommes  capables,  une  formation  cosmique
a  large  de  milKons  et  de  millions  de  kilometres,  se  trans-
it portant  avec  cette  vitesse  au  sein  du  vide  infini  .  .  .  non
e  pas  une  nebuleuse,  mais  dix,  cent,  mille,  un  million,  oui,
le  un  million  de  nebuleuses  voguant  dans  tous  les  sens  .  .  .


on  ■


16 ■  "  " '(JaniiUe  "Flammarion.  [part


animees  '  de  '"viixsJsses-'  les  'plws "  yEjriees,  depuis  50  jusqu'ai
100,  500, '  700, '  1200  kilometres  par  seconde  f  .  .  .

Le  Grand  Nuage  de  Magellan,  qui  contient  278  nebu-
leuses,  s'eloigne  de  nous  a  la  vitesse  de  560  kilometres  par
seconde,  et  le  Petit  Nuage  a  la  vitesse  de  603.

L'aspect  de  I'univers  est  entierement  transforms,  meta-
morphose, dans  la  pensee  humaine.  Qu'est-ee  que  I'im-
mobilite  silencieuse  apparente  de  la  nuit  etoilee  ?

Notre  Voie  Lactee  elle-meme  dans  laquelle  le  Soleil
lui-meme  n'est  qu'une  faible  etoile,  parait  se  deplacer  dans
I'immensite  au  taux  de  600.000  metres  par  seconde,
emportant  dans  son  cycle,  le  soleil  et  son  systeme,  notre
minuscule  Terre  et  ses  destinees,  en  ajoutant  un  14*^
mouvement  aux  13  que  nous  connaissons  deja.

Et  qu'est-ce  que  toutes  ces  vitesses  ?  A  quel  repere
fixe  les  rapportons-nous  ?  .  .  . A  aucun  !

Et  les  immenses  nebuleuses  noires  ?  Et  les  astres
obscurs  ?  Et  les  soleils  eteints  ?  Et  les  mondes  defunts  ?
Et  tout  I'invisible  qui  peuple  anonymement  I'immensite
siderale  ?

Nous  venons  de  prendre  une  idee  des  etendues,  des
grandeurs  et  des  vitesses.  C'est  I'infiniment  grand  pour
I'homme  terrestre.  Descendons  maintenant  dans  Vinfini-
ment  petit.

Revenons  ici,  a  Pascal,  a  sa  definition  celebre  du  ciron
microscopique  :

"  Qu'un  ciron  offre  dans  la  petitesse  de  son  corps  des
parties  incomparablement  j)Ius  petites,  des  jambes  avec
des  jointures,  des  veines  dans  ces  jambes,  du  sang  dans
ces  veines,  des  humeurs  dans  ce  sang,  des  gouttes  dans
ces  humeurs,  des  vapeurs  dans  ces  gouttes  ;  que,  divisant
encore  ces  dernieres  choses,  Thomme  epuise  ses  forces  en
ses  conceptions,  et  que  le  dernier  objet  oii  il  peut  arriver
soit  maintenant  celui  de  notre  discours  ;  il  pensera  peut-
etre  que  c'est  la  I'extreme  petitesse  de  la  nature.  Je
veux  lui  faire  voir  la-dedans  un  abime  nouveau  ;  je  veux
lui  peindre  non  seulement  I'univers  visible,  mais  I'immen-
site qu'on  peut  concevoir  de  la  Nature,  dans  I'enceinte  de
ce  raccourci  d'atomes. Qu'il  y  voie  une  infinite  d'univers,


LXXXIX.J


Discou  rs  Presiden  tiel.


17


dont  chacun  a  son  firmament,  ses  planetes,  sa  terre,  en
la  meme  proportion  que  le  monde  visible  ;  dans  cette
terre  des  animaux,  et  enfin  des  cirons,  dans  lesquels  il
retrouvera  ce  que  les  premiers  ont  donne,  et  trouvant
encore  dans  les  autres,  la  meme  chose,  sans  fin  et  sans
repos,  qu'il  se  perde  dans  ces  merveilles,  aussi  etonnantes
danri  leur  petitesse  que  les  autres  par  leur  etendue,  car
qui  n'admirera  que  notre  corps,  qui  tantot  n'etait  pas
perceptible  dans  I'univers,  imperceptible  lui-meme  dans  le
sein  du  tout,  soit  a  present,  un  colosse,  un  monde,  ou
plutot  un  tout,  a  Tegard  du  neant  oii  Ton  ne  peut  ar-
river  ?

"  Car  enfin  qu'est-ce  que  I'homme  dans  la  nature  ?
Un  neant  a  I'egard  de  I'infini,  un  tout  a  I'egard  du  neant  :
un  milieu  entre  rien  et  tout.  Infiniment  eloigne  de
comprendre  les  extremes,  la  fin  des  choses  et  leur  principe
sont  pour  lui  invinciblement  caches  dans  un  secret  im-
penetrable."

Aiiisi  parlait  Pascal  au  XVII*^  siecle,  Les  decouvertes
du  vingtieme  siecle  sur  les  atomes  nous  ont  ramenes
dans  sa  sphere  de  meditation  en  en  montrant  I'absolue
realite,  et  I'etude  de  la  lumiere  nous  a  conduits  a  ex-
primer  Fechelle  de  I'univers  en  unites  optiques  qui  descen-
dent  depuis  les  etendues  incommensurables  dominant  la
longueur  de  I'annee-lumiere  (9  trillions  467  milliards  de
kilometres)  devenue  le  metre  des  mesures  siderales,  jusqu'au
millionieme  de  millimetre,  qui  exprime  les  longueurs  d'onde
du  spectre  solaire.

L'infininient  petit  est  peut  etre  plus  difficile  a  concevoir
que  I'infiniment  grand.  Que  I'espace  soit  sans  bornes,  en
n'importe  quelle  direction,  que  nous  puissions  voyager  en
esprit,  avec  n'importe  quelle  vitesse,  pendant  I'eternite,
sans  approclier  d'aucun  terme,  nous  le  comprenons.  Le
contraire  nous  est  clau-ement  inadmissible,  puisque  quelle
que  soit  la  barriere  que  nous  imaginons,  notre  esprit  saute
par  dessus.  Mais  I'infiniment  petit  !  Considerons  les
feuilles  d'or,  par  exemple.  Les  batteurs  d'or  fabriquent
des  feuilles  dont  I'epaisseur  n'est  que  le  dixieme  du  micron,
q'est-a-dire  le  dixieme  du  niillieme  de  millirnetre,  lis  s'arretent-

B


18  Camille  Flammarion.  [part

la  parce  que,  pratiqiiement,  ils  ne  peuvent  pas  aller  plus
loin.  Le  diametre  des  atonies  de  I'or  qui  compose  ces
feuilles  est  done  inferieur  au  dixieme  de  micron,  et
leur  masse  inferieure  a  la  quantite  d'or  qui  emplit  un
cube  de  ce  diametre,  c'est-a-dire  1  cent-milliardieme  del  ij
milligramme.  Ajoutons,  avec  M.  Jean  Perrin,  que  la
masse  de  I'atome  d'hydrogene  est  environ  200  fois  plus
petite,  et  si  faible  qu'il  en  faut  20  trillions  pour  con-
stituer  un  milligramme.  La  discussion  conduit  meme  a
conclure  que  les  diametres  des  atomes  sont  inferieurs  au
millionieme  de  millimetre,  et  leur  masse  au  cent-millionieme
de  trillionieme,  de  gramme.  ...  II  parait,  d'apres  des
calculs  rigoureux  et  des  experiences  tres  precises,  qu'un
milligramme  de  radium,  contient  deux  millions  de  trillions
d'atomes.  .  .  .  C'est  I'invisible  dans  I'invisibilite,  I'extra-
invisible  dans  I'extra-invisibilite, — et  j'ajouterai :  I'incom-  s
prehensible  dans  I'incomprehensibilite.

Arretons-nous.  Je  prie  les  auditeurs  qui  m'ont  suivi
jusqu'ici  de  m'excuser  de  les  avoir  entraines  aussi  loin.
Mais  c'est  I'eblouissement  meme  de  la  splendeur  de  la
verite.

Maintenant,  pensons  que  dans  cet  univers,  du  plus  for-
midable des  mondes  au  plus  minuscule  des  atomes,  tout

est  en  activite,  en  mouvement,  en  vibration.

^  ^  ^

Dans  la  contemplation  des  grandeurs  astronomiques
resumees  tout  a  I'heure,  nous  avons  ete  transportes  un
instant  a  travers  I'infini  de  I'espace  et  du  temps,  et  nous
avons  senti  que  I'Astronomie  est  la  premiere  et  la  plus
importante  de  toutes  les  sciences,  parce  qu'elle  nous
apprend  quelle  place  nous  occupons  dans  la  creation  et
comment  I'univers  est  constitue  :  ceux  qui  I'ignorent  vivent
sans  savoir  oil  ils  sont.  Mais  la  connaissance  de  I'univers
materiel  ne  suffit  pas  a  une  instruction  qui  souhaite
etre  complete.  Les  recherches  sur  la  nature  et  la  des-
tinee  de  Fame  humaine,  m'ont  toujours  paru  associees  ^s.
directement  a  la  connaissance  astronomique.  D'ailleurs
le  ciel  a  toujours  ete  associe  aux  vues  religieuses  sur  la
vie  future.  Les  etudes  psychiques  se  presentent  a  nous
comme  le  complement  naturel  de  la  connaissance  du  ciel,


k
tte


its

I'ODi

m

it  I

IK

Si

y

iimi


le


t


il


XXXIX.]


Discours  Presidentiel.


19


ia  pluralite  des  moncles  habites  pose  devant  notre  pensee,
^  n  meme  temps  que  le  sj)ectacle  de  la  vie  universelle,  le
°t  robleme  de  la  pluralite  des  existences  de  I'ame.  Sur  la
IB  lanete  que  nous  habitons,  la  vie  est  le  but  supreme,
If  nperieux,  auquel  tout  obeit.  Chaque  etoile  est  un
If  3leil.  Les  systemes  de  mondes  sont  innombrables.  Que
IS  evient  I'ame  apres  la  vie  terrestre  ?  Existe-t-elle  in-
1-  cinsequement  ?  N'est-ce  pas,  comme  le  pretendent  les
a  laterialistes,  une  fonction  du  cerveau,  qui  nait  et  croit
11  vec  lui,  et  s'eteint  aix  dernier  soupir  ?  La  connaissance
le  e  I'ame  nous  importe  autant  que  celle  de  I'univers  et
s  oit  faire  par  tie  de  la  science  integrate.  Les  diverses
11  jligions  ont  affirme,  jusqu'ici,  avoir  le  monopole  de
IS  3tte  etude  et  ont  pris  la  juridiction  de  I'autre  monde.
1-  es  Asiatiques,  les  Grecs,  les  Egyptiens,  les  Hebreux,
>  ^s  Cliretiens, les  Musulmans, les  diverses  ecoles  spiritua-

3tes  modernes  ont  decrit  les  conditions  de  la  vie  future,
ii  laque  systeme  suivant  ses  idees  et  ses  croyances,  mais
1  'ont  rien  decouvert  de  reel  dans  I'Empyree,  dans  I'Olympe,
la  ans  les Champs-Elysees, dans  les  enfers, les  limbes,  le

urgatoire,  les  regions  inconnues  de  I'immortalite.  Quelle
1-  it  la  nature  de  I'ame,  quelles  sont  les  conditions  de  sa
it  irvivance  ? Qu'est-ce que le temps  ? Qu'est-ce  que

espace  ?  Si  je  rappelle  que  des  I'annee  1866  j'ai  pose
questions  dans  mon  petit  livre  Lumen,  je  rappellerai,
s  1  meme  temps,  que  je  les  ai  associees  aux  etudes  astro-
n  amiques,  a  des  voyages  dans  I'infini  et  dans  I'eternite,
IS  dsant  pressentir  toute  la  complexite  du  plus  grand  des
IS  roblemes.

IS  Si  Fame  continue  d'exister  apres  la  mort  du  corps,
le  doit  etre  quelque  part.  Sans  doute,  la  monade
it  sychique  vit  en  dehors  de  nos  jugements  sur  I'espace  et
IS  ir  le  temps,  et  nos  idees  terrestres  sont,  comme  nos
e  ;ns  terrestres,  incomj)letes,  imparfaites,  et  erronees,  et
Dn  a  dit  que  I'ame  n'occupe  aucune  place.  Mais  on
'i  Durrait  conclure  que,  si  elle  n'est  nulle  part,  elle  n'existe
i!  IS.  II  y  a  la  un  paradoxe  a  eclaircir.  Lorsqu'a  I'age
la  }  douze  ans,  j'etais  en  6"  classe  des  etudes  latines,  on
IS  )us  enseignait  que  dix  mille  ames  pourraient  tenir  sur
1, pointe d'une aiguille. C'etait la une image  assez


20


Camille  Flamm  avion .


I


fail


Itii

m


pittoresque, mais que je trouvais incomprehensible.  Eps
meme  temps,  les  conferences  religieuses  nous  montraient  1
paradis celeste, la  Trinite au sommet, les choeurs  delnf
anges  et  des  archanges,  les cherubins, les  seraphins,  le  ic
puissances,  les  dominations,  les  trones  et  toute  la  milici
celeste  celebree  dans  les  Ecritures  et  dans  I'AjDocalypse  d
Saint  Jean. Plus  tard,  la  lecture  de  la  Divine  Comedi:
du  Dante  m'a  mis  sous  les  yeux  la  mythologie  chretienn'
du  paradis,  du  purgatoire  et  de  I'enfer,  tels  qu'on  se  lei
representait au moyen-age et tels que nous les  voyon
sculptes aux portails de nos belles catliedrales, monui  n
ments d'une pieuse foi anthropomorphique et seculaire!  vl
ment  credule. Copernic,  Galilee,  Kepler,  Newton,  Laplace  tspi
d'Alenibert, Euler, Herscliel et leurs successeurs  son
venus ensuite developper sous nos regards  emerveille
I'immensite  optilente  d'un  tout  autre  ciel,  peuple  de  million
de  systemes,  de  millions  de  mondes  habitables,  en  mem^
temps que la Vie nous apparaissait sur notre  planet^
comme  la  loi  supreme  de  la  nature,  et  que  cette  mediocr
et  minuscule  planete,  si  imparfaite  a  tons  les  points  d
vue,  se  montrait  a  nous comme une coupe trop  etroit'
d'oii  la  vie  deborde  de  toutes  parts, avec  des  parasite
se  multipliant  partout  au  detriment  de  la  vie  elle-meme  i
Alors I'immensite  sans  bornes  des cieux  infinis  nous
8.tterres  par  sa  grandeur,  la  notion  de  I'eternite  a  inter
penetre celle de I'infini, et la prevision des  destinee
inconnues qui nous attendent s'est imposee a  notr
meditation comme le plus grand et le plus grave  de:
problemes,  precisement  par  I'association  de  la  psychologi
a r Astronomic. Que deviennent les ames  ?  Commen
vivent-elles  ? Ou  sont-elles  ? La  pluralite  des  existence
est  elle  le  corollaire  normal  de  la  pluralite  des  mondes  s
En 1865, un  pliilosophe  frangais, Andre  Pezzani,  laureaj
de  I'lnstitut, a  publie  ini  ouvrage {La  Pluralite  des  eoC
istences de Vdme) faisant suite dans sa pensee a  moi
ouvrage  La  Pluralite  des  ynondes  habites,  et  dans  ce  livre
au cliapitre intitule  Jean  Raynaud,  Henri  Martin,  Flam
marion,  il  presente  cette  doctrine  comme  scientifiquemen
etablie. Voila  pres de 60  ans de  cela, j'y  ai  toujour:
pense  depuis,  et  il  me  semble  que  la  demonstration  n'es


tett


1


XXXIX.]


Discours  Presidentiel.


21


•as  encore  faite.  La  reincarnation  sur  la  terra  et  sur
L'autres  mondes  est  probable  ;  niais  non  demontree  ;  il
n  est  d(j  menife  de  la  preexistence  ;  nous  existions  avant
ie  naitre  ici,  comme  nous  existerons  apres  ;  mais  la
)reuve  scientifique  n'est  pas  apportee.

Nous  sommes  tous  domines  par  nos  idees  et  nos  images
.nthropomorphiques  : I'Astronomie doit en affranchir  la
luetapsychique d'outre-tombe. Lorsque nous  envisageons
1(  le  probleme  de  la  continuation  de  la  vie  de  Fame  sur
)i  [l'autres  planetes,  nous  ne  devons  pas  nous  la  representer
11  i:n des formes humaines terrestres, car les  differences
]( liosmiques  dans  la  pesanteur,  la  densite,  les  atmospheres
(Mespirables,  les  modes  d' alimentation,  la  lumiere,  la  chaleur,
)[  es radiations diverses, interdisent la possibilite de  ces
Jf  ormes. Malgre toute notre admiration pour les  Venus
11  it  les  ApoUons  des  Musees  anciens  et  modernes,  et  pour
11  eurs  types  vivants  plus  suggestifs  encore,  nous  avons  le
et  'egret  de  penser qu'il  n'y  a  sur  les  autres  planetes  ni
CI  lommes  ni  femmes  identiques  aux  indigenes  terrestres.  II
lous est impossible de nous figurer ces  reincarnations,
lit  ^uant  a  I'existence  de  I'ame  non  incarnee,  a  I'etat  d'esprit,
t(  iuivant  immediatement  la  mort,  dans  I'atmospliere  terrestre
HI  )u  dans  I'espace  interplanetaire, il est difficile  de  nous
.a  representer  sous  forme  de  monade  sans  dimensions,  et
jertains  indices  nous  conduisent  a  admettre  qu'un  corps
jthere  fluidique  se  detache  du  corps  materiel  et  demeure
q^uelque  temps,  corps  invisible  qui  devient  perceptible  en
bertaines  conditions.

Qu'est-ce  que  la  vie  1 Qu'est-ce  que  la  mort  1
Visitant  un  jour  I'Abbaye  de  Westminster,  j'ai  lu  sur
ie  monument  eleve  a  John  Gay,  I'mscription  suivante  :

'  Life  is  a  jest ;  and  all  things  show  it.

I  thought  so  once  ;  but  now  I  know  it.

Devons-nous tous attendre comme John Gay  d'avoir
passe  de  I'autre  cote  pour  penetrer  le  mystere  de  la  vie
m  st de la mort  % N'est-ce pas, au contraire, I'une  des
ei  etudes qui nous interessent le plus a faire  ? Vous  le
pensez,  et  c'est  la  raison  d'etre  de  votre  Societe,
Dans  sa  preface  a  I'ouvrage  Love  and  Death,  Sir  WiUiam


22  Garnille  Flammarion.  [par'


Barrett  a  remarque  avec  raison  combieii  il  est  surprenani
qu'un  grand  nombre  des  instructeurs  Chretiens  desapprou
vent  les  recherches  psychiques,  sans  paraitre  comprendrJ^'
que  ces  recherches  renversent  les  fondations  du  materia'
hsme,  et  sans  reconnaitre  que  la  telepathic  demontret
par  notre  Societe,  la  transmission  de  la  pensee,  suffil
seule  a  prouver  que  I'ame  existe  independamment  dt
cerveau  materiel  et  pent,  par  consequent,  lui  survivre.

Grace  a  vos  travaux,  et  principalement  a  ceux  de  Williair
Barrett  et  de  Frederic  Myers,  les  transmissions  telepathiques
sont  irrefutablement  prouvees.  La  telepathic  est  certainei
quoique  encore  exceptionellement  etudiee,  aussi  certaine  que
I'existence  de  Londres,  de  Sirius  et  de  I'oxygene,  et  povirtani
elle  rencontre  encore  des  dissidents  qui  I'ignorent.  Elk
parait  vmiverselle,  s'exercer  meme  entre  les  hommes  et
les  animaux.  Ses  applications  dans  le  monde  mora]
seront  j)eut-etre  plus  vastes  encore  que  celles  de  la  gravita
tion  dans  le  monde  physique.  Et  tout  nous  autorise  a
affirmer  qu'elle  s'exerce  meme  entre  les  morts  et  les  viv
ants.  Dans  son  discours  du  18  Mai  1900,  Myers  lui-meme
nous  a  fait  senth  son  immense  ampleur.

Quel  est  son  mode  de  transmission  ?  Devons-nous
penser,  avec  Crookes,  que  sa  vitesse  de  propagation  egale
celle  de  la  lumiere,  avec  9  trilUons  de  vibrations  par
seconde  1  M.  Marconi  n'a-t-il  pas  dit,  recemment,  dans
son  discours  presidentiel  de  Bmningliam,  que,  d'apres
Sir  Oliver  Lodge,  la  telepathic, — sur  laquelle  il  n'a  pas
d'opinion  personnelle, — n'est  pas  due  a  des  vibrations
physiques,  a  la  fa^on  des  vagues  electriques  ?  Pour
nous,  quelle  que  soit  sa  nature,  elle  existe,  et  se  montre
independaute  de  I'espace,  et  j'ajouterai  qu'il  me  semble
qu'elle  agit,  non  pas  entre  les  cerveaux,  comme  le  croyait
le  Professeur  Flournoy,  mais  entre  les  esprits.

Sir  Oliver  Lodge  disait,  en  1892,  dans  son  Discours  au
Congres  scientifique  de  I'Association  britannique  pour
I'Avancement  des  sciences  :  "  La  grande  majorite  des
savants  est  hostile  aux  recherches  sur  les  transmissions
de  pensees,  et  deliberement  opposee  a  leur  discussion.
Et  cela  non  pas  apres  un  long  examen,  ce  qui  justifierait
I'opposition, mais souvent sans aucun examen."  Lodge


98  SI

et


tei


i


LXXXIX.j


Discours  Presidentiel.


a  parle  comme  I'avait  fait  Copernic  en  1543  dans  la
dedicace  de  son  livre  au  pape  :  "  Mathemata  mathematicis
scribuntur.  Si  fortasse  erunt  ixaTuioXoyoi  qui  cum
omnium  mathematum  ignari  sunt,  illorum  judicium  con-
temnam.  Les  verites  mathematiques  ne  peuvent  etre
jugees  que  par  les  mathematiciens.  Je  meprise  le  juge-
ment  des  matlieologues  ignorants."  ^Cliacun  ne  devrait
se  permettre  de  juger  que  les  choses  qu'il  connait.

Malgre  tant  d'obstacles,  vous  avez  fonde^  les  bases  de
la  science  ^integrale'^de  I'avenir,  car  I'univers  n'est  pas  un
as  semblage  materiel  de  mondes  inertes  et  une  combinaison
d'atomes  mecaniquement  associes,  mais  un  edifice  organise
et  regi  par  des  forces  invisibles  agissant  selon  des  lois
intelligentes.  Une  force  spiritueUe,  infinie  et  inconnais-
sable,  est  la  cause  premiere  de  toutes  les  autres  causes  ;
eUe  est  I'ame  de  I'univers  ;  mais  il  est  impossible  a  des
etres  finis  de  comprendre  I'infini.  Mens  agitat  molem,
ecrivait  Virgile  au  VI''  chant  de  I'Eneide  :  Un  principe
spirituel  anime  le  monde.  Cette  affirmation  etait  pro-
clamee  eloquemment  trente  ans  avant  la  naissance  de
Jesus -Christ.  Elle  I'avait  ete  bien  des  siecles  auparavant
par  Bouddlia  Qakya-Mouni,  par  Confucius,  j)ar  Pythagore,
dent  la  maxime  etait  Numeri  regunt  mundum.  Mais
les  apparences  materielles,  les  impressions  de  nos  sens
physiques,  incomplets  et  trompeurs,  ont  echpse  cette
verite  fondamentale,  et  nos  sciences  actuelles  instituees
sm"  I'etude  des  apparences,  depuis  I'astronomie  jusqu'a
la  chimie  et  la  physiologic,  sont  uacompletes.  Vous  les
completez.  Les  noms  de  Crookes,  de  Myers,  de  Lodge,
de  William  James,  de  Barrett,  de  Balfour,  de  Bergson,
de  Richet,  s'ajoutent  a  celui  de  Newton.

En  France,  on  travaiUe  aussi.  Des  progres  dignes  d'at-
tention  ont  ete  recemment  realises  dans  ce  pays  voisin
qui  n'est  separe  du  votre  que  par  un  etroit  canal,  inex-
istant  pour  la  telepathic.  Parmi  ces  progres  en  faveur
de  I'avancement  des  sciences  psychiques,  je  me  fais  un
devoir  et  un  plaish  de  signaler  la  fondation  de  i'lnstitut
metapsychique  international  et  la  reorganisation  de  la
Revue  spirite.  La  methode  experimentale  est  enfin
apphquee  a  la  discussion  scientifique  de  faits  trop  long-


24  Gamille  Flammarion.  [paet

temps  demeures dans I'ombre  crepusculaire  des  reves  etj  tonj'
des  illusions,  et  qui  meritent  par  leur  incontestable  realite,
d'etre  inscrits  dans  le  cadre  de  la  science  positive.

Un  ami  de  I'humanite,  M.  Jean  Meyer,  a  compris  cette
necessite  moderne,  et  c'est  a  lui  que  nous  devons  ce
double  progres.  L'lnstitvit  metapsychique  est  etabli  sous
la  haute  direction  du  savant  docteur  Gustave  Geley,
avec  la  collaboration  du  professeur  Richet,  de  M.  Santo-
liquido,  du  Comte  de  Gramont,  du  Docteur  Calmette,
et  de  plusieurs  eminents  psychistes.  La  Psychical  Society
pent  feliciter  M.  Jean  Meyer  de  cette  oeuvre,  et  emettre
le  voeu  que  I'avenir  de  ces  institutions  soit  assure  en
France  comme  elles  le  sont  en  Angleterre.

Je  pourrais  aj  outer  ici  que,  cette  annee  meme,  la
litterature  psychique  vient  d'etre  signalee  en  France  par
la  publication  des  experiences  faites  autrefois  par  Victor
Hugo.  II  y  a  longtemps  que  cette  publication  etait
attendue.  Ces  experiences  datent  de  1853,  1854,  et  1855.
Depuis  1855,  68  annees  se  sont  ecoulees,  et  38  depuis  le
depart  du  poete.  Tout  vient  a  point  a  qui  salt  attendre  ;
mais  cette  attente  a  ete  vraiment  un  peu  longue.

J'avais  donne  dans  mes  Memoires  un  avant-gout  de
ces  communications  transcendantales.  Nous  sommes  heur-
eux  de  les  voir  publiees  aujourd'hui  presque  in  extenso.
Elles  exposent  devant  nous  le  plus  inextricable  des  pro-
blemes.  Ni  la  subconscience,  ni  F auto -suggestion,  ni  la
transmission  de  pensee,  ni  I'hypothese  spirite  de  I'identite
n'en  donnent  la  solution.  On  y  entend  Eschyle,  Shake-
speare, Moliere,  Mahomet,  Moi'se,  Platon,  Socrate,  et  meme
Jesus-Christ  ;  mais  on  y  entend  aussi  la  Mort,  I'Ombre
du  Sepulcre,  I'ldee,  le  lion  d'Androcles  et  autres  entites
inexistantes.  D'admirables  inspirations  poetiques  nous  y
eblouissent.  Mais  partout  on  y  sent  I'influence  de  Victor
Hugo  qui,  pourtant,  n'a  jamais  voulu  se  mettre  a  la
table  dictant  ces  phrases  et  s'est  contente  du  role  de
secretaire.  L'editeur  de  ces  pages  mysterieuses,  M.
Gustave  Simon,  a  bien  voulu  conclure  en  citant  mon
humble  et  sincere  opinion  que  nous  ne  savons  a  peu  pres
rien  sur  la  nature  reelle  de  ces  phmomenes.

Je  me  permettrai  de  me  souvenir  que  Victor  Hugo  a


I


LXXXIX.]


Discours  Presidentiel.


25


toujours  associe  les  contemplations  astronomiques  aux
i  recherches psychiques, et qu'a la publication de  mon

premier  ouvrage  (La  Pluralite  cles  Mondes  liabites)  il
t(  m'ecrivait  de  Jersey,  le  17  decembre  1862  :  "  Les  matieres
c  que  vous  traitez  sont  la  perpetuelle  obsession  de  ma
IS  pensee,  et  I'exil  n'a  fait  qu'augmenter  en  moi  cette  medi-

tation  en  me  pla^ant  entre  deux  infinis,  1' Ocean  et  le
)■  :Ciel."

Oui,  la  pensee  franyaise  a  travaille  et  travaille  comme
y  la  pensee  anglaise  dans  la  meme  sphere  d'etudes,  et
e  actuellement  plus  que  jamais  les  esprits  soucieux  de
1  connaitre sont unis dans le meme labeur intellectuel ;

ils  preparent  en  commun  I'etablissement  de  la  science
a  nouvelle.  Partout,  dans  toute  I'Europe,  aux  Etats-Unis,
r  dans  I'Amerique  du  Sud  et  meme  en  Chine  et  au  Japon  ;
r  partout,  surtout,  depuis  cette  guerre  effroyable  et  sauvage
t  qui  a  supprime  15  millions  d'existences  liumames  et  cause

des  ruines  irrejDarables,  partout  les  pensees  fremissent  d'un
e  nouveau  reveil,  les  elevant  vers  une  ascension  spirituelle.
; Oui, nos etudes metapsychiques completent  desormais

les  investigations  astronomiques  pour  notre  connaissance
i  integrale.  Je  crois  pouvoir  formuler,  en  terminant,  quelques
•  principes  qui  me  paraissent  aussi  inattaquables  que  les
.  verites  astronomiques.

^  H"  ^

Soixante  annees  d'observations,  inter  mittentes,  mais
assez  regulierement  suivies,  de  ces  phenomenes,  m'ont
conduit  aux  deductions  suivantes  :

L'etre  humain  est  doue  de  facultes  encore  inconnues  a
la  science,  manifestees  notamment  par  les  transmissions
telepathiques,  par  la  vue  sans  les  yeux  a  distance,  par
la  vue  d'evenements  a  venir.  Ces  facultes  psychiques
formeront  un  des  chapitres  les  plus  importants  de  la
science  future.  Elles  nc  sont  pas  une  production  du
cerveau  ;  elles  sont  essentiellement  intellectuelles,  apparti-
ennent  a  I'esprit.

II  y  a  des  doubles  de  vivants.

La  pensee  est  productrice  d'images.


26


Camitle  Flammarion.


Des  coiTrants  psychiques  paraissent  traverser  I'atmo-
sphere.

Nous  vivons  au  sein  cl'un  monde  invisible.  '

Les  facultes  de  I'ame  humaine  survivent  a  la  desa- :
gregation  de  I'organisme  corporel.

Au  moment  de  la  mort,  ces  facultes  transcend antales
se  manifestent  par  un  certain  nombre  d'actes  varies,  les
uns  de  transmissions  mentales,  les  autres  de  production
de  phenomenes  physiques.  Le  passage  de  la  vie  a  la
mort  est  signale  au  loin,  soit — ce  qui  est  le  plus  frequent
— par  des  bruits  et  des  mouvements  materiels,  soit  par
des  emotions  de  I'ame.

II  y  a  des  manifestations  de  morts  et  meme  des  ap-
paritions, dont  le  mode de  production  est  a  determiner.

II  y  a  des  maisons  hantees.

Les  manifestations  de  defunts  sont  rares  et  exception-
nelles,  et  d'autant  plus  rares  que  Ton  s'eloigne  davantage
du  deces.  Malgre  leur  rarete,  un  strict  examen  ne  laisse
aucun  doute  sur  leur  realite.

La  telepathic  existe  entre  les  morts  et  les  vivants
comme  entre  les  vivants.

Les  transmissions  telepathiques  entre  vivants,  les  mani-
festations et  les  apparitions  de  mourants  ne  sont  plus
niees  que  par  ceux  qui  n'ont  pas  eu  le  temps  d'etudier
le  sujet  ou  qui  tiennent  a  les  ignorer  de  parti-pris.  II
n'en  est  pas  de  meme  des  manifestations  et  apparitions
de  morts.  Ce  scepticisme  est  excusable,  attendu  que
celles-ci  sont  plus  rares  et  moins  faciles  a  prouver.  Pour  ma
part,  j'ai  ete  longtemps  a  les  admettre,  et  je  ne  I'ai
fait  que  sur  un  ensemble  d'observations  concordantes  et
convaincantes.

II  me  semble,  nies  chers  Collegues,  que  ces  diverses
affirmations,  etablies  sur  une  longue  etude,  doivent  etre
admises  comme  scientifiquement  fondees  et  dignes  d'etre
associees  aux  connaissances  astronomiques  contemporaines.
J'ai  tenu  a  exposer  ici  tout  cet  ensemble,  persuade  que
I'epoque  actuelle  marque  une  date  importante  dans
I'histoire  de  la  philosophic.  J'ai  un  peu  abuse  de  votre
attention,  et  je  m'en  excuse  sur  I'importance  du  sujet.
Le  but  de  notre  vie  intellectuelle  a  tous,  n'est-il  pas  la


LXXXIX.]


Discours  Freside7itiel.


21


recherche  de  la  Verite  integrale  et  complete  ?  La  science
n'est  qu'a  son  aurore,  et  ses  progres  prodigieux  sont
I'indice  de  progres  prochains  plus  prodigieux  encore.  Les
generations  se  succedent,  les  decouvertes  s'ajoutent.  Re-
petons  avec  Bacon  :  Multi  pertransibunt  et  augebitur
scientia.


28


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgivick.


[part


II.

ON  HINDRANCES  AND  COMPLICATIONS  IN  TELE-
PATHIC COMMUNICATION.

By  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick.

Critics  of  the  evidence  put  forward  for  communication
from  the  dead  often  demur  not  only  to  the  frequent  fail-
ure to  get  "  messages  "  at  all,  but  to  the  confused
quality  of  the  "  messages  "  for  which  the  dead  are  sup-
posed to  be  responsible — to  the  fragmentariness  of  the
truthful  elements  in  communications  about  matters  con-
cerning which  the  alleged  communicator  must,  it  would
seem,  be  well  informed,  and  the  amount  of  irrelevant
matter  and  actual  error  in  which  the  truthful  elements
are  liable  to  be  imbedded.  "  Why,"  say  the  critics,
"  cannot  the  dead,  if  they  communicate  at  all,  say  what,
they  mean."

Now  it  is  very  difficult  to  obtain  adequate  evidence  of
communication  from  the  dead,  and  many  reasons  may  be
urged  for  caution  in  the  acceptance  of  alleged  communica-
tions as  genuine.  But  the  confused  quality  of  many
of  the  supposed  "  messages  "  when  received  is  not  one  of
these  reasons.  Communication  from  the  dead  is  presum-
ably of  the  same  nature  as  telepathic  communication
between  the  living,  and  similar  confusion  is  exhibited  in
what  appear  to  be  indubitable  instances  of  the  latter.
I  do  not  think  that  anyone  experienced  in  psychical
research  doubts  this.  But  it  has  occurred  to  me  that  an
examination  of  cases  of  telepathy  between  the  living,
from  the  pomt  of  view  of  imperfection  of  transmission,
might  be  interesting  and  might  throw  light  on  the  process
of  telepathy.  Particular  cases  have  often  been  com-
mented on,  but  I  do  not  think  they  have  been  collected
and  compared.


:l  Lxxxix.]  Tele.pathic  Comnmnication.  29

A  soi  disant  Myers  communicating  through  Mrs.  Hol-
land's automatic  writing,  once  said,  "  The  nearest  simile
I  can  find  to  express  the  difficulties  of  sending  a  message
— is  that  I  appear  to  be  standing  behind  a  sheet  of  frosted
glass — which  blurs  sight  and  deadens  sound — and  dictating
feebly — to  a  reluctant  and  somewhat  obtuse  secretary."  ^
This  analogy  from  indistinct  perception  and  consequent
misinterpretation  of  impressions  derived  through  the
senses,  is  as  applicable  to  telepathic  communications  be-
!  tween  the  living  as  it  is  to  supposed  communications
from  the  dead.  But  what  I  want  to  examine  as  far  as
possible,  is  what  part  of  the  failure,  when  a  telepathic
message  is  incompletely  transmitted,  is  due  to  what  we
may  call  the  sheet  of  frosted  glass — that  is,  the  inherent
difficulty  in  the  passage  of  an  idea  from  one  mind  to
another  without  the  use  of  the  senses — what  to  the  feeble
dictation — that  is,  want  of  power  in  the  agent — and  what
to  the  reluctance  or  obtuseness  of  the  secretary — that  is,
obstacles  in  the  percipient's  own  mind.

As  regards  the  frosted  glass — some  hindrance  to  free
transmission  between  two  individuals,  A  and  B,  there
must  be  so  long  as  they  retain  their  individuality.  If
there  were  no  barrier  A  and  B  would  be  merged  into  one.
But  I  may  say  at  once  that  I  do  not  think  we  have
evidence  of  obstruction,  apart'  from  A  and  B  themselves
(as  we  should  have,  for  instance,  if  the  transmission  were
a  physical  phenomenon  like  the  passage  of  light).  If  we
stick  to  our  analogy,  the  "  sheet  of  frosted  glass  "  must
symbolize  the  aggregate  difficulties  due  to  the  minds,
embodied  or  unembodied,  of  agent  and  percipient  and
cannot  be  studied  separately  from  these.  The  one  piece
of  evidence  suggesting  obstruction  outside  the  two  minds
is  the  apparent  influence  of  the  spatial  relation  between
agent  and  percipient  in  some  telepathic  experiments —
experiments  when  agent  and  percipient  are  in  different
rooms  succeeding  less  well  than  when  they  are  together. ^

^Proceedings,  Vol.  XXI.,  p.  230.

2  Examples  of  this  will  be  found  in  the  Brighton  experiments  reported
in  Proceedings,  Vol.  VI.  and  VIII.  ■  For  discussion  of  it  see  Vol.  VI.,
pp.  156,  157,  aiia  Vol.  VIII.,_p.  544,


30


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgioick.


[part


This  is  undou1)tedly  a  fact  in  certain  cases,  whatever  the
explanation.  In  other  experimental  cases,  however,  dis-
tance appears  to  be  no  hindrance,  nor  does  it,  so  far  as
we  know,  affect  spontaneous  telepathy,  and  I  am  disposed
to  think  that  in  experiments  where  it  does  operate  ad-
versely this  is  diie  to  a  subjective  effect  in  the  mind  of
agent  or  percipient  or  both,  arising  perhaps  from  self
suggestion  or  the  lack  of  necessary  exciting  stimulus.

Practically  our  investigation  will  then  be  confined  to
what  we  can  learn  about  the  telepathic  process  in  the
minds  of  agent  and  percipient.  As  regards  the  latter,
there  are  some  preliminary  remarks  to  make  before  pro-
ceeding to  telepathic  cases.

We  shall  find  that  an  important  difficulty  in  the  em-
ergence of  an  idea  telepathically  conveyed,  appears  to  lie
in  the  passage  of  the  idea  from  one  stratum,  as  we  may
call  it,  of  the  percipient's  mind  to  another.  My  readers
will  doubtless  grant  me  the  existence  of  these  strata  and
will  admit  that  often,  and  probably  always,  there  are  in
us  two  or  more  streams  of  memory  and  intelligent  mental
action  existmg  concurrently,  which  are  more  or  less  sepa-
rate and  more  or  less  independent  of  one  another,  though
ideas  may  pass  from  one  to  the  other.  Any  such  stream
of  which  our  ordinary  waking  consciousness  is  not  at  a
given  moment  aware,  may  be  spoken  of  as  at  that
moment  subliminal  to  it.  We  get  gliiiipses  of  double
mentation  at  work  in  dreams,  in  automatic  writing,  in
sensory  hallucinations  such  as  crystal  visions,  in  hypnotism,
and  otherwise.  Assuming  this  granted  I  need  not  here
go  into  the  evidence  for  it.  This  will  be  found  in  many
papers  in  our  Proceedings  and  elsewhere.  The  problems
about  the  nature  of  human  personality  suggested  by
these  divisions  of  consciousness  are  of  course  of  great
importance,  but  do  not  concern  us  at  this  moment,  and
for  simplicity  I  want  to  avoid  them  as  far  as  possible.

What  I  want  to  show  is  that  in  emerging  from  a
sublimmal  stratum  an  idea  or  intention  may  be  distorted
or  curtailed  ;  and  it  will  be  best  to  show  this  in  the  first
instance  in  cases  where  there  is  no  question  of  telepathy.
Examples may be found among interesting  experiments


LXXXIX.]


Tele pathic  Communication .


31


i described  by  Gurney  in  Proceedings,  Vols.  IV.  and  V.^
and  by  F.  W.  H.  Myers  in  Proceedings,  Vol.  VIII. ,^  though
in  neither  case  were  the  experiments  tried  exactly  with  a  view

I  to  throwing  light  on  the  question  now  before  us.  In  the
particular  experiments  I  am  about  to  quote,  ideas  were
impressed  on  persons  in  hypnosis,  who  were  found  on
being  immediately  awakened  to  have  no  conscious  recol-
lection of  the  said  ideas.  Gurney's  subjects  while  hyp-
notised  were instructed to write with a planchette  a

i!  prescribed  sentence  or  sometimes  a  line  rhyming  to  a
given  one.  After  waking,  their  hand  having  been  placed
on  the  planchette,  which  was  screened  from  their  eyes,
they  were  set  to  read  aloud — the  idea  given  to  the  hyp-
notic consciousness  emerging  meanwhile  in  planchette
writing.  In  Myers'  experiments  a  post-hjrpnotic  crystal
vision  was  prescribed  and  duly  experienced.  In  one  case,
therefore,  the  idea  emerged  in  motor,  and  in  the  other  in
sensory  automatism.  In  some  of  Gurney's  experiments
the  readmg  aloud  did  not  seem  to  interfere  with  the
performance  of  the  task  set  to  the  subliminal  self,  but
in  others  there  was  some  mutual  interference  ;  the  following
is  a  case  in  point.

P — 11  was  told  several  times  [in  hypnosis]  '  It  has  left
off  snowing  '  ;  and  then,  when  woke  and  set  to  planchette,
he  was  made  to  read  aloud.  The  writing  which  appeared
was,

It  has  Ifeft  sn

and  while  this  was  proceeding,  the  reading  was  bad  and
stumbling.  When  the  writing  stopjied,  the  reading  became
appreciably  more  correct  and  fluent.  Re-hjrpnotisation
afforded  a  glimpse  of  the  condition  in  which  the  secondary
intelligence  had  found  itself.  Asked  what  he  had  been
doing,  the  'subject'  rephed,  "Trying  to  write  'it  has
left  off  snowing.'  "  Asked  i£  he  had  been  reading,  he
said,  "  Reading  !  No,  I  haven't  been  reading,"  and  added,
"something  seemed  to  disturb  me." "How  was  that?"

^Peculiarities  of  certain  Post-Hypnotic  States,  Proc,  Vol  IV.,  p.  268
and  Recent  Experiments  in  Hypnotism,  Proc,  Vol.  V.,  p.  3.

^  The  Subliminal  Consciousness,  Chap.  V.,  Proc,  Vol.  VIII.,  p.  436.


32


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgivick.


[PAET


"  Something  seemed  to  keep  moving  about  in  front  of  me,
so  I  got  back  into  bed  agam."  "  Didn't  Mr.  Gurney  hold  a
book  and  make  you  read  aloud  ?  "  "  No,  somebody  kept
movmg  about.  I  didn't  Uke  the  looks  of  them.  Kept
wandering  to  and  fro.  Horrible,  awful !  I  thought  to
myself  '  I'll  get  into  bed.'  It  looked  so  savage — quite
mmerved  me,"  etc.,  etc. (P/oc,  Vol.  IV.,  p.  319.)

Here  we  have  an  illustration  of  a  train  of  thought  and
action  impressed  on  the  hypnotic  stratum  of  the  mind,
working  itself  out,  but  in  an  imperfect  manner,  when
that  stratum  (on  awaking  from  hypnosis)  has  become
subliminal.  The  waking  intelligence  knows  nothing  of  it
unless  and  until  it  is  shown  the  automatic  writing  that
has  been  produced  without  its  participation.  It  has  been
aware,  however,  of  some  disturbing  element,  some  inter-
ruption to  its  own  proceedings.  On  re-hypnotisation,  it
is  found  that  the  intelligence  which  has  been  writing,
now  no  longer  subliminal,  has  been  still  more  aware  of
disturbance,  thoiigh  unconscious  of  the  action  of  the
waking  intelligence  which  has  produced  it.  We  have
not  here  any  reception  of  a  message  from  the  subliminal
stratum  to  the  sujiraliminal  except  through  the  automatic
writing,  but  we  have  evidence  of  mutual  interference
between  the  two  strata  working  independently.  This  may
have  been  due  only  to  the  two  sections  of  the  mind
having  simultaneously  to  use  a  common  organism  to
express  themselves.  It  seems  possible  that  it  was  the
movement  of  the  print  before  the  eyes,  or  rather  of  the
eyes  along  the  lines  of  print,  that  produced  in  the  sub-
liminal seK,  unaware  of  the  reading  aloud,  the  night-
mare-ish  impression  of  the  disturbance.

In  Myers's  experiments  we  also  have  the  two  strata  at
work,  but  as  it  were  in  co-operation,  not  antagonism.
As  in  Gurney's  experiment,  an  impression  with  instruction
as  to  action  is  given  in  hypnosis  to  that  mental  stratum
which,  as  soon  as  the  hypnotised  person  is  awakened,
becomes  subliminal.  But  the  action  prescribed  does  not
involve  outward  bodily  action  like  the  writing.  The
subliminal  is told to produce a  visual  hallucination,  a


LXXXIX.]


Telepathic  Communication.


33


crystal  vision/  representing  a  subject  described  to  it.
This  duly  occurs  and  the  waking  intelligence  without
knowuig  the  origin  of  the  picture  has  to  observe
and  interpret  it.  Myers  writes  {Proc.  Vol.  VIII.,
p.  460)  :

"  Next  time  I  suggested  [in  hypnosis]  a  hippojmtamus — an
animal  which  P.  had  never  seen  m  the  flesh.  On  being
awakened  he  saw  on  the  card  what  he  called  a  rhinoceros.
He  complamed  that  it  was  rather  indistinct ;  he  was  not
sure  whether  it  had  horns  or  tusks.  There  is  a  certain
interest  m  this  as  indicating  that  the  haUucination  was
founded  upon  a  mental  picture  suggested  by  my  words,
rather  than  on  the  words  themselves.  One  might  have
supposed  that,  since  my  whole  suggestion  consisted  of  the
word  hippopotamus,  the  awakened  subject,  however  vaguely
he  saw  the  beast,  would  have  knowTi  that  it  was  meant
for  a  hippopotamus.  But  the  picture,  vague  as  it  was,
seemed  to  be  more  communicable  from  the  hypnotic  to
the  suprahminal  self  than  the  word  which  had  originally
generated  it.  A  picture  was  what  had  been  ordered  and
a  picture  came." [Proc,  VIII.,  ^5.  460.)

I  next  told  P.  (hypnotised)  the  story  of  Robinson
Crusoe  finding  the  foot-print  and  fearing  savages.  .  .  .
Awakened  and  set  before  the  glass  of  water,  P.  at  once
exclaimed,  "  Why,  there's  Buffalo  Bill  !  He's  dressed  in
feathers,  and  skuis  rormd  him ;  almost  hke  a  savage.
He's  walldng  about  in  a  waste  place.  ...  I  can  see
something  else  coming  from  another  part, — it's  a  blackie.
.  .  .  Look  at  them  now,  how  they're  arguing !  Buffalo
BiU  and  his  black  man."  .  .  .

Observe  that  .  .  .  the  footmark,  which  was  the  point
on  which  I  had  chiefly  dwelt,  was  not  observed.
... P. had read Eobinson Crusoe  ; but Buffalo  BiU

^  I  call  it  crystal  vision  as  the  hallucinations  were  of  the  natvire  of
visions  in  a  crystal ;  but  in  the  eases  quoted,  what  was  actually  aimed
at  and  obtained  was  in  one  ease  a  hallucinatory  picture  on  a  blank
card,  and  in  the  other  a  moving  picture  in  a  glass  of  water.

V


34  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick.  [part'

was  plainly  fresher  in  his  memory.^  Proc,  Vol.  VIII.,
p.  461.

In  the  first  of  these  two  experiments  by  Myers,  we
have  indistinctness  in  the  picture  evolved  and  transmitted
to  the  sujDraliminal  intelligence — probably  owing  to  in-
distinctness in  the  idea  which  reached  the  hypnotic
consciousness,  for  I  do  not  think  Myers's  idea  of  a
hippopotamus  would  hive  been  distmct,  and  the  percipient
was  not  acquainted  with  the  animal.  In  the  second
experiment  the  hallucinatory  vision  seems  to  have  been
distinct  as  far  as  it  went,  though  not  apparently  com-
pletely representing  the  scene  prescribed.  In  both  the
"  message  "  which  reaches  the  supraliminal  intelligence  is
misinterpreted  by  it,  for  in  the  first  it  did  not  mean  a
rhinoceros  and  in  the  second  it  did  not  mean  Buffalo  Bill

I  have  assumed  that  the  misunderstanding  was  supra-
liminal. It  is,  however,  conceivable  that  it  occurred
subliminally.  The  idea  derived  by  the  hypnotic  stratum
from  Myers's  words  7nay  have  been  m  the  first  case  a
rhinoceros  and  in  the  second  Buffalo  Bill.  But  in  these
particular  instances — at  any  rate  the  second — I  think  it
highly  improbable  that  there  was  subliminal  misunder
standing  of  what  Myers  said.  The  hippopotamus  impres
sion  was  perhaps  too  vague  to  be  worth  discussing  from
this  point  of  view,  for  the  same  picture  might  have  come
if  Myers  had  said  "  rhinoceros  "  and  therefore  if  the'
subliminal  had  wrongly  understood  "  rhinoceros."  But'
the  idea  "  Buffalo  Bill  "  by  itself  would  I  think  have
produced  a  different  picture,  and  one  less  appropriate  to
Robinson  Crusoe  than  that  produced  by  Myers's  story.

I think  then that these cases (and others might  be
quoted) sufficiently indicate that an idea, even  when
successfully impressed on one stratum of  consciousness
is  liable  to  get  distorted  before  it  emerges  in  another,  at
any  rate  when  the  transmission  is  effected  by  means  of

1  "  Buffalo  Bill"  was  an  American,  touring  the  counti-y  at  this  time
with  a  show  representing  the  Wild  West  of  America — a  show  which  was
having  a  great  success  in  this  country.

Both  the  above  experiments  are  quoted  by  Myers  in  Human  Person
alily,  and  the  first  is  quoted  also  in  Proceedings,  Vol.  XIII.  p.  59.3.


i


:a[


"  Lxxxix.]  Telepathic  Communication.  35

^  what  Myers  calls  sensory  or  motor  automatism.  And  I
think  we  may  add  that  if  an  idea  reaches  the  waking
f(  consciousness  by  such  means,  it  is  practically  certain  that
ed  it  has  been  transmitted  from  a  subliminal  stratum.  In
J,  automatic  writing,  at  any  rate  when  not  followed  at  the
i  time  by  the  waking  consciousness, ^  this  is  plainly  so,  for  the
1  intelhgence  using  the  hand  is  subliminal  at  the  moment,
nt  so  that  if  the  writing  contains  ideas  not  in  the  supra-

i  liminal  stratum,  they  must  issue  from  the  subliminal.
eiiJhat  the  same  is  true  in  the  case  of  ideas  expressed
J  through  sensory  automatism — say  a  hallucinatory  vision —
lijiis  hardly  less  obvious. For  a  vision  which  is  first  seen

ii  and  then  independently  interpreted  by  the  supraliminal
i  consciousness,  must  have  been  made  up,  so  to  speak,
]]  subliminally.  The  supraliminal  intelligence  is  not  aware
a.  that  such  a  hallucination  is  being  constructed  until  it
;(  perceives  it.

I  All  this  we  shall  have  to  take  into  account  in  examining
j  the  hindrances  encountered  by  telepathic  messages.  It  is
5(  possible  that  all  telepathic  communication  from  outside
j  first  reaches  a  subliminal  stratum  of  consciousness  and
,j  therefore  has  to  run  the  gauntlet  of  passage  from  one
,j  stratum  to  another  before  the  supraliminal  consciousness
J  is  aware  of  it.  That  it  has  to  do  so  when  it  emerges
jj  through  sensory  or  motor  automatism  is  I  think  certain.
[i(  It  is  worth  noting  that  we  are  more  accustomed  than
III  we  sometimes  remember  to  a  want  of  complete  under-
ff  (Standing  between  two  parts  of  our  minds  even  when  there
t(  is  no  question  of  any  abnormal  state. When,  for  instance,

in  writing  a  letter,  we  write  "  there  "  for  "  their,"  it  is
55  not  because  we  do  not  know  which  we  mean,  or  how  to
;i  spell  what  we  do  mean.  It  must  be  because  the  part  of
;5  our  mind  occupied  with  the  spelling  is  attending  to  the
jl  idea  of  the  sound,  and  not  to  the  idea  of  the  meaning,
oj  This  seems  to  imply  a  subliminal  element  in  the  ordinary

operation  of  writing,  which  is  co-operating  imperfectly
j  with  the  waking  intelligence.

1  The  extent  to  which  in  automatic  writing  the  waking  intelligence
'  Df  the  aiitomatist  is  aware  of  what  is  being  written  varies  throutrh
ilmost  all  possible  degrees.


36  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwich.  [part

Before  concluding  these  preliminary  observations  and  turn-
ing to  particular  cases  of  apparent  obstruction  in  telepathic
messages,  I  must  remark  on  a  very  important  difference
in  the  evidence  possible  for  telepathic  messages  from  the
dead,  and  similar  messages  from  the  living.  In  the
latter  we  not  only  know  the  message  received,  but  in
some  cases  (such  as  experimental  ones)  have  independent
knowledge  of  the  message  sent  ;  and  in  others  (such  as
apparitions  at  the  time  of  the  death  of  the  person  seen)
at  any  rate  know  independently  of  some  coinciding  crisis
in  the  supposed  sender's  state.  And  in  fact  the  coinci
dence  between  the  message  and  what  we  know  of  the
supposed  agent  at  the  time,  constitutes  a  very  important
part  of  the  evidence  for  telepathy.  But  in  the  case  of
messages  from  the  dead  we  can  have  no  independent
means  of  knowing  what  passes  on  the  supposed  agent's
side.  All  we  know  is  the  message  as  received,  and  we'
can  only  judge  from  this  whether  a  message  was  really
sent  and  what  its  contents  were.

Even  in  messages  from  the  living  we  cannot  tell  whether
the  message  emerges  in  a  truncated,  or  distorted,  or
otherwise  altered  form,  unless  we  know  exactly  what
message  was  sent  ;  and  this  we  can  seldom  know  except
in  experimental  cases.  It  is  chiefly,  therefore,  to  ex
perimental  cases  that  I  shall  refer  in  this  paper.  No
experiments  have,  so  far  as  I  know,  been  tried  with  a
view  to  discovering  to  what  kind  of  alterations  messages
are  liable — mdeed  it  is  difficult  to  see  how  such  experi
ments  could  be  carried  out — we,  therefore,  have  to  ex-
amine those  tried  with  the  object  of  ascertaining  the
existence  of  telepathy.  '

I  shall  illustrate  what  I  have  to  say  chiefly  from  the
following  series  of  experiments  pubhshed  in  our  Pro-
ceedings.

T.  Those  made  by  Mr.  Guthrie  and  friends  of  his  with

Miss R and  Miss E as percipients  and

published  in  Proc,  Vol.  I.,  pp.  263-283  ;  Vol.  II.,
pp.  24-42,  pp.  189-200  ;  Vol.  III.,  pp.  424-452
(see  also  Phantasms  of  the  Living  and  Myers's
Human  Personality).


isi:


m


fei
lea
mis

|I0

p
lit

'flT

fur]
ftoi
»«
list


j,i  Lxxxix.]  Telepathic  Communication.  37

111. II.  Mr. and Mrs. Newnham's experiments,  Proc,  Vol.

III.,  pp. 7-23 (see  also  Phantasms  of  the  Living
icf  and Myers's Human  Personality).

he  III.  Experiments  by  Messrs.  SclimoU  and  Mabire,  Proc,
he  Vol.  v.,  pp.  169-215.

in IV.  Experiments by Dr. von Schrenck-Notzing,  Proc,

Vol.  VII.,  pp.  3-22.
as V.  Experiments at Brighton in which I was  myself
ju]  concerned. Two series, Proc, Vol. VI.,  pp.

sis!  128-170,  and  Vol.  VIII.,  pp.  536-596.

(jj.  j  VI.  Mr.  Rawson's  experiments,  Proc,  Vol.  XI.,  pp.  2-17.
lie  i  VII.  Miss  Tipping's  experiments,  Proc,  Vol.  XXVII.,
lit'  pp.  415-457.

qI  VIII.  Prof.  Gilbert  Murray's  experiments,  Proc,  Vol.  XXIX,
at  pp.  46-110.

t'j  In  all  of  these  except  V.  agents  and  percipients  were
(Pj  iwake  and  apparently  in  their  normal  state  of  conscious-
lll  aess. In  V.  the  percipients  were  hypnotised.

In  II.  though  both  agent  and  percipient  were  in  posses-
if[  don  of  their  normal  consciousness  during  the  experiments,
Q[  'Aie  response  of  the  percipient  to  unseen  questions  was
jt  3xpressed  in  automatic  writing  of  the  purport  of  which
pj  ihe  was  as  a  rule  unaware  until  she  read  it  afterwards.
,j.  For  the  sake  of  clearness  and  brevity  I  do  not  propose
iij  30  discuss  the  evidence  for  the  operation  of  telepathy
J  .n  the  cases  quoted,  but  shall  assume  that  the  precautions
p;  jaken  to  exclude  the  conveyance  to  the  percipient  of  the
(j,  desired  impression  through  the  senses  were  adequate.
J.  Readers  who  wish  to  know  what  the  precautions  were
1j(  lnust in each case refer to the paper in  Proceedings

3^uoted  from.  But  I  must  warn  my  readers  against
Ijj  regarding  the  experiments  I  shall  quote  as  intended  to
„,  present  an  evidentially  convincing  case  for  the  existence

Df  telepathy.  They  are  selected  with  an  entirely  different
{I  object,  and  the  best  and  most  startling  successes  in  trans-
it "erring  ideas  and  images,  would  often  be  useless  for  my
I  3urpose.  The  mere  fact  that  the  idea  gets  through
jj  Dromptly and completely and without perceptible  inter-

nediate stages, prevents any light bemg thrown  on

jbstacles  that  may  have  been  overcome.


1

38  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgivick.  [pAKTj  ^'^

On  the  other  hand  the  cases  where  the  "  message  "
does  not  get  through  at  all,  and  the  percipient  receives
no  conscious  impression  concerning  it,  are  also,  as  a  rule,
useless  for  our  present  purpose,  for  they  do  not  reveal
where  the  obstacle  is.

A  distinction  must  be  drawn,  however,  between  cases
where  a  particular  would-be  agent,  or  a  particular  would-
be  percipient  fails  persistently,  and  the  cases  where,  with
apparently  unchanged  conditions,  failures  occur  in  the
midst  of  successes.  In  the  former  telepathic  incapacity  in
agent  or  percipient  would  account  for  failure,  but  not  in
the  latter.  And  one  would  expect  in  failures  amid
successes,  to  be  able  to  discover  the  difference  in  con-
ditions which  must  exist  and  be  the  cause  of  failure.
Practically,  however,  little  or  nothing  has  been  done  in  |
this  direction  as  yet.  These  failures  amidst  successes
remain  unaccountable  and  are  at  present  of  no  assistance
in  our  present  quest.  And  the  same  is  I  think  true  of
another  class  of  case,  still  more  difficult  to  explain —
those  in  which  the  percipient  does  have  an  impression
which  to  him  has  all  the  appearance  of  being  veridical,
but  which  is  in  fact  entirely  wrong.  In  the  Brighton
experiments  it  was  noticed  that  some  expectation  of  success
seemed  required  to  produce  any  impression — wrong  or
right.  At  any  rate,  in  sets  of  experiments  where  agent
and  percipient  were  separated  by  a  greater  distance  than
usual  (which,  as  already  said  (see  p.  29 )  for  some  reason
hindered  success),  the  absence  of  any  impression  was  more
frequent  than  in  unsuccessful  sets  with  agent  and  per-
cipient together.

Impressions  are  sometimes  accompanied  by  a  feeling  of
the  operation  of  some  sort  of  influence,  the  absence  of
which  may  be  noticed  by  the  percipient  when  the  "  mess-
age "  does  not  get  through.  When  this  happens  it  seems
possible  that  the  want  of  success  is  due  to  the  agent
faihng  to  give  the  message  some  necessary  impulsive
quality.  What  I  mean  is  well  described  by  Sir  Oliver
Lodge  in  discussing  experiments  with  Mr.  Guthrie's  sub-
jects. Miss  E.  and  Miss  R. He  says :


(tc-
lestii

J


I  re
Ir.


I


jXxxix.]  Telepathic  Communication.  39

With  regard  to  the  feehngs  of  the  percipients  when
receiving  an  impression,  they  seem  to  have  some  sort  of
consciousness  of  the  action  of  other  minds  on  them  ;  and
once  or  twice,  when  not  so  conscious,  have  complained
that  there  seemed  to  be  '  no  power  '  or  anjrthing  acting,
and  they  not  only  received  no  impression,  but  did  not
feel  as  if  they  were  going  to.  .  .  .  They  both  say  that
several  objects  appear  to  them  sometimes,  but  that  one
among  them  persistently  recurs,  and  that  they  have  a
feeling  when  they  fix  upon  one,  that  it  is  the  right  one.
Sometimes  they  seem  quite  certain  that  they  are  right.
Sometimes  they  are  very  uncertain,  but  still  right.  Occa-
sionally Miss  E.  has  been  pretty  confident  and  j^et  quite
wrong. Proc,  Vol.  II.,  p.  200.

It  would  be  interesting  to  know  whether  the  nature  of
he  percipient's  impression — visual,  auditory,  or  mere  idea,
;tc. — depends  on  the  agent.  It  depends  partly  on  sug-
gestion and  expectation,  and  no  doubt  partly  on  the
jercipient's  habit  of  mind  ;  but  is  there  also  some  effect
produced  directly  though  unintentionally  by  the  agent,
md  which  would  vary  vt^ith  different  agents  ?  In  the
Brighton  experiments,  one  of  the  percipients — T. — made
I  remark  which  may  be  instructive  on  this  point.  With
tfr.  Smith  as  agent  trying  to  transfer  numbers,  T.'s
mpressions,  whether  right  or  wrong,  were  generally
owing  I  think  to  our  suggestion)  visual,  though  he
sometimes  complained  of  the  numbers  being  "  such  a  long
way  off  that  you  can  hardly  see  them."  But  when  Mx.
Myers  or  Dr.  Leaf  took  the  part  of  agent — in  which,
jxperimenting  with  T.,  they  were  entirely  unsuccessful —
r.,  when  asked  whether  he  saw  or  heard  the  number
le  named,  said  "  No,  I  seem  to  imagine  it  "  {Proc.  Vol.
VI.,  p.  161).  The  non -success  of  these  agents  makes  it,
lowever,  improbable  that  their  influence  had  any  direct
jffect  in  producing  this  result.  It  is  more  likely  that
r.'s  subliminal  represented  to  him  in  this  way  the  absence
telepathic  influence.

If  we  turn  now  to  particular  telepathic  experiments,  and
look  first for light on  the  agent's  part  in  the  process,


40


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick.


[part


something  can  perhaps  be  learnt  from  cases  where  two
or  more  agents  acting  simultaneously  produce  a  mixed'
effect,  or  when  an  involuntary  idea  of  one  of  them  seems
to  confuse  or  supersede  the  impression  it  was  intended
to  convey.  The  following  case  illustrates  such  superseding.
I  give  an  abstract  of  Sir  Ohver  Lodge's  report  in  Proc,
Vol.  II.,  p.  198,  concerning  an  experiment  with  Mr.  Gutlirie's
percipients  :

Agents  : — 0  J.  L.,  Dr.  Herdman,  Miss  R  d,  Miss  R.

Percipient,  Miss  E.  Object,  "  a  teapot  cut  out  of  silver
paper.''  (Contact.)

Miss  E.  [said]  "  Something  hght  .  .  .  No  colour  .  .  .
Looks  like  a  duck.  .  .  .  Like  a  silver  duck.  .  .  .  Something
oval  .  .  .  Head  at  one  end,  and  tail  at  the  other "...
She  drew  a  rude  and  perverted  copy  of  the  teapot,  but
"  didn't  loiow  what  it  was  unless  it  was  a  duck."

Dr.  Herdman  then  explained  that  he  had  been  thinking
aU  the  time  how  like  a  duck  the  original  teapot  was.

It  may  be  objected  that  as  Dr.  Herdman  had  no
intention  of  transferring  his  irrelevant  idea  of  a  duck  to
the  percipient  and  there  was  therefore  no  voluntary
effort  to  project  it,  he  cannot  have  been  the  effective
agent.  This  raises  the  whole  question  of  the  efficacy
of  voluntary  effort,  and  it  is  a  difficult  question.  We
can  say  at  once  that  voluntary  effort  is  at  any  rate
not  always  necessary.  For  instance  in  the  series  of
experiments  carried  out  by  Mr.  Wales  and  Miss  Samuels  (see
Proc,  Vol.  XXXI.,  pp.  124-217),  the  agent  Mr.  Wales  made
no  effort  to  transfer  any  particular  ideas.  Miss  Samuels,
however,  had  impressions  corresponding  unmistakably  to
thoughts  of  Mr.  Wales  or  events  in  which  he  was  con-
cerned. The  activity  and  effort  here  seem  to  have  been
entirely  on  the  percipient's  side.  The  same  apjjarently
happens  in  some  non-experimental  cases.  Compare  for
instance  a  case  in  which  Mrs.  Verrall  was  apparently  the
agent,  described  in  Proc,  Vol.  XXVI.,  p.  44-46.  It  is
too  long  to  quote  in  full  here,  but  Mrs.  Verrall  sums  up
her  account  of  it  by  saying  that  it  is  "I  think,  indispu-
table  that they [her daughter and a cousin,  who  were


LXXXIX.]


Telepathic  Commimication .


41


table  tilting]  tapped  thoughts  of  mine  which  I  had
dehberately  refrained  from  commmiicatmg  to  them."  On
the  other  hand  in  IVIr.  and  IMi's.  Newnham's  experi-
ments the  questions  which  of  course  he  mtended  she
should  apprehend  though  she  had  no  normal  access
to  them,  reached  her  almost  without  fail.  But  answers
unknown  to  her,  which  might  have  been  got  out
of  his  mind,  only  appeared  in  her  script  in  a  very  sHght
and  fragmentary  way.  Is  it  possible  that  he  inhibited
ithem — not  voluntarily,  but  because  they  were  Masonic
secrets,  and  thus  as  it  were  locked  up  in  his  mind  ?
Intentional  agency  at  any  rate  serves  to  mark  a  par-
ticular idea  in  the  agent's  mind,  and  to  associate  it  with
the  percipient,  and  it  is  possible  that  this  makes  it  more
available  to  the  latter,  even  if  voluntary  effort  on  the
1  agent's  part  has  httle  effect.

Returning  for  a  moment  to  the  duck  and  the  teapot,  we
must  not  ignore  the  possibility  that  Dr.  Herdman  contributed
little  or  nothmg  to  the  result.  The  percipient  may  have  been
struck  with  the  resemblance  of  her  impression  to  a  duck
independently,  though  if  so  the  idea  of  "  teapot  "  was
apparently  entirely  obhterated  by  that  of  "  duck."  In
a  case  of  Professor  Gilbert  Murray's,  however,  the  per-
cipient must  have  caught  by  mistake  an  irrelevant  idea
of  a  lady  present.  He  got  the  impression  of  "  kangaroos  "
when,  as  she  thereupon  reported, ^  she  had  been  thinking
that  a  kangaroo  or  a  bear  with  a  visiting  book  (the  idea
came  from  Punch)  would  be  a  good  subject  for  experiment.
The  actual  scene the  idea  of  which  it  was  intended  to

transfer was "  Mr. L beating an egg at  Siena."

[Proc,  Vol.  XXIX.,  p.  98,  Exp.  66).

I  have  already  suggested  that  telepathic  messages  first
reach  the  percipient  subhminally. Erom  analogy  it  is  not
unlikely  that  it  is  in  a  subHminal  part  of  the  agent's
mind also that the eiiective action in telepathy  takes
If place. If  so  we  can  see  that  somehow  the  spontaneous

^  1  It  is  of  course  an  evidential  weakness,  in  the  case  of  both  duck  and
f kangaroo,  that  the  supposed  agent's  idea  was  not  mentioned  till  after

the  percipient  had  spoken. At  the  same  time  a  pseudo -memory  does

not  seem  probable  in  either  case.


42  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick.  [part

subliminal  impulses  conveying  the  ideas  "  Duck  "  and
"  Kangaroo  "  in  the  experiments  just  described  may  have
been  more  powerful  or  more  accessible  to  the  percipient
than  the  deliberate  impulses  conveying  the  ideas  intended.

The  complication  of  simultaneous  transference  of  different
ideas  by  different  agents,  or  the  transference  of  two  ideas
from  the  same  agents,  does  not  necessarily  produce  con-
fusion. Sir  Oliver  Lodge  tried  two  experiments  illustrating
this.  The  following  are  accounts  of  them  abstracted  from
his  records  :

Li  one  {Proc,  Vol.  II.,  p.  196)  two  agents  were  set  to
look  at  different  drawings — a  square  and  a  cross  like  an
X — ^neither  Isnowitig  Avhat  the  other  was  looking  at.  The
percipient  Miss  R.,  who  did  not  know  that  anything
unusual  was  being  tried,  said,  "I  see  things  moving
about  ...  I  seem  to  see  two  things  ...  I  see  first  one
up  there  and  then  one  down  there  ...  I  don't  know
which  to  draw  ...  I  can't  see  either  distinctly."  Told
anyhow  to  draw  what  she  had  seen,  she  drew  first  a
square,  and  then  said,  "  Then  there  was  the  other  thing
as  well  .  .  .  afterwards  they  seemed  to  go  into  one,"
and  she  drew  a  cross  inside  the  square  from  corner  to
corner,  addmg  afterwards,  "  I  don't  know  what  made  me
put  it  inside."

In  the  second  the  object  was  a  tetrahedron  outline  rudely
drawn  m  projection — a  triangle  with  Imes  from  the  angles
meeting  in  the  middle  (Proc,  Vol.  II.,  p.  199).  The
percipient  Miss  E.  said  "  Is  it  another  triangle  "  [A
triangle  had  been  the  subject  of  a  previous  experiment.]
No  reply  was  given,  but  Sir  Ohver  silently  passed  round
to  the  agents  a  scribbled  message,  "  Think  of  a  ijyramid."
Miss  E.  then  said,  "  I  only  see  a  triangle  .  .  ."  then
hastily,  Pyramids  of  Egypt.  No  I  shan't  get  this."
Asked  to  draw,  she  only  drew  a  triangle.

A  source  of  confusion  occurs  when  in  a  series  of  experi-
ments the  impression  intended  to  be  transferred  in  one
experiment  does  not  emerge  till  the  next — the  agent
having  meanwhile  given  vip  the  first  and  passed  on  to
something else. But in such cases, when not due  to


uxxxix.]  Telepathic  Communication.  •iS

3hance,  the  delay  may  be  entkely  in  the  percipient's  mind
and  thus  be  a  case  of  gradual  emergence.  Some  instances
will  be  found  below.  In  the  Brighton  experiments,  m
attempts  to  transfer  double  numbers,  such  deferred  im-
pressions occurred  on  one  occasion  with  two  numbers
n  succession,  in  the  course  of  a  rather  successful  set  of
experiments.^

There  are  cases  which  suggest  that  attention  devoted
successively  to  different  parts  of  the  object  to  be  trans-
ferred, by  the  agent  or  percipient  or  both,  led  to  success
when  the  attempt  to  transfer  the  whole  had  failed.  The
following  is  a  curious  one.  The  attempt  was  to  transfer
a  name  selected  by  IVIi'.  Guthrie.  I  abstract  from  his
account  :

He had just tried with the imagined name  Patriclc,
with  the  result  that  the  percipient  said,  "Is  it  Peter  or
Patrick  1" He  then  thought  of  the  name  Jemima,  this
time  apparently  writmg  it  down. Mr. Guthrie  began  as
sole agent  but  there  were  three  or  four  others  m  the
room. In  what  follows  the  remarks  in  brackets  are  Mr.
Guthrie's. The  percipient  said,  "Is  it  Lawrence  ?  No—
it  looks  hke  a  long  name but  I  cannot  see  Avhat  it  is
a  bit  ...  No  ..  .  Angelo  is  it  t  " (AU  were  now  shown
the  name  and  caUed  upon  to  think.)  .  .  ."It  begins  with
a  J  .  .  . Oh !  I  see  a  J. (Mr. G. "Do  you  see  the
letters  as  a  whole  1  ") "  I'll  try  to  look  at  the  letters.
Oh ! I can see five or  sis  letters, but can't  get  the
name." (Mr.  G.  "Then  you  see  the  letters. Well,  take
it  letter  by  letter. You've  named  the  first  letter  ;  now
what is the next?") "Is it E?" (A'lr. G.  "Right.
Now the thhd letter.") "M" ("  Righl^the  fourth
letter  ?  ") "  I  " ("  Right— next  letter  "?  ") "  Two  more,
hke  C.A." ("  A  is  right. Now  look  at  the  last  letter  but
one.") "  E,  I  thmk."  (N.B.— The  subject  had  no  idea
of  the  name  nor  of  what  letters  had  passed  through  her
mind  so  as  to  get  the  name.) {Proceedings,  Vol.  I.,  pp.
279,  280.)

It  seems  certain  here  that  when  the  spelling  letter  by

I  See  Proc,  Vol.  VI.,  p.  161.


44


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick.


[PAET


letter  began  the  agents  (as  well  as  the  percipient)  must
have  concentrated  on  the  letter  required  and  that  this
may  have  helped  the  percipient  ;  but  her  failure  to  grasp
the  word  as  a  whole  combined  with  the  almost  complete
success  in  getting  the  individual  letters  is  curious  and
shows  how  very  vague  the  picture  of  the  whole,  which
yet  apparently  existed  in  her  mind,  must  have  been.
This  contrasts  with  the  previous  experiment  (Peter  or
Patrick,  guessed  for  Patrick)  where  the  guess  seems  to
have  been  made  from  a  perception  of  at  least  part  of  the
name  as  a  whole.  Note  also  the  dream-like  amnesia  for
the  impressions  that  had  just  passed  through  her  mind.
It  almost  looks  as  if  the  percipient  had  fallen  into  a
semi-trance  state.

This experience brings us to the percipient's  side
in the experiments,  but  before leaving the  agent's  side
it  will  be  well  to  give  a  hst  of  the  kind  of  subjects  it
was  attempted to  transfer in the  various series  under
consideration. In  a  large  number  of  cases  it  was  simply
a visual sensation derived from gazing at some  small
object — e.g.  an  apple  or  a  key  or  a  card  or  a  number  or
a diagram. It is a matter of some interest, but  not
always  easy  to determine, whether  when an  impression
reaches  the  percipient,  it  is  the  idea,  or  the  image,  or  the
name  of  it  that  reaches  him  first. To  ehminate  the  name
some  experiments  have  been  successfully  tried  with  name-
less  diagrams — combinations of lines or irregular  shapes
that  cannot  be  described  by  a  word  or  even  by  several
words. Sometimes the object gazed at was a  rough
drawing  by  the  agent,  who  thus  probably  reinforced  the
impression  on  his mind. At  other  times  there  was  no
actual  external  object  before  the  agent,  but  he  endeavoured
to  transfer  an  imagined  or  remembered  object  or  scene.
In  such  cases  there  was  probably  at  least  a  visual  element
in  his  mental  impression  and  with  some  agents  perhaps  a
very  strong  one. In Mr. and Mrs. Newnham's  experi-
ments there may have  been a visual element in  the
agent's  impression  as  he  wrote  down  the  questions  which
the percipient, without sight or knowledge of  them,
was to answer by automatic writing. But so  far


Lxxxix.]  Telepathic  Communication.  45

^3  we  know  there  was  no  transference  in  visual  form
of  any  such  visual  element.  The  percipient  had  no
conscious  impression  of  the  question,  nor,  except  on  one
occasion,  of  the  answer,i  till  she  read  what  the  planchette
had  written  (see  Proc,  Vol.  IIL,  p.  12).  Perhaps
attempts  to  transfer  quotations,  of  which  there  are
one  or  two  among  Professor  Gilbert  Murray's  experi-
ments (see  Proc,  Vol.  XXIX.,  p.  102.  Exps.  86  and  87)
should  be  classed  with  transferences  of  questions,  as  m
both  the  agent's  impression,  if  visual,  is  of  words.  In
some  of  the  experiments  in  which  Miss  L.  Tipping  was
the  percipient  {Proc.  Vol.  XXVIL,  pp.  415-457)  the  agent
not  only  looked  at  an  object  but  handled  it  and  herself
executed  movements  in  connection  with  it,  and  the
impression  of  these  movements  seems  on  several  occasions
to  have  been  transferred  to  the  percipient  in  another  room.

Of  course  this  list  of  kinds  of  transference  attempted
is  far  from  exhaustive, even  if  we  confine  ourselves  to
the series of experiments from which I have  drawn
illustrations. Nor  of  course  do  these  series  include  all
the series in our Proceedings. I have selected  those
series  and  those  individual  experiments  which  seem  to  me  to
throw  most  light  on  obstacles  or  aids  to  telepathic  trans-
mission. I  do  not  think  that  we  have  evidence  to  show
that  among  methods  and  objects  of  transference,  one  kind
is in itself more likely to succeed than another.  But
there  is  little  doubt  that  some  kinds  are  better  adapted
to  some  agents  and  percipients,  and  other  kinds  to  others.
Such  differences  are  very  likely  to  arise  both  from  self-
suggestion  and  from  the  degree  of  interest  different  kinds
of  experiments  may  excite  in  different  people.

I  now  turn  to  what  is  the  more  interesting  and  in-
structive part  of  our  investigation— the  percipient's  side
of  the  transmission.

iThe  one  occasion  was  when,  in  answer  to  the  unseen  question,
"What  name  shall  we  give  to  our  new  dog?"  the  name  '  Nipen  '
(from  Feats  on  the  Fiord),  not,  by  the  way,  thought  of  by  the  agent,
shot  into  the  automatist's  conscious  mind,  just  as  she  was  m  the  act
of  automatically  writing  it  down. (Proc,  III.,  p.  23.)


46  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick.  [part

I  believe,  as  already  said,  that  what  happens  in  the
typical  case  is  that  the  telepathic  impression  first  reaches
a  subliminal  part  of  the  mind.  From  this  it  is  trans-
mitted to  the  waking  consciousness,  emerging  in  various
ways — as  by  automatic  writing,  or  in  a  visual  or  other
hallucination,  or  in  a  quasi-sensory  mental  impression,
or  simply  as  an  idea  or  otherwise.  The  impression  thus
transmitted  is  often  indistinct  or  otherwise  obscure  and
needs  interpretation.  There  are  obviously  in  this  process
several  opportunities  for  error  to  intrude.  The  impression
as  subhminally  received  may  be  imperfect,  there  may  be
defect  or  addition  or  distortion  in  the  transmission  from
the  subliminal,  and  there  may  be  misinterpretation  of
the  impression  of  which  the  percipient  ultimately  becomes
conscious.  This  misinterpretation  moreover — due  perhaps
to  guessing  or  to  irrelevant  association  of  ideas — may
react  on  and  modify  the  impression.

Further  complication  is  added  by  the  fact  that  the
imjiression  sometimes  is  received,  or  at  least  emerges,
gradually,  and  premature  transmission  from  the  subliminal,
or  premature  interpretation  may  produce  errors.  For
instance,  in  one  of  Mr.  and  Mi's.  Newnham's  experiments
Mr.  Newnham  who  had  to  preach  on  the  following  Whit-
Monday  on  the  occasion  of  a  Masonic  ceremonial,  asked
the  question  (unknown  of  course  as  usual  to  the  per-
cipient) "  Give  me  a  text  for  Whit-Monday  s  sermon.
Mrs.  Newnham  wrote  with  the  planchette,  "If  I  go  not
away,  the  Comforter  will  not  come  to  you."  Mr.
Newnham  writes  :

The  selection  of  a  subject  suitable  for  Whitsuntide  is
plainly  the  first  idea  caught  by  the  mtelligence  ;  so  I
proceeded  :— "  That  will  not  do  for  my  subject.  I  want  a
text  for  the  Monday's  sermon."  Ajiswer  :  "Let  brotherly
love  continue." (Proc,  Vol.  III.,  p.  21.)

Here  the  question  was  apprehended  in  two  stages.  ^
If  the  experiment  had  been  stopped  after  the  first,  the

1  Perhaps  in  this  case  the  impression  first  received  by  tlie  subliminal
was  Whit-Sunday — a  mishearing  as  it  were,  for  Whit-Monday.  The  idea
of  Whit-Monday  may  only  have  reached  it  when  the  question  was
mentally  repeated.


1


u>]  Lxxxix.]  Telepathic  Communication.  47


k  answer  given  would  have  been  wrong, though  it  would
les  have  shown  a  partial  apprehension  of  the  question.
IS- Again  with  the  same  experimenters  the  unseen  question
Ills  asked  being,  "  What  do  I  mean  by  chaffing  C.  about  a
let  lilac  tree  ?  " Planchette  replied, "  Temper  and  imagina-
)D.  tion." Now  this  answer  apparently  implied  apprehension
US  of  the  fact  that  there  was  something  about  chaff  in  the
question,  for  we  are  told  that  these  two  words  formed
part of habitual family chaff, but the question as  a
)i  whole had seemingly not been  grasped. Mr.  Newnham
therefore  proceeded,  "  You  are  thinking  of  somebody  else,
m  Please  reply to my question." The answer given  was
"  Lilacs,"  showing  a  further  fragment  of  apprehension  of
the  previous  question  though  still  incomplete  {Proc,  Vol.
III.,  p.  23). It  seems  to  have  been  a  delayed  impression,
for  Mr.  Newnham's  second  question  did  not  contain  the
word  lilacs  though  he  was  of  course  thinking  of  lilacs.

Another  complication  is  introduced  in  experiments  in
which  the  subliminal  mind  of  the  percipient  operates,
by  its  unwillingness  at  times  to  admit  ignorance.  IMr.
Newnham  was  much  interested  in  Masonic  archaeology,  of
which  Mrs.  Newnham  was  completely  ignorant.  He  on
several  occasions  asked  questions  relating  to  this  which
required  for  their  proper  answer  knowledge  of  Masonic
secrets.  Answers  more  or  less  appropriate  were  generally
written,  but  were  never  correct.  They  were  obvious
inventions,  though  sometimes  showing  fragments  of  know-
ledge beyond  Mrs.  Newnham's,  of  Masonic  things.  Here
is  a  specimen. The  unseen question  was  :

Q.  "  Write  out  the  prayer  used  at  the  advancement  of
a  Mark  Master  Mason."

A.  "  Almighty  Ruler  of  the  Universe  and  Architect  of
all  worlds,  we  beseech  Thee  to  accept  this,  our  brother,
whom  we  have  this  day  received  into  our  most  honourable
Company  of  Mark  Master  Masons.  Grant  him  to  be  a
worthy  member  of  our  brotherhood  ;  and  may  he  be  in
!  his  own  person  a  perfect  mirror  of  all  Masonic  virtues.

Grant  that  all  our  dokigs  may  be  to  Thy  honour  and
glory,  and  to  the  welfare  of  all  mankind."


48  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgivick.  [pabt

[Mr.  Newnham  continues]  This  prayer  was  written  off
instantaneously  and  very  rapidly.  It  is  a  very  remarkable
production  indeed.  For  the  benefit  of  those  who  are  not
members  of  the  craft,  I  may  say  that  no  prayer  in  the
shghtest  degree  resembling  it  is  made  use  of  m  the  Ritual
of  any  Masonic  degree  ;  and  yet  it  contains  more  than  one
strictly  accurate  technicahty  connected  with  the  degree
of  Mark  Mason.  ... I  proceeded  to  inquire  as  follows  :


:oiili


Q.  "  I  do  not  know  this  prayer. Where  is  it  to  be

found  ?  "
A.  "  Old  American  Ritual."
Q.  "  Where  can  I  get  one  ?  "
A.  "  Most  hkely  none  in  England."

Q.  "  Can  you  not  write  the  prayer  that  I  make  use  of

in  my  own  Lodge  ?  "
A.  "No,  I  don't  Itnow  it."

In  these  .  .  .  answers  we  see  a  new  moral  element
introduced.  There  is  evasion,  or  subterfuge,  of  a  more  or
less  ingenious  kind ;  and  totally  foreign  to  the  whole
character  and  natural  disposition  of  the  operator.  A
similar  attempt  at  deUberate  invention,  rather  than  plead
guilty  to  total  ignorance,  is  contained  in  the  following
answers."  [Another  case  is  then  given  by  Mr.  Newnham.]
(Proc,  Vol.  III.,  pp.  14  and  15.)  i


k


•k


The  telepathic  experiment  here  succeeded  completely
Each  question,  though  unknown  to  her  supraliminal
consciousness,  was  evidently  entirely  apprehended  by  the
subliminal  intelligence  of  the  automatist  and  an  answer
appropriate  in  form  was  written.  But  the  answers  were
pure  invention,  though  the  first  one  incorporated  some
fragments  of  information  which  the  percipient  probably
found  in  the  agent's  mind.  We  seem  to  get  here  a  lurid
light  on  the  untrustworthiness  of  the  subliminal  self
when  uncontrolled  by  the  normal  waking  self — and  serious

1)

^  The  whole  of  Mr.  Ne^vnham's  report  on  his  experiments,  as  edited  ife
by  Myers  {Proc,  Vol.  Ill  ,  pp.  7-23  and  also  quoted  in  Phantasms  and
in  Human  Personality)  should  be  read  by  those  interested  in  the  sub-
liminal working  of  the  mind  here  revealed.


pt
«

1(1
b

h
k
ipi
w
lan
iste
m


18]  sxxix.]  TelejMthic  Communication.  49


ossibilities  of  deliberate  distortion  of  telepathic  messages
)  gratify  subliminal  vanity  suggest  themselves.^

If  any  one  questions  our  right  to  attribute  the  futile
ttempt  at  deception  to  the  percipient's  subliminal  self,
3  it  might  have  been  the  work  of  another  spirit,  I
aould  reply  that  the  writing  intelligence  when  questioned
s  to  its  identity  always  asserted  that  it  was  Mrs.  Newn-
am — "  wife  "  as  it  expressed  it  ;  and  secondly  that  no
rue  information  was  included  which  was  unknown  to  both
gent  and  percipient.  One  of  the  things  most  puzzling
nd  difficult  to  explain  is  the  question  raised  by  Mr.
[ewnham,  why,  when  the  percipient  could  get  from  the
gent's  mind  the  question  asked,  she  could  not  also  get
com  it  the  expected  answer.  This  I  have  briefly  dealt
nth.  above,  on  p.  41.

There  was  at  least  one  occasion  when  Mrs.  Newnham
id  apparently  learn  telepathically  the  answer  as  well  as
he  question,  but  the  answer  was  very  short.  A  pupil
i  Mr.  Newnham's,  sceptical  about  the  whole  thing,  was
Uowed  to  suggest  a  question  on  condition  that  Mr.
vTewnham  saw  it  in  writing.  Mr.  Newnham  and  his
tupil  went  outside  the  closed  door  of  the  room  where  Mrs.
Newnham  was  sitting  with  her  planchette,  and  the  young
aan  wrote  "  What  is  the  Christian  name  of  my  eldest
ister  ?  "  On  returning  to  the  room  they  found  the
.nswer  already  waiting  for  them — "  Mina."  This  was  the
amily  abbreviation  of  Wilhelmina,  and  was  unknown  to
dr.  Newnham.  It  is  implied  that  it  was  unknown  to
tirs.  Newnham  also,  and  unless  by  some  accident  she  had
it  some  time  happened  to  learn  what  the  sister  was
ailed,  she  must,  it  will  be  observed,  have  learnt  the  answer
elepathically  from  the  brother,  even  if  the  question  was
/ransmitted  as  usual  by  her  husband  {Proc,  Vol.  III.,  p.  12).

An  advantage  of  the  percipient's  impression  emerging
n  automatic  writing  is  that  there  is  little  or  no  room  for

1  It  seems  just  possible  that  the  frequent  naming  of  a  wrong  niunber
vhen  an  impression  of  a  number  was  expected — in  e.g.  the  Brighton
xperiments,  may  have  been  partly  due  to  a  strong  subliminal  dislike
o  admitting  failure  and  a  determination  to  transmit  to  the  consciouB
ntelligence,  something,  even  if  only  a  guess.

D


50


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgioick.


iroli
b  (

\i


111


misinterpretation  at  the  stage  at  which  the  waking  inlj
telligence  becomes  aware  of  it.  When  the  impressiorj  m
emerges  as  a  sensory  halhxcination,  this  is  otherwise
as  we  have  akeady  seen  in  cases  where  it  had  not  beer,
received  telepathically  (see  above  pp.  33-35).  The  possi'
bilities  of  misinterpretation  are  of  course  liable  to  b€|
increased,  when  the  hallucination  develops  gradually.  In
some  of  the  Brighton  experiments,  the  percipient  hypno-
tised by  the  agent,  Mr.  G.  A.  Smith,  was  set  with  opened,
eyes  to  look  at  a  blank  card,  on  which  he  was  told  he
would  presently  see  a  picture.  The  agent  then  tried  to
concentrate  his  mind  on  an  imaginary  picture,  of  which
the  subject  had  been  chosen  by  Miss  Johnson  or  myseU
and  communicated  to  him  in  writing.  The  development
of  the  picture  was  as  a  rule  slow.  The  following  (see
Proc,  Vol.  VIII.,  p.  561)  is  the  case  in  which  it  was,  I
think,  slowest  and  most  fragmentary.  The  subject  was
A  Christy  Minstrel  with  a  banjo.  The  percipient  (Miss  B.j
said,  "  There's  something  long,  something  round  in  that
one — a  little  cage  of  some  sort — something  that  looks  like,  jjj.
a  cage  ;  yet  there's  something  like  a  handle.^  A  can  !
Oh,  it's  a  can  !  It's  quite  clear  now."  Without  remark
about  her  impression  we  gave  her  a  fresh  card,  and
continued  to  try  to  impress  on  her  the  same  subject.
She  said,  "  Something  here  dark — a  hand."  I  asked,
"Is  it  a  woman's  hand  or  a  man's  ?  "  To  which  Miss
B.  replied,  "  A  black  hand." — which  seemed  a  partia
success.  At  this  point  Mr.  Smith  had  to  wake  Miss  B.
in  order  to  ask  her  when  she  had  to  go.  Finding  there
was  still  a  little  time  to  spare  she  was  re-hypnotised
and  another  experiment  tried.  The  subject  this  time  was|
A  sailing  boat  on  the  sea.  This  apparently  made  no
impression  at  the  moment  and  Miss  B.  presently  said
"A  man — black — He's  got  something  in  his  hand — a,n\
instrument — sort of guitar thing." Nothing had  been;


Mil

-cli


ittei
lilt
ittei
Id

le


1  (


^  Can  she  have  been  on  the  track  of  a  banjo  and  have  misled  hersell
by  the  idea  'handle'  ?  As  when  P.,  given  a  hallucinatory  picture'
of  a  choir  boy  {Proc,  Vol.  VIII.,  p.  66.5)  developed  it  at  a  certain
point  into  a  ghost  dressed  in  white  with  hands  up.  "  You  couldn't
naistake  it  for  anything  but  a  ghost,"  ,


(

md


iXXXix.]  Telepathic  Commtinication.  51


aid  about  the  Christy  Minstrel  and  the  banjo,  so  this
ardy  emergence  of  the  picture  was  striking.  The  waking
nd  re-hypnotisation  was  evidentially  a  weakness,  as  it
avolved  contact  between  agent  and  percipient.  But  on
he  other  hand  the  sequence  of  events  strongly  suggests
hat  the  full  impression  had  reached  Miss  B.  subliminally
rom  the  first,  but  had  remained  latent — only  fragments
eing  transmitted  to  the  interpreting  consciousness,  until
he  final  picture  got  through.^
After  this  the  attempt  to  make  Miss  B.  see  the  sailing
oat  was  continued,  but  twice  produced  nothing  but  a
ague  impression.  Then  Miss  Johnson,  who  had  remained
a  ignorance  of  the  subject  of  the  joroposed  picture  in  order
hat  she  might  be  able  to  talk  to  the  percipient  without
langer  of  giving  indications,  asked  whether  it  was  any-
hing  like  an  animal.  Miss  B.  said,  "  No — got  some
)rong  sort  of  things — something  at  the  bottom  like  a  little
)oat — What  can  that  be  up  in  the  air  ? — Cliffs  I  supx^ose
—cliffs  in  the  air  high  up — it's  joining  the  boat — oh,
ails — a  sailing  boat — not  cliffs — sails."  This  was  not  all
ittered  consecutively  but  partly  in  answer  to  questions
)ut  by  Miss  Johnson  in  order  to  stimulate  the  percipient's
ittention  {Proc,  Vol.  VIII.,  p.  561).

In  this  case  until  the  picture  was  grasped  as  a  whole,
he  elements  of  it  seem  to  have  been  seen  rather  vaguely,
n  the  one  to  be  now  qvtoted  {Proc,  Vol.  VIII.,  p.  565),
he  elements  of  the  picture  emerged  in  a  piecemeal  manner,
)ut  each  was  definite  when  it  came.  The  subject  was
4  sandwichman  with  advertisement  of  a  play.  The  per-
iipient — P. — said,  "  Something  like  letter  A — stroke  there,
ihen  there." I  said,  "Well  perhaps  it  will  become  clearer."

continued,  "  8omething  like  a  head  on  the  top  of  it  ;
I  V  upside  down — two  legs  and  then  a  head. — A  man
ivith  two  boards — looks  like  a  man  that  goes  about  the
streets  with  two  boards.  I  can  see  a  head  at  the  top
md  the  body  and  legs  between  the  boards.  I  couldn't
jee  what  was  written  on  the  boards,  because  the  edges


^  The  percipient  being  in  hypnosis,  neither  the  intelKgence  which  sent
ip  the  sensory  automatism,  nor  that  which  interpreted  it,  was  Miss
?,'s  normal  waking  self. One,  however,  was  subliminal  to  the  other.


52


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick.


[par'


were  turned  towards  me."  This  case  is  interesting,
because  notwithstanding  the  gradual  emergence  and  tardy
understanding  of  the  hallucinatory  picture  there  is  strong
reason  to  think  that  it  was  the  idea  of  a  sandwich  man,
and  not  a  copy  of  the  agent's  mental  image,  that  reached
the  subliminal  stratum  of  the  percipient's  mind.  For  the
agent — Mr.  Smith — stated  afterwards  that  he  had  pictured
to  himself  the  man  and  one  board  facing  him.  And  this
was  the  natural  way  to  think  of  it,  since  the  subject  set
included  the  advertisement  of  a  play,  which  of  course
would  only  be  seen  if  the  board  faced  the  spectator.
The  percipient's  impression  was  incomplete.

Sometimes  when,  accordmg  to  the  percipient's  description,
the  development  of  the  picture  has  reached  a  point  at
which  one  would  have  expected  the  interpretation  to  be
obvious,  the  latter  lags  somewhat.  Thus  (see  Proc,
Vol.  VIII.,  p.  562)  the  subject  fixed  on  for  the  picture
being  a  man  and  woman  dancing,  P.  after  long  waiting
said  he  saw  "  A  man  and  a  girl  there — a  lady  and
gentleman. — He's  got  his  arm  round  her  waist — ^they're
valsing  or  dancing  something  or  other  "  ;  each  point  being
stated  with  an  air  of  discovery,  and  the  arm  round  the
waist  not  at  first  suggesting  the  dancing.

On  the  other  hand  the  idea  sometimes  came  before  the
picture  had  completed  itself.  Thus  (Proc,  Vol.  VIII.,
p.  568)  the  subject  for  the  picture  being  A  mouse  in  a
mouse-trap  ;  P.  said,  "  I  can  see  something — some  lines
coming  "  (pause)  "  still  'those  lines  and  something  like


fa


It


le  r


at!


lit


oh,  I  think  I  know  what  that's  going  to  be.  Is  that
meant  for  a  mouse  trap  ?  "  I  asked,  "  Any  mouse  ?  "
P.  said  :  "I  think  it  looks  as  if  the  mouse  were  trying
to  poke  its  nose  through  the  bars.  I  don't  think  it's
fancy."  ^

It  was  possible  to  have  a  false  picture  competing  more
or  less  with  the  true  one.  Thus  {Proc,  VIII.,  p.  267)
the  subject  on  one  occasion  was  A  snake  with  its  forked
tongue  out.  P.  said,  "  I  thought  I  saw  something  like
one  of  those  men  with an  ice-cream  barrow — caught  a


1  This  was  seen,  not  on  a  card  as  usual,  but  with  closed  eyes.


It's


tiTi


jXXXix.]  Telepathic  Communication.  53


jlimpse  of  it  " — then — "  I  just  thought  I  could  see  some-
rhing  like  a  snake.  I  can  see  it  now  still — something
ike  a  snake-charmer  there  playing  with  it — isn't  afraid  of
t  a  bit.  I'm  not  going  to  say  this  is  it  yet,  because  I
aw  the  ice-cream  barrow  just  now.  It  seems  a  most
illy  thing  to  see  a  snake  after  an  ice-cream  barrow — but
;hat  went  and  this  stays  longer — stiU  there."  The  whole
experiment  lasted  ten  minutes.  We  may  observe  that
)esides  the  irrelevant  impression,  there  was  what  one  may
;all  embroidery  on  the  telepathic  idea — the  addition  of
;he  snake-charmer  to  the  snake.  P.'s  hypnotic  imagina-
tion must  have  concerned  itself  actively  with  the  impressions
le  received  on  this  occasion.  P.  said  once  {Proc,  Vol.
VIII.,  p.  563),  "  You  could  easily  fancy  anything  that
3ame  into  your  head."

One  evening  we  got  Miss  B.  to  see  a  hallucinatory
picture  and  to  write  with  a  planchette  at  the  same  time
[see  Proc,  Vol.  VIII.,  p.  262-3).  Five  experiments  were
bried,  in  two  of  which  there  was  a  visual  impression
mth  closed  eyes),  but  nothing  legible  was  written.  In
a  third  there  was  no  visual  impression  and  the  writing
was  wrong.  In  only  two  did  both  methods  of  externalis-
ing the  impression  operate.  In  one  of  these  the  results
of  the  two  methods  differed  markedly  from  each  other
and  both  were  completely  wrong.  There  was  some
approximation  to  the  desired  impression  in  the  remaining
case.  The  subject  was  A  cow  being  milked  by  a  dairy-
maid. Miss  B.  said,  "  there's  an  animal  I  can  see,  a
big  one  too — biggish  looking — got  some  horns  I  think.—
It's  a  buffalo."  She  saw  nothing  besides  the  buffalo
and  said  it  was  standing  up.  In  the  meanwhile  the
planchette  had  written  "  Cow."  A  few  experiments  in
number-guessing  were  also  tried,  in  which  Miss  B.,  while
trjing  for  visual  impressions  of  numbers  looked  at  by  the
agent,  at  the  same  time  had  her  hands  on  a  table,  tilting
it,  here  too  the  results  of  the  two  processes  were  dis-
cordant.

The  possibihty  of  impressions  developing  differently
according  to  the  method  by  which  they  reach  the  in-
terpreting mtelhgence,  or  of different  impressions,  whether


54  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwiclc.  [pa:


0B


n

rati
Bark
ixter
irigii

)f  SI
101,

:iiess

lUS

,e
Dbje(
nice:
idea


veridical or  not,  competing in this way for  attentio
again  opens  up  vistas  of  opportunities  for  confusion.

When  we  pass,  as  we  must  now  do,  from  impressioi  leffl
emerging  in  sensory  or  motor  automatism  to  those  pe
ceived  as  mental  images  or  sensations,  or  simply  as  ide<
or words, we can seldom trace the operation of  tl
subliminal with the same certainty. The  telepath
impact — so  far  as  appears  in  many  of  these  cases — ma
reach  the  waking  intelhgence  dnect. I  am  inclined  to  thin!
however,  from  analogy,  that  telepathic  communication  i
at  least  as  a  rule,  a  subliminal  affair  and  that  when  thiiii
development  of  the  conscious  impression  in  the  cases
are  about  to  consider  is  gradual  or  incomplete,  it  may  liii
due,  just  as  in  some  of  the  cases  above  considered,  tiClii
difficulty in passing from subhminal to supraliminal  lli
and  we  shall  find  certain  cases  where  the  operation  c
the  subliminal  intelhgence  is  strongly  indicated.

I  will  begin  with  impressions  visual  but  not  hallucinator
— not  externalised,  and  illustrate  with  two  cases  from  Mi
Guthrie's  experiments  where  the  general  form  and  appeal
ance  of  an  object  gazed  at  by  the  agent  seems  to  hav
been  gradually  apprehended  by  the  percipient  but  not  a
first  its  name  or  meaning.  Indeed  the  first  was  definitel
misinterpreted.

Object  looked  at  Mr.  B's  watch  held  at  some  little  distanc
behind  the  percipient. Percipient  says  :  "Is  it  bright
round  ...  Is  it  a  button." {Proc,  Vol.  I.,  p.  266.)

Object looked at a dark crimson apple.  Percipien
says, "Is  it  round  ?  .  .  .  a dark  red  shade  .  .  .  like
knob  off a drawer.  ... It  is an apple." {Proc,  Vo
I.,  p.  268.)

The  interpretation  "  button  "  was,  it  would  seem,  ,
guess  based  on  an  imperfect  visual  impression.  "  Apple
may  have  been  a  guess  too — not  a  real  interpretation
We  cannot  tell.  Moreover,  it  is  probable  that  when  f
guess  or  an  interpretation  is  made  it  reacts  on  the  im
pression  and  makes  this  clearer.  Some  cases  suggesting
this  will  be  quoted  below  ;  and  we  have  had  evidenc(
above,  pointing  to  this  kind  of  action  and  reaction  be


kill
heiit


this
iniii
the


XXXIX.]  Telepathic  Communication.  55

ween  interpretation  and  hallucinatory  pictures. And  as
,  matter  of  fact  the  same  thing  happens  to  us  in  real
ion  perceptions  of  external  things  either  not  very  clearly  seen
peiir  heard,  or  capable  of  more  than  one  interpretation.  ^
lea I  have  distinguished  between  interpretation  and  guessing,
lut  I  must  allow  that  the  distinction  is  not  a  very  well-
tlii  narked  one,  whether  we  are  concerned  with  perception  of
iia  external objects or with mental images telepathic  ally
uii  )riginated. Indeed  in  a  certain  sense  our  interpretations
iii)f sensory impressions might all be called guesses.  I
im,  however,  usmg  the  word  guess  to  mean  an  interpreta-
..ion  which  carries  no  conviction,  at  any  rate  before  the
li-uess  is  accepted  and  the  image  has  adapted  itself  to  it.
t(Chus in the first of the above-mentioned  experiments
.he  mental  image  seems  to  have  been  of  a  bright  round
)bject at an uncertain distance and therefore of  an
mcertain size.^ Casting about for an explanation,  the
dea  of  a  button  suggested  itself  as  a  possible  one,  but
}here was no feeling of certainty about it. The  per-
3ipient's  mental  image  was  not  obviously  that  of  a  button
a,nd  recognised  as  such. In  the  second  experiment,  shape,
3olour  and  size  (the  drawer  knobs  of  a  chest  of  ckawers
being of much  the same size as an apple) are  appre-
hended, and  the  mental  image  becomes  complete  and  is
recognised  by  the  percipient  as  an  apple. Of  course  m
thus  figuring  to  ourselves  the  process  in  the  percipient's
mind,  there  is  much  of  conjecture. All  we  know  is  what
the  agents  intended  and  what  the  percipient  is  reported
to  have  said,  to  which  we  may  add  the  experience  we  all
have  of  the  process  of  ordinary  sensory  perception.

It  may  be  worth  dwelling  on  this  last  a  little  because
of  the  importance  of  its  bearing  on  the  interpretation  of
mental  images  telepathically  received.  Perception  of  ex-
ternal objects  is  in  effect  the  interpretation  of  sensory
impressions.  Taking  for  simplicity  one  sense  only,  the
sense  of  sight ;— when  we  say  we  see  anything— a  book  for
iii  instance — we  mean  of  course  that  certain  sensations  have
i^j  affected  the  retina,  which  with  the  aid  of  previous  know-

i  For  want  of  recognition  of  size  and  consequent  confusion  compare
one  of  Miss  Tippings  experiments  quoted  below  p.  62:


S6  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgivick.  [par:

ledge— such  as  what  a  book  is  hke,  the  probabihty  thai
a  book  would  be  in  the  place  where  it  appears  to  be
and  so  forth — we  interpret  as  a  book.  Actually  if  th(
presence  of  a  book  in  that  place  is  expected,  very  slighl
sensory  impressions  will  be  perceived  as  a  book,  and  we
may  in  such  a  case  interpret  as  a  book  something  ir
fnost  respects  entirely  different.  Again,  when  there  ii
Httle  of  expectation  to  guide  us,  and  owing  to  bad  lighl
or  other  cause  the  visual  sensation  is  unusually  imperfect
we  are  sometimes  compelled  to  guess  considerably  beyond
what  our  visual  sensations  justify.  Mistakes  are  ofter
made  in  semi-darkness  in  this  way.  Selection  is  anothei
element  in  the  process  of  perception  which  may  eithei
help  or  hinder  correct  apprehension.  Most  of  our  visua]
perceptions  are  effected  by  a  selection  of  such  lines  and
colours  among  those  presented  to  us,  as  we  can  combine
into  the  image  of  a  probable  object.  Amusing  use  is
made  of  this  fact  in  those  puzzle  pictures  representing  in
the  same  picture  two  entu-ely  different  subjects.  One
interpretation  first  strikes  us  as  obvious,  but  when  we
have  succeeded  in  perceiving  the  other,  it  is  sometimes
quite  difficult  to  perceive  the  first  again  at  all.

I  will  quote  next  some  cases  where  I  think  it  is  pretty
certain  that  no  "  guess  "  was  made.  The  percipient's
experience  seems  to  ha^e  been  of  the  nature  of  a  gradu-j
ally  developing  visual  image  in  the  mind,  interpreted  as'
the  development  proceeded.  In  the  first  the  image  re-
mained vague  and  indistinct  to  the  end  and  it  seems
possible  that  an  initial  misinterpretation  by  the  percipient
about  branches  hindered  the  proper  development.  The
impression  may  have  been  like  the  puzzle  pictures  just
referred  to.

Object  looked  at  by  agents,  A  small  toy  dog,  coloured
light  brown,  with  tail  extended  and  in  the  act  of  leaping.
Percipient  says  :— "  Is  it  green  ?  .  .  .  I  can  see  something
like  a  lot  of  branches.  .  .  .  Can't  count  them— look  too
many— hke  a  long  stem— so— "  (tracing  a  horizontal  fine
m  the  air)  "  with  thmgs  down  "  (tracmg  fines  downwards)
"  Looks  to  be  a  fighter  colour  now  .  .  .  not  green  as  at


pei'c


Ol'li

in


:.xxxix.]  Telepathic  Communication.  57

first  .  .  .  but  now  it  looks  like  an  animal.  Can't  see
any  more. {Proc,  Vol.  I.,  p.  268.)

Object.  A  jug  cut  out  of  white  card  board.  Percipient
says,  "  Camaot  see  any  colour  .  .  .  looks  all  light  .  .  .Is
it  a  cup  ?  There  is  a  handle  ...  oh  it  is  a  jug."
(Proc,  Vol.  I.  p.  269.)

Object  :  A  pair  of  scissors,  standing  open  and  upright.
Percipient  says  :  ''Is  it  silver  .  .  .  No — it  is  steel.  .  .  .
It  is  a  pair  of  scissors  standing  upright."  {Proc,  Vol.  I.,
p.  267.)

In  the  following  case  it  is  certain  that  there  was  no
guess.  There  was  an  apprehension — probably  vague — of
a  shape,  but  no  idea  attached  to  it.  Experiments  were
being  made  with  rough  drawings  as  objects.  When  the
percipient  thought  she  had  a  correct  impression  she
unbandaged  her  eyes  and  attempted  to  draw  the  im-
pression she  had  had.  On  one  occasion  the  agent  di-ew
and  gazed  at  a  rough  representation  of  a  horse.  It  was
extremely  bad,  but  nevertheless  that  it  was  meant  for  a
horse  or  something  like  one  was  unmistakable.  The
percipient's  reproduction,  also  extremely  rough,  unmis-
takably resembled  the  original,  though  not  at  all  like  a
horse.  Almost  all  that  constituted  the  resemblance  of  the
origmal  to  a  horse  had  been  eliminated.  The  percipient
in  fact  cannot  have  had  the  idea  of  a  horse  in  her  mind,
though  she  must  have  had  a  vague  impression  of  the
lines  of  the  original.  (See  Proc,  Vol.  II.,  p.  42,  where  the
drawings  are  reproduced).

In  Baron  von  Schrenck-Notzing's  experiments  with
roughly  drawn  diagrams  there  are  instances  where  the
correct  impression  is  approached  through  two  or  tliree
wrong  ones,  perhaps  not  derived  from  the  original  at  all.
This  may  be  a  mode  of  gradual  development,  but  on  the
other  hand  it  may  merely  be  that  the  percipient  has  a
multiplicity  of  impressions  among  which  she,  as  it  were,
feels  about  for  the  right  one.  (See  diagrams  14  and  15
in  the  sheets  of  diagrams  following  p.  22  of  Proc,  Vol.
VII.)

In  the  mental  impressions  discussed  above,  it  was,  1
think,  clearly  the  image  of  the  object  to  be  transferred


k
five
objt
com
inst
dpi
h'Ik
ofi

I


5^  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick.  [pariIisS

that  reached  the  percipient. What  she  grasped,  partially,
or  completely,  was  the  external  appearance. But  there  arej
other cases where it  is equally clearly the idea  rather
than  the  image  that  is  apprehended. This  is  well  seen
in  ]\'Ir.  Rawson's  experiments  [Proc,  Vol.  XI.,  pp.  1-17).
In  these  the  agent  and  percipient  each  sat  with  block  and
pencil  before  her  and  the  latter  tried  to  reproduce  what
the former, unseen by her, was drawing.  Sometimes
the  reproduction  was  nearly  exact  (as  in  the  two  pigs  ori
p. 4)  and  there  is  nothing  to  show  whether  it  was  the
image  or  the  name  that  was  transmitted. Sometimes,  on
the  other  hand,  it  seems  clearly  to  have  been  the  idea
or the name of the object that the percipient  appre-
hended ; as  when  she  drew  a  hand (p. 4)  in  a  totally
different position from that drawn by the agent,  and
similarly a  ring (p. 5), or a  clock and again a  'chak,
different  in character  from those the agent had  drawn
(pp. 10 and 11). It must, however, have been  the
impression  of  form  that  converted  a  waste-paper  basket
into  a  barrel (p. 10). And  it  is very difficult to  say
what  happened  when  the  agent  drawing  a  match-box,  the
percipient drew what was even more suggestive of  a
match-box  but  in  a  different  position,  and  then  failed  to
interpret  her  own  drawing (pp. 15 and 16). "  I  don't
know  what  I  have  drawn,"  she  said, "it  is  a  kind  of
square  inside  a  square."  •  The  "  square  inside  a  square,"
resembling the  strip  of  luminous  paint  on  some  match-
boxes, did  not  appear  in  the  agent's  match-box.

In  one  experiment  in  this  series  in  which  a  nearly
exact  replica  of  the  agent's  drawing — a  nose — was  made,
the  percipient  apparently  first  apprehended  the  idea  of
the  object,  or  perhaps  its  function.  She  said,  "I  can
think  of  nothing  ;  I  can  only  hold  my  nose,"  and  presently
proceeded  to  draw  the  nose  herself  (pp.  9,  10).  In  one
of  the  experiments  of  Messrs.  SchmoU  and  Mabire  series
it  was  pretty  clearly  the  function  of  the  object  rei^resented
by  the  cbawing— that  of  a  musical  instrument— that
first  reached  the  percipient's  consciousness.  The  object
was  a  rough  drawing  of  a  lyre— its  frame  resembling  the
outline  of  a  vase  with  a  foot. It  had  four  wires  up  the


f/ir
w
its
iiit
tli(
No


Lxxxix.]  Telepathic  Communication.  59

middle  connected  by a  bar  across  the  top. After  two
minutes  the  percipient  said  :

"  I  have  got  the  notion  of  a  flute— or  of  some  musical
instrument  or  other."  (a  little  later)  "I  see  many  Unes.
It  resembles  a  vase,  but  it  is  not  a  vase."  She  then
cbew  and  said  "  Now  it  is  Uke  a  harp  ;  there  are  several
strings — Uke  a  httle  gridiron."

At  the  end  of  the  experiment  she  handed  to  the  agents
I  five  drawings  showing  a  progressive  resemblance  to  the
object  or  parts  of  it,  and  ending  with  one  very  fakly
complete.  Here  although  the  idea  of  some  musical
instrument  was  the  first  thing  apprehended  by  the  per-
cipient, subsequent  impressions  seem  to  have  been  almost
wholly  of  form  {Proc,  Vol.  V.,  p.  190  and  for  facsimiles
of  drawings  p.  213).

The point raised above of the reaction of the  per-
cipient's interpretation on his impression is  illustrated
rather clearly,  I think, by an experiment in  Messrs.
SchmoU  and  Mabire's  series  (Proc,  Vol.  V.,  p. 181,  and
for facsimiles of drawings, p. 210). The object  was
three horizontal lines of unequal lengths connected by  a
vertical  line  at  their  left  end. It  was  hke  a  letter  E  with
its  horizontal  lines  enormously  prolonged,  and  it  was  not
intended to represent anything. After a few  minutes
the percipient said, "I see three fish on a  skewer."
Not being well  understood she explained  : — "  Three  fish
held  by  a  skewer,  that  is  as  they  are  sold  in  the  fish-
markets  ; but  everybody  knows  that  !  " Then  she  took
off  her  bandage and drew a  very rough  representation
of  three  fish  lying  parallel,  with  a  skewer  through  their
heads. Apparently a mental image of three  parallel
J lines,  suggested  three  parallel  fish  and  was  then  modified
e to  fit  the  interpretation.

s  A  more  unfortunate  example  of  development  on  wrong
i  lines,  due  apparently  to  ideas  introduced  by  the  per-
t  cipient  in  attempts  at  interpretation,  is  afforded  by  one
t  of  the  experiments  of  the  Misses  Tipping  [Proc,  Vol.
e  XXVII. ,  p.  420).  The  object  experimented  with  was
e a  gold  watch  bracelet. Miss  K.  Tippmg  sat  at  the  table


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick.  [far%

holding  the  bracelet  up  and  turning  it  round  and  round
in  her  hands.  Miss  L.  Tipping  in  another  room  (the,
experiments  were  made  at  the  S.P.R.  rooms)  said  :

You  are  sitting  at  a  table  in  a  well  ht  room— the
fire  seems  burning  brightly— great  sense  of  comfort— and
you  are  holding  a  small  round  smooth  object,  bright  in
colour.  You  have  picked  it  up  and  keep  turnmg  it
round,  your  hands  seem  movuig  much.  It  is  glowmg
colour— orange  is  the  colour  I  get  and  its  colour  is  its
attraction.  The  object  seems  very  cold  and  smooth,
and  a  great  feehng  of  roundness  comes  to  me."

So  far  the  description  is  fairly  good  and  in  some
respects  very  good.  But  at  this  point  the  percipient
gets  off  the  right  track  altogether— misled  perhaps  by  the
idea  of  a  round  orange-coloured  object. She  goes  on  :

"  I  sense  a  warm  country  and  dark  people  movmg
about— pickmg  up  fruit— long  groves  of  trees— blue  sky—
and  very  sunny.  Is  it  fruit  you  are  holdhig  ?  I  get
many  objects  of  the  same  shape.  I  can't  make  out  if
it  is  an  orange,  or  some  kmd  of  fruit  with  plenty  of
juice. I  seem  to  be  tastmg  fruit  of  some  kind."

In  the  following  experiment  in  Professor  Gilbert  Murray's
extremely  mteresting  series  {Proc,  Vol.  XXIX.,  p.  105)
initial  misinterpretation  by  the  percipient  affected  all  that
followed.  The  idea  to  be  transferred  was  "The  little
crocodile  on  the  Captain's  trunk  and  him  showing  it  to
Isabel  a7id  me."  The  percipient  said,  "Where's  Denis's
lizard  gone  ?— because  I  thought  it  was  Denis's  lizard
pursumg  you  and  Isabel— the  lizard  on  a  bed  in  a  cabin
and  you  and  Isabel  lookmg  at  it."  It  was  not  un-
natural to  mistake  a  Uttle  crocodile  for  a  known  lizard,
especially  if  the  impression  thus  mistaken  was  a  rather
vague  visual  or  semi-visual  one.  And  it  must  be  allowed
that,  notwithstanding  this  mitial  error,  the  percipient  got
remarkably  near  to  the  agent's  idea.

Associated ideas sometimes impress themselves  before
the idea intended is grasped. Thus in one of  Mr
Gutlirie's  experiments  {Proc,  Vol.  IL,  p.  35)  the  object


lave
In

if  '

(Pre.


Pre


sail
hi


ele


^'  jXXXIX.]


Telepathic  Communication.


61


Jid  ooked  at  was  a  rough  bid  rather  spirited  drawiyig  of  a  fish,
ii  ipparently  swimming. The  percipient  said  almost  directly,

'  are  you  thinking  of  the  bottom  of  the  sea  with  shells
^.  md  fishes  ?  " And  then, "Is it a snail or a fish  ?  "
,  The  figure  she  proceeded  to  draw  was  distinctly  a  very
"  :air  imitation  of  the  original,  but  justified,  in  a  way  which
^  the  original  did  not,  the  doubt  whether  it  was  a  snail  or

a,  fish. The  idea  of  the  bottom  of  the  sea  may  of  course

have  originated  with  the  agent  or  the  percipient.
1^' In  the  next  case  the  agents  were  probably  responsible
'  since  the  association  of  ideas  was  involved  in  the  selection

of the-  object to be transferred. Mr. Guthrie  writes

[Proc,  Vol.  II.,  p.  30)  :

"  One  evening  [during  a  visit  to  London]  I  called  Miss
E  and  a friend  of  mine  .  .  .  out  of  the  room,  and  re-
quested them  to  assist  me  in  imagining  the  large  stained
ig glass  rose-window  in  the  transept  of  Westminster  Abbey,
opposite to which Miss E, Miss E, and I had  been
't sitting  at  the  service  the  same  afternoon. I  then  asked
f Miss  R  to  say  what  object  we  were  thinking  of.  After
'f a  while  she  said,  "  I  cannot  tell  what  you  are  lookmg  at,
but  I  seem  to  be  sittmg  m  Westminster  Abbey,  where
we were this afternoon." After another interval  she
i| said,  "  I  seem  to  be  looking  at  a  window,"  and  again,
J "I  thmk  it  is  the  window  in  the  chancel  with  the  figures."
J When  afterwards  told  which  window  it  was,  she  said  that
J she  did  not  see  any  wmdow  distinctly,  and  certainly  not
, the  rose-window  thought  of.

i In the following case association of ideas — Mx.  Keir
1  Hardie  suggesting  the  Labour  Party — misled  the  percipient
•  Professor  Gilbert  Murray,  though  the  result  was  an  amus-
1 ing  derivation  from  the  original. The  impression  to  be
f conveyed  was  Keir  Hardie  blacking  boots. The  percipient
said, "  Hunter's shoes. Labour Party with  exceedingly
bright  boots  " {Proc,  Vol.  XXIX.,  p.  99). One  cannot,
of  course,  be  sure  that  what  the  agent  actually  transferred
was  what  she  intended  to  transfer,  but  if  it  was,  it  seems
clear that though the idea of Keir Hardie failed  to
emerge  in  the  percipient's conscious impression  it  must


62  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick.  [pabiI

have  been  tliere  latent  in  his  mind,  and  so  must  the  idea
of  boots  being  blacked.  It  looks,  in  fact,  as  if  the  com-
plete idea  intended  reached  the  percipient  subhminally
all  right,  but  evolved  itself  otherwise  in  the  course  of
emergence  into  consciousness.

There  are  other  mental  processes  besides  association  of
ideas  which  may  interfere  with  the  successful  emergence
of  telepathically  received  impressions.  One  is  a  tendency
to  ignore  or  reject  ideas  that  the  conscious  intelligence
dislikes  or  that  seem  to  it  absurd  or  unlikely  to
be  meant.  This  probably  happens  a  good  deal  with
some  percipients  and  might  easily  happen  without  our
knowing  anything  about  it.  Here  are  two  instances
where  this  kind  of  inhibition  nearly  prevailed  :

In  one  of  the  Brighton  experiments,  P.  was  to  see  on
a  card  a  hallucinatory  picture  of  A  spider  in  the  middle
of  its  web. After  some  time  he  said  :

"Now  I  can  see  something-— funny  shape— don't  loiow
what  it  is  either — not  quite  round — octagonal  in  some
places— hnes  across  it— more  sides  than  eight— some  broken.
If  I  was  to  compare  it  with  anything,  it  would  be  a
spider's  web  ;  but  it  can't  be  that.  There  would  never
be  a  picture  of  a  spider's  web."  {Proc,  Vol.  VIII  p
568.)

In one  of the experiments of the Misses  Tipping

agent  and  percipient  being  in  different  rooms— the
agent  occupied  herself  mainly  with  opening  and  closing
an  umbrella,  dancing  during  part  of  the  time  while  she
did  so.  The  percipient's  account  of  her  impression  began
"your  hand  seems  moving  up  and  down,"  and  then
diverged  into  what  might  be  the  description  of  a  small
table  bell,  the  kind  that  is  struck  by  pressing  down  a
knob.  She  ended  her  written  description  with,  "  You
lift  up  your  hand  and  let  it  fall.  Several  times  you  do
this.  The  shape  seems  hke  a  doll's  umbrella,  with  a
little  slender  stem."  She  afterwards,  but  before  receiving
any  hint  of  what  the  experiment  had  been,  said  :

"  the  impression  she  had  got  was  of  her  sister  moving
her hand up and down rhythmically  .  .  . She  saw  an


0


lit


to  (
wlio
fn
iv
niai
Klf


Telepafhic  Communication .


63


;ej  object  like  a  mushroom,  and,  wondering  what  it  was,
a-  had  kept  on  thinking  of  a  wee  doll's  umbrella  which  she
!1t  had  had  when  a  child.  She  tried  to  banish  the  impression
i as  irrelevant." (Proc, Vol. XX^^I.,  pp.  426-428.)

(It  looks  as  if  mushroom  shape  here  had  suggested
i  nusliroom  size,  and  so  the  toy  umbrella  mstead  of  a  real
■t  Dne.)

=y  Another  source  of  confusion  is  liable  to  occur  when  the
'X  .dea  to  be  transferred  goes  beyond  what  the  percipient's
i'j  mind  can  construct  from  material  at  its  disposal.  Thus

Dr.  Ermacora  tells  us  that  in  a  dream  impressed  on  a
1'  3hild  between  four  and  five  years  of  age,  a  lamb  figured.
^  The  child  lived  at  Venice  and  had  never  seen  a  live  lamb.

The  animal  that  duly  appeared  was  accordingly  inter-
s  preted  by  her  as  a  light -coloured  dog.^ {Proc,  Vol.  XI.,

pp.  251,^252).

But  it  is  not  only  mental  habits  and  associations  that
-  are  liable  to  afiect  the  impression  that  reaches  the  per-
.  cipient's  normal  waking  intelligence.  Outside  things  actu-
.  ally  occurring  or  existing  contemporaneously  sometimes
3  seem  to  mix  themselves  •  in  and  play  a  part  in  the  result.

One of the quaintest cases was  when  the  edge of  the
[  card  P.  was  looking  at,  cut  off  part  of  the  hallucinatory
picture — a  vase  ivitli  flowers — which  he  should  have  seen.
This  is  what  P.  said  :

I  see  something  round,  hke  a  round  ring.  I  can  see
some  straight  thmgs  from  the  round  thing.  I  think
it's  a  glass — it  goes  up.  I'll  tell  you  what  it  is  ;  it  must
be  a  pot — a  floAver  pot  you  know  with  things  growing  in
it.  I  only  guessed  that  because  you  don't  see  things
growing  out  of  a  glass. ^ — Ifs  not  clear  at  the  top  yet.

3  1  The  case  in  which  this  incident  occurred  is  too  long  and  complicated
to  quote  here,  but  I  strongly  recommend  those  interested  in  telepathy,
who  do  not  happen  to  remember  Dr.  Ermacora's  accovmt  of  his  Ex-

■  periments  in  Proc,  Vol.  XI.,  pp.  235-308,  to  read  it.  The  experiments
are  of  quite  an  unusual  kind,  and  the  fulness  of  telepathic  contact
manifested  in  them  between  the  sleeping  percipient  and  the  secondary
self  (as  it  probably  was)  of  the  agent,  is  very  remarkable.

2  The  impression  was  evidently  confused,  which  may  have  been  due

'■- to  distraction  in  the  agent,  who,  while  thinking  of  a  vase  with  flowers,

i sat  actually  facing  a  pot  with  a  growing  india-rubber  plant  in  it.


64  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick.  [pari

You  see  something  going  up  and  you  can't  see  the  topj  jj
because  of  the  edge  of  the  paper— it's  cut  off.  I  don't
wonder,  because  it's  no  good  wondering  what  Mr.  Smith
[the  agent]  does,  he  does  such  funny  thmgs.  I  should
fancy  it  might  be  a  geranium,  but  there's  only  sticks,
so  you  can't  tell. (Proc,  Vol.  VIII.,  pp.  565,  6.)

Two  cases  of  percipients  being  apparently  aided  or
influenced  by  an  object  in  front  of  them  are  recorded  by
Mr.  Rawson.  In  the  first  the  agent  drew  a  clock.  The
percipient,  Mrs.  L,  began  drawing  within  ten  to  fifteen
seconds  and  presently  said,  "I  am  drawing  something  I
can  see."  She  sketched  the  clock  in  front  of  her  on  the
mantelpiece,  which  was,  however,  quite  unlike  the  agent's
clock — a  wall  clock  with  weights.  {Proc,  Vol.  XI  pp  10
11).

The  second  case  was  more  curious.  The  agent's  drawing
represented  a  sand  glass.  This  was  unknown  to  Mr.
Rawson. He  writes':

Mrs.  B.  [the  percipient]  after  waitmg  some  three  minutes
said,  "  I  can't  think  of  anything."  In  about  fifteen
seconds  more  she  called  me  and  said,  "  Look  here,"—
pointing  to  a  gilt  four-leaved  shamrock  like  this  [drawing
of  it  given]  which  formed  an  ornament  at  the  corner  of  a
picture,  frame  in  front  of  her  as  she  sat  at  a  table  with
her  back  to  Mrs.  L.  [the  agent]  ...  "  Look  here,  Mr.
Rawson,  I  was  looking  vacantly  before  me  and  I  noticed
this. It's  the  only  idea  I  have  and  I  will  draw  it."

When  I  looked  at  her  drawmg  I  was  astonished  to  see
that  she  had  only  drawn  two  leaves  of  the  shamrock,  and
those  the  two  [opposite  each  other]  which  exactly  re-
semble the  interior  of  a  sand  glass.  (See  Proc,  Vol.  XI.,
p.  15,  where  the  drawings  are  reproduced.)  i  ^

h

The  mental  process  here  is  somewhat  obscure,  but  it
looks  as  if  the  idea  ^  of  the  object  to  be  transferred  had

1  I  say  idea  rather  tlian  form,  because  the  percipient's  drawing  cor-  4,
responded  to  the  glass  part  of  the  sand  glass— the  essential  part  of  it.
It  ignored  the  stand,  which  was  prominent  in  the  form  of  the  agent's
drawing. It  is  of course  possible that  the succe.ss  here  was  nurelv  >

'■ ■'  ISOIl


,xxxix.]  Telepathic  Communication.  65

een  grasped  subliiiiinally,  and  to  get  it  apprehended
upraliminally  the  subUminal  intelligence  had  picked  out
he  lines  in  the  shamrock  corresponding  to  the  form  of  a
and  glass  as  one  picks  out  lines  and  marks  in  glowing
oal  when  one  sees  faces  in  the  fire.

In  Professor  Gilbert  Murray's  experiments  several  cases
re  noted  where  some  external  fact  or  occurrence  seemed
3  suggest  or  stimulate  the  right  idea,  not  as  it  did  in
lie  above  cases,  but  by  some  sort  of  association  of  ideas.

will  quote  three.

Subject  to  be  transferred,  Ghost  of  Strafford  coming  in  to
see  Charles  I.,  when  John  Inglesant  was  page-in- waiting.

Percipient  says,  "  I  think  this  is  wrong.  I'm  going
to  guess  it  is  a  ghost.  (A  light  through  the  window  sug-
gested a  ghost.)  I  should  say  a  sort  of  Cavaher  ghost
appearing  in  the  evening.  I  should  think  it  is  in  a  book.
Charles  I.  appearing  to  anybody — ghost  appearing  to
Charles  I.— (guessmg)  Strafford."  {Proc,  Vol.  XXIX.,
p.  94.)

Subject,  Cousin  B having  his  eyes  examined  by  Mr.

C  . Percipient says  : "  An oculist,  C  -,  examining

the  eyes  of  B  " (suggested  by  one  of  the  company

moving  her  spectacles). {Proc,  Vol.  XXIX.,  p.  98.)

Subject,  Savonarola  having  the  pictures  burnt  in  Florence
and  standing  up  and  a  crowd  round.  Percipient  says,
"  It's  Itahan — I  think  it's  something  in  a  book.  Well,
this  is  the  merest  guess  and  may  have  something  to  do
with  the  spark  that  came  out  of  the  fire — I  get  a  smell
of  burning,  the  smell  of  a  bonfire — I  get  Savonarola  burn-
ing the  pictures  in  Florence." {Proc,  Vol.  XXIX.,  p.  104.)

Professor  Murray  in  his  Presidential  Address  discusses
he  influence  of  such  external  events.  He  says  {Proc,
'o\.  XXIX.,  p.  59)  :

Now for some experiments, where the  subconscious
impression  chose some sense-channel  by  which  to  reach

3cidental.  The  reason  for  thinking  otherwise,  besides  the  large  amount
I  telepathy  manifested  in  the  series,  is  that  the  selection  of  the  portion
f  the  shamrock  drawn  is  a  very  odd  one  if  purely  arbitrary,  and  is
scounted  for  if  prompted  telepathically.


♦


SSI


66  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick.  [par!

me.  First,  the  sense  of  smell.  My  daughter  [the  agent
thought  of  Savonarola  at  Florence  and  the  people  burnini
their  clothes  and  pictures  and  valuables  in  the  square.-
I  first  felt,  "This  is  Italy,"  then,  "This  is  not  modern"
and  then  hesitated,  when  accidentally  a  small  tarry  bit  o
coal  tumbled  out  of  the  fire,  I  smelt  oil  or  paint  burning
and  so  got  the  whole  scene.  It  seems  as  though  hen
some  subconscious  impression,  struggling  up  towards  eon
sciousness,  caught  hold  of  the  burning  coal  as  a  means  o:
getting  through.  (I  am  sorry  to  use  metaphorical  Ian
guage,  but  exact  language  would  be  both  difficult  anc
cumbrous.)  In  this  case  then  the  information  came'
through  the  sense  of  smell.

Mrs.  Verrall,  who  reported  on  the  whole  series  ol
experiments,  makes  some  interesting  comments  on  this
passage  in  the  address— she  says  {Proc,  Vol.  XXIX  i
p.  85)  :  ',

The  subjective  impressions  of  the  percipient  as  to  method'
are  always  valuable,  and  Professor  Murray  has  given  us  con-
crete examples  of  each  of  the  suggested  processes. But  a
considerable  familiarity  with  this  type  of  phenomena,  both!"
as  critic  and  as  percipient,  leads  me  to  warn  the  reader
that,  though  the  subjective  impression  is  no doubt  accu-
rately noted,  we  must  not  accept  it  unchallenged  as  an
explanation of the process. In other words, while  we
may  grant,  for  instance, that  the  smell  of  a  tarry  coal
which  fell  from  the  fire  was  the  means  of  translating  a
subconscious  impression  into a  conscious  thought  of  the
burning pictures, it is not safe to infer  that such  an
incident is a necessary part of the process. In  the
unusual  condition  induced  by  a  dehberate  desire  to  plunge
below  the  threshold  and  bring  back  spoil  from  the  depths,
the  mind  grasps  eagerly  after  something  familiar,  and—
I speak  at least  of my own sensations — is  relieved  at
seizing  a  solid  fact, withm  normal  experience,  to  which
it  may  attach  the  half -apprehended  object  of its  search.
The  percipient's  mind  being  thus,  so  to  say,  on  the  look
out  for  such  a  Imk,  fastens  on  the  falling  coal,  but  had
the  coal  not  fallen,  it  is  capable  of  finding  some  other


Til
(tin
il
m

A{
n

ki

bi

fr

er,

fj


XXXIX.]


Telepathic  Communication.


67


link,  or  even  of  forging  one.  Thus  in  one  of  his  instances
^  of  a  fictitious  association  of  ideas,  Professor  Murray
~ speaks  of  hearing  a  horse  in  the  road  outside  : "I  have

a  noise  of  hoofs.  I  expect  it's  the  noise  of  hoofs  in  the
'  street  that  makes  me  think  of  it."  But  in  the  con-
^ temporary  record  of  the  note-taker  we  read  :  "  No  noise

of  hoofs  in  the  street."  ^

^  It  is  a  frequent  feature  of  telepathic  "  messages,  '  and
le  fact  appears  in  a  good  many  of  the  cases  discussed
bove,  that  the  percipient's  imiDression, even  when  clear
nd  correct  as  far  as  it  goes,  does  not  give  the  whole
message." This  is  a  very  important  thing  to  keep  in
lind when estimating the value of information  tele-
i  athically  received. Telepathy,  as  we  know  it,  even  if  it
^'  ere more readily available than it is, could not  be
V  ;lied  on  like  telegraphy  to  convey  a  message  accurately
ad fully  ; and the message often stops  short  of  com-
^  leteness for  no obvious reason. I will conclude  my
samination  of  develojoment  of  telepathic  impressions,  by
J  uoting  two  cases  illustrative  of  this  fact. In  both  the
^ansmission  is  very  successful  as  far  as  it  goes. In  the
rst  it  is also very  prompt. In the second the  idea
^1  merged  by  stages.

The  first  is  one  of  Baron  von  Schrenck-Notzing's  ex-
j,  eriments. He,  in  one  room,  drew  The  staff  of  Msculapius
jl  ith  the  serpent. The  percipient,  Fraiilein  A.,  in  another
.  )om with the door closed drew at the same time  a
lake — or  at  least  a  wavy  line  with  a  head  and  a  tail
JsembUiig  the agent's snake. But there was no  staff,
erhaps the percipient had not heard of the staff  of
,j  llsculapius, and so the idea failed to reach her  ;  and
,  le  report  leaves  it  uncertain  whether  she  even  interpreted
er  own  rough  drawing  as  a  snake. In  any  case,  how-
.j  ;^er,  it  is  certain  that  the  staff  was  not  represented  either
I  I  form  or  in  idea. {Proc,  Vol.  VII.,  p.  12,  and  page  6
^  ■  reproduction  of  diagrams).

I  The  second  incomplete  impression  I  shall  quote  is  one
j  :  Professor  Murray's. The subject  to be  impressed — -a

f  1  For  this  experiment  cf.  Proc,  Vol.  XXIX.,  p.  60  and  pp. 92,  93.


68  Mrs.  Henry  SidgivicJc.  [par^


5sn


purely  imaginary  one — was  Celia  NetvboU  under  a  gourd
tree  at  Sfnyrna.  The  percipient  said,  "  Modern  Greek  oi
some  kind — sort  of  Asia  Minor  place — a  tree  and  womeii
sitting  under  it — a  particular  tree — girl  sitting  undei'
it — she  does  not  belong  to  the  place — she  is  English —
something  to  do with  a  poet  ^— can't be Mrs.  Kipling'

— no  it's  a  girl — rather like one of the 0  s — don't

think  I  can  get  her."  (Proc,  Vol.  XXIX.,  p.  107,  also
p.  66.)

Here  each  item  as  it  emerges  is  correct  or  immediately
corrected,  and  the  whole  scene,  as  it  were,  is  grasped ;
but  the  percipient  fails  to  recognise  either  the  identity
of  the  lady  or  the  exact  place,  though  both  are  ex-
tremely prominent  in  the  original  idea,  and  though  char-
acteristics of  both  emerge  in  the  impression.

I  have  now,  I  think,  sufficiently  shown  that  there  are
obstacles  or  at  any  rate  difficulties  in  the  way  of  tele-
pathic transmission  which  easily  may,  and  in  fact  often
do,  interfere  with  the  process,  and  prevent  a  "  message "
being  received  as  the  sender  intended.  Apart  from
difficulties  on  the  agent's  own  side,  and  even  when  a
message  has  apparently  safely  reached  some  part  of  the
percipient's  mind,  it  may  fail  to  pass  successfully  from
that  to  the  normal  waking  consciousness.  And  this  not
only  because  the  impression  is  sometimes  too  feeble  to
prevail,  but  because  as  transmitted  to  the  normal  con-
sciousness the  latter  may  fail  to  interpret  it.  And  the
difficulties  may  be  aggravated  by  differences  in  the  results,
according  as  different  modes  of  externalisation — different
methods  of  transferring  the  subliminal  impression  to  the
normal  consciousness — are  used,  and  even  by  deliberate
invention  in  the  subliminal  mind.

The  amount  of  light  thrown  incidentally  in  the  course
of  our  investigation  on  the  telepathic  process  is  I  fear  not
very  great.  But  I  think  there  is  some,  and  indeed
enough  to  give  good  grounds  for  hope  that,  as  our  ac-
cumulation of telepathic occurrences, spontaneous  and


speri


I


^  Miss  Newbolt  is  the  daughter  of  Sir  Henry  Newbolt,  author  oV
Admirals  All  and  other  poems.


is  XXXIX.]


Telepathic  Communication.


xperimental,  increases,  we  shall  gradually  acquire  a  more
omplete  understanding  of  how  telepathy  works.  In  the
aeanwhUe  it  is  clear  that  extreme  caution  is  needed  in
.ccepting  telepathic  messages  as  either  accurate  or  com-
(lete  when  they  reach  us,  whether  the  sender  be  incarnate
•r  discarnate.


'^O  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [pab


SUPPLEMENT.


A  TEXT-BOOK  OF  METAPSYCHICS.i

Review  and  Ceitiqite  by  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.

The  object  of  Professor  Richet  in  writing  his  great  wov.
Trait  e  de  Metapsycliique  is  to  introduce  Psychical  Researc
as  a  serious  scientific  study  into  the  Universities,  and  t(
get  it  recognised  as  the  beginnings  of  a  real  science.

He  considers  that  the  stages  through  which  the  subjec
has  already  passed  are  :


1.  The  Mythical  ;  up  to  Mesmer  (1778).

2.  The  "Magnetic"; from  Mesmer  to  the  Fox  sisten
(1847).

3.  The Spiritist  ; from the Fox sisters to  WiUiair
Crookes  (1847-1872).

4.  The Scientific  ; which begins with William  Crookei
(1872).

and  he  expresses  a  hope  that  this  book  wall  help  to  inaugurate
a  fifth  period,  which  he  calls  "  The  Classic,"  being  that  o:
scientific  recognition.

But  he  reahses  and  sympathises  with  the  great  difficulty
which  men  of  science  feel  on  encountering  facts  of  a  different
order  from  any  to  which  they  are  accustomed.  The  forces
with  which  the  investigation  deals  are  intelhgent  forces  :  ali
other  forces  as  yet  studied  by  men  of  science  are  bhnd  forces

1  I'raiti  de  Metapsychique,  par  Charles  Richet,  Professear  a  TUniversite,
de  Paris,  Membre  de  I'lnstitut.  Dedie  a  la  memoire  de  mes  illustres
amis  et  maitres.  Sir  William  Crookes  et  Frederic  Myers,  qui,  aussi  grands
par  lo  courage  que  par  la  pensee,  ont  trac6  les  premiers  lineaments
de  cette  science.  Omnia  jam  fient  fieri  quaj  posse  negabam.  (Paris,
Felix  Alcan,  1922. Pp.  ii+816.)


Ill


1(11

imia
jiei
ileli


n  0
im


ai


l^xxxix.]  A  Text-Book  of  Metapsychics.  71

ievoid  of  self-consciousness  and  caprice  ;  in  other  words,
sdthout  personality  or  wiU..  Whereas  intellectuaUty,  Avill,
md  intention, — which  may  not  be  human  but  which  resemble
mman  will  and  intention, — are  characteristic  of  metapsychic
jhenomena.  Such  phenomena  seem  due  to  unknown  but
nteUigent  forces,  including  among  these  unknown  inteUigences
;he  astonishing  intellectual  phenomena  of  our  OAvn  sub-con-
iciousness.

Hence  he  is  not  surprised  at  the  hostile  reception  and
ncreduhty  which  the  facts  encounter  at  present.  But  he
idduces  instances  of  other  phenomena,  now  well  known  and
iommonplace,  which  half  a  century  ago  Avould  have  been
•egarded  as  wildly  incredible.  For  instance,  these  four,  which
n  1875  "could  not  possibly  have  been  foreseen  :

1.  A  voice  spealdng  in  Paris  is  heard  in  Rome.

2.  The  germs  of  disease  can  be  bottled  and  cultivated
in  a  cupboard.

3.  The  bones  of  a  living  person  can  be  photographed.

4.  Guns  can  be  taken  through  the  air  at  180  miles
an  hour.

Professor  Richet  is  critical  in  his  language.  He  will  permit
is  to  say  that  some  facts  are  usual  and  some  unusual ;  but
le  objects  to  our  making  two  classes,  facts  that  are  under-
:tood  and  facts  that  are  not  understood.  For  he  claims  that
ve  really  understand  nothing  of  the  truths  of  science,  whether
^reat  or  small.  We  hve  among  mysteries,  which  only  do  not
istonish  us  because  we  are  used  to  them.

The  facts  of  metapsychics  are  neither  more  nor  less
mysterious  than  the  phenomena  of  electricity,  of  fertihza-
tion,  and  of  heat.  They  are  not  so  usual  ;  that  is  the
whole  difference.  But  it  would  be  absurd  to  dechne  to
study  them  because  they  are  unusual.

In  estimating  the  value  of  this  book  we  must  remember
ts  object.  This  object  wiH  hardly  be  plain  to  Enghsh  readers
vho  occupy  themselves  with  the  translation  so  usefully  •  pre-
jared  by  Mr.  Stanley  de  Brath.  For  its  title.  Thirty  Years
)/  Psychical  Besearch,  does  not  convey  the  impression  of  a
Treatise  on  Metapsychics.  It  suggests  rather  a  summary  or
survey  of  thirty  years  of  personal  experience  and  investiga-


72  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [par

tion.  I  can  imagine  someone  saying,^ — "  Well,  after  all,  tha
is  what  the  book  is,  except  that  the  author  quotes  not  onl
his  own  observations  but  the  observations  and  experimeni
of  many  others,  so  far  as  they  have  been  made  accessibl
in  one  of  the  Romance  languages."  If  this  were  the  plat
it  might  be  supposed  that  when  experiences  are  cited  the
would  be  given  in  full,  with  all  the  precautions  and  details
like  a  description  of  some  new  experiment  in  a  scientifi
Journal ;  so  as  to  enable  a  student  to  put  himself  in  a  judicia
position,  and  detect,  if  he  can,  flaws  of  observation  am
possibilities  of  error.

But  that  is  not  the  line  taken  by  a  text-book,  or  by  an;
other  summary  treatise.  Nor  is  it  consistent  ■with  Professo
Richet's  plan.  It  would  be  altogether  too  burdensome  an(
bulky  to  try  and  cover  the  ground  in  that  manner.  A  com
prehensive  treatise  can  only  give  a  general  summary  of  thi
methods  and  results,  with  references  to  the  original  sources
where  the  student  must  look  up  the  details  of  any  particula
point  he  thinks  worthy  of  close  attention,  in  the  Proceeding.
of  scientific  societies  or  other  contemporary  pubhcations.  Ful
details  are  never  given  in  a  text-book.  And  in  many  text
books  no  reference  to  the  original  source  is  given.  Incidenti
are  copied  from  other  writers,  or  taken  on  second-hanc
authority  from  some  other  expositor.

Hence  in  judging  the  information  given  in  the  Traite  di
Metapsychique,  we  must  not  judge  it  exactly  from  the  S.P.R
point  of  view.  If  we  do,  we  shall  be  able  to  point  out
lacunae,  and  even  a  certain  amount  of  casualness  in  thf
narration,  which  can  only  be  corrected  by  supplementary
study  of  the  original  record  whence  the  facts  summarised  in
the  text-book  are  drawn.

It  is  famihar  to  students  of  science  that  the  original  record
of  any  experiment  or  discovery  is  usually  more  interesting
and  ilhiminating,  when  the  paper  written  by  the  original
discoverer  is  referred  to,  than  the  comparatively  brief  summary
in  -a  text-book  can  possibly  be.  Such  summaries  are  of
great  value  to  students,  who  could  not  otherwise  be  expected
to  cover  the  ground  or  to  know  what  to  look  for.  To  a
certain  extent  they  may  be  accepted  as  representing  the
impression  made  upon  the  mind  of  the  writer  of  the  text-


lie

Sllffi(


and
E

m


to
pos
pre
dec
I

tin

tioi
mi:
me
pe(
aii(
8tr

Hf
on
or
dis
foi
fa(
tei


ii


LXXXIX.]  A  Text-Book  of  Meta'psycUcs.


73


book ;  and  they  may  in  many  cases  be  accepted  on  his
authority,  unless  there  is  some  special  reason  for  doubting
them.  For  the  purpose  of  passing  examinations,  and  getting
a  ground-work  of  knowledge,  the  text-book  alone  may  be
sufficient.  But  for  anything  hke  serious  study,  by  a  senior
student,  of  some  special  phenomenon  which  attracts  his  atten-
tion, references  to  the  original  sources  are  indispensable.
Otherwise  a  number  of  illuminating  details  may  be  missed,
and  facts  may  either  be  accepted  too  readily,  or,  on  the
other  hand,  rejected  too  readily;  whereas  a  fuller  study  of
the  whole  circumstances  would  supply  many  missing  details,
and  contribute  to  a  fuller  and  better  understanding.

Especially  is  this  necessary  when  dealing  with  facts  to
which  we  have  not  a  theoretical  clue,  and  which  in  their
own  nature  seem  more  or  less  incredible.  In  all  such  cases
no  amount  of  reading  would  or  ought  to  justify  a  feeUng
of  complete  confidence ;  nothing  can  replace  first-hand  experi-
ence. One  object  of  a  text-book  is  to  encourage  the  student
to  make  experiments  for  himself,  to  open  his  mind  to  the
possibihties  of  discovery,  and  to  value  the  critical  care  and
iS  precautions  which  have  been  and  must  be  taken  to  avoid
deception.

Professor  Richet  maintains  that  he  is  careful  to  confine
himself  to  a  summary  and  description  of  the  facts  of  observa-
tion and  to  leave  theories  to  the  future.  He  objects  to
mixing  up  hypotheses  concerning  the  real  nature  of  the  pheno-
mena at  the  present  stage.  The  facts  as  conceived  by  many
people  seem  to  have  a  distinct  bearing  on  human  destiny  ;
and  an  attempt  has  been  made  to  build  a  great  theoretical
structure  upon  them.

But  all  this  is  entirely  foreign  to  Professor  Richet's  object.
1,  He  says  in  his  Preface  that  he  has  "endeavoured  to  write
in  on  science,  not  on  dreams."  He  has  therefore  confined  himself,
nil  or  tried  to  confine  himself,  to  a  statement  of  facts  and  a
J  discussion  of  their  actuaUty,  scarcely  mentioning  theories;
1  for  all  theories  as  yet  proposed  to  account  for  metapsychic
[i'  facts  appear  to  him  terribly  frail.  No  doubt  some  day  a
tenable  theory  will  be  formulated ;  but  the  time  is  not  yet,
;i  for  the  facts  themselves  are  in  dispute.  Scientific  men  have
s hitherto  often  rejected  them  mthout  examination.  Neverthe-


'^'^  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [pari

less  in  his  view  the  facts  are  numerous,  authentic,  and  startUng  ;
and  he  does  not  see  how  any  unbiassed  man  of  science  could
dare  to  cast  doubt  upon  them  all  if  he  consents  to  look  into
them.

The  three  fundamental  phenomena  of  the  new  science  he
sums  up  under  three  heads  :

1.  Cryptesthesia  (which  covers  Clairvoyance  and  Telepathy
and  Premonitions).

2.  Teleldnesis  (or  movements  of  inert  matter  without
apparent  contact  or  known  forces).

3.  Ectoplasm  (or  what  are  commonly  called  material-
isation phenomena  :  appearances  of  clothes,  veils  and
living  bodies).

These,  he  says,  make  up  the  whole  of  Metapsychics.  "To
admit  them  is  to  admit  a  great  deal.  To  go  further  is  to
go  beyond  the  present  bounds  of  Science."  He  claims  however
that  these  three  strange  phenomena  will  have  to  be  admitted,
whatever  may  be  the  explanation  at  which  we  ultimately
arrive  ;  "  although  Science,  severe  and  inexorable  Science,
has  hitherto  refused  to  contemplate  them."

It  has  long  been  recognised  that  the  main  branches  of  the
whole  subject  are  two,  the  more  purely  psychical  variety
and  the  more  especially  physical  variety.  The  two  are  prob-
ably connected,  but  the  connection  is  not  always  manifest.

Professor  Richet  divides  his  book  accordingly,  and  calls
the  two  branches :

1.  Subjective  Metapsy cities,  including  Lucidity  of  various
Idnds,  Monitions,  and  Previsions  ;  and

2.  Objective Metajjsij chics, including physical  movements
exceptionally  caused,  Levitations,  and  MateriaUsations.

The  subjective  portion  occupies  some  500  pages  ;  the  ob-
jective portion,  in  which  he  has  admitted  Hauntings,  occupies
about  300  ;  while  the  concluding  chapter  of  the  book  is  a
general  discussion  of  the  phenomena,  with  prejudice  shown
in  favour  of  normal  and  material  interpretation  in  terms  of
human  faculty,  and  with  hostile  criticism  of  the  other  rather
facile  hypotheses  which  have  been  made  by  different  workers.

The  treatment,  or  imphed  doctrine  throughout,  is  quite
appropriate  to  the  attitude  of  mind  natural  to  an  eminent


LXXXIX.]


A  Text-Booh  of  M  eta  psychics.


75


Physiologist,  accustomed  to  deal  with  bodily  mechanisms,
and  not  ready  to  admit  any  kind  of  supernormal  causes
beyond  unexpected  and  puzzhng  extensions  of  human  powers.

The  facts  of  clairvoyance  and  of  Lucidity  generally,  or
what  he  recognises  as  the  unexplained  human  faculties  which
he  sums  up  as  Cryptesthesia,  prove,  he  claims,  that  in  human
subconsciousness  there  are  unexpected  reserves  of  intelHgence
and  far-reaching  perceptions,  not  exphcable  by  the  recognised
organs  of  sense  and  transcending  the  recognised  boundaries
of  both  space  and  time.  The  facts  of  Telekinesis  and
Materiahsation  tend  to  show  that  the  human  organism  can
exert  force  beyond  its  recognised  periphery,  and  that  temporary
emanations'  from  that  organism  can  not  only  exert  force  on
distant  objects,  but  can  also  mould  themselves  into  strange
simulacra,  which  for  a  time  can  be  seen,  felt,  and  photo-
I  graphed,  and  Avhich  imitate,  in  an  extraordinary  manner,
portions  of  the  normal  body  whence  they  arose.  These  ecto-
plasmic  formations  are  the  most  incredible  of  aU,  and  must
have  seemed  bizarre  and  almost  repellent  to  any  Biologist.
Nevertheless  Professor  Eichet,  in  spite  of  his  recognition  of
their  amazing  and  outrageous  character,  finds  himself  able
to  vouch  for  them  as  unexplained  and  apparently  inexphcabie
reahties.

AU  ideas  about  the  Soul  and  Survival  are  foreign  to  his
conceptions. He  remains  a  Materiahst,  satisfied  with  expressing
the  facts  in  terms  of  their  material  substratum,  and  able  to
dispense  with  any  speculation  as  to  their  psychic  and  spiritual
nature. Everything  is  attributed  to  unconscious  and  hitherto
unrecognised latent powers in the human organism.  If
information  is  obtained  about  things  occurring  at  a  chstance, —
the  fact  is  attributed  to  the  lucidity  or  Cryptesthesia  of  the
unconscious  part  of  the  medium,  not  to  the  conveyance  of
:|  information by some other inteUigence. And when  com-
m  munications are received, apparently from some  deceased
1  I  person, about  things  which  he  alone  might  be  supposed  to
know, — that  also  is  attributed  to  the  same  kind  of  cryptes-
: thesia, called  forth  and  directed  by  means  unknown  to  us,
so as to operate unconsciously on the bodily  mechanism.
! And  in  such  cases  the  impression  produced,  on  the  medium
and  on  those  present,  is  liable  to  take  the  form  of  a  dramatic


loft'


76  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [part  0'

semblance  or  impersonation,  so  striking  as  to  lead  them  to|
imagine  that  the  deceased  person  is  in  reality  exercising  some!
influence  ;  it  appears  that  he  is  acting  as  if  he  still  retained!  flich
consciousness  and  memory,  and  as  if  he  utiHsed  the  medium's
mechanism,  and  worked  it  as  he  used  to  work  his  own,  so
as  by  its  aid  to  be  enabled  to  communicate.

Whereas,  on  Professor  Richet's  view,  or  at  least  on  what
he  considers  for  the  present  to  be  the  only  scientific  view,
such  deceased  persons,  having  lost  their  brain  and  bodily
mechanism,  have  ceased  to  be,  and  are  obviously  incapable
of  doing  anything  whatever,  let  alone  still  possessing  the
power  of  giving  any  information  or  showing  signs  of  intelli-
gence, even  though  the  intelligence  shown  is  such  as  otherwise
might  naturally  be  attributed  to  them.  To  suppose  that
deceased  people  are  able  to  communicate,  or  even  that  they
are  still  in  any  state  of  existence,  is  to  him  a  hypothesis,  a
speculation,  at  present  not  scientifically  justified.  We  must
be  satisfied  to  record  the  facts,  and  leave  the  interpretation
to  the  future.  Though  it  must  be  admitted  that  a  strong
prejudice  against  the  usually  adopted  explanation  may  lead
a  critic,  even  one  who  tries  to  be  scrupulously  fair,  into
discounting  and  occasionally  misrepresenting  some  of  the
facts  which  he  is  trying  to  record.  He  may,  for  instance,
be  tempted  to  bring  an  accusation  of  triviaUty  and  improba-
bility to  bear  on  cases  which,  to  a  less  prejudiced  mind,
would  emancipate  themselves  readily  from  any  such  accusation


So  far  I  have  attempted  to  give  some  indication  of  the
nature  and  scope  of  the  book,  which  undoubtedly  is  a  very
important  pubhcation,  and  is  bound  to  have  a  considerable
influence  on  the  future  development  of  the  subject.  It  may
now  be  well  to  add  a  few  points  of  genial  criticism.

And  first  on  certain  small  matters  of  nomenclature.  Pro
fessor  Richet's  object  in  his  nomenclature  is  to  avoid  anything
in  the  nature  of  hypothesis.  But  the  term  "  Cryptesthesia,"
which  he  prefers  to  Lucidity  or  Clairvoyance  and  Telepathy,
does  seem  unintentionaUy  to  convey  the  hypothesis  that  the
information  obtained  is  got  by  an  extension  of  the  powers,
or  by  an  enhanced  sensibiHty  of  the  organs  of  sense  ;  being
allied  to  the  words  Telesthesia  and  Hyperesthesia,  which  are


4


jXXXIX.]


A  Text-Booh  of  Metapsy chics.


77


ntended  to  convey  that  implication.  Something  of  that
lort  may  be  true,  but  it  is  unwise  to  assume  it.  A  term
yhich  seems  to  assume  it  may  become  a  troublesome  trap.
^Nevertheless  an  assumption  of  that  kind  does  seem  acceptable
;o  Professor  Richet,  for  says  he  :

"...  I  prefer  to  imagine  an  amazing  retinal  vision  of
written  words  (he  means  in  a  sealed  box  or  at  a  great
distance)  than  a  reading  of  my  brain  wherein  nothing
is  written,  but  in  which  there  are  so  many  impressions,
memories,  and  exceedingly  complex  and  evanescent  com-
binations that  are  really  ultra-microscopic  modifications  of
cellular  protoplasm,  and  have  no  relation,  apart  from
my  own  consciousness,  to  the  sound  or  to  the  phonetic
sign  of  a  name.  To  say  "telepathy"  explains  nothing.
Cerebral  vibration,  conscious  or  unconscious,  is  a  profound
mystery,  much  more  mysterious  than  a  signature,  which
is  a  positive,  real,  and  tangible  thing,  and  would  be
visible  to  sight  if  sufficiently  penetrating ;  whereas  the
reading  of  a  thought  cannot  be  explained  by  any  intensi-
fication of  any  of  our  senses."

French  Edition  (p.  76).
Enghsh  Edition  (p.  66).

After  some  illustrations  he  goes  on  :

"  Some  go  even  further.  As  there  are  facts  known
to  no  living  person,  but  known  to  B.,  now  dead,  this
can  still  be  explained  by  telepathy — it  is  still  by  telepathy
that  the  thought  of  B.,  deceased,  has  been  transmitted
to  the  percipient.

These  wire-drawn  explanations  amply  show  that  we
know  absolutely  nothing  of  the  means  whereby  cryptes-
thetic  cognitions  reach  the  mind  .  .  .

I  think  it  best  to  keep  within  the  Umits  of  rigid  science,
and  to  say — At  certain  times  the  mind  can  take  cogniz-
ance of  reahties  which  neither  our  senses,  our  insight,  nor
1  our  reasoning,  permit  of  our  knowing.  This  is  not  an
explanation,  but  it  leaves  the  door  open  to  any  future
explanation.  Human  thought  is  one  among  the  reahties
thus  made  known,  but  this  is  not  a  necessary  condition ;


I


'^^  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [pabi

the  reahty  alone  is  sufficient,  without  its  having  passed
through  a  human  mind.

Let  us  go  no  further,  and  in  presence  of  these  unusual
facts  let  us  be  content  to  say  that  our  mental  mechanism,
even  more  complex  than  it  seems,  has  means  of  cog-
nizance that  escape  analysis  and  are  even  beyond  surmise.
This  dispenses  with  all  hypothesis  ;  i  it  does  not  imply
that  cryptesthetic  knowledge  arises  from  transmitted
vibrations  of  human  thought;  it  merely  states  a  fact,
and  it  is  more  scientific  to  enunciate  a  fact  without
comment  than  to  enmesh  one's  self  in  theories,  such  as
telepathy,  which  are  entirely  unproven.

"  Telepathy  "  imphes  a  hypothesis  :  "  cryptesthesia  "
has  the  great  merit  that  it  does  not.  If  A.  sees  his
dying  friend  B.  at  the  moment  of  death  it  is  a  hypothesis
to  say  that  the  thought  of  B.  has  been  transmitted  to  A.
But  it  is  no  hypothesis  to  say  that  A.  has  some  special
sensibihty  that  makes  him  aware  of  the  death  of  B.  .  .  .

Therefore, when  in this  book  telepathy  is  spoken  of,
as  it  often  A^ill  be,  it  must  be  understood  as  a  particular
form of lucidity, and not as a distinct phenomenon.  ,
Both  are  equally  mysterious."

The  last  thing  I  want  to  do  in  a  review  is  to  argue  the
matter  with  the  author.  My  object  is  rather  to  present  his
case.  But  when  it  comes  to  theorising  or  speculating— which
is  inevitable  however  much  one  tries  to  refrain  from  it,— the
idea  of  attributing  a  sort  of  omniscience  to  the  unconscious
self  of  the  medium  strikes  me  as  so  far  fetched  and  intrinsi-
cally absurd  that  I  may  be  allowed  to  indicate  briefly  the
argument-  on  the  other  side,  which  I  will  do  by  paraphrasing
some  words  of  Mr.  J.  Arthur  Hill,  since  they  summarise  the
position  in  a  clear  and  crisp  manner.  He  writes  to  me  in
a  letter  something  like  this  :

To  yield  preference  to  the  hypothesis  that  Mrs.  Piper's
subliminal  somehow  has  access  to  the  memories  of,  say,  G.  P.,
rather than to the hypothesis of the continued  existence

1  I  interrupt  here  to  say  that  the  word  "  mechanism  "  in  this  con-
nexion is  full  of  hyi^othesis;  and  so  is  the  word  "sensibility'"  further
down.


161


Lxxxix.]  A  Text-Book  of  MetapsycMcs.


79


of  G.  P.,  appears  illogical.  The  assumption  of  quasi-omni-
science,  or  access  to  a  cosmic  reservoir  of  information  and
personal  memories,  is  a  step  further  from  fact  than  is  the
idea  of  personal  survival.  We  know  at  least  that  G.  P.  did
exist,  so  there  is  nothing  absurd  in  the  supposition  that  he
may  still  exist,  if  the  facts  point  that  way  ;  whereas  nothing
has  ever  suggested  the  possession  by  a  human  being  of  anj^
kind  of  omniscience.  Moreover,  even  if  the  idea  of  indefinite
extension  of  cryptesthesia  or  latent  sensibility  could  be  ration-
ally entertained,  there  would  still  be  the  searching  question
to  answer ; — "  From  among  the  mass  of  material  thus  open,
who  selects  the  appropriate  details  "  ?

I  (0.  J.  L.)  put  this  question  to  Richet  briefly  and  forcibly,
"  Who  selects  ?  " Qids  deligit  ?

It  is  permissible  to  add  that  the  fact  of  telepathy  or  trans-
mission of  ideas  between  living  persons,  without  perceptible
use  of  the  organs  of  sense,  makes  it  easier  to  accept  the
possibility  of  telepathic  communion  with  a  discarnate  mind.
The  term  "  discarnate  mind,"  or  mind  dissociated  from  matter,
no  doubt  to  Richet  sounds  absurd.  But  probably  a  Physicist
is  more  accustomed  to  non-sensible  and  immaterial  conditions
than  is  a  Physiologist.  A  Physiologist  is  bound  to  search
for  mechanical  and  molecular  processes  in  the  complex  organ-
isms he  studies  ;  and  very  admirable  and  successful  has  been
his  search.  But  a  Physicist  has  had  to  learn,  among  other
things,  that  in  the  ether  of  space  there  are  no  molecules,  no
Chemistry,  and  perhaps  no  ordinary  Mechanics.  He  is  not
unaccustomed  to  encounter  a  thing  sui  generis,  with  properties
of  its  own,  distinct  from  the  properties  of  the  atomic  and
molecular  aggregates  with  which  our  animal-derived  sense
organs  have  made  us  obtrusively  familiar.  Professor  Richet
would  probably  agree  that  to  state  a  fact  in  terms  of  matter
is  after  all  no  full  and  ultimate  and  final  elucidation.  Mystery
remains  even  when  such  a  statement  can  be  made.  So  why
lay  undue  and  exclusive  stress  on  what  is  after  aU  an  inter-
mediate stage  of  exposition  ?

Richet  is  quite  within  his  rights  in  feeUng  any  form  of
spiritistic hypothesis highly improbable. But he must  not


Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [paei

suppose  that  either  in  his  mind  or  in  his  book  he  is  refraining

from  theorising. Witness  such  passages  as  these  :

It

Everything  seems  to  prove  that  the  intelligence  is  a  ««
function  of  the  brain,  that  it  depends  on  the  integrity  lil
of  the  cerebral  mechanism,  and  on  the  volume  and  quality
of  the  blood  that  irrigates  it.

It  is  possible,  it  is  even  probable,  that  there  may
exist  in  nature  other  intelligences  under  other  conditions
than  the  physical  conditions  of  terrestrial  life  ;  but  they
would  no  longer  be  human  intelligences  .  .  .  They
would  not  belong  to  humanity;  since  the  mind,  whether
human  or  animal,  can  possess  the  human  psychological
characteristics  of  consciousness,  memory,  sensibility,  reason,
and  will,  only  if  the  brain  exists.  Thousands  and  thou-
sands of  experiments  establish  so  close  a  relation  between
the  brain  as  organ  and  intelligence  as  function,  that  it
is  as  impossible  to  admit  the  persistence  of  the  function
(mind)  without  the  organ  (brain)  as  the  renal  secretion
without  the  kidney.

F.  (p.  770).
• E.  (p.  607).


iter
m
II

St

ifoi
irai


koi
sitt


i  (


This  being  his  view — or  at  all  events  his  present  view, — it
is  not  surprising  that  he  finds  a  difficulty  about  telepathy.
If  telepathy  means  direct  reading  and  interpreting  the  mole-
cular configuration  in  another  person's  brain,  by  whatever
penetrating  insight  such  molecules  can  be  perceived— such
reading  is  I  admit  frankly  incredible.  No  wonder  he  prefers
to  take  refuge  in  a  vague  agnosticism  rather  than  admit  the
likelihood  of  any  such  forced  and  elaborate  and  gratuitous
hypothesis.  But  his  readers  are  probably  aware  that  other
serious  students  have  held  other  notions,  and  that  his  alterna-
tive is  not  the  only  one.  Some  approximation  to  one  of
the  normal  methods  of  conveying  human  thought  is  altogether
more  likely.  The  point  largely  turns  upon  the  question
whether  mind  ever  acts  on  mind  directly  without  the  customary
modes  of  bodily  and  sensory  signalling,  and  without  the
unhkely  and  unsupported  hypothesis  of  brain  acting  on  brain.
To  try  to  gain  an  idea  direct  from another  person's  brain


ill


Itai


IjXXXIX.]  a  Text-Booh  of  MetapsycMcs.


81


J  ivould  be  like  trying  to  get  an  idea  of  music  by  witnessing
:rom  outside  a  hall  some  X-ray  shadows  of  the  movement
Df  the  orchestra. A  microscopic  examination  of  a  phonographic
!  1  record on a wax cylinder would be more enlightening  if
ity  juoh record  were made and were available. And this  is
itj  Drobably  the analogy  on  which sundry  persons  have  specu-
ated, but its basis is very  insecure when appUed to  the
lat  nterpretation  of  molecular  configurations  ; which,  after  all,  are
M  naccessible.

iej The fact is, that in spite of Professor Richet's  instinct
ley  lot  to theorise but merely to state  facts, he cannot  help
18  iheorising at times  ; and in my view no one can.  !Facts
;al  strung  on  no  thread  of  hypothesis  are  random  and  intractable
)i  things. Some  hypothesis  at  the  back  of  one's  mind  is  necessary  :
ID-  jo  abstain  from  it  is  impossible,  however  lightly  and  tenta-
eii  "ively it be held. But Richet is naturally so  impressed,
il  through a life-long occupation with Physiology, with  the
%  material  and  cerebral  aspect  of  orthodox  psychic  phenomena
jj  n  general,  that  he  does  not  feel  as  if  he  were  theorising  in
:;he  least  when  he  assumes  that  throughout  every  mental  action,
I),  in  origin, in transmission, and  in reproduction, there  must
1,  36 a physical concomitant at every stage. Take  Telepathy
["or instance : — admittedly there is a physical  concomitant
;j  Dn  the  part  of  the  percipient,  whose  muscles  must  be  put
:nto action somehow, presumably through his  brain-nerve
mechanism as usual, in order to display any result  ;  but
^  it  is  a  pure  assumption  to  suppose  that  that  brain  is  stimu-
,  lated mechanically or physicaUy by some other  organism.

Or,  to  put  it  more  concretely,  brain  processes  are  presumably
.  of  a  chemical  order,  and  it  is  a  hypothesis  to  assume  that
bhere  is  anything  in  the  nature  of  vibration  between  one
^  brain  and  another  when  telepathy  or  any  other  transmission
3f  thought  occurs  between  two  people.  Whatever  may  turn
3ut  to  be  the  truth  about  such  a  matter,  to  state  with  our
present  dearth  of  knowledge  that  there  must  be  such  a  vibra-
tion is  merely  dogma.  So  that  when  Richet  says  that  a
telepathic  impression  must  be  due  to  some  unknown  vibration,
lie  is  theorising.

He seems rather enamoured of the word "  vibrations  "  ;
spelled  the same  in French as in English, and I  suppose


Sllll


82  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [pAE'ifj^j

meaning  the  same.  Of  Hallucination,  for  instance,  he  sayi  j,,,:
on  page  708,  ^

...  in  order  to  produce  a  veridical  hallucination  there
must  be  some  kind  of  exterior  cause  or  molecular  vibra
tion  that  starts  the  cryptesthetic  emotion  ;

though  he  admits  that  these "  vibrations  " do  not  resemblt
ordinary  mechanical  molecular  vibrations.

He  further  says  that  in  the  case  of  collective  hallucinations
when  several  persons  simultaneously  see  the  same  apparition,
it  is  impossible  to  deny  the  objectivity.  One  can  hardly
suiopose,  he  says,  that  these  images  which  many  people  see,
have  no  objectivity, — are  not  mechanically  objective.  But
other  views  have  been  held  and  discussed  by  Myers  and
Gurney.

So  that  the  only  theorising  he  really  seems  to  object  to.
strongly  is  the  variety  v/hich  is  connected  with  spiritistic
hyiDotheses.  It  may  not  have  occurred  to  him  that  any
theory  is  implied  in  ordinary  materialistic  views;  to  him
they  seem  axiomatic.  But  confidently  to  assume  their  neces-iy
sary  truth  and  completeness  is  to  close  the  door  to  a  possible
aspect  of  the  subject  which  many  students  have  been  driven
to,  in  spite  of  their  initial  materialistic  predilections.

I  see  that  Professor  Richet  not  only  objects  to  the  term
"  supernatural,"— which  many  people  do,— but  also  objects
to  the  term  "  supernormal,"  which  Myers  devised  in  order
to  take  its  place.  He  says  that  both  terms  are  inadmissible,
that  there  can  be  nothing  in  the  universe  but  the  natural
and  the  normal.  "  From  the  moment  that  a  fact  exists,  it
is  necessarily  both  natural  and  normal."  I  do  not  know
whether  the  French  word  normal  conveys  a  significance
different  from  ours,  but  certainly  the  phenomena  of  Meta-
psy chics  are  not  normal  in  our  sense  of  the  word.  They
may  be  real,  they  may  be  natural ;  they  may  even  some
day  seem  connnonplace  ;  but  certainly,  in  the  present  state
of  human  knowledge,  they  are  not  customary,  or  universally
admitted,  or  normal.  They  do  not  come  up,  either,  to
any  recognised  standard  or  norm.  They  lie  outside  our  regular
experience.  They  are  astonishing,  extraordinary,  supernormal.
This is evidently a limitation depending on the  present


ay
ill
If


1  HV

■I
\  Me
ieim


itas

Bfl


iaji


iXXXix.]  A  Text-Book  of  MetapsijcMcs.  83


standard  of  human  attainment.  But  then,  what  else  is  language  ? ,
Professor  Richet's  objection  to  the  term,  however,  is  interest-
ng,  because  it  emphasises  his  object,  which  is  to  bring  these
ahenomena  out  of  the  region  of  the  occult  and  the  mysterious,
nto  the  region  of  the  normal  through  unusual  faculties  of
nanliind.  "  Unusual  "  he  will  -perforce  allow :  but  "  suj)er-
lormal "  he  will  not.  And  that  is  a  brief  summary  of  his
theoretical  position  throughout  the  work.  His  hope  and
endeavour  are  to  trace  and  attribute  everything  to  the  normal
acuities  of  man,  without  bringing  in  outside  and  hypothetical
nfluences  of  any  kind  whatsoever.  Not  that  he  is  foolishly
iogmatic  enough  to  deny  the  possibility  of  such  influences,
jut  because  he  considers  that  they  are  beyond  the  scope  of
jresent  science  ; and  his  object  is  to  be  purely  scientific.

Whether  he  will  succeed  in  influencing  his  biological  colleagues
'avourably,  by  this  cautious  attitude,  is  doubtful  ;  but  at
my  rate  it  seems  to  give  him  some  advantages,  and  inspires
lim  with  an  easy  boldness  in  narrating  the  queerest  facts.
3e  can  feel  sure  that  his  sanity  will  not  be  called  in  question,
^d,  after  all,  what  the  theoretical  view  of  anj^  one  person
nay  be  at  any  given  time — even  a  Professor  Richet, — is
iomparatively  unimportant.  Judicial  recognition  and  accept-
mce  of  genuine  facts  is  the  vital  thing  for  the  future  well-
3eing  of  science.  For  if,  after  all  the  effort  of  the  past  and
present  generation,  the  subject  still  lies  outside  the  bounds
)f  recognition, — if  it  still  continues  to  be  the  subject  only
)f  ridicule  and  contempt, — ^that  wholesale  rejection  will  to
uture  generations  seem  rather  a  sad  and  lamentable  repetition
)f  mistakes  which  have  too  frequently  and  consistently  been
nade  by  the  high  priests  of  orthodoxy  in  the  past,
"^ow,  however,  we  learn  that  Professor  Richet  has  had  the
jourage  to  present  his  volume  to  the  French  Academy  of
iciences,  and  that  on  the  strength  of  his  reputation  the  book
vas  accepted  even  with  some  acclamation.  Criticism  of  course
s  far  from  silenced ;  no  one  would  wish  it  to  be  silenced  ;
5ut  the  dawn  of.  a  more  enlightened  day  seems  approaching.

Ckiticisms  of  Detail.
So  far  for  a  general  and  appreciative  survey  of  the  book,
it  is  rather  a  thankless  task  to  descend  to  details  and  especi-


■I


84  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [pAEl|

ally  into  minutiae  of  criticism.  But  from  the  S.P.R.  point
of  view  it  is  necessary  to  say  something  in  that  direction.
Otherwise  a  wrong  impression  may  be  conveyed  as  to  the
precision  and  care  taken  in  the  selection  and  treatment  of
the  selected  examples.

It  appears  certain  and  very  natural  that  Professor  Richet
has  paid  more  attention  to  the  physical  and  physiological
side  of  things  than  to  the  more  purely  psychic  phenomena,
notwithstanding  the  abundant  space  which  these  latter  occupy
in  his  book.  He  is  not  as  familiar  with  the  evidence  collected
by  the  S.P.R.  as  he  doubtless  is  with  the  details  of  many
other  enquiries.  And  unintentionally  he  occasionally  mis-
represents it.  It  seems  desirable  therefore  in  the  interests
of  truth  that  a  few  of  these  misrepresentations,  or  occasional
errors  of  detail,  should  be  pointed  out,  so  as  to  put  students
on  their  guard  and  make  them  realise  how  necessary  it  is
to  refer  to  the  original  authorities.  Unfortunately  the  reaUy
original  authorities — at  least  in  English  cases — are  rarely  cited
or  apparently  referred  to  by  Richet,  who  seems  content  with
accepting  his  foreign  matter  in  quotations  by  others,  or  to
depend  often  on  abbreviated  translations.  He  therefore  does
not  always  do  full  justice  to  the  exact  record,  sometimes
tending  to  appreciate  it  somewhat,  sometimes  unduly  to
depreciate  it ;  and  apparently  insignificant  details,  like  proper
names  and  places,  are  treated  rather  casually.  He  probably
considers  that  he  has  an  instinct  for  the  essential,  and  can
afford  to  slur  over  the  rest.  The  S.P.R.  is  more  laborious
and  cautious,  for  it  is  conscious  that  it  does  not  precisely
know  which  points  are  essential.  And  its  leaders  cultivate
a  habit  of  scrupulosity  about  detail  which  may  be  wearisome
but  is  a  defect  on  the  safe  side.

The  important  branch  of  the  subject  called  by  the  S.P.R.
"  Cross-correspondence  "  seems  to  have  been  totally  mis-
conceived by  Richet.  Most  of  the  instances  which  he  gives
are  mere  instances  of  telepathy,  not  of  cross -correspondence
at  all.  This  absence  of  understanding  about  the  meaning  of
what  has  been  termed  cross-correspondence  is  a  defect  which
I  feel  sure  he  will  wish  to  remedy.  At  present  the  heading
affixed  to  that  section  of  the  book  is  misleading.  Other
important  people  abroad  have  failed  to  recognise  the  special


Coi


4  IS
fe
'urn.
if  I


BUS


s.?.

Ir

ws
m
few
asse


deal


to

in

arti

and

is


iXXXix.]  A  Text-Booh  of  Metapsy chics.  85

features  of  real  cross-correspondence,  and  the  singularly  striking
3haracter  of  the  evidence  for  survival  which  they  embody ;
though  admittedly  they  embody  it  in  a  way  which  needs
some  laborious  delving,  for  it  does  not  lie  on  the  surface.

Concerning  hallucinations,  Richet  seems  to  think  there  is
something  pathological  or  morbid  about  them ;  saying  that,
with,  a  few  insignificant  exceptions,  '"no  normal  sane  individual,
EuUy  awake,  has  any  hallucinations.  If  he  sees  apparitions
it  is  because  the  apparitions  have  an  objective  reality."  But
this  is  contrary  to  the  evidence  collected  by  Gurney  in  Phan-
tasms of  the  Living,  and  also  to  that  collected  in  the  "  Census
of  Hallucinations."  (See  Proceedings,  Vol.  X.)  So  that  this
must  be  regarded  rather  as  a  dogmatic  assertion  than  as  a
carefully  considered  estimate,  if  the  word  "  hallucination  "
is  used  in  the  S.P.R.  sense.  But,  as  I  point  out  later,  Richet's
terminology  is  rather  different,  and  his  use  of  the  word  hal-
lucination, as  an  impression  not  caused  by  anything  outside
the  patient,  does  require  a  pathological  cause.  I  emphasise
the  different  signification  of  the  term  here,  because  otherwise
readers  of  the  book  who  are  familiar  with  the  Proceedings
'S.P.R.  may  be  misled.

In  the  rapid  summarising  of  recorded  evidence  there  is
always  liable  to  be  some  slight  error,  sometimes  unimportant,
sometimes  important.  And  it  may  be  helpful  if  I  record  a
few  which  have  been  noticed.  First,  certain  questionable
assertions  about  exact  time.
Page  379.

Mrs.  Green's  dream  of  drowning  girls.  Judging  by  the  dates
given,  the  dream  as  recorded  occurred  twelve  hours  after  the
death,  not  "a  cette  meme  heure."  This  error  is  quite  ex-
cusable, however,  for  when  the  case  was  first  printed  in  the
Journal  S.P.R.  the  percipient  had  attributed  the  wrong  sign
to  the  difference  of  longitude.  The  correction  was  made  later
in  Phantasms  (Vol.  I.,  page  376,  footnote),  and  in  an
article  by  Myers  in  the  Proceedings.  This  case  is  a  good  one,
and  is  often  quoted  by  Richet.  He  will  recognise  that  it
is  important  to  make  no  error  about  coincidence  of  time,
because  that  may  clearly  affect  a  subsequent  explanation.
Page  305.

There  seems  no  evidence  in  the  record  that  the  death  of


86


Sir  Oliver  Lodge.


[par'


Mrs.  Bagot's  dog  occurred  on  the  same  day as the  vision
though  it  is  clear  that  the  vision  occurred  before  the  perci
pient  loiew  of  the  dog's  death.
Page  381.

I  am  told  that  the  Griffin  vision  preceded  death  by  aboul
twenty  minutes,  and  was  not  accurately  at  the  samt
moment."

Pages  384  (the  Jukes  case),  and  394  (the  Runciman  Haggil
case).

The  discrepancy  in  time  was  a  few  hours.

Page  406. (The  Williams  case.)

The  death  appears  to  have  occurred  about  two  days  later
than  the  dream.

The  compilers  of  Phantasms  of  the  Living  paid  particular
attention  to  time  ;  not  only  for  evidential  reasons,  but  because,
working  on  the  h3rpothesis  of  telepathy,  an  impression  received
before  a  death  could  be  attributed  to  the  unconscious  agency
of  the  still  living  person ;  whereas,  an  impression  received
some  time  after  the  death  of  the  presumed  "  agent  "  would
have  to  be  attributed  either  to  telepathy  from  the  dead  or
to  deferred  telepathy  from  the  living.  If  telepathy  is  thrown
overboard,  and  a  general  crypt  esthesia  substituted,  details
about  time  probably  seem  less  important.

Myers  went  so  far  as  to  suggest  the  plotting  of  a  sort  of
probability  curve  representing  the  time  interval  (before  or
after)  between  death  and  apparition.  The  sort  of  curve  he
means,  and  indicates  on  page  427  of  Vol.  V.,  Proc.  S.P.R.,
could  easily  be  assimilated  by  a  physicist  to  Maxwell's  law
of  the  distribution  of  velocities  among  the  molecules  of  a
gas. The  curve  of  Maxwell  is  shaped  like  this  :


and  its  equation  is


TT


T
P
P

to

was
Ik


Lxxxix.]  A  Text-Book  of  Metapsychics.


87


The  point  A  would  correspond  with  the  instant  of  crisis
or  death.  Times  before  and  after,  at  which  monitions  or
apparitions  occur,  are  plotted  horizontally  ;  number  of  instances
are  plotted  vertically,  each  at  its  right  relative  time.

If  any  young  investigator  is  stimulated  to  use  the  records
already  made,  for  analysing  their  time  relations,— though  at
present  the  number  of  records  are  insufficient,  in  spite  of  the
laborious  "  census  of  haUucinations  "  conducted  by  Prof,  and
Mi-s.  Sidgwick,— I  would  caution  him  or  her  to  be  very  careful
in  estimating  each  detailed  time.  Time  and  longitude  are
rather  confusing,  without  practice,  and  a  hasty  extraction  of
dates  and  hours  may  be  misleading.  Moreover,  clocks  are
liable  to  be  wrong  enough  to  matter  sometimes,  even  if  they
are  carefully  read.

Then,  passing  to  examples  of  another  kind  :

Page  232.

Professor  Gilbert  Murray's  important  experiments  are  attri-
buted by  Richet  to  auditive  hyperesthesia.  This  hypothesis
was  considered,  and  apparently  half-favoured,  by  Professor
Murray  himself— in  default  of  any  even  semi-normal  explana-
tion ;  but  it  was  carefully  examined  by  Mrs.  Verrall  {Pro-
ceedings, Vol.  XXIX.,  p.  83),  and  is  really  not  a  reasonable
supposition,  under  all  the  circumstances.

Page  268.

About  the  well-lmown  case  of  Abraham  Florentme.  Pvichet
says  no  American  or  English  journal  had  mentioned  his  death.
That  is  not  so.  Accounts  had  been  printed  in  America  ;
and  the  main  question  is  whether  these  papers  can  have
fallen  under  the  eye  of  Stainton  Moses.  (See  Journal  S.P.R.,
Vol  XX.,  pp.  148-152,  223,  258.)

Page  708.

Experimental  apparition  of  IVIr.  Kirk  to  Miss  G.  (See
Proceedings,  Vol.  X.,  pp.  270-272.)  There  were  two  appari-
tions, not  one.  The  first  was  quite  reaUstic  and  life-like  :
the  second  it  was  which  gave  his  face  in  miniature.  Pro-
bably Richet  here,  as  in  other  cases,  may  have  been  misled
by  the  secondary  authority  to  which  he  refers,  a  quotation
or  reference  to  it  in  some  other  work,  instead  of  going  back
to  the  original  authority,  and  enabling  his  readers  to  do
the  same.


88  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [paeI


Richet  appears  to  be  under  an  important  misapprehension
about  the  experiments  with  G.  A.  Smith  by  Gurney  and
Myers.  He  thinks  that  G.  A.  Smith  ultimately  denied  these
experiments  (page  104).  But  that  is  not  so.  By  the  way,
the  reference  given  to  these  experiments  is  wrong ;  those
puMished  in  Volume  VIII.  of  Proceedings  were  an  entirely
different  set.  The  invented  denials  and  supposed  surreptitious
methods,  published  long  afterwards  by  Blackburn  (called  by
Richet,  Blackman)  in  a  newspaper  article,  are  worthy  of  no
credence.  For  Blackburn  turned  out  to  be  a  scoundrel.
(See,  for  a  full  account  of  the  newspaper  correspondence,
S.P.R.  Journal,  Vol.  XV.,  pp.  115-132.)

The  following  brief  extract  will  show  what  G.  A.  Smith's
attitude  was.  Blackburn  had  concocted  his  article  for  John
Bull  or  some  other  paper,  under  the  impression  (which  he
admits)  that  Smith  and  all  who  could  contradict  him  were
dead. Says  G.  A.  Smith  :

"  Let  me  say  at  once  that  Mr.  Blackburn's  story  is  a
tissue  of  errors  [this  is  a  mild  term]  from  beginning  to
end.

We  never  contemplated  the  possibihty  of  '  coding  '
until  we  learnt  it  from  Mr.  Myers  and  Mr.  Gurney  them-
selves. He  says  we  practised  it  together  and  brought
off  startlmg  hits.  We  never  did  anything  of  the  kmd.
He  did  once  say  what  a  journalistic  sensation  might  be
made  by  pretending  the  phenomena  were  done  by  trickery.
He  has  waited,  it  appears,  until  he  thought  all  were  dead
who  took  part  in  the  experiments  in  order  to  pretend
this  ..."

Discussing  possible  normal  means  of  effecting  the  transmission
of  a  certain  sketch  to  the  percipient  while  swaddled  and
swathed  in  blankets,  Smith  quotes  Mr.  Gurney  as  having
said  at  the  time  that  under  the  circumstances  the  only  pos-  f
sible  way  of  doing  it  by  trickery  was  to  conceal  the  drawing  bi
in  a  pencil  case  and  pass  it  into  the  supposed  percipient's
hands  as  soon  as  he  asked  for  a  pencil.  This  and  other
still  more  ingenious  suggestions  of  Mr.  Gurney,  concerning
possible  and  conceivable  tricks  of  signalling,  were  later  repro-
duced by  Blackburn  as  having  been  the  means  by  which
the  feats  were  actually  done.


Iroi


EVIC


bvi
ik
iei
mdi
sely
on
h

m

latl
ii'ft
bee


Bl  XXXIX. ]  A  Text-Book  of  Metapsijchics.  89

01 Later  Mr. G. A. Smith says of Blackburn's statement  —

"It  is  the  most  amazing  piece  of  mvention  ever  brought
to  my  notice  ...  All  the  essential  points  of  Mr.  Black-
burn's article are  untrue, and I deny the whole  story

* from  beginning  to  end."

'Ij

Hi Perhaps this denial of Blackburn's lies is what  misled
l)j  >rofessor  Richet  into  thinking  that  Smith  denied  the  validity
111,  f  the experiments  ! On the  contrary, he adheres  to  them
el  trongly,  and  says  that  he  found  Myers  and  Gurney  "  were
'.n  the  watch  not  only  for  premeditated  trickery  but  for  un-
onscioiis trickery as weU." They were "aware of  every
levice and dodge for making sham phenomena." And  the
ngenuities  in  Blackburn's  amusing  series  of  articles  are  those
lypothetically devised by Gurney himself as  outrageous
ichemes  against  which  to  guard.

The experiments conducted in 1881 by Professor  Barrett
md  others  with  the  Creery  children  are  not  to  be  set  aside
iavalierly,  as  Professor  Richet  is  inclined  to  do  (pp.  67  and  107).
They were upheld as genuine by the extremely  cautious
Professor  Sidgwick,  in  his  Presidential  Address  to  the  S.P.R.
n  1884,  when  he  implies  that  the  results  could  only  be  ac-
■  counted  for  normally by one or other of the  investigators
i  [laving been in the trick. The subsequent detection  and
admission  of  signalling  between  these  girls,  on  later  occasions
when  one  was  agent  and  another  percipient, do not  really
undermine  previous  experiments,  when  the  investigators  them-
selves were  the  agents. Sir  William  Barrett  sets  special  value
on  his  original  experiments  with  the  Creery  children,  because
he regards them as essentially the scientific discovery,  as
opposed  to  the  mere  popular  suspicion,  of  the  fact  of  tele-
pathy  or telepathic lucidity ;— a fact which, however  inter-
ipreted, has since been so amply confirmed. So ample  has
'been  the  confirmation  of  this  kind  of  lucidity,  in  other  cases,
that  Professor  Richet  is  well  within  his  rights  if  he  prefers
to  ignore  any  experiments  on  which  any  kind  of  doubt  or
suspicion  can  be  thrown  by  reason  of  subsequent  mal-practices.
Gurney 's statement on the subject is in Proc. S.P.R.,  V.
pp.  269,  270. Some account of  these and other early  tele-
pathic experiments are given in Phantasms of the  Living,


90  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [paB'

pp. 10-31. Barrett's o^oi initial summary can be  referr©
to  in  Nature,  Vol.  24,  page  212  (July  7th,  1881),  that  bein
a  year  before  the  foundation  of  the  S.P.R.,— in  which  founda
tion  no  doubt  Barrett's  enthusiasm  played  a  stimulating  part
There are other little points, sometimes of  discrepancy
sometimes of judgement, to which I might call  attention
But  enough  of  these  small  corrections, which  by  no  meam
pretend  to  be  exhaustive. They  would  to  some  readers  seen
quite  trivial,  if  we  went  through  them  all. But  wlien  engagec
in  recording  facts  without  theory,  no  details  can  be  trifling
When  we  have  not  the  clue,  we  have  no  means  of  judging
what  is  trifling  and  what  is  not. With  a  clue  we  may  ration^
ally  discard  some  things  as  insignificant ; but  when  searching
for a clue, the most trivial  detail — a smear on  a  windo-w
ledge,  the  brand  of  a  cigar  ash,  a  fragment  of  finger-nail,—'
may  be  more  significant  than  all  the  rest  of  the  striking  and
superficially  interesting events. In  detective cases a  witness
has  to be  adjured  to  leave  out  no  detail,  however  trivial;
and  the  same  urge  is  surely  rightly  felt  by  a  conscientious
recorder of psychic occurrences. Everything, not  merely
conspicuous  things,  must  be  exact. That  is  why  the  methods
of  the  S.P.R.  have  been  so  irritating  : they  might  be  stig-
matised as  even  painfully  pernickity  and  pragmatically  precise.
As  pioneers  they  were  seeking  a  clue,  and  required  the  scent
of a sleuth-hound and the instinct of a Sherlock  Holmes.
If  that  instinct  sometimes  failed  us,  and  if  we  have  occasion-
aUy attended to details with Dr. Watson's eyes, our  good,
intentions and the difficulty of the subject must be  some
excuse.

Parenthetically  it  occurs  to  me  to  suggest  that  the  kind
of  summary  description  which  Richet  gives  of  each  quoted
case  might  have  been  employed  with  advantage  as  a  prelude
to  each  of  the  detailed  accounts  recorded  in  Phantasms  or
Proc.  S.P.R.  It  is  tiresome  to  have  to  read  the  full  record
in  order  to  find  out  what  sort  of  case  it  is  and  what"  it  is
all  about.  A  short  summary  would  tell  us  this,  and  then
the  record  would  be  there  for  study  and  minute  scrutiny
in  sucli  cases  as  seemed  worth  while.


lib


p


di


ii  iLXXXix.]  A  Text-Booh  of  MetapsycMcs.


91


Richet's  Terminology.

It  may  help  a  reader  to  know  that  what  the  S.P.R.  called
"  Phantasms  of  the  Livhig  "  (or  of  the  Dead  for  that  matter),
and  "  Monitions,"  Richet  calls  sporadic  cryiDtesthesia  "
{cryptesthesie  accidentelle):'  The  S.P.R.  similarly  called  it
"Spontaneous  Telepathy,"  a  term  which  is  much  the  same,
though  rather  more  definite,  and  therefore  Avith  the  chance
of  being  rather  more  wrong  (or  perhaps  right).

What  is  commonly  called  "  Psychometry  "  (which  he  stig-
matises as  "a  detestable  term")  Richet  styles  "Pragmatic
cryptesthesia,"  because  it  is  excited  by  or  in  connexion  with
some  material  object ;  though  he  thinks  it  doubtful  if  material
contact  with  any  object  is  really  necessary.

Previsions  are  "  Premonitory  cryptesthesia,"  and  may,  he
says,  be  either  due  to  some  form  of  auto-suggestion  or  un-
conscious self  inference,  or  may  be  received  under  hypnotism,
or  may  simulate  spiritistic  influences.  Such  premonitions
may  relate  to  sickness  or  to  death  or  to  accidents  or  to
sundry  events.

It  is  noteworthy  that  Richet  does  not  use  the  word  "  hal-
lucination "  freely,  as  the  leaders  of  the  S.P.R.  have  done
or  used  to  do  ;  for  he  considers  that  about  an  hallucination
there  is  something  morbid,  and  if  an  apparition  or  other
deceptive  appearance  represents  or  corresponds  to  some  kind
of  reality,  no  matter  how  remote,  that  subjective  vision  or
audition  is  not  strictly  an  hallucination.  He  interprets  that
term  as  signifying  "  a  mental  image  exteriorised  without  any
exterior  reality."

In  general  we  may  say  that  Professor  Richet's  independent
attitude  and  freedom  from  tradition  are  rather  refreshing,
ikj  We  in  this  country  are  apt  to  follow  a  lead  or  general  trend,
J  especially  in  writing  for  the  S.P.R.,  the  cautious  attitude  of
III  whose  founders  we  more  or  less  admire  and  desire  to  imitate.
Richet  is  emancipated  from  this  tradition,  and,  by  following
•  a  course  of  his  own,  sets  things  under  a  ncAV  aspect.

Richet's  Chapter  VII.  contains  a  remarkable  summary  and
discussion  of  cases  of  prevision ;  for  this  surprising  extension
of  human  faculty  evidently  impresses  him  considerably,  and
the  more  difficult  he  feels  it  of  any  rational  explanation,  the


1


92  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [pAR'i

more  closely  he  attends  to  and  collects  the  evidence.  Ir!
the  end  he  considers  it  established,  though  he  admits  the
difficulty  of  reconciling  such  a  faculty  with  other  experiences
and  human  instincts  in  general.  This  section  is  perhaps  the
most  notable  and  carefully  compiled  in  the  subjective  portion
of  the  book.  He  knows  how  extraordinary  such  a  faculty  is.
and  how  strong  the  evidence  necessary  to  establish  it,  but
he  perceives  that  the  evidence  is  strong  enough.  So  he  has
faith  that  an  explanation  will  be  found  in  time,  and  that
this  phenomenon,  together  with  all  the  other  facts  he  deals
with,  will  presently  fit  into  their  niches  in  an  orderly  system
of  ascertained  truth.

In  contrast  with  his  acceptation  of  prevision,  may  be  in
stanced  his  rather  hypercritical  attitude  to  what  he  calls
"  Xenoglossie."  The  instances  he  cites  of  this  speaking  or
writing  in  unknown  tongues  are  impressive,  especially  those
in  which  a  child  is  the  operator;  but  he  disdains  to  con-
sider anything  of  the  nature  of  partial  possession  or  "  control,"
either  in  this  or  in  any  other  connexion ;  and  he  sums  up
by  saying  that  :

"  none  of  the  facts,  whether  of  Xenoglossie  or  of  automatic
writing  by  children  and  unlettered  persons,  carries  sufficient
weight  of  proof.  We  cannot  therefore  grant  them  full  rights
of  citizenship  in  the  kmgdom  of  subjective  metapsychics,
though  I  am  inclined  to  thmk  that  before  long  some  may
be  admitted  as  authentic."

Child  prodigies,  musical  and  other,  are  dismissed  too,  as
explicable  by  abnormally  rapid  development  ;  and  when
emphasising  his  own  personal  knowledge  about  the  marvellous
precocity  of  Pepito  Arriola,  who  was  "a  skilful  musician  at
the  age  of  three  years  and  three  months,"  he  says  that  "no
one  has  imagined  the  intervention  of  a  spirit  to  explain  it,"

But  it  is  difficult  to  contemplate  some  of  these  child  and
animal  prodigies,  when  weU  evidenced,  without  at  least  sur-
mising some  form  of  outside  intelligent  control,  I  really
cannot  contemplate  an  untrained  organism  playing  the  piano
or  the  violin,  or  writing  Greek  or  even  ecclesiastical  Latin,
merely  under  the  influence  of  its  own  unconscious  or  reflex
action.


Cod

ct
1(


die


m


I

fb
Iks
expli
Slid
may


tlier

Stllf
TO


trie


4'


;XXXix.]  A  Text-Book  of  Metapsychics.  93

Physical  and  Physiological  Phenomena.

Concerning  the  physiological  phenomena  treated  of  in  the
lecond  half  of  the  book,  it  would  be  an  impertinence  for  me
;o  criticise  or  even  to  praise  Professor  Richet's  investigations
md  conclusions.  In  his  own  subject  he  is  beyond  my  reach.
BEis  medical  training  gives  him  many  advantages  ;  and  of
;he  abnormal  or  unusual  in  this  du'ection  he  has  seen  much
nore  than  I  have.  It  was  indeed  only  through  his  kind
nvitation  and  hospitality  that  I  was  enabled  to  see  what
[  did,  in  1894,  of  the  Eusapia  phenomena,  under  admirable
;onditions  on  his  Mediterranean  island  (see  Journal  S.P.R.,
Vol.  VI.,  pp.  306-360).  We  never  got  the  conditions  so  good
igain  ;  and  phenomena  fluctuated,  till  in  England  they  almost
petered  out.  Some  were  genuine  even  then — notably  the
swelling  of  a  curtain — but  Professor  Richet  may  be  assured
that  Eusapia  did  get  a  hand  loose,  by  surreptitious  and
apparently  rather  practised  means.  I  pass  no  condemnation
on  her,  for  various  reasons,  but  such  is  the  fact.

I  am  able  however  to  vouch  for  genuine  and  unmistakable
phenomena  on  the  island,  as  strongly  as  Professor  Richet
himself.  Some  of  them  were  totally  and  even  absurdly  in-
explicable by  any  amount  of  hand  or  foot  loosing,  even  if
such  loosing  had  been  allowed  ;  which  it  is  safest  to  assume
may  have  been  done  sometimes,  however  unUkely  it  may
seem.  '

I  have  no  fault  to  find  with  Richet's  very  brief  summary
of  a  few  of  our  experiments  on  the  He  Riband  with  Eusapia.
Phenomena  were  obtained  which  were  undoubtedly  genuine,
and  which  overcame  all  suspicion.  But  his  idea  of  what
went  on  at  Cambridge  is  vague,  and  he  may  think  that
there  was  no  fraud.  But  there  was.  Hodgson  pretended
imbeciUty,  and  Eusapia  fell  into  the  trap.  She  adopted  a
stupid  though  rather  skilful  trick.  The  results  so  obtained
were  feeble,  not  at  all  of  the  old  order,  and  I  found  it
difficult  to  suppose  that  she  was  trying  to  fool  Hodgson.
Fortunately,  before  the  end,  she  tried  to  fool  me  also  ;  and
I  testify  that  undoubtedly  she  contrived,  by  a  substitution
trick,  to  get  a  hand  loose  when  I  and  Professor  Sidgwick
were  controlling. Myers  was  disgusted  with  her,  and  the  end


94  Sn  Oliver  Lodge.  [pargIsS

was  rather  painful.  But  later  on,  at  Richet's  invitation
Myers  was  prevailed  on  to  see  her  again  in  more  congenia;
surroundings,  and  his  confidence  in  her  possession  of  rea]
powers— however  much  when  under  difficulties  she  might
try  to  eke  them  out — was  restored.  j  i  i

To  throw  away  good  experiments  because  of  some  bad
ones  is  an  unwise  procedure  :  and  few  discoveries  could  be
made  if  that  policy  were  adopted  in  a  laboratory.  Laymen
think  that  Nature  never  deceives ;  but  she  does.  Caution
and  repetition,  and  renewed  caution,  and  varying  conditions,
and  repetition  with  greater  Itnowledge  of  weak  points,— those
are  the  remedies  for  untoward  incidents.


ffC


6  «


Materialisation.  p

As  to  the  general  question  of  so-called  physical  phenomena
and  the  difficulty  of  reconciling  them  with  ordinary  scientific
knowledge,  it  is  a  notable  circumstance  that  Richet  finds
himself  impelled  to  admit  "materialisation,"  or  ectoplasmic
formations  of  an  anatomical  and  physiological  kind,  as  a  fact.

The  evidence  must  have  been  very  strong  to  convince  him
of  so  improbable  a  phenomenon.  I  myself  have  both  seen
and  felt  ectoplasmic  protuberances  ;  though  sometimes  they
could  be  felt  Avhen  they  could  not  be  seen,  and  the  vision
of  them  Avas  always  more  indistinct  than  seemed  consistent
with  their  palpable  activity.  I  doubt  if  the  visible  thing  is
the  enei-getic  and  forcible  portion.  The  suggestion  to  my
mind  is  that  the  filmy  visible  thing  is  more  like  a  sustainer,
connector,  or  conveyor,  of  the  more  active  and  important
agency  ;  on  the  analogy  of  a  placenta  or  an  investing  mem-
brane ;  and  that  its  function  is  to  maintain  organic  connexion
with  the  strong  substantial  mechanism  which  itself  cannot
be  seen.  Invisible  agencies  able  to  exert  or  transmit  force,
even  enormous  force,  are  common  in  physics,  e.g.  magnetism,'
gravitation,  cohesion,  and  they  all  depend  on  the  Ether—
for  which  we  have  no  sense-organ.


H
itic
dth
'  eitei
liti

Sei


pa

■  iOBK

le
igak
ijaii


Deductions.  r

Examining  now  his  conclusions  or  working  hypotheses,  we
shall  find  that  Richet  is  human  enough to be  subject  to


ibjei
lit
iiart


ISl  iXXXIX.]


A  Text-Book  of  MetapsycMcs.


95


01  loods. Which of us is not  1 Sometimes he is the  strict
lii!  lateriahst ; sometimes  the  lack  of explanation  in  terms  of
ei  latter, and  the  poverty  of  outlook  in  that  direction  only,
^tl  annot  but  shake  his  conviction. The  book  is  a  large  one,
'nd  not  every  sentence  in  it  is  consistent. It  is  a  fine  piece
4  i  work,  and  the  occasional  variation  in  mood  is  instructive.
If  ?he  variation  is  part  of  the  facts,  and  should  not  be  con-
et  ealed. To  tinker  with  the  sentiments,  so  as  to  make  them
11  .bsolutely  consistent  throughout,  would  not  be  fair,  and  has
li,  lot  been  done. The  author  lets  us  into  his  doubts  as  well  as
it  is  certainties,  he  allows  himself  to  hint  at  profound  mysteries
nfolding  before  our  gaze,  and  he  claims  no  finality  for  his
iresent speculative conclusion. What he claims finality  for
,re the facts — the great mass of facts — allowing here  and
here  the  evidence  for  some  of  them  to  be  weaker  than  for
ithers,  ready  to  discard  any  which  show  signs  of  weakness,
.nd  discarding  a  few  which  are  really  not  weak  at  all,  be-
ause  of  the  least  suspicion  of  a  flaw.

If  anything,  either  in  fact  or  theory,  teUs  against  the  spirit-
5tic  explanation,  it  is  emphasised  to  the  full ;  and  the  student
nth  a  balanced  mind  will  be  well  advised  to  accept  the
eiterated  accusation  of  triviahty  and  folly  and  improbability
t^ith  a  certain  amount  of  hesitation,  just  as  he  is  likely  to
.ccept  the  facts  with  a  certain  amount  of  hesitation.  My
;dvice  to  a  student  is  :

See  what  Richet  says  ;  keep  an  open  mind,  and,  when
here  is  an  opportunity,  try  experiments  or  make  observations
or  yourself.  Be  not  deceived  by  glib  spiritualism  or  by
qually  glib  materialism.  The  truth  may  lie  in  middle  ways.
!ome  facts  strongly  suggest  and  support  the  spirit  hypothesis.
)thers  hardly  suggest  it,  and  do  not  support  it  at  all.  Others
,gain  are  difficult  of  adjustment  and  may  be  held  to  tell
,gainst  it.  The  existence  and  display  of  the  power  of  extensive
acidity  and  clairvoyance,  exercised  apparently  apart  from
,ny  mind  but  an  unconscious  one,  is  a  real  and  not  a  fanciful
ibjection.  Reconcihation  of  opposing  views  wiU  come  in  time,
mt  still  further  study  of  the  phenomena  is  necessary.  The
lart  played  by  the  medium  may  be  exaggerated,  but  it  may
,lso  be  unduly  minimised.
Towards  the  end  of  the  book  Richet  begins  to  abandon


iia«


fers
fell


96  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [PARijsi

the  strictiiess  of  his  claim  to  be  stating  facts  only,  and  says-:  trie:
I  quote  from  Mr.  Stanley  de  Brath's  excellent  translation  :

P.  619.  "  To  state  facts  is  not  enough  ;  we  mus
summon  up  courage  to  outline  some  kind  of  theory;
imperfect  though  it  will  necessarily  be  .  .  .  To  transforr
matter,  to  become  a  living  ephemeral  being,  and  ti
create  ephemeral  living  matter  is  to  open  a  new  world  dei
We  are  evolving  in  another  dimension,  and  Man  n(
longer  belongs  to  the  animal  kingdom.  He  even  tran
scends  the  mechanical  world  in  which  Ave  move,  when
chemistry,  physics,  and  mathematics  reign  supreme.  Any
thing  is  possible."

And  then,  before  long,  he  continues — surprisingly  :

P.  621.  "  Why  should  there  not  be  intelligent  anc  *
puissant  beings  distinct  from  those  i^erceptible  by  oui
senses  ?  By  what  right  should  we  dare  to  affirm,  or
the  basis  of  our  limited  senses,  our  defective  intellect
and  our  scientific  past  as  yet  hardly  three  centuries  old
that  in  the  vast  Cosmos  man  is  the  sole  intelligent  being
and  that  mental  reality  ahvays  depends  upon  nerve^
cells  irrigated  with  oxygenated  blood  ?  "

P.  622. "  It  is  said  : '  Man  only  shows  his  mind  by
his brain  ; therefore there can be no mind without  ap
brain.' Such  is  the amazing  logic of  those who  accuse
us  of  working  against  Science.'
I am ready  to go no  further  myself! And  his view  of
the  Universe  is  similarly  expanding; for, after referring  to
the outlook of Science fifty years ago, when the range  of
enquiry  seemed  limited  and  exhaustible,  he heartily  welcomes  "
the  new  knowledge  in  \s'ords  such  as  these  :

P.  625.  "  Our  hopes  are  now  vastly  greater ;  we  have
a  glimpse  of  a  whole  unexplored  world  full  of  mysteries,
before  which  we  stand  as  dumb  and  dense  as  a  Hottentot
might  before  Poincare's  vortices,  Hertz's  waves,  Pasteur's
microbes,  or  Einstein's  relativity."  i'

tijii'

Conclusion  pli

In  speaking  of  the  book  as  a  text-book,  I  may  be  con-  ^
veying  an  impression  of  aridity. But  what  I  mean  is  that  ,,,,


t  K


SE

Ha
It)
ill
u  \
iiuni
lasis


:xxix.]  A  Text- Book  of  Metapsychics.  97

tries  to  cover  the  ground  in  an  orderly,  comprehensive  and
stematic  manner.  Text-books  can  be  dry  and  uninteresting,
it  nothing  written  by  Professor  Richet  is  likely  to  suffer
Dm  faults  of  that  kind.  His  literary  style  has  often  been
■aised  by  competent  masters  ;  and  as  a  matter  of  fact  the
)ok  is  lively  and  interesting  reading.  And  it  gives  a  com-
■ehensive  summary  of  the  whole  subject  in  what  is  intended
be  a  simple  and  straightforward  manner.  It  does  not  of
.urse  compare  with  Myers's  great  and  original  Treatise  on
uman  Personality.  It  does  not  aim  in  that  direction,
yers's  aim  was  strongly  theoretical ;  and  the  numerous  facts
hich  he  adduced,  and  which  he  gave  in  Appendices  in  fairly
11  details,  were  purposely  selected  as  illustrative  of  his  theories,
ichet,  we  will  say,  has  no  theories.  Or  rather,  his  theories
■e  of  what  may  be  called  the  orthodox  kind.  He  adheres
■  biological  orthodoxy  so  far  as  he  can  :  and  in  so  far  as
s  facts  do  not  fit  into  the  scheme,— that  is  not  his  fault,
e  really  tries  to  fit  them  in,  and  would  never  wish  to  ex-
ude a  fact  on  theoretical  grounds.  Whatever  weaknesses
ay  be  pointed  out  here  and  there,  he  has  dbne  yeoman
Tvice  by  his  labours,  and  has  furnished  the  world  with
robably  the  most  comprehensive  survey  of  the  subject  that
IS  yet  been  produced.


Hi


SEQUEL  TO  THE  REVIEW  OF  PROFESSOR  RICHET'S
"  TRAITS  DE  MfiTAPSYCHIQUE."

Having  now  reviewed  the  book,  I  feel  inclined  to  trespass
Q  the  space  allowed  me  and  carry  on  a  half-playful  argument
dth  my  good  friend  and  eminent  co-worker  as  to  the  points
n  which  we  differ.  The  points  on  which  we  agree  are  too
umerous  for  mention.  It  seems  curious  that,  on  a  common
asis  of  facts,  two  men  of  science,  both  fully  accepting  all
he  discoveries  in  orthodox  science,  and  acquainted  with  most
f  the  phenomena  in  metapsychics,  should  differ  in  their  con-
3quent  outlook  on  the  universe,  rather  markedly  ;  though
ach  is  willing  to  abandon  his  theoretical  position  on  good
round  shown.

We  may  take  the  "  Conclusion "  of  this  book  as  Richet's
itest,  though  by  no  means  his  last, word  on  the  subject.


a


98  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [pas

Taking  then  a  few  of  his  points  I quote  from the  Engli^
edition, —

P.  608. "  Will the self of a person who  stammere
continue  to  stammer  in  the  Beyond  ? What  puerility  !  "

Why  should  this  be  called  puerility  ?  What  do  we  kno^'
one  way  or  the  other  ?  Let  us  be  guided  by  the  facti
If  facts  seem  puerile  or  childish,— well,  some  facts  are  pueri]
and  childish,  viz.  those  belonging  to  boys  and  children.  Unt
the  possibihty  of  survival  is  definitely  disproved,  it  does  nc
seem  altogether  unhkely  that  personal  peculiarities  and  habitus
tricks  of  expression  might  be  re-assumed  and  reproduced,  if  th
old  terrestrial  existence  was  either  dreamily  or  otherwis
occasionally  remembered  and  dramatised.

It  is  mere  hypothesis  again  to  say  that  deceased  peopl
would  never  talk  about  trifles.  How  do  we  know  ?  Wh-
should  they  differ  so  completely  from  the  same  people  whei
living  on  this  planet  ?  Our  ideas  about  death  have  growi
so  solemn  and  religious  that  it  is  easy  to  raise  prejudici
against  their  mentioning  or  thinking  of  such  a  trifle  as  i
ring  or  a  tie-pin,  even  if  it  had  special  or  affectionate  associa.
tions. When  Professor  Kichet  says, —

P.  611 "That one should come back to earth  t(

speak  of  a  sleeve-link  is  not merely  feeble, it has  nc

likelihood at all  ; it is a  strong  argument  against  tht
spiritist  doctrine."

And,  again,  when  he  says, —  '  •

P.  613.  "A  specific  set  of  prose  and  verse  imitationsf
or  personations  of  certain  authors  is  clever  literary  work '
but  does  not  come  from  a  Beyond  ...  It  is  in  no  way  '
beyond  human  powers.  It  is  not  the  semi-divine  inspira-'l'
tion  that  we  might  expect  from  spirits."  k

It  sounds  most  sensible.

But  is  it  ?  How  do  we  know  that  "  spirits  "  are  in  any
sense  "  semi-divine  "  ?  How  do  we  know  that  if  able  to
return  they  might  not  bethink  themselves  of  some  trifling
episode  ?

A  might  hold  that  they  would  never  think  of  trivahties  ;  B
might  hold  that  they  would  think  of  nothing  else. Why  not  cease


If

iiibj
rliii


H

ICO

)ii
Tl
tee
and
ist


M


I


Lxxxix.]  Sequel  to  Review  of  A  Text-Booh  of  Metapsy chics.  99


to  make  guesses  and  ascertain  the  fact  ?  It  is  no  use  trying  to
decry  facts  by  adjectives.  The  sole  question  is,  are  they  facts  1
If  they  are,  then  it  is  possible  that  we  may  be  instructed
by  them,  and  that  our  adjectives  are  less  than  just.  In
England  the  j)rejudice  against  the  employment  of  trivial
recollections  for  evidential  purposes  has  been  countered  again
and  again,  but  probablj^  on  the  Continent  there  is  leeway
to  be  made  up.

It  may  seem  as  if  I  am  attending  too  exclusively  to  the
subjective  side  of  psychic  phenomena  and  their  interpretation,
which  after  all  are  not  Richet's  main  concerns,  but  he  wiU
know  that  we  in  England  have  studied  the  subjective  side
of  metapsychics  almost  exclusively,  and  only  by  long  considera-
tion have  been  brought  to  this  pass  of  yielding  to  the  con-
viction that  survival  and  intercommunion  are  proved  realities,
in  spite  of  numerous  difficulties  in  fully  comprehending  them.

He  wiU  not  claim  that  a  worker  in  science  can  do  without
theories  for  ever,  or  that  human  beings  are  irrefragably  bound
to  materiaUstie  theories. We  mi^st  be  guided  by  the  facts.

The  importance  of  Richet's  book,  which  is  undoubtedly
based  on  a  long  study  of  the  subject,  justifies  a  thorough
and  critical  examination  of  his  position,  and  he  wiU  be  the
last  to  resent  arguments  and  contentions  about  the  various
phenomena  regarded  from  a  point  of  view  differing  from  his
own.  He  must  reahse  that  we  have  not  taken  up  our  position
Lightly  and  without  fair  recognition  of  its  difficulties  ;  but
until  a  better  theory  can  be  promulgated, — and  the  absence
of  all  theory  is  not  a  better  one,  however  allowable  as  a
-emporary  and  cautions  expedient, — we  must  follow  our  clue
antil  it  ceases  to  guide.  The  time  for  caution  must  some
time  expire ;  and  if  we  have  had  to  get  down  off  the  fence,
16  will  grant  that  it  may  be  with  good  reason,  oven  if  he
ioes  not  appreciate  or  accept  that  reason.  If  he  considers
ihat  our  reasoning  is  not  good  enough,  I  cordially  recognise
lis  right  to  an  opinion.


tl


But now let him imagine himself awake and  intelligent
on  the  other  side," — if  he  wiU  grant  me  such  a  supposition, —
md trying to convince us of his identity. How wiU  he
)roceed  ? Will  he  recite  the  names  of  his  sons  and  daughters

g2


ane


calc


100  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [par^  K':-

and  grandchildren  ? Will  he  tell  us  about  his  meeting  witl
some  named  deceased  friend  ?

We  shall  probably  know  the  main  facts  underlying  these
names  ;  their  citation  is  quite  natural  ;  but  it  is  too  natural
it  proves  nothing.  Nor  does  the  appearance  of  these  names
disprove  anything. They  leave  the  question  where  it  was.

WiU  he  teU  us  of  some  laboratory  experiment,  say  about
the  suffocation  of  a  dog  ? We  know  that  too.

Will  he  tell  us  of  some  epoch-making  scientific  novelty  ■?
He  could  equally  well  tell  us  of  it  now.  If  he  does  not,  it
is  probably  because  he  does  not  specially  know  one, — does
not  know  much  more  than  he  has  already  pubhshed,  or
read  about  in  treatises  by  others.  Why  should  a  year  or
two  apart  from  his  laboratory  make  him  more  cognisant  of
physiology  than  he  was  here,  with  corpora  vilia  all  round  him
and  instruments  to  hand  ?

Will  he  tell  us  that  he  has  met  Raymond  and  G.  P.,  and
perhaps  even  Phinuit  and  John  King,  and  found  them  real  after
all  ?  We  shall  not  believe  him  ;  or  perhaps  we  shall ;  but  there
will  be  nothing  to  convince  sceptics  in  such  a  statement.

Will  he  tell  us  that  he  has  found  out  that  the  old  control
we  commonly  speak  of  as  Phinuit  really  was  connected  with
Marseilles  once  on  a  time,  though  he  is  foggy  about  the  name
by which he was then known  ? He will be telling us no  I  to
Tuore  than  Phinuit  has  already  said, — without  credence.  ect

Will  he  tell  us  that  somebody's  son,  now  in  robust  health,
will  have  a  hunting-accident  before  the  year  is  out  ?  He
will  probably  not  know  it.  And  if  he  does  suspect  it,  through
some  source  of  information  inaccessible  to  us, — well,  hunting-
accidents  are  not  infrequent,  and  mediums  often  make  guesses,
and  some  of  them  come  right  by  chance.

WiU  he  read  some  characteristic  poetry,  and  speak  his
admirable  French  ?  The  dramatising  powers  of  a  medium
are  capable  of  anything.

WiU  he  read  and  transmit  a  sealed  letter,  finding  that
matter  is  not  so  obstructive  to  mind  as  had  been  thought  ?
That  would  be  obvious  cryptesthesia.

WiU  he  take  some  effluence  from  the  medium  and  construct
a  (not  very  good)  likeness  of  himself,  that  we  may  have
objective  proof  of  his  existence  ? It  is  no  proof  at  aU,  nor

I


ABILXXXIX.]  Sequel  to  Review  of  A  Text-Book  of  Metapsychics.  101

ritiof anything except of a surprising formative power of  the
unconscious.

Will  he  stand  in  front  of  a  camera  to  be  photographed  ?
Most  hkely  no  impression  wiU  be  produced.  If  there  is  an
limpression,  the  photographer  has  done  a  good  trick,  or,  rather,
an  evil  one.

Will  he  lament  his  purblind  attitude  to  psychic  phenomena
apart  from  material  machinery,  and  teach  us  the  joy  of
emancipation  and  freedom  from  the  flesh  ?  Hundreds  have
done  the  same  and  not  been  believed.

Will  he  control  a  child  and  cause  it  to  play  music  or  do
calculations,  or  employ  scientific  terms  ?  Child  prodigies  have
long  been  known.

Will  he  make  a  special  effort  and  take  the  trouble  to  learn
and  recite  some  poem  from  the  Classics,  or  to  invent  some
ecclesiastical  or  other  Latin  when  controlling  an  illiterate
medium  ?  The  verdict  will  be  interesting,  but  the  incident
should  have  been  repeated." (The  quotation  is  from  p.  225.)

Will  he  extract  some  matter  or  secretion  from  the  medium
and,  welding  it  into  solid  form— as  instructed  by  some  who
have  been  making  experiments  longer  than  humanity,— will
he  surprise  the  people  present  by  hand-grasps  and  luminous
appearances  and  noisy  blows  ?— He  will  probably  not  be  able
to  do  it  ;  but  if  he  can  get  it  done,  then  of  course  that  is
ectoplasm,  which  is  plainly  a  sort  of  substance  simulating
inteUigence  and  really  controlled  by  the  unconsciousness  of
the  medium  from  whose  body  it  emanated.

Will  he  cause  an  ignorant  mediumistic  woman  to  speak  some
sentences  in  Arabic  about  his  visit  to  Algiers  ?  He  will  only
raise  wonder  at  the  Xenoglossic  power  of  an  uneducated
medium  ;  and  suspicion  will  be  raised  as  to  the  truth  of  her
assertion  if  she  maintains  that  she  never  knew  anything  like
Arabic.

Will  he  try  to  see  and  tell  us  what  is  being  set  up  in  type
before  anything  appears  in  print  ?  Or  will  he  read  something
in  a  closed  book  and  convey  that;  so  as  to  demonstrate  his
new-found  power  of  surpassing  the  ordinary  obstructiveness
of  matter  ?  It  will  be  useless  ;  and  will  be  regarded  as  an
argument  against  survival,  and  as  a  demonstration  of  the
extraordinary  power  of  the  medium's  subconsciousness.


102


8ir  Oliver  Lodge.


[part


Will  he  transmit  some  learned  and  peculiar  phrase,  or
narrate  some  incident  in  his  past  life  unknown  perhaps  to{
any  person  but  recorded  in  some  private  cipher  ?  The  poweri
of  the  medium  will  be  held  to  transcend  time  as  well  asj
space,  and  as  it  were,  to  witness  the  incident.

Will  he  tell  us  of  a  lost  note-book  in  a  railway  carriage,
that  it  had  a  red  star  on  the  outside  and  some  stamps  stuck
into  it  on  the  inside,  some  of  them  foreign  ones  ?  What
triviality  to  concern  himself  with  such  rubbish  under  new
and  semi-divine  conditions  !

How  will  he  proceed  with  his  demonstration  ?  I  really  do
not  know. Nor  will  he. Nor  does  he  know  now,—

Page  616.  "Taking  subjective  facts  alone,  it  [the  spiritist
theory]  is  not  demonstrated ;  and  the  trying  thing  is
that  one  does^  not  see  how  it  could  be  demonstrated—
how  it  could  be  proved  that  human  consciousness,  with
its  remembrance  and  its  personality,  had  survived  the
death  of  the  brain."

But  I  can  tell  him  this  :— that  when  in  due  time  he  finds
himself  on  the  other  side,  and  meets  a  welcoming  company,
with  Myers  and  other  friends  and  some  kindred  spirits  of
whose  sympathy  and  interest  at  present  he  is  probably  un-
aware, I  feel  sure  that  he  will  keenly  discuss  with  them  the
experiments  they  have  made,  and  the  various  attempted  plans
for  convincing  the  world  of  spiritual  existence  apart  from
ordinary  matter;  and  will  eagerly  devise  new  experiments  to
demonstrate  what  he  will  then  perceive  to  be  the  real  meaning
of  his  beloved  nascent  science  of  metapsychics.  He  will  find
it  more  difficult  than  even  he  had  imagined,  and  will  be
perhaps  chagrined  at  the  sullenness  and  stupidity  of  those
down  here  whom  he  tries  to  influence.  If  he  thinks  he  will
be  able  to  demonstrate  anything  so  preposterous  as  his  own
permanent  discarnate  existence,  he  will  find  himself  deeply
disappointed  at  the  result.  Any  sort  of  explanation,  or  none
at  all,  will  be  considered  better  than  that.

He  may  wish  he  had  apprehended  more  nearly  at  their
true  value,  the  attempts  which  have  already  been  made;
he  will  realise  how  real  and  familiar  surviving  humanity  still
is,  even  when  divested  of the  old  material  instrument;"  and


jxxxix.]  Sequel  to  Revietv  of  A  Text-Book  of  Metapsychics.  103


le  will  be  amused  at  the  idea,  which  he  used  to  entertain,
)f  there  being  only  non-human  entities  among  the  manifold
Dossibilities  of  existence.  Those  there  will  be ;  but  he  will
jind  plenty  of  humanity  too  ;  and  he  will  realise  that  it
Vas  not  for  nothing  that  they  laboured  and  underwent  much
j)bloquy  and  criticism,  in  their  efforts  to  call  their  feUows
io  a  larger  view  of  the  universe,  and  to  a  recognition  of  a
vhole  multitude — a  whole  sub-universe — of  facts  at  present
ying  outside  the  confines  of  organised  knowledge.

That  he  already  has  a  mind  which  is  opening  to  perception
:)f  deep  underlying  realities  can  be  demonstrated  by  the  passages
already  cited  on  page  96 — from  the  conclusion  of  his  great
30ok ;  and  1  hope  that  his  whole-hearted  acceptance  of  the
yeird  and  puzzling  facts,  of  prevision  on  the  subjective  side,
md  of  ectoplasmic  formation  on  the  objective  side,  will  cause
lim  joy.  That  he  will  understand  their  possibility  and  theory
nuch  better,  until  after  further  years  of  experience,  may  well
36  doubted ;  but  he  will  assuredly  be  glad  that  his  instinct
'or  truth  had  led  him  to  overcome  the  prejudices  of  a  life-
;ime,  and  admit  unpalatable,  or  at  least  indigestible  and  un-
jxplained,  facts.  In  those  acceptances  he  has  shown  his
jpenmindedness  and  his  strength ;  and  he  has  not  hesitated
M  uplift  his  standard  before  an  International  Congress  of
Physiologists,  meeting  this  summer  of  1923  in  Edinburgh.
Few,  if  any  other,  men  of  science  would  have  been  given
1  hearing  on  such  an  occasion  and  on  such  a  subject  !

And  now  in  conclusion  I  must  confess  that  in  thus  writing
and  arguing,  and  perhaps  rather  trampling  on  conventions,
I  am  writing  less  for  Richet  himself  than  for  others  who
may  be  influenced  by  the  views  expressed  in  his  book.  As
regards  his  own  philosophic  attitude,  he  must  choose  his  own
time  and  his  own  modes  of  expression.  Diversities  of  view
are  frequent  in  a  nascent  science  ;  and  conservatism  has  its
advantages.

To  go  over  too  jDromptly  from  one  camp  to  another  would
be  unwise.  As  a  matter  of  policy,  slow  and  leisurely  de-
velopment is  best ;  and  the  influence  of  Richet  reaches  where
my  own  influence  is  already  greatly  discounted.  Some,  when
they  see  truth  clearly,  feel  constrained  to  embrace  it  whole-


«


104  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [pae'

heartedly  and  risk  everything ;  others  may  think  it  wise:
to  penetrate  still  deeper  into  her  mysteries  before  rising  t(
the  surface  and  waving  a  beckoning  hand  to  loiterers  on  th(
shore.  Far  be  it  from  me  to  judge  which  is  best.  Eacl
must  take  his  own  line,  and  follow  the  course  which  to  him
seems  wisest.  If  his  lot  is  to  encounter  ridicule  and  hostility
from  his  own  generation,  he  is  but  sharing  the  experiences
of  a  very  honourable  company  of  predecessors.


Familiae  Scientific  Scepticism.


it  1

sreri


i  il
iitliei


mst
In


I  know  well  how  difficult  it  is  to  accept  a  fact  for  which
one  sees  no  sort  of  reason  or  explanation.  Facts  have  been
neglected  or  denied,  times  without  number,  because  no  rational
explanation  could  be  given.  To  take  only  two  instances,  one-
from  Physics,  one  from  Biology  : —

Kepler  and  many  others  suspected  some  relation  between'
the  moon  and  the  tides.  Numerous  facts  suggested  such  a
connexion  ;  a  Spring  tide  soon  after  new  and  full  moon  was,
the  most  obvious  ;  the  interval  between  consecutive  day-tidesi  ain(
corresponding  more  nearly  to  the  lunar  day  than  to  the  solari^"!'*
day,  was  another.

But  what  on  earth  could  the  moon  accomplish,  from  its
position  a  quarter  million  miles  away  !  So  the  idea  was
regarded  as  superstitious  ;  and  Galileo,  as  an  orthodox  ex-
perimentalist and  mechanician,  chaffed  Kepler  for  his  fanciful
and  credulous  belief.

Only  when  Newton  displayed  the  machinery,  and  proved
that  even  bodies  at  a  distance  really  did  influence  each  other,
through  some  unknown  intervening  substance  or  mechanism,
did  the  belief  gain  general  acceptance.  Thereafter  its  details
could  be  and  were  worked  out,  until  it  became  established
as  a  commonplace  of  general  elementary  knowledge.

As  the  other  example,  I  take  the  changes  popularly  supposed
to  be  wrought  in  the  foetus,  during  pregnancy,  by  some
influence  or  shock  or  other  experience  of  the  mother,  so  that
the  offspring  bears  signs  of  the  functional  disturbance.

That  this  has  been  regarded  as  a  superstition,  and  perhaps
in  some  quarters  still  is,  hardly  needs  showing  ;  but  recently
I  learn,  from  Sir  Arthur  Keith's  admirable  lecture,  in  a  supple-


doe
and

the

ieqt
II

'Oil

P
[(

k

k

{
ffe


I


Lxxxix.]  Sequel  to  Review  of  A  Text-Booh  of  Metapsychics.  105


nent  to  Nature  of  date  18th  August,  1923,  that  Biologists  are
5 1(  jeginning  to  accept  the  fact  ;  not  because  of  specific  instances,
4  Dut  because  they  see  some  chance  of  understanding  how  such
at!  reverberation  or  intercommunication  could  come  about  through

i  change  in  secretions,  so  that  an  impression  on  one  individual
ilili  30uld  cause  sympathetic  response  in  another.

Dfs  What  I  call  attention  to  is  that  the  numerous  instances
')f  its  actual  occurrence  were  insufficient  to  prevent  their
jither  being  denied  or  else  attributed  to  coincidence ; — that
'oroad-backed  sustainer  of  anything  we  find  it  inconvenient
or  unattractive  to  believe.  Sometimes  the  authoritj^  for  the
"act  was  unimpeachable,  but  that  alone  was  not  enough.  I

M  nust  quote  from  Keith's  lecture  : —

In  1868  Darwin  related  "  the  case  of  a  cow  in  which  one
*  jye  was  injured  when  she  was  in  calf.  The  calf  was  born
with  the  corresponding  eye  small  and  blind.  In  more  recent
p'ears  Marey  has  recorded  an  identical  result  in  a  mare ;
me  eye  was  injured  when  she  was  pregnant,  and  the  foal
;v^as  born  with  the  corresjjonding  eye  small  and  blind.
Sitherto  we  liave  been  inclined  to  regard  such  cases  as  mere
ioincidences,  but  the  well  Imown  experiments  of  Guyer  and
Smith  provide  a  rational  explanation."

This  "  rational  explanation  "  was  provided  by  the  experiment
— published  in  1921 — of  injecting  a  substance,  having  a  selective
ind  toxic  action  on  the  lens  of  the  eye,  into  the  veins  of
doe  rabbits  at  the  end  of  the  second  week  of  pregnancy  ;
and  then  finding  that  the  young  rabbits,  when  born,  showed

ibhe  defect  to  be  expected,  and  that  also  many  of  their  sub-
sequent progeny  were  afflicted  with  cataract.
"  These  experiments  show  that  the  germ  plasm  can  be  reached
from  without."

Probably  a  few  biologists  must  have  claimed  that  the  facts
of  observation  had  alreadj^  demonstrated  this,  apart  from  special
experiment  ; but  they  may  have  been  set  aside  as  cranks.

Another  example  might  be  found  in  the  superstition  which
seemed  to  connect  the  effect  of  the  malaria  or  "  bad  air  "  of
the  Campagna  with  the  prevalence  of  a  noxious  insect.

1 Experiments  in  metaphysics  are  much  to  be  desired.  When
Ifwe  know  the  kind  of  secretion  which";  in  a"^  medium  enables
jthe  formation of ectoplasm, and the consequent  temporary


106  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [part  lxxxix

construction  of  organic  forms  which  appear  subject  to  in
teUigent  control  of  some  kind,  general  disbelief  in  the  pheno
nienon  will  not  continue  to  react  adversely  on  the  progres
of  science.

If  is  surely  reasonable  to  maintain  that  curious  and  puzzling
and  superficially  incredible  phenomena  should  be  taken  as
hints  for  enquiry  and  suggestions  for  experiment.  To  denj'
and  to  ignore,  is  easy  and  popular  and  respectable,  and  per
sonally  advantageous  in  the  present  state  of  popular  prejudice,
but  it  is  an  unworthy  attitude  to  be  taken  up  by  the  heirs
of  those  great  precursors  who  overcame  the  danger  of  public
opprobrium  and  first  laid  the  foundations  of  free  and  un-
fettered enquiry  into  all  the  facts  of  nature.

The  strength  of  Richet's  position  is  that  he  fully  accepts
the  phenomena,  or  such  of  them  as  have  been  well  evidenced,
without  at  all  feeUng  that  he  has  the  clue  to  their  explanation.'
To  dechne  to  contemplate  facts,  or  to  take  such  an  a  priori
attitude  that  experience  of  them  is  impossible,  is  not  the
faihng  of  Professor  Richet ;  and  by  trying  to  abstain  from
any  theory— or  when  that  becomes  impossible  by  showing
a  liking  for  a  materialistic  one,— his  book  may  carry  an
influence  into  unhkely  quarters.

Hence  those  who  have  the  credit  of  science  at  heart,  and
have  some  hope  that  the  next  generation  of  scientific'  men
will  overcome  the  very  natural  hostile  prejudice  of  their  im-
mediate predecessors,  may  appreciate  the  value  of  Prof.  Richet's
attitude,  even  if  they  feel  constrained  here  and  there  to  dis-
agree with  it;  and  in  that  spirit  I  for  one  admire  the  long
years  of  attention  which  Richet  has  given  to  a  despised  subject,
and  cordially  welcome  the  appearance  of  the  Traite  de  Meta-
psychique.

Oliver  J.  Lodge.


i


Me,


m

sent
liei


I,


PROCEEDINGS


OF  THE


Society  for  Psychical  Research


PART  XC.
MAY,  1924.


FOR  AND  AGAINST  SURVIVAL.

The  Difficulty  of  Survival  from  the  Scientific
Point  of  View.

By  Professor  Charles  Richet,

Membre  de  I'lnstitut ;  Professor  of  Physiology  in  the  University  of  Paris  ;
Past  President  of  the  S.P.R.


[n  my  numerous  writings  I  have  resolutely adhered  to
bhe position of not admitting as demonstrated  the
mrvival of consciousness. Nevertheless,  it may be  that
2iy  negative attitude is somewhat more strongly  repre-
sented  in my writings than in my intimate  thought.
There  are  facts  so  unexpected,  so  perturbing,  continually
cropping  up  as  we continue  to  study  the  subject,  pre-
^  renting themselves with such disconcerting rapidity  and
« complexity, that it would be inexcusable for me  to
!  ieny, without hesitation, all possibility of the  survival
)i  consciousness.

It  therefore  appears  to  me  wise  to  make  a  reserve  in
ny  negation. If  it  is  true — as  I  have  often  maintained —
■  hat the most reasonable h3rpothesis is the  unknown
lypothesis  X,  which  it  will  be  for  the  future  to  develop,
t  is  very  possible  that  this  hypothesis  X  need  not  be


i  1

108  Professor  Charles  Richet.  [part


antagonistic  to  the  spiritistic  hypothesis.  In  fact,  I  do
not  wish  to  expose  myself  to  the  chance  of  seeing  my
negations  suddenly  reversed  by  new  experiments  ;  so,
although  I  do  not  expect  this  to  happen,  my  attitude  of
prudence  may  be  pardoned.  At  the  same  time,  in  spit^
of  my  prudence,  I  am  forced  to  regard  the  spiritistic  hypo-
thesis, not  only  as  undemonstrated,  but,  still  more,  as  being
in  formal  opposition  to  a  great  number  of  facts.

Let  it  be  well  understood  that  I  am  not  at  all  con-
cerned to  know  whether  survival  is  agreeable  or  dis-
agreeable, nor  whetlier  I  am  in  accord  or  disaccord  with
any  particular  brand  of  religious  opinion  :  it  is  not
things  of  that  kind  which  occupy  my  mind,  but  only  a
question  of  fact — the  truth.


II.

To  what  then  is  the  spiritistic  hypothesis  in  opposition  1
First  of  all,  very  briefly,  there  is  Physiology,  that  is
to  say  a  very  precise  science,  rich  in  demonstrations,
which  have  estabhshed  by  innumerable  proofs  a  narrow
rigorous  parallehsm  between  intellectual  functions— other-'
wise  called  memory — and  the  brain.

Moreover,  in  the  immense  animal  kingdom  there  is  no'
gap,  no  hiatus.  The  monkey  and  the  dog  have  a  memory
analogous  to  that  of  man  :  the  hen  and  the  tortoise  can
be  compared  with  the  monkey  and  the  dog  :  then  the
fish  and  the  octopus  :  then  all  the  other  animals,  down
to  the  worms.  Consciousness,  mobihty,  sensitiveness,  are
functions  of  the  nervous  system  ;  so  that  it  is  necessary
to  suppose,  not  only  the  survival  of  the  human  conscious-
ness, but  also  the  survival  of  all  animal  memories.
That  is  a  grave  consideration,  and  I  am  not  resigned
to  it.  ^


too


Jlllj

is  i]


But  the  spiritists  do  not  admit  what  my  illustrious
friend  Oliver  Lodge  humorously  calls  "the  fetish  of  the
brain."  For  myself,  without  being  able  to  give  a  firm
demonstration  (for  one  cannot  prove  a  negative),  I  cannot
beheve  that  memory  can  exist  without  the  anatomical  p
and  physiological  integrity  of  the  brain. Whenever  there


m
im

doa


xc]  For  and  Against  Survival.  109

is  no  more  oxygen,  whenever  the  temperature  is  either
too  low  or  too  high,  when  there  are  a  few  drops  of
atropine  or  morphine  or  chloroform  introduced  into  the
blood,  whenever  the  course  of  cerebral  irrigation  is
stopped — memory  alters  and  disappears.  Sj)iritists  cannot
deny  these  facts.  They  say  merely  that  the  brain  is
only  an  instrument,  which  is  unable  to  respond  unless  it
is  intact.  And  it  is  by  reasoning  of  another  order  that
they  try  to  prove  that  the  instrument  is  not  necessary.

But  that  is  another  grave  consideration.  It  is  as  if
I  were  to  say  that  in  an  electric  lamp  the  passage  of
the  current  and  the  integrity  of  the  mechanism  of  the
lamp  are  not  necessary  for  the  production  of  its  hglit.


III.

But  let  us  proceed  and  come  to  the  direct  proofs.
Following  the  classification  that  I  have  formulated,  they
can  be  related  to  subjective  metapsychics  or  to  objective
metapsychics.

Now  in  subjective  metapsychics  we  have  a  great  number
of  facts  proving  that  human  intelhgence  has  means  of
acquiring  information  other  than  through  normal  sensory
oharmels  ;  and  that  it  acquires  this  information  under
conditions  which  exclude  the  attribution  of  this  super-
lensorial  knowledge  (or  cryptaesthesia)  to  the  presence  of  an
individuahty  which  has  survived  the  death  of  the  brain.

When  Ossowiecki  reads  the  word  "  toi  "  that  I  have
written  on  a  scrap  of  paper  held  all  crumpled  up  in  my
hand,  or  when  he  indicates  a  verse  of  Rostand  that
I  don't  know  and  that  Mme  de  Noailles  had  enclosed
in  a  carefully  sealed  letter,  there  is  no  need  to  suppose
the  intervention  of  the  soul  of  a  deceased  person.  There
is  perception  or  knowledge  of  reality  : that  is  all.

And  this  perception  or  knowledge  is  profoundly
mysterious.  We  might  say  that  it  has,  so  to  speak,  no
limit  known  to  us.  We  are  not  leaving  the  scientific
iomain  if  we  say  that  cryptaesthesia  can  reveal  to  us
fragments  of  the  real — fragments  which  seem  to  have  no
3onnexion  with  space  and  time.


110  Professor  Charles  Richet.  [pAHl

Since  the  facts  are  so,  since  cryptaesthesia  in  these  cases
is  apparently  not  connected  with  the  agency  of  any
discarnate  person,  I  do  not  at  all  see  why,  in  spite
of  appearances — sometimes  startUng  and  disturbing — one
should  feel  authorised  to  suppose  that  the  individuaUty
of  some  dead  person  has  retained  his  consciousness,  his
memory,  and  is  there  in  order  to  make  revelations  to
us.  It  is  a  hypothesis  wliich  is  not  at  all  necessary,
given  the  mysterious  and  vast  extent  of  cryptaesthesic
power.

Consequently,  all  the  revelations  of  the  discarnate  about
their  old  hfe  can  be  logically  attributed  to  this  power
of  cryptaesthesia.

Nevertheless,  I  do  not  overlook  two  facts  :  (1)  That
genuine  mediums  have  an  invincible  tendency  to  attribute
their  answers  to  a  spirit  of  the  dead  :  all  their  phrases
are  saturated  with  the  spiritistic  hypothesis  ;  and  it  was
so  even  in  the  beginning  of  their  career,  when  they  had
practically  no  knowledge  of  spiritistic  Uterature.  (2)  We
must  admit— what  is  not  very  satisfactory—that  mediums
have  a  way  of  selecting  minute  details  in  the  hfe  and
habits  of  a  definite  discarnate  person  in  order  to  utiUse
or  adapt  them  in  their  answers.  Sir  Ohver  Lodge  and
E.  Bozzano  have  insisted  on  the  difficulty  there  is  in
understanding  this  selection  in  the  messages.  So  much
so  that  in  certain  very  rare  cases  the  hypothesis  of
survival  is  much  less  far-fetched  than  the  hypothesis  of
selective  cryjjtaesthesia.

But  these  reasons,  which  I  frankly  bring  forward  in
all  their  force,  do  not  hinder  me  from  conclucUng  that  by
subjective  metapsychics  one  cannot  render  hkely  the
theory  of  survival.

One  must  here  remark  that  we  have  not  taken  into
account  the  wholesale  nonsense  furnished  by  automatic
writing  in  thousands  of  experiments.  Even  for  the  most
hardened  spiritist  there  is  not  one  communication  in  a
thousand  which  is  not  ridiculous  :  it  behoves  one  there-
fore to  be  very  cautious  about  the  thousandth  observation,
even  when  it  has  rather  striking  features.


It

real

«xa

m
siir
phe


ma

me

for


xc]  For  and  Against  Survival.  Ill

IV.

Let  us  remain  a  moment  longer  in  subjective  meta-
psychics  and  consider  the  most  extraordinary  facts  in  the
whole  of  known  science,  that  is  to  say  Premonitions.
It  must  be  understood  that  I  by  no  means  deny  the
reality  of  certain  premonitions  ;  I  have  quoted  remarkable
•examples  of  them  which  have  happened  to  me  personally  :
and  in  the  annals  of  our  science  there  are  astonishing
■examples.  But  premonition  has  nothing  to  do  with
survival.  It  remains  an  absolutely  incomprehensible
phenomenon  for  our  puny  intelhgence.  One  cannot  see
how  this  phenomenon,  which  .shocks  so  brutally  our
sense  of  free  will,  can  ever  be  understood.

That  matters  httle.  It  is  an  undeniable  fact  ;  and
it  proves  to  us  the  sheer  impossibility,  as  yet,  of  finding
any  explanation  for  metapsychic  phenomena.  But  I  do
not  propose  an  explanation  or  a  theory.  When  I  speak
of  cryptaesthesia  I  indicate  a  fact— the  perception  of
reahty  by  extra-sensorial  channels.  I  do  not  seek  to
go  beyond  that,  and  as  yet  science  has  no  right  to  go
beyond  that.


V.


What  strongly  confirms  this  opinion,  about  our  scien-
tific powerlessness  in  coming  to  a  conclusion,  are  the
experiences  of  Objective  metapsychics  ;  for  they  prove
to  us  that  we  are  still  plunged  in  thick  darkness.  When
an  ectoplasmic  formation  comes  out  of  the  body  of
Eusapia,  of  D.  D.  Home,  of  Mss  Gohgher,  of  Eva,  or
of  WiUy,  we  can  only  properly  conclude  that  from  the
bodies  of  mediums  can  be  disengaged  sometimes  forces
having  objective  reahty,  which  can  be  moulded,  and
jjjl photographed,  and  can  assume  the  most  diverse  appear-
ances. What  connexion  can  there  be  between  these
jg.  materiahsations  of  human  forms  and  the  survival  of
memory  1 I  cannot  see  any.

Moreover,  there  are  not  only  materiahsations  of  human
forms, but also materiahsations of veils,  head-dresses.


112  Professor  Charles  Richet.  [part!

clothes,  animals.,  various  objects  ;  to  such  an  extent  that  I
we  cannot  doubt  that  the  power  of  materiahsation  or  of  siii
producing  ectoplasm  is  not  limited  to  human  personahties.

I  know  well  that  in  certain  cases,  in  particular  the  case  ne'
of  Mr.  Cushman  [American  Journal  S.P.R.,  April,  1922,
pp.  132  to  147),  the  photograph  of  the  phantom  represents
very  exactly  the  face  of  the  young  deceased  daughter
of  Mr.  Cushman.  But  even  in  this  remarkable  case,  if  tni
there  is  not  some  error  or  trickery,  it  is  impossible  to
suppose  that  the  body  of  this  young  girl  had  not  been
decomposed  by  the  decay  of  the  tomb.  We  cannot
really  suppose  that  the  forms  of  living  people  perpetuate
themselves  after  death.  It  must  be  the  materiahsation  of
something  tvhich  has existed  and  which  no  longer  exists.

To  admit  that  is  to  enter  a  world  absolutely  unknown.
It  is  possible  that  one  day  it  may  be  admitted  ;  but
to-day  we  stand  plunged  into  an  abyss  of  deeper  and
deeper  mysteries.  It  would  mean,  not  only  the  survival  Mi
of  memory,  but  the  survival  of  the  chemical  elements
which  constitute  our  body,  and  which  retain  somehow  enl
their  molecular  arrangement,  in  spite  of  incineration  and
putrefaction.

Thus  objective  metapsychics  gives  no  support  whatever
to  the  theory  of  survival. It  teaches  us  only  this — that,
so  far, we  have  understood  nothing, absolutely  nothing,  t|i(
of  all  these  phenomena.

ID

VI.  *


And  now  to  conclude.  Unknown  truths,  immense  ph
unforeseen  horizons,  open  before  us.  Let  us  not  hasten
to  build  up  a  fragile  theory.  The  further  we  advance
the  more  the  shadows  thicken.  The  old  Egyptians  had
ah-eady  supposed  that  a  human  being  survived  the
disintegration  of  its  human  tatters.  They  put  into  the
sarcophagus  of  their  dead  ones,  cakes,  toys,  and  jewels.
The  anthropomorphism  of  the  spiritist  is  of  the  same
order.  Truth,  under  the  profound  veils  which  cover  it,
must  be  far  more  noble  than  this  antiquated  idea — the
'prolongation of  our  miserable individual  intellectuality.


xc]


For  and  Against  Survival.


113


I  deny  nothing.  I  claim  only  that  the  theory  of
survival  has  some  extremely  feeble  evidence  in  its  favour,
but  against  it  a  series  of  innumerable  inductions.  In
view  of  the  rapid  progress  of  the  sciences,  and  the  pro-
found change  in  all  our  conceptions,  it  must  be  held  to
constitute  only  a  revival  of  very  ancient  superstitions.
The  evolution  of  science  will  lead  us  to  more  splendid
truths.


FOR  AND  AGAINST  SURVIVAL.

The  Possibility  of  Survival  from  the  Scientific
Point  of  View.

By  Sir  Olfver  Lodge.

My  good  and  eminent  friend  Professor  Richet  has  made
an  admirable  statement  or  synoptic  summary  of  the
enhghtened  materialistic  position  in  regard  to  the  pheno-
mena studied  in  Psychic  Research,  and  recorded  in  his
great  book,  Traite  de  Metapsychique.  His  statement
would  not  be  accepted  by  the  great  majority  of  his
colleagues,  who  being  unacquainted  with  the  facts  are
therefore  comparatively  benighted  ;  but  the  interesting-
thing  is  that  though  Professor  Riohet  knows  facts  which
in  some  of  their  aspects  conflict  with  materiahsm,  he  yet
is  able  to  remain  a  materiahst.

No  offence  is  intended  by  this  term  :  it  is  a  definite
philosophical  position.  It  is  well  to  have  this  position
competently  sustained,  so  far  as  the  phenomena  specially
under  consideration  are  concerned,  and  so  far  as  it  has
a  bearing  on  our  acceptance  or  rejection  of  the  possibihty
or  reasonableness  of  human  survival.  If  Professor  Richet's
stronghold  can  be  stormed,  it  is  unhkely  that  any
successor  will  be  able  to  entrench  himself  in  a  fortress
of  equal  soHdity.

Richet  shows  himself  remarkably  open  minded,  for  he
says,  "  I  deny  nothing "  ;  he  also  shows  himself  a
thorough  agnostic,  for  he  says  that  we  are  still  plunged


114


Sir  Oliver  Lodge.


[part


in  thick  darkness  and  have  no  chie  to  these  mysteries.
But  here  is  just  where  I  differ  from  him.  I  am  less
open-minded,  for  I  want  to  deny  a  good  deal.  I  am
less  agnostic,  for  I  have  a  working  hypothesis,  which  I
desire  to  verify  or  else  explode.

Now  although  Professor  Richet  is  acquainted  with  the
facts,  I  venture  to  say  that  he  is  not  yet  acquainted
with  my  version  of  the  spiritistic  point  of  view  ;  which
I  might  call  "  our  theory "  except  that  I  have  no  right
to  involve  other  people  in  a  disputed  and  unorthodox
position.  Why  should  he  be  acquainted  with  it  ?  If  I
have  indicated  my  theoretical  views  at  all,  it  has  always
been  in  a  faint  and  apologetic  manner,  because  I  want
to  confront  them  always  with  the  facts,  and  because  I
wish  to  emphasise  the  facts  themselves  rather  than  any
opinion  or  theories  about  them.  But  with  my  friend
Professor  Richet  I  must  take  a  different  hne.  There  is
no  need  to  weary  him  by  insistence  on  the  facts, — though
about  a  few  of  the  subjective  kind  I  have  a  more  favour-
able opinion  than  he  has  ;  just  as  on  the  objective  side
he  has  had  advantages  of  investigation  denied  to  me, —
what  is  troubling  him  throughout  is  the  lack  of  theory.
He  bravely  faces  the  lacuna.  He  does  not  seek  to  devise
opposition  theories.  He  is  content  to  say  that  the  facts
are  mysterious  and  inexplicable  and  rather  crazy,  when
interpreted  as  orthodox  science  feels  bound  to  interpret
them.

And  with  that  hmitation — the  limitation  which  orthodox
science  at  present  imposes  on  itself — crazy  and  incredible
is  what  they  are.  Still  more  crazy  must  our  theories
about  them  seem.  But  new  facts  often  require  new
theory  for  their  interpretation.  There  are  things  in  the
universe  which  biological  science  has  not  yet  taken  into
account.  If  or  when  it  does  proceed  to  take  another
entity  of  physical  existence  into  account,  it  will  find  its
difficulties  gradually  disappearing.  And  Richet  himself
win  feel  sooner  or  later  that  he  can  have  a  clue  to  his
facts,  a  link  on  which  to  thread  them,  a  point  of  view
which  will  enable  him  to  interpret  them  in  a  more  hospi-
table and  less  dumbfounded  manner.


xc]  For  and  Against  Survival.  115

From  his  present  point  of  view  no  wonder  they  appear
strange,  troubhng,  mysterious  and  incredible.  The  marvel
is  that  his  loyalty  to  truth  and  to  fact  has  enabled  him
to  accept  them  at  all,  as  part  of  the  reahty  of  the
Universe.  That  is  just  what  they  are  :  but  then  some
other  things  are  hkewise  part  of  reahtj^.  And  when  we
accept  and  incorporate  the  Ether  into  our  scheme — a
thing  at  present  totally  ignored  by  biological  science,  and
indeed  ignored  by  all  science  except  one-half  of  the
science  of  Physics — the  horizon  will  begin  to  brighten,
the  mist  roll  away,  and  a  star,  if  not  a  sun,  will  begin
to  illuminate  the  darkness.

I  said  that  I  wanted  to  deny  as  well  as  to  assert.
Professor  Richet  refrains  from  denying,  but  some  of  his
assertions  are  rash.  He  denies  with  hesitation  :  he
asserts  with  vigour — a  procedure  in  general  quite  admir-
able ;  but  on  this  occasion  I  am  going  rashly  to  take  an
opposite  course.  I  am  going  to  deny  with  vigour  and
assert  with  hesitation.  Only,  for  the  sake  of  lucidity
and  brevity,  I  may  find  it  best  to  throw  my  assertions
into  a  positive  and  dogmatic  form,  which  ill  suits  the
subject  were  it  not  for  this  explanation.  And  I  must
trust  my  critics  clearly  to  apprehend  that  when  I  turn
from  denials  to  assertions  I  am  only  formulating  a
working  hypothesis,  only  making  an  effort  to  frame  a
rational  conception  of  the  manner  and  method  of  human
survival.

The  evidence  for  survival  ought  to  stand  on  its  own
merits,  without  being  hampered  by  effete  superstitions.
I  wish  to  deny  and  repudiate  some  of  those  superstitions
in  a  forcible  manner  ;  and  in  this  I  know  that  I  am  in
agreement  with  all  the  more  reasonable  spiritists.  Professor
Richet,  and  perhaps  some  others  in  the  physiological
camp,  seem  to  want  to  carry  these  superstitions  over
from  "  the  dark  ages "  into  the  era  of  Science  ;  but
this  must  not  be  allowed.  The  subject  is  difficult  enough
without  these  unnecessary  and  impossible  accretions.

My  first  denial  then  is  of  anything  Uke  the  resuscitation


116


Sir  Oliver  Lodge.


[PABT


of  a  corpse.  Humanity  for  many  centuries  has  been
accustomed  to  think  of  people  being  put  into  a  grave,
there  to  bide  their  time  for  some  future  event  :  and  those
who  hold  or  try  to  hold  that  view  would  be  indisposed
to  accept  any  appearances  of  the  departed  unless  they
could  find  their  empty  tomb.  Now  we  maintain  that
the  idea  of  a  resuscitated  body  wandering  about  is  absurd  ;
although  the  history  of  folk-lore  shows  that  beUefs  of
this  kind  were  held  :  and  a  stake  was  sometimes  driven
through  the  body  of  a  suicide  in  order  to  keep  it  quiet.
The  reason  for  this  preposterous  practice  was  no  doubt
similar  to  that  which  Professor  Richet  now  expresses,
viz.  that  the  personahty  is  so  entirely  associated  with
the  material  body  that  any  visible  and  tangible  appearance
of  that  personality  must  necessarily  be  taken  to  mean
that  the  corpse  was  used  for  the  purpose.  And  during
the  Middle  Ages  some  even  of  the  Fathers  of  the  Church
apparently  could  not  dissociate  the  idea  of  ultimate
resurrection  from  the  notion  of  an  abandoned  grave,  a
collection  of  the  body's  original  particles,  a  composing
of  them  together,  and  a  revivification.  But  the  facts
give  no  justification  for  such  an  idea.  And  those  who
hold  the  spiritistic  view  are  as  wllhng  as  any  Physiologist
is  to  admit  all  the  facts  about  disintegration,  decomposi-
tion, incineration,  and  the  rest.  The  materialistic  survivals
of  folk-lore  must  be  utterly  discarded.

If  it  be  found  that  an  apparition  or  phantom  has  the
features  and  bodily  marks  of  the  discarded  instrument  of
manifestation,  then  those  facts  will  have  to  be  accepted,
and  an  explanation  sought  elsewhere.  No  explanation
based  on  the  revivification  of  the  corpse  can  be  accepted
for  a  moment.  It  is  true  that  it  seems  like  the  obvious
and  childish  explanation  :  but  in  the  fight  of  modern
knowledge  it  ought  to  be  discarded  as  extinct.  When
■we  say  that  the  facts  uphold  the  doctrine  of  survival,  we  do
not  mean  that  I

The  ancient  Egyptian  practices,  and  their  idea  of  death
must have been troublesome and painful. The  notion
that  the  surviving  soul  or  Ka  required  meats  and  furniture
and  appfiances,  which  were  therefore  put  into  the  tomb


xc]


For  and  Against  Survival.


117


ior  its  sustenance  and  convenience,  belongs  to  the  childish
Age  of  humanity,  and  must  have  given  great  anxiety  to
survivors,  especiallj"  poor  survivors,  lest  they  had  for-
gotten something  necessary,  or  lest  they  had  not  made
adequate  provision  for  their  beloved's  future  existence.

Mechfeval  ecclesiastical  behefs  were  in  many  respects
better  than  that.  It  must  have  been  painful  to  put  the
loved  person  into  the  earth  and  leave  him  in  the  cold  and
dark  for  unkno-mi  centuries  ;  but  at  anj^  rate  they  had
faith  that  the  bodily  part  would  be  at  peace  until  sum-
moned again  and  reconstituted  by  Divine  Power.  They
had  anxieties  and  troubles  enough  however  about  the
soul,  which  they  were  told  might  be  in  torment  unless
they  mvoked  the  supernataral  power  of  the  priesthood.
This  fear  must  have  given  so  much  pain  that  really  those
behefs  were  hardly  superior  to  the  more  ancient  behefs  of
the  Egj^tians.  It  is  known,  however,  that  the  phi'ase
■•'•'resurrection  of  the  body""  is  capable  of  adaptation  and
Teasonable  interpretation  by  behevers  ;  as  explained  e.g.  in
2Ian  and  the  Universe,  and  in  Part  III  of  Rayniond.

But  with  Ecclesiastical  practices,  science  has  nothing
to  do.  It  ought  to  regard  the  facts  from  a  totally  new
and  different  aspect.  We  ought  to  maintain,  and  we  do
maintain,  that  the  material  body  has  served  its  turn  and
is  utterly  discarded  and  done  with,  that  its  particles  can
be  used  again  for  other  forms  of  hfe,  and  that  no  sort
•of  identity  or  personahty  remains  associated  with  them.

As  to  what  becomes  of  the  personahty,  and  what
instrument  now  serves  its  turn,  that  is  a  matter  for
investigation  ;  that  is  what  we  have  to  learn.  Xo  question
of  priestcraft  should  be  associated  -ndth  it  :  it  is  a
straightforward  scientific  enquiry.  It  may  be  that  we
do  not  know.  But  on  the  other  hand  it  may  be  that
we  can  frame  a  working  h\-pothesis.  Such  a  hypothesis
is  growing  in  my  mind  :  and  the  beginnings  of  it  were
in  the  mind  of  St.  Paul,  of  Clement  of  Alexandria,  of
Origen,  and  other  Greek  Fathers  of  the  Church.  Very
hkely  their  ideas  were  condemned  as  heretical  at  the  time  ;
but  that  does  not  prove  them  imtrue.

To  avoid  mistmderstanding,  I  should  hke  to  say  here


118


Sir  Oliver  Lodge.


[part


that  in  all  I  have  said  I  am  referring  to  ordinary  bodies
and  ordinary  people.  If  there  is  a  case  for  an  exceptional
Body,  and  for  a  different  treatment  in  one  particular
instance,  so  that  one  Tomb  was  really  empty,  that  is  not
a  matter  to  which  I  wish  to  refer  here.  I  may  have
more  to  say  about  that  in  a  proper  time  and  place.

Meanwhile  I  am  deahng  with  the  apparitions  and  the
fate  of  ordinary  people.  The  facts  suggest,  what  is
rather  the  point  at  issue,  that  they  do  sometimes  appear  :
but  the  fact  is  certain  that  their  material  bodies  remain
in  the  tomb,  or  wherever  else  they  were  deposited  by
survivors.  If  this  is  fully  admitted  and  thoroughly
accepted,  a  crude  materialistic  explanation  of  the  facts
is  put  out  of  court,  and  the  ground  is  to  that  extent
cleared.  The  enquiry  may  now  proceed  freed  from  this
encumbrance  of  folk-lore.  There  is  no  survival  of  the
material  body !

Nevertheless,  those  of  us  who  consider  that  we  are
really  in  touch,  sometimes,  with  surviving  personaKties,
are  told  by  those  personalities  that  they  have  "  bodies "
just  as  real  and  substantial  as  they  used  to  have,  that
they  find  themselves  signally  unchanged,  that  they  pre-
serve the  same  appearance,  so  that  they  can  be  recognised;
that  it  is  by  means  of  these  bodies  or  instruments  of
manifestation  that  they  are  aware  of  and  communicate
with  each  other,  and  that  by  aid  of  them  they  occasion-
ally communicate  with  us.  How  can  these  statements
be  reconciled  with  what  has  just  been  said  ?  Well,  that
is  where  comes  in  my  working  hypothesis — a  hypothesis
not  accepted  by  me  alone  ])ut  by  many  others  who  are
feeling  their  way  in  the  same  direction,  a  hypothesis
which  we  can  read  into  many  of  St.  Paul's  words,  and
which  we  therefore  think  that  that  inspired  genius  caught
some  ghmpse  of,  though  he  could  not  have  formulated  it
in  modern  terms.

If  I  am  tempted  to  call  it  "  my  hypothesis,"  it  is
because — apart  altogether  from  psychical  conditions — I  have
made  a  life-long  study  of  the  Ether  of  Space  ;  so  that  to
me  it  seems  a  more  famihar  and  substantial  and  practical
entity  than  it  is  likely  to  be  to  people who  have  not


!r  xc]  For  and  Against  Survival.  119

s  made  that  study,  and  to  whom  it  seems  something  indefinite,
al  vague,  and  imaginary.

ir  Among  scientific  men  the  Ether  has  only  been  studied
)t  by  Physicists,  and  not  by  all  of  them.  It  has  been
e  ignored  by  Chemists,  qua  Chemists,  and  has  probably
I  never  entered  the  thoughts  of  Physiologists,  or  Biologists
le  I  of  any  kind,  at  all.  And  yet  if  it  is  a  reaMty  in  the
is  'Universe  it  may  have  chemical  and  biological  functions
:  to  perform,  as  well  as  its  well  known  functions  in  the
1  [science  of  Physics.  We  know  it  familiarly  in  the  pheno-
Hmena  of  Light,  of  Electricity,  of  Magnetism.  We  are
r  beginning  to  associate  it  also,  rather  definitely,  with
s  Elasticity,  Cohesion,  and  Gravitation.  And  we  are
t  gradually  learning  that  the  greater  part  of  the  energy
f  in  the  Universe,  and  certainly  all  potential  energy,  belongs
e  to  it,  and  not  to  matter  at  all. Atomic  matter  is  one

thing  :  the  Ether  is  another.  They  may  be  related  ;  in
e  fact  they  are  related.  The  hnk  between  them  is  electricity,
i.  But  if  it  is  possible  ever  to  unify  them,  and  to  regard

them  as  different  manifestations  of  one  thing,  there  is
t  no doubt which is the more fundamental of the  two.

The  Ether  is  the  fundamental  thing.  Matter  is  a  derived
:  and  secondary  thing.  And  the  electric  charges  which
f  constitute  matter  are  probably  composed  of  modifications
t  of  the  Ether.

This  really  is  orthodox  Physics,  though  it  is  not  yet  so

>  substantiated  that  all  Physicists  must  necessarily  agree  with
[  it.  There  may  be  legitimate  differences  of  opinion,  but  it  is
<  a  recognised  and  reasoned  scientific  view.  It  is  well  founded,
r  it  is  deduced  from  the  facts,  and  is  entirely  independent  of

>  any  psychic  considerations.

[.  Suppose  then,  for  purposes  of  argaiment,  that  we  allow
:  the  Ether  in  the  physical  universe  to  have  the  functions
:  which  most  physicists  attribute  to  it  :  then  it  becomes  a
definite  question  whether  it  ought  not  to  be  taken  into
-  account  in  philosophic  discussion,  and  in  the  long  run  in
'  biological  theory  too.

I  To  explain  all  that  I  have  said  on  the  side  of  physics
1  would  need  something  like  a  treatise.  In  this  discussion  I
[  must  be  brief,  and  must  appear  to  be  more  hypothetical  than


120  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [pabt

I  am.  Still  when  we  come  to  Biology  we  are  bound  to  be
hypothetical.  And  the  working  hypothesis  that  I  promul
gate  must  be  held  hghtly,  until  the  facts,  studied  long  and
carefully,  are  found  to  substantiate  it,  and  constitute  it
a  reasonable  clue  to  phenomena  which,  though  real,  seem
otherwise  inexphcable.

To  Professor  Richet  the  facts  seem  quite  inexplicable.
He  feels  that  he  is  working  in  the  dark,  and  that  "  the
only  safe  statement  is  to  say  that  we  really  know  nothing,
absolutely  nothing,  about  the  Universe."'  From  this
point  of  view,  my  agnosticism  is  not  so  deep  as  his.  I
feel  that  we  have  a  clue,  and  that  it  is  only  by  following
it  up  that  we  shall  find  out  whether  it  is  a  trustworthy
clue  or  not.  Any  clue  is  better  than  none.  Discon-
nected facts,  not  joined  by  any  thread  of  theory,  are
intractable  and  confusing  things.  They  can  hardly  be
said  to  belong  to  Science,  which  means  a  system  of
organised  knowledge.  And  it  is  because  they  lack  the
clue,  that  Biologists  in  general  feel  so  hostile,  and  are
conscious  of  such  repugnance,  to  the  facts  themselves.
To  the  honour  of  Professor  Richet,  in  spite  of  his  repug-
nance, he  is  ready  to  accept  the  facts.  But  it  seems  to
me  that  he  raises  unnecessary  difficulties  about  them  by
his  insistence  on  matter  alone.  He  will  never  under-
stand them  in  terms  of  "  matter "  alone.  Strictly
speaking,  we  cannot  understand  anything  fully  and  com-
pletely in  terms  of  matter  alone.  By  concentrating  on
matter  we  eliminate  from  our  thoughts  the  greater  part
of  the  Universe.  The  Universe  contains  many  things
besides  matter.  It  contains  magnetism  and  electricity
and  light  and  ether  ;  it  also  contains  life  and  thought
and  mind  and  consciousness  and  memory  and  personahty
and  character.  None  of  these  things  are  material  ;  and
yet,  strangely  enough,  some  of  them  have  come  into
association  with  matter  through  the  curious  biological
process  of  Incarnation.  For  a  time  intelligences  do
inhabit  material  bodies  which,  by  barely  known  processes,
they  have  unconsciously  constructed.  It  is  evident  that
there  exists  a  formative  principle,  which  is  able  to  deal
Avith  the  atoms  of  matter,  or  rather  with  the  more  com-


i


h
latti
i(


Btr

fe


lOti

ik
ic
B
te

i

IS

lat
n


iiil


■eol


cc]  For  and  Against  S^vri■ival.  121

)lex  molecules  into  which  the  atoms  have  already  grouped
themselves  :  and  thus,  by  aid  of  the  energy  which  these
nolecules  receive  from  the  sun,  non-material  entities  are
iible  to  manifest  themselves  famiharly  in  association  with
natter.  So  vivid  is  the  connexion  that  we  have  learnt
.0  identify  them  with  their  material  modes  of  manifes-
ation,  and  to  imagine  that  they  cannot  otherwise  exist.

We  do  not  know  why  they  require  a  habitation  or
nstrument  belonging  to  the  physical  universe  ;  but  we
nay  assume  that  for  some  unknowoa  reason  they  do.
iVe  know  that  they  make  use  of  matter,  though  we  know
lot  how  or  why.  But  the  facts  now  show  that  associa-
ion  with  matter  is  not  essential  to  their  existence.  We
nay  assume  that  they  can  make  use  of  something  else,
f  the  facts  point  that  way.  My  working  hypothesis  is
hat  they  are  more  closely  associated  with  the  Ether  than
vith  matter,  that  they  act  primarily  and  directly  on  the
Sther,  and  only  indirectly  on  matter,  and  that  they  are
ble  to  continue  in  their  Ether  habitations  when  the
naterial  particles  are  worn  out  and  discarded.  In  justifi-
iation  for  this  I  wish  to  say,  as  a  physicist,  that  most,
)ossibly  all,  of  our  actions  on  matter  are  exerted  through
he  Ether  :  some  obviously,  like  propulsion  by  electric
notors,  others  less  conspicuously,  but  just  as  really,
vherever  force  crosses  empty  space.  For  atoms  are  never
n  contact.

But  we  have  no  sense  organs  for  the  Ether.  To  our
iresent  animal  senses  it  is  entirely  elusive.  Hence  we
hall  know  nothing  about  any  personalities  associated  only
sdth  an  Ether  body  unless  they  can  operate  on  our  senses
n  some  way.  To  do  this  they  must  operate  on  matter,
^et  us  suppose  then  that  they  can  extract  organised
naterial  and  mould  it,  as  a  sculptor  moulds  his  clay  or
LS  a  painter  treats  his  pigments,  until  they  have  fashioned
i  material  representation  which  we  may  be  able  to  see
i-nd  touch,  and  which,  if  imbued  with  energy,  may  per-
orm  physical  actions, such  as  the  motion  of  objects.

This  is  not  an  unfounded  guess  ;  for  we  know  that
he  famihar  material  body  has  been  built  up  in  its  present
lefinite  shape  out  of  food  not  in  the  least  hke  it  ;  that


122  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [par

the  shape  of  the  material  body  depends  on  the  formativi
organising  principle,  not  on  the  aliment  provided.  Tha
is  the  peculiarity  of  live  things.  They  are  able  to  display
themselves,  to  exhibit  their  own  shape,  by  means  of  an^
kind  of  wholesome  material.  In  this  they  are  unlik(
crystals,  of  which  the  shape  is  entirely  dependent  on  th(
nutriment  supplied.

We  have,  therefore,  only  to  suppose  that  this  formativf
principle  or  constructive  power  persists.  And  we  neec
not  have  any  great  difficulty  in  supposing,  if  the  fact:
warrant  and  suggest  the  idea,  that  this  same  formative
principle  can  continue  to  act  occasionally  even  on  matter
when  suitable  organised  protoplasmic  material  is  provided
and  that  the  material  can  be  moulded  into  the  same  hke-
ness  as  of  old,  although  imperfectly  and  very  temporarily.

In  this  general  way,  therefore,  I  would  seek  to  account
for  objective  metapsychical  phenomena.  That  deceased
human  beings  are  often  thus  engaged  need  not  be  assumed.
The  formative  unconscious  power  or  principle  may  be.
miich  more  general  than  that,  but  it  must  also  be
specific.  In  an  egg  the  formative  principle  exists  which
constructs  a  bird  ;  from  the  ovvim  of  a  dog,  a  dog
emerges  :  the  formative  principle  in  an  acorn  constructs
an  oak.  The  construction  is  in  every  familiar  case
specific.  So  if  human  hands  and  faces  are  produced,|
or  even  if  things  like  garments  and  veils  are  imitated,
it  is  not  unreasonable  to  suppose  that  some  human,  ^"
element — in  the  latter  case  perhaps  a  conscious  element —
is  somehow  concerned  in  the  production.

Subjective  metapsychics  is  still  easier  to  associate  with
human  survival.  The  controlling  immaterial  entity,  the
hving  personality,  was  known,  while  here,  to  be  able  to
operate  on  the  cells  of  its  brain,  so  as  not  only  to  move
muscles  but  thereby  to  convey  ideas  intelUgible  to  other
similar  personalities  who  were  acquainted  with  the  con-
ventional signs  or  language.  And  it  is  a  question  of
evidence  whether  this  power  of  operating  on  brains  can
be  extended  to  other  brains,  so  that  a  personaUty  which
has  lost  the  use  of  its  own  instrument  may  be  able,
with  difficulty  and  by  permission, to  work  similarly  on


d
Is;
flot
'le
loi
ledi
m
mi
«h


low
sac
M
!triv

li  li
fe

I


1st
lain


isli(
k


in


l:c.]  For  and  Against  Survival.  123

he  brain  of  some  hospitable  person  who  partially  vacates
lis  instrument  in  trance,  or  who  allows  part  of  it  to  be
ised  for  moving  either  his  hand  in  writing  or  his  organs
)f  speech.  If  so,  the  ideas  thus  conveyed  may  mainly
)elong  and  be  largely  appropriate,  not  to  the  host  or
'  medium,"  but  to  the  actuating  personahty  or  "  control."
Chough  admittedly  the  habit  and  cultivation  of  the
uedium's  brain  may  to  some  extent  hamper  free  and
'msophisticated  and  fully  intelhgent  control,  and  may
tecessitate  a  judicious  selection  of  topics  or  of  language,
uch  as  the  instrument  may  be  able  to  transmit  Mdthout
indue  and  telergic  effort.

It  is  unnecessary  to  elaborate  this  further,  because
hese  are  the  facts  which  more  strongly  than  any  others
lemonstrate  survival.  Whether  the  evidence,  as  yet,
:onstitutes  proof  is  a  perfectly  reasonable  thing  to  discuss  ;
,nd  there  may  be  differences  of  opinion.  But  no  artificial
Objections  need  be  raised  by  the  difficulty  of  realising
low  it  can  possibly  be  done.  The  appearances  are
ixactly  as  if  the  simple  explanation  were  the  true  one.
^nd  there  have  been  several  cases  in  science  where,  after
triving  for  a  more  complicated  theory,  we  have  found
ifter  all  that  Reality  and  Appearance  were  not  so  different
bS  had  been  surmised.  For  instance,  after  much  hesitation
ve  had  to  decide  that  the  red  appearances  round  the  sun
it  the  time  of  an'  eclipse,  which  looked  hke  flames,
eally  were  flames  and  not  anything  less  familiar.  Again,
v^hen  in  old  days  the  Danish  astronomer,  Roemer,  sought
o  explain  certain  curious  anomalies  in  the  motion  of
Tupiter's  Satelhtes,  by  the  supposition  that  light  had  a
inite  velocity  and  took  a  measurable  time  to  bring  the
nformation — the  suggestion  was  in  most  quarters  scouted
iS  too  simple  and  ad  Jioc  an  explanation  ;  and  under  the
lame  "  the  equation  of  light,"  it  was  rejected  and  unused
or  the  best  part  of  a  century  ;  until  an  independent
.nd  quite  different  observation  by  the  Enghsh  astronomer
Sradley  required  a  similar  explanation,  and  thereby  estab-
ished  it  beyond  dispute.  The  messenger  had  lagged  on
he  journey — that  was  all.
Let  it  not  be  supposed,  however,  that  the  discovery  of


124  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [par"

the  finite  rate  of  propagation  of  light  is  a  small  dis'
CO  very  ;  it  has  turned  out  to  have  the  most  portentous
consequences  ;  for,  as  we  learn  from  Einstein,  the  velocitj
of  light  is  perhaps  the  only  absolute  and  unchangeablt
thing  in  the  physical  universe.

So  I  expect  it  will  be  with  the  spiritistic  hypothesis
in  some  developed  form.  Childishly  simple  as  it  appears
seemingly  more  appropriate  to  primitive  man  than  tc
Fellows  of  the  Royal  Society,  it  may  turn  out  not  onlj
to  be  true  but  to  involve  consequences  of  tremendous
moment  to  mankind  ;  indeed  it  may  outweigh  all  othei
discoveries  in  its  influence  on  human  will  and  conduct  !

I  have  been  led  on  in  a  more  positive  direction  than
I  had  intended,  and  have  broken  off  my  catalogue  oi
denials,  such  as  I  thought  Professor  Richet's  article
called  for.  Denial  is  no  pleasure  to  me  :  and  I  have
nothing  so  fundamental  to  deny  as  the  resuscitation
and  utihsation  of  corpses — a  procedure  which,  if  it  were
possible,  might  legitimately  be  stigmatised  as  necromancy.
But  there  are  a  few  sentences  in  Professor  Richet's  article
to  which  I  wish  to  oppose  a  negative.  They  are  as
follows  : —

First,  the  imphcation  (by  the  use  of  the  word  "  cannot  ")
that  any  reasonable  holder  of  the  spiritistic  view  would
liU  to  deny  physiological  and  pathological  facts  if  he  were
able.  It  is  not  a  question  of  "  camiot,"  it  is  a  question
of  •■  do  not  "  :  we  accept  them  fully.  If  the  instrument
is  out  of  order  or  interfered  with  or  drugged,  no  sign  of
intelhgence  can  be  made.  Injure  a  person's  brain,  and
his  mind  is  cut  off  from  our  ken.  It  is  isolated,  not
annihilated.  Mind  and  Brain  belong  to  different  cate-
gories. A  brickbat  is  a  curious  weapon  against  a  mind,
but  it  is  effective  against  a  brain.  IMind  belongs  to
psychology,  not  to  physiology.

Second,  that  any  sen.sible  people  hold  that  an  instru-
ment is  not  necessary  for  communication  and  response.
On  the  contrary,  they  hold  that  it  is  necessary,  quite
necessary,  and  that  that  is  the  use  of  a  medium. If  an


iieti


COI


silt
SllJ


It

inf
k


xc]  For  and  Against  Survival.  125

electric  lamp  is  spoiled,  the  usual  plan  is  to  replace  it  by
another.  That  other  may  be  an  inferior  one,  but  the
current  must  pass  or  you  will  get  no  light.  Integrity  of
some  instrument  is  essential  to  rational  communication.

Thirdly,  that  999  communications  out  of  a  thousand
are  ridiculous.  If  we  eliminate  obvious  nonsense  and
lunacy,  the  statement  is  not  true.  If  it  were  true  it
would  indeed  be  a  damning  fact.  Being  a  question  of
fact,  it  is  important  :  and  I  maintain  that  communica-
tions obtained  through  reputable  and  tested  and  genuine
mediums  are  nearly  all  of  them  sensible,  are  often  of
surprising  interest,  and  are  sometimes  of  value.  In  this
matter  I  claim  to  have  had  more  experience  than  my
friend.  The  volumes  of  the  S.P.R.  Journal  and  Pro-
ceedings contain  plenty  of  instances,  and  many  more  are
,|  known  to  me  and  to  my  readers.  Indeed,  in  this
country  and  in  America  the  multitude  of  rational,  and
sometimes  ingeniously  devised  and  extremely  evidential,
communications  is  overwhelming.

But  it  will  be  objected,  the  facts  whole  will  not

be  content  with  that  simple  idea — the  idea  of  the  vicarious
use  of  other  people's  brain-nerve -muscle  mechanism  for
the  transmission  of  messages  from  a  surviving  etherially-
embodied  once-incarnate  personality — even  if  that  idea  can
be  rationahzed.  The  notion  of  human  survival  beyond
bodily  death  is  well  able  to  account  for  simple  personal
communications  to  surviving  relatives,  messages  of  affection
and  advice,  and  things  of  that  sort.  Those  are  what  have
suggested  the  idea.  It  is  obvious  that  that  is  their
superficial  appearance.  The  notion  may  also  serve  most
naturally  to  account  for  the  incidents  of  classical  scholar-
ship, and  hterary  allusion,  beyond  the  scope  of  the
medium's  learning  or  cultivation.  But  Subjective  Meta-
psy chics  contains  many  other  phenomena  besides  these.
It  contains  travelling  clairvoyance,  for  instance,  when
information  is  given  about  what  is  happening  at  a
distance,  or  when  apparently  telepathic  effects  are  produced
across  a  continent  ;  or,  more  puzzhng  still,  when  sealed
documents  and  unopened  books  are  read ;  and.  most
puzzling of all, when future events are predicted.  Do


Bsta


ippl;


126  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.  [par':'

I  seriously  claim  to  have  the  beginnings  of  a  working  [^J*
hypothesis  sufficient  to  account  for  these  things  ?  i

Well,  I  do  !  Let  me  try  to  expound  it  tentatively  ir
a  few  words.  i

The  dissociation  of  personahty  from  the  restrictions  ol
the  material  body  need  not  only  occur  at  death.  Some
people  may  have  rather  loose  connexion  during  life
Their  animated  etherial  vehicle,  or  some  part  of  it,  may
indistinctly  be  conceived  as  able  to  wander  during  sleep,
or  to  leave  the  main  part  of  the  body  during  trance.
Usually  only  the  spirit  is  supposed  to  leave  at  such
times — by  those  who  hold  that  there  is  such  a  thing  as
spirit — and  possibly  that  may  ])e  sufficient  for  the  purposes
of  travelhng  clairvoyance  and  for  cryptaesthesic  sensibihty  ;i
but  if  it  turns  out  that  a  spirit  must  have  a  habitation
of  some  kind,  I  shall  not  be  deterred  from  pressing  an
etherial  body  into  the  service.  The  facts  may  not
necessitate  it,  or  they  may. We  shall  see.

But  how  are  we  to  account  for  the  reading  of  sealed
envelopes,  the  penetration  of  opaque  obstacles  ?  Well,
opacity  is  a  thing  that  can  be  treated  physically.  Iti^pe
means  that  waves  of  hght  cannot  get  through  :  they  are
either  reflected  back,  or  they  are  absorbed  and  turned
into  heat,  by  an  opaque  body.  A  conducting  metal
represents  one  type,  a  "black  body"  the  other  type  of  toy
opacity  ;  and  there  are  all  grades  of  obstruction  to  ether
waves.  But  opacity  does  not  mean  that  nothing  can
get  through.  I  am  not  prepared  with  a  physical  explana-
tion of  how  these  clairvoyant  things  can  be  done.  The
phenomenon  is  to  me  the  most  puzzling  of  all.  I  doubt
if  it  can  be  solved  in  terms  of  "  matter."  No  adeciuate  port
attempt  has  yet  been  made  to  solve  it  in  terms  of
•'  Ether."  X-rays  give  us  a  hint  :  but  I  am  not  sure
that  it  is  done  in  a  physical  way  at  all.  There  is  some
evidence— not  much— that  the  contents  of  the  book  have
to  be,  or  have  had  to  be,  in  some  person's  mind  :  and
whether  that  which  has  once  caused  a  mental  impression
can  for  that  reason  be  more  easily  read,  or  whether  the
information  is  somehow  mentally  conveyed  by  other  than  luid
a  physical  process,  I  do  not  know. I  am  not  afraid  of  a


itigr
in  t
if  I
itki
liiin


lo


at

DlUt

ject
at  I
tliei


isiitc]  For  and  Against  Survival.  127

ini  Dhysical  explanation,  but  prefer  to  wait  for  more  know-
edge  of  the  facts.

Those  who  have  read  Dr.  Eugene  Osty's  book  called
Supernormal  Faculties  in  Man,^  now  translated  by  Mr.
Stanley  de  Brath,  will  be  astonished  at  the  remarkable
nstances,  that  have  come  mainly  within  his  own  experi-
ence, of  trustworthy  clairvoyant  and  diagnostic  faculty  ;
50  that  this  eminent  physician  and  neurologist  is  able  to
ipply  what  he  caUs  metagnomy,  and  Richet  calls  cryptaes-
}hesia,  to  the  understanding  and  rehef  of  severe  bodily
icl|iilments.  He  gives  examples  not  only  of  diagnosis, —
)ften  by  means  of  what  is  frequently  called  psychometry,
:rom  a  piece  of  cloth  or  other  object  belonging  to  the
Datient, — he  also  gives  examples  of  prognosis,  sometimes
T^erified  ;  and  a  few  instances  of  what  might  here  be
stigmatised  as  "  fortune-telHng."  The  collection  of  cases
n  that  book  seem  to  me  well,  worthy  of  the  attention
)f  Biologists  ;  and  inasmuch  as  he,  like  Professor  Richet,
ittributes  them  to  a  paranormal  extension  of  purely
luman  faculty,  without  any  of  what  might  be  called
jupernormal  assistance,  there  may  be  less  than  usual  in
lis  book  to  repel  them  by  unacceptable  and  quasi- childish
lypotheses.  At  any  rate  Dr.  Osty  narrates  the  facts
[rankly,  and  quotes  testimony  from  some  of  the  clah'-
/oyants  themselves  as  to  the  way  the  impressions  seem
;o  come  to  them.  The  result  seems  to  be  a  body  of
jvidence  which  cannot  reasonably  be  overlooked  by  men
)f  science.  Moreover  this  alone  shows,  if  it  were  necessary,
jhat  Professor  Richet  is  not  alone  in  his  cautious  attitude
o  theory,  and  rejection  of  spiritistic  views,  but  is  sup-
ported by  confreres  of  similarly  great  experience.

Prevision  does  not  give  me  the  profound  difficulty  that
it  present  it  gives  Professor  Richet.  If  we  have  to
nodify  our  notion  of  Time,  and  regard  it  as  more  sub-
iective  than  hitherto — well,  we  can  face  even  that  ;  but
it  present  I  do  not  see  the  necessity.  If  any  one  survives
;here  must  be  many,  and  some  have  survived  for  a  long
tsiiime.  If  there  is  progress,  as  they  tell  us  there  is — as
doubtedly  there must  be  if  survival  is  a  reahty  in  a

'  La  Connaissance  sv/pra-noiniale  Elude  experimental e  (Paris,  1923).


128


Sir  Oliver  Lodge.


[PARliC]


rational  universe, — some will have acquired  more  knowilome
ledge  and  power  than  we  at  present  possess. And,  foiit
evidential  purposes,  it  is  not  impossible  that  these  moreirei
learned  individuals  may  deign  to  lend  assistance.  .jde

Scientific  inference,  even  to  us,  is  possible,  and  physical )f  t
prediction  can  be  based  upon  that.  There  are  manyuaat
kinds  of  prediction  known  to  vis  here  and  now.  A>verj
transit  or  an  echpse  is  one  very  simple  type.  A  railway  nfor
time-table  is  another.  I  can  predict  that  I  shall  go  byjo
the  11.15  to  Paris  this  day  fortnight.  Competent  people^
can  predict  that  Aldebaran  will  be  occulted  by  the  moonoccai
at  4.7  a.m.  on  the  23rd  of  August,  1924  ;  or  that  Marsjato
will  graze  or  rather  dip  under  the  left-hand  top  of  the
moon,  and  remain  invisible  from  8.3  to  8.23  p.m.  on  the
evening  of  the  5th  of  November  in  this  same  year.  One
class  of  prediction  is  based  on  planning,  which  we  may
or  may  not  carry  out,  and  is  contingent  upon  "  strikes."
The  other  is  based  upon  calculation  from  present  know-
ledge, and  is  contingent  on  their  being  no  cometary  or
other  disturbance  to  affect  the  equanimity  of  the  moon.
Predictions  are  always  contmgent,  never  iixfallible.  Yet
one  may  feel  reasonably  certain  that  frost  will  occur  next
winter,  and  I  hope  equally  certani  that  France  and
England  will  continue  good  friends.

To  take  a  small  instance.  Why  am  I  sure  that  our
differences  of  opinion  about  details  of  the  Universe  will
not  upset  the  amicable  relations  between  Richet  and
myself  ?  The  answer  is.  Because  we  both  have  characters
of  fair  stability  on  which  reliance  can  be  placed.

Very  well  then,  a  higher  being — I  do  not  mean  Deity,
for  that  may  go  without  saying,  but  people  who  have
advanced  in  knowledge,  grown  in  intelligence, — may  be
able  to  infer  and  plan  and  predict  events,  of  to  us
surjDrising  improbability,  far  ahead.  They  see  further  than
we  do.  They  have  greater  power  of  ratiocination,  they
are  better  judges  of  character,  and  can  tell  with  fair
assurance  how  even  people  will  behave,  as  well  as,  more
easily,  what  mechanical  things  will  do.

But  are  we  in  touch  with  these  exalted  intelligences  ?
Is  it  hkely  that  they  take  the  trouble  to  come  and  talk


he


Sc


pk
dis(


m


;c.]  For  and  Against  Survival.  129


lomesticities  through  a  medium  here  ?  No,  by  no  means  ;
t  least  we  need  not  look  for  such  condescension.  We
ire  not  in  touch  with  them,  but  our  friends  on  the  other
ide  are.  They,  let  us  suppose,  want  to  give  evidence
)f  the  reahty  of  things  which  are  strange  to  us.  They
"ijlvant  to  wake  us  up  out  of  our  materialistic  torpor  :  so
very  now  and  then  our  friends  are  allowed  to  glean
nformation  from  some  higher  being,  and  to  convey  it
o  us.  If  Newton  or  Shakespeare  were  ahve  on  the
iarth  to-day,  even  I  might  be  allowed  to  speak  to  him
)ccasionally  :  and  if  I  was  talking  to  ignorant  people
'ifterwards,  though  I  could  not  convey  one  tithe  of  what
le  might  have  told  me,  I  might  be  able  to  impress  a
ioke\  by  predicting  an  eclipse  or  a  comet,  or  by  fore-
:elUng  some  chain  of  events  that  would  excite  interest
ind  astonishment.

So  we  need  not  be  unduly  perturbed  at  finding  that
:hose  on  the  other  side  possess  powers  which  we  do
lot  understand.  We  ourselves  possess  powers  which  our
ancestors  would  have  thought  miraculous ;  and  our  des-
cendants will  smile  at  the  satisfaction  with  which  we  view
Dur  petty  achievements  in,  say,  locomotion  and  inter-
communication. Prometheus  was  regarded  almost  as  a
god  for  discovering  fire.  Yet  any  urchin  with  a  box  of
matches  could  set — if  not  the  Thames — at  least  a  Thames
warehouse  on  fire.  It  took  a  Faraday  to  discover
magneto-electricity  ;  but  every  electrical  shop  sells  tele-
phones and  dynamos.  It  needed  Maxwell  and  Hertz  to
discover  electrical  waves  ;  but  now,  one  can  hear  Paris
concerts  by  a  thing  rigged  up  in  an  Enghsh  or  Scottish
barn.  To  modify  the  well-known  tag  into  something
more  certainly  true  :  There  is  nothing  eitlier  new  or
strange  but  thinking  makes  it  so."


1


PROCEEDINGS

OF  THE

Society  for  Psychical  Research

PART  XCI.
JULY,  1924

PRESIDENTIAL  ADDRESS.

By  J.  G.  PiDDINGTON.

{Delii-ered  at  a  General  Meeting  of  the  Society  on  May  8,  1924.)

i'ORTY-Two  years  have  now  gone  by  since  the  foundation
)f  our  Society,  and  during  that  time  nothing  of  a  sensa-
ional,  or  even,  I  think,  of  an  outstanding  character  has
)ccurred  to  interrupt  the  even  tenor  of  its  way.  Progress,
ndeed,  has  been  made,  but  it  has  been  a  quiet  and  a
;radual  progress.  There  has  been  no  unexpected  develop-
nent  such  as  from  time  to  time  cheers  investigators  in
ither  fields  :  no  startUng  discovery  to  attract  wide  atten-
ion  and  win  instant  recognition.

In  ordinary  circumstances  I  should  not  complain  of
hat ;  nor  should  I  now,  were  it  not  that  my  office  obliges
ae  to  choose  some  subject  on  which  to  address  you.
t  must  often  happen  that  Presidents  of  other  Societies
ievoted  to  studies  that  yield  quicker  and  more  positive
esults  are  spared  the  trouble  of  casting  about  for  a
ubject  for  their  Addresses,  and  have  one  almost  thrust
pon  them  by  some  new  discovery,  or  tangible  advance
ecently  made  in  their  own  particular  science.  As  I  am
ot  in  that  happy  position,  such  observations  as  I  have  to
lake  will,  I  fear,  be  of  a  rather  dull  and  desultory  kind.


132


J .  G,  Piddington


[PAR''  :cl]


I  shall  not,  like  my  eloquent  predecessor,  move  amon,
the  splendours  and  immensities  of  the  heavens  ;  nor  sha][»ti<
I  seek  to scale  the mountain-heights  of  thought,  but-
of  necessity,  if  not  by  choice — I  shall  keep  to  the  low!
and  homelier  valleys  that  lie  about  the  base  of  Psychicalwa
Research.

In  speaking  of  the  progress  made  during  the  pas^
42  years  as  slow  and  hesitating  I  have  no  intention  c
belittling  it,  or  of  suggesting  that  it  is  not  real.  ]
what  educated  people  thought  30  or  40  years  ago  abou
the  phenomena,  we  investigate  be  compared  with  wha
the  same  class  thinks  now,  no  one,  I  venture  to  saj
will  fail  to  note  a  marked  change.  Almost  universe
indifference  has  given  place  to  a  widely-diffused,  if  mile
interest  ;  the  sniffings  and  snortings  of  the  robust  scepti
who  would  dismiss  the  whole  subject  a  iwiori  as  rubbis
or  superstition  are  at  least  less  frequent  and  usuaU;
more  restrained  ;  and  more  than  one  orthodox  psychologis
not  merely  treats  us  with  respect  but  has  given  us  hi
blessing.  It  is  not  simply  a  case  of  hostility  and  ridicul
giving  place  to  toleration — to  a  toleration  born  parti
of  easy-going  good-nature  and  partly  of  boredom  ;  it
something  more  than  that.  The  work  done  by  tb
Society  has  unquestionably  brought  about  a  change  i  ipi
the  beliefs  of  great  numbers  of  educated  people.  B;  le
"  educated  people  "  I  mean,  not  svich  as  can  mere!
read  and  write,  but  those  people,  drawn  from  ever
class  of  the  community,  in  whom  the  critical  facult
is  sufficiently  developed  to  allow  them  to  weigh  voluminou
if  not  highly  comphcated,  evidence.  Among  such  peop^
40  years  ago  there  can  have  been  but  very  few  wbi|tiKl
beUeved  in  telepathy  ;  whereas  to-day  they  must  numbflflei
tens  of  thousands.  I  do  not  mean  that  the  majorit|cii
of  these  persons  would  be  well  enough  up  in  the  evidend
for  telepathy  to  give  detailed  reasons  for  their  beli
in  it  ;  and  I  daresay  a  large  proportion  of  them  assun
it  to  be  a  physical  process,  and  are  unaware  that  suc;
evidence  as  there  is  points  in  the  opposite  directioitl  t
Nevertheless,  the  fact  remains  that  a  large  number  m
educated people nowadays accept telepathy as a  factifjij


iay(
id
S(


mil

■epti


cel.]  Presidential  Address  133

jmd  it  is  the  evidence  collected  and  published  by  our
Society  that  has  brought  this  about.

If  belief  in  clairvoyance  has  not  grown  to  any  thing
ike  the  same  extent,  that  is  largely — perhaps  entirely —
iia  jecause the evidence for it is most markedly  inferior
n quantity, whatever may be thought of its  quality,
)0 the evidence for telepathy  : and there can be  no
question  that  quantity  tells,  and  rightly  so,  I  think.
What educated opinion about the so-called "  physical
i«)|)henomena " may  be  I  have  little  or  no  idea  ; but  I
luspect  it  to  be  much  the  same  as  about  clairvoyance,
n  spite  of  there  being  a  considerable  mass  of  evidence
effl|-elating  to  them. At  the  same  time  I  am  being  constantly
itruck, and rather bewildered, by the fact that  the
'  physical phenomena " command more interest  among
nembers of the general public than do the  psychical
)henomena. So  little  conversant  am  I,  however,  with  the
)hysical  phenomena  that  the  less  I  say  about  them  the
s  I  »etter ; and henceforward I shall  confine myself  almost
ntirely  to  the  psychical  phenomena.

The  estimates  I  have  been  attempting  of  the  different
'ffects  produced  on  the  educated  world  by  our  different
iiinds  of  evidence  are  necessarily  based  on  my  personal
mpressions  only,  and  may  be  mistaken  ;  but  if  they
tie  correct,  then  there  is,  I  think,  a  close  correspondence
n  tetween  the  effects  produced  on  outsiders  and  the  effects
ift  on  the  minds  of  those  members  of  the  Society  who
lave  taken  an  active  part  in  the  collection,  consideration,
,nd  presentment  of  the  evidence.

So  far  I  have  not  mentioned  one  type  of  the  phenomena
tudied  by  the  Society  :  namely,  the  so-called  Spirituahstic
ihenomena.  That  most  of  us  who  have  studied  these  par-
icular  phenomena  at  first  hand  believe  that  in  many  cases
hey  are  in  some  degree,  though  by  no  means  wholly,
ue  to  the  agency  of  the  dead,  is  clear  enough  from  the
apers  we  have  contributed  to  the  Proceedings ;  but
whether  this  opinion  is  shared  by  any  considerable  section
f  the  educated  public  I  have  no  means  of  ascertaining.
>ut  of  this  much  at  least  I  feel  confident,  that  the
vidence on which we rely has had enough effect  to


i
)arl


evf
icii
m
neo


ami


134


J.  G.  Piddington


CI.]


4


«  (


ilw


lys:


allow the question of communication from and  witl
the  dead to  be debated  in a  serious  spirit and  as
serious  possibility.

If  this  be  true,  and  if  it  be  true  besides  that  telepath^^
is  to-day  accepted  as  a  fact  by  large  numbers  of  educates
people,  then  I  for  one  cannot  regard  this  as  a  meai
and  unsatisfactory  outcome  of  42  years'  work.

It  may  be  objected  that,  though  the  Society  ma^
perhaps  deserve  the  sole  credit  for  convincing  man;;!
critical  minds  of  telepathy,  it  is  not  entitled  to  the  whol(
credit  for  bringing  about  a  more  favourable  attitud
towards  the  question  of  communication  with  the  dead
and  it  may  be  claimed  that  part  of  the  credit  shoulc
be  given  to  the  Spiritualists.  This  claim  I  would  no'
admit,  though  ready  to  allow  that  they  can  coun
many  converts  among  the  uncritical ;  and  I  would  g(  i
further  and  urge  that  it  is  the  Spiritualists'  uncritica
and  over-enthusiastic  way  of  dealing  with  their  evidencelw
their  failure  to  distinguish — or  if  they  do,  to  mark  th(  sjcl
distinction — between  good  evidence  and  weak  or  worthlesi
evidence,  and  their  reluctance  to  suspect  fraud  wher*  Bf
to  the  plain  man  it  is  patent  or  highly  probable,  thai!f
have  been  in  the  past  and  are  to-day  responsible  fo]
much  of  the  prejudice  against  the  spiritualistic  hypothesiil' s
prevalent  among  people  capable  of  realising  whether  oi  lost
not  a  case  is  being  presented  with  caution,  candour
and  care.

The  effect  produced  on  educated  minds  by  the  worl
of  the  Society  has  not  been  confined  to  a  wide-spreacjtai
belief  in  telepathy  or  to  a  greater  inclination  to  consideilo  c
in  a  serious  spirit  the  problem  presented  by  the  spirit  Bi
ualistic  phenomena,  but  has  been  felt,  as  indeed  is  onljunsi
natural,  in  philosophy  and  religion.  Few  books  on  eitheilif
subject  appear  nowadays  which  fail  to  take  at  leasi!
some  account  of  psychical  research  ;  and  this  is  perhaps
all  the  more  gratifying  if  we  consider  how  natural  i1  ave
would  have  been  had  the  victorious  advance  of  physica.  titt
science  during  recent  years  so  absorbed  the  attention  otii
of  the  intellectual  world  that  there  was  none  left  tc
spare  for  our unspectacular reconnoitrings in a  strange


ttfl


m  :ci.]


Presidential  Address


135


Olli


itia


ffii-nd  obscure  region.  Physical  science,  indeed,  is  marching
rora  strength  to  strengtli  ;  she  betrays  no  symptom  of
ecline, but rather every evidence of increasing  power

0  grapple  with  the  problems  of  the  material  world  ;
,nd  if  her  triumphant  progress  during  the  past  40  years

aei|»e  contrasted  with  our  relatively  exiguous  record  of
uccess,  some  may  feel  a  sense  of  discouragement.  Yet
do  not  think  discouragement  would  be  justified,  and
laijhat  for  two  reasons.  In  the  first  place,  ours  is  a  young
cience — if  the  name  of  "  science "  may  be  given  to  an
y  inquiry  conducted  with  an  unflinching  regard  for  accuracy
and  if  in  its  youth  it  progresses  but  slowly,  it  is  only
ml  allowing  the  example  of  physical  science.  In  the  second
lace,  we  are  faced  at  every  point — and,  I  imagine,
Iways will be — with difliculties which only rarely,  or

1  a  very  mild  form,  beset  workers  in  the  realm  of
hysical  science.  All,  or  nearly  aU,  the  phenomena  we
ivestigate — and  here  I  have  in  mind  chiefly  the  purely
sychical  phenomena,  though  much  of  what  I  am  about
D  say  would  hold  good  of  the  alleged  "  physical  pheno-

rlia  lena  "  too — nearly  all  these  phenomena  are  in  themselves
f  a  perfectly  ordinary  and  commonplace  nature.  Some-
ody  dreams  something,  or  somebody  says  something,
r  somebody  writes  something.  We  all  do  those  things,
lost  of  us  every  day,  unless  we  happen  to  be  dumb  or
literate.  I  may  be  told,  perhaps,  that  many  of  the  spoken
r  written  things  we  investigate  are  spoken  or  written  by
person  in  trance,  and  that  trance  is  not  ordinary  or
jrfJjommonplace.  That  is  true ;  but  our  primary  object  is
isiji  3  discover  evidence  of  supernormal  action — by  which  I
piii  lean  something  that  goes  beyond  the  limits  of  mere  sub-
anscious  action,  however  strange —  ;  and  in  our  search  for
itlj  ddence  of  supernormal  action,  as  thus  defined,  the  condi-
on  of  the  speaker  or  writer  is  of  no  importance.  If  every-
ling  that  Mrs.  Piper,  or  Mrs.  Thompson,  or  Mi's.  Leonard
ave  said  or  written  when  entranced,  had  been  said  or
ixitten  while  they  were  wide  awake  and  in  a  perfectly
prmal  condition,  its  value  as  evidence  of  supernormal
3tivity  would  not  be  afliected  one  way  or  the  other,
ere  ls  nothing,  then in  the  phenomena  which  in  itseK


ill


lbs

C£

ll  C'

U
m


136  J.  G.  Piddington  [pari

compels  conviction  of  its  supernormal  character  ;  and  it
is  just  this  ordinariness  of  the  phenomena  that  gives
fraud,  whether  conscious  or  subliminal,  its  chance.  In
physical  science  fraud  of  either  kind  is  practically  a
negligible  possibility,  and  even  if  fraud  were  practised
it  could  be  readily  detected.  In  our  case,  it  would,  I
think,  be  true  to  say  that  we  can  never  put  our  fingei
on  a  single  phenomenon  and  unhesitatingly  and  con-
fidently pronounce  it  to  be  supernormal  ;  we  can  never
say  "  this  is  a  certain  instance  of  telepathy,"  or  "of
clairvoyance "  ;  we  can  never  say  "  fraud,  or  chance,:
or  misdescription  will  not  suffice  to  explain  this  particular
occurrence."  Even  if  the  laws  governing  telepathic  oi
clairvoyant  action  were  to  be  discovered,  we  should
not,  so  far  as  I  can  see,  be  any  better  able  to  attain
to  certainty  in  any  given  instance,  so  long  as  super-'
normal  phenomena  remain  so  easily  simulable  as  they  itof
are  at  present.  At  best  we  can  attain  only  to  a  reason-
able degree  of  certainty  :  not  to  that  degree  of  cer-
tainty  which  is  so  often  within  the  reach  of  physicallrt
science.

There  appeared  in  the  Journal  for  December  last  aniKj
account  of  a  case  of  smgular  interest,  especially  from  ffti
the  point  of  view  of  theory.  In  bare  outhne  the  reported
facts  were  these  :  A  Dutch  boy  of  15  has  been  watchingi
from  his  window  some  people  entering  a  house  opposite, iffld
for  the  purpose  of  having  a  seance,  and  has  been  feeling  ;liop(
vexed  at  not  being  able  to  take  part  in  the  seance  |ip
himself.  He  then  gets  hold  of  an  old  school-book  con-|  Tl
taining  an  Enghsh  poem,  and  sits  down  and  reads  theijtbs
poem  in  a  dreamy  state,  without,  however,  apparently 'iptei
any  other  design  than  that  of  whihng  the  time  away.iom
Whilst  the  boy  is  dozing  over  the  poem,  two  out  of  j-tl
the  five  stanzas  of  which  it  consists — the  only  ones  thejjkt
boy  knew  by  heart — are  reproduced  at  the  seance,  thejttiai
i-eproduction  being  preceded  by  the  manifestation  of  a
control "  who  gives  no  name,  announces  in  Enghsh
that  he  is  going  to  write  a  song,  answers  in  English
questions  put  in  Dutch,  and  states  that  he  is  an  English-
man. ■  Siiaeci


m  CI.]


Presidential  Address


137


1  i If  all  the  facts  reported  are true,  they  are  obviously
:iv6  uportant from the theoretic point of view.  But
1  /hat kind  of certainty  can one  feel as  to  the  alleged
i'  i  upernormal elements in this case  1 What odds  would
sel  ou lay on their being genuine  ? Would you  lay
[  1  000 to 1 in £'s sterling that there wasn't  trickery,
19?  r collusion, or misdescription, or some other  normal
a  iause at work  ? I can't answer for others, but  my
;vij  ,nswer would be an emphatic "  No  "  : though^  I
"i  aight  be  prepared  to  lay  3  to 1  against  a  normal  ex-
DfE  Sanation  being the  true  one. But  how flimsy a  kind
nlai  I'f  certainty this represents as compared with the  kind
9  if  certainty that  physical  science  may afford.  Imagine
hat  the Astronomer Royal v/ere invited, or dared,  to
tai  vager  £5000 to £1 that  the  next  eclipse  of  the  moon
pel  Fould occur at the time predicted by Greenwich,  or
liei  whoever it is that works out these things. Well,  he
m  aight suffer from a Nonconformist conscience, or  he
cci  night  hold  that  there's  no  fun  in  betting  on  a  certainty  ;
is  )ut  at  any  rate  it  would  not  be  fear  of  losing  his  money
hat  would  deter  him  from  laying  the  odds. These  two
J  maginary wagers will serve to illustrate the kind  of
01  tertainty  that  physical  science  frequently — though  by  no
I  neans  invariably — attains,  and  the  uncertainty  that  dogs
Jl  our  efforts  ; and  so  long  as  that  uncertainty  exists — •
md  it  may  well  be  that  it  will  always  exist — we  cannot
lope  to  approach,  let  alone  to  rival,  the  rate  of  progress
)f  physical  science.

This perpetual want of cut-and-dried-ness, this  un-
lubstantialit}/ and instability that characterise all  our
phenomena,  may  well  be  one  of  the  causes  that  render
)ur  investigations  distasteful  to  so  many  men  of  science
—though fortunately not to all. And not only  that,
Dut the comparative immunity from such  uncertainty
ihat men of science enjoy may disqualify them  from
Deing, as  they  might  on  first  thoughts  be  supposed  to
iijioe, the best judges of our work. Frederic Myers,  it
Ms  true,  often  expressed  himself  as  tliough  the  filial  court
»Df  appeal  before  which  our  case  would  be  heard  would
■aecessarily be composed of men of science ; and  our


138  J.  0.  Piddington  [PAM

first  President  in  his  first  Presidential  Address  spoke  as
follows  :

"  If  anyone  asks  me  what  I  mean  by,  or  how  I  define,
sufficient  scientific  proof  of  thought-reading,  clairvoyance,
or  the  phenomena  called  spiritualistic,  I  should  ask  to  be
allowed  to  evade  the  difficulties  of  determining  in  the
abstract  what  constitutes  adequate  evidence.  What  I
mean  by  sufficient  evidence  is  evidence  that  will  convince
the  scientific  world."

I might have hesitated to express dissent from  the
opinions  of  two  such  authorities, had  I  not  chanced  to
re-read Professor Henri Bergson's Presidential  Address
to this Society, and  gathered  from it, though  he  does
not  say  so  in  so  many  words,  that  he  takes  the  view
which  I  am  here  putting  forward. Training  in  physical
science and the pursuit of it, as it seems to me,  do
not  necessarily  make  a  man  a  better  critic  of  the  evidence
collected  by  this Society  than do  some  other  forms  of
education and employment. A man of science  might
be as good a critic as others, or even a better one  ;
but  in  that  event  he  would  be  so,  not  qmi  man  of  science,
but  because  he  happened  to  possess  qualifications  which
his  own  avocation  is  not  specially  calculated  to  develop.
Men  of  science  are  not,  so  far  as  I  know,  specially  expert
in assessing the value of human testimony  ; nor  are
they specially expert— perhaps rather the  contrary— in
literary matters, and it so happens that quite a  con-
siderable portion  of  our  evidence  can  hardly  be  appreciated
at its true value without some scholarly and  literary
msight. And though men of science deal with  men's
bodies, alive or dead, they have little experience  in
dealing with the manifestations, and particularly  with
the abnormal manifestations, of men's minds.  "  Unlike
ourselves,  moreover,  it  is  but  very  rarely  indeed  that  men
of science have to beware of fraud, conscious or  sub-
liminal ; and  if they have to make allowance for  the
personal equation of experimenters or observers,  that
allowance,  owing  to  various  causes,  presents  little  difficulty;
whereas against that possible and frequent source  of


XCI.]  Presidential  Address  139

error  we  with  difficulty  have  to  guard  ourselves  in  every
department  of  our  enquiries  ;  and  in  addition  we  have
always  to  be  making  allowance  for  the  personal  equation
of  the  dreamer,  of  the  percipient,  of  the  automatist,
and  of  the  corroborating  witnesses.

I  do  not,  then,  believe  that  official  science  is  our
proper  court  of  appeal  ;  and  I  do  not  know  of  any
formal  body  which  could  assume  that  function  with
authority.  Neither  medicine,  nor  law,  nor  history,  nor
literature,  though  each  might  contribute  some  of  the
necessary  qualifications,  could  fill  the  bill  ;  and  not  even
a  committee  of  intelligent  schoolboys,  though  it  might
possess  some  useful  qualifications  in  which  physicians,
lawyers,  historians,  men  of  letters,  and  even  men  of
science  might  be  deficient.  It  is,  I  beheve,  only  among
what  for  want  of  an  exacter  definition  I  have  called
"  educated  people  "  that  a  competent  tribunal  will  be
ultimately  found.  It  is  they  who  will  pass  final  judge-
ment ;  and  it  is  therefore  their  interest  that  we  should
specially  try  to  win  ;  and  we  should  not  be  downhearted
if  men  of  science  as  a  body  look  askance  at  our  work  ;
and  if  so  far  only  five  Fellows  and  two  Presidents  of
the  Royal  Society  have  presided  over  our  Society.

I  pass  on  now  to  make  some  observations  on  the
organisation  through  which  our  researches  have  been
carried  on.  A  large  part — I  think  I  may  say,  a  very
lai'ge  part — of  the  Society's  research  has  been  done  by
a  small  number  of  its  members,  of  whom  most  are  friends
or  acquaintances  of  each  other.  This  small  number  of
individuals  might  have  co-operated  as  a  private  group
without  a  Society  behind  them,  but  to  have  done  so
would  have  involved  at  least  two  drawbacks.  They
would  have  found  it  much  harder  to  form  a  considerable
circle  of  readers,  and  to  maintain  it  if  formed  ;  and  they
would  consequently  have  made  less  headway  in  attracting
the  attention  of  that  very  class  of  educated  people  which,
if  my  view  is  sound,  will  some  day  pass  judgement  on  the
investigation.  Secondly,  without  a  Society  behind  them,
it  is  unlikely  that  any  small  group  of  workers  would
have  been  able  by  their  own  unaided  activities  to  come


140


J .  G.  Piddington


[part


often  enough  into  contact  with  what  I  venture  to  call
the  raw  material,  or  corpora  vilia,  necessary  for  the
prosecution  of  their  researches.  The  existence  of  a
Society  made  it  possible  to  carry  out  the  Census  of
Hallucinations — a  work  of  great  importance — on  a  scale
large  enough  to  provide  a  dependable  basis  for  calcula-
tion ;  and  it  is  among  the  members  of  our  Society
that  some  of  the  best  automatists  and  telepathic  per-
cipients have  been  found  :  Mrs.  Verrall,  Mrs.  Salter,
Mrs.  Stuart  Wilson,  Mrs.  Home,  Mrs.  "  Forbes,"  Mrs.
Lyttelton,  Miss  Ramsden  and  others  ;  and  if  I  do  not
add  the  name  of  Professor  Gilbert  Murray,  it  is  for
fear  of  his  protesting  that  lie  is  but  a  mere  hyper-
aesthetic,  innocent  of  all  telepathic  faculty.

In  thus  being  largely  self-supporting,  and  dependent
for  its  raw  material  only  to  a  limited  extent  on  imports
from  abroad,  our  Society,  perhaps,  differs  from  all  other
scientific  bodies  ;  for  even  if  some  of  the  medical  and
psychological  societies  draw  on  their  members  for  subjects
of  experiment  and  observation,  I  am  sure  they  do  not
do  so  to  anythmg  like  the  same  extent.  To  those  of
our  members  who  have  lent  themselves  so  unselfishly
and  docilely  to  experimentation  and  observation — some-
times prolonged  and  very  tedious — our  sincerest  thanks
are  due  ;  and  are  due,  if  for  no  other  reason  at  least
for  this,  that  it  is  their  collaboration  which  has  saved
us  from  the  awkward  necessity  of  relying  for  a  large
and  important  part  of  our  evidence  on  professional
subjects.

Yet  while  the  institution  of  a  Society  has  brought
these  and  other  advantages  with  it,  I  would  not  deny
that  it  has  entailed,  or  may  entail,  some  drawbacks
and  disappointments.  Let  me  begin  with  the  disappoint-
ments :  two  in  number.  The  first  is  the  relatively  small
number  of  members  who  have  been  willing,  not  now
and  again  and  for  a  short  period,  but  systematically
and  regularly,  to  work  at  our  subject.  When  we  con-
sider the  number  of  highly-educated  people  with  private
means  in  this  country,  and  how  many  of  them  under-
take  work of a public character without  remuneration,


XCI.]


Presidential  Address


141


and  how  many  of  such  people  there  must  be  in  the
ranks  of  our  members,  we  may  naturally  feel  disappointed
that  so  few  have  devoted  themselves  to  Psychical  Research.
The  second  disappointment  is  the  faUing-off  of  recent  years
in  the  number  of  cases  contributed  by  our  members.
Members  would  no  doubt  excuse  their  inactivity  on  various
grounds  ;  but,  short  of  there  being  no  cases  to  report,
no  excuse  is  valid  in  face  of  the  need,  the  ever-present
need,  of  fresh  evidence.  On  this  head  I  have  to  enlarge
at  some  length.

One  reason  why  it  is  highly  desirable  to  keep  up  a
constantly  fresh  supply  of  evidence  is  the  need  for  mere
accumulation,  quantity  of  evidence  being  of  prime  impor-
tance where  crucial  tests  and  cases  are  not  be  had.
A  second  reason  is  that  our  sort  of  evidence  has  a
tendency  to  lose  its  value  and  effect  as  it  grows  old.
A  case,  even  if  contemporaneously  and  carefully  recorded,
that  dates  back  20,  30,  or  40  years,  is  apt  to  produce
less  effect  on  our  mmds  than  a  well-recorded  case  of
recent  date.  Why  this  should  be  so  I  am  by  no  means
clear  ;  and  no  doubt  the  tendency  to  feel  a  lessened
confidence  in  old  evidence  is  not  entirely  rational.  Yet
it  is  not  entirely  irrational,  for  in  the  case  of  old  evidence
we  must  always  have  the  feeling  that  the  chances  are
against  our  being  able  to  clear  up  doubtful  points  by
cross-examining  the  witnesses,  either  because  they  are
no  longer  alive,  or,  because  if  tlxey  do  survive,  their
recollections  after  so  long  a  lapse  of  time  would  not  be
worth  much.  I  have  purposely  not  spoken  of  cases
that  go  back  more  than  forty  years  because  that  would
have  included  evidence  collected  in  the  Dark  Ages  before
the  foundation  of  this  Society,  and  much  of  that  evidence
would  be  open  to  the  suspicion  of  having  been  recorded
and  collected  by  people  who  were  not  fully  alive  to
all  the  sources  of  error.  I  am  speaking  of  our  own
evidence  only,  which  m  spite  of  its  high  quahty  tends
to  decrease  in  value  as  time  goes  on.  I  would  ask
you  to  consider  what  effect  our  evidence  would  be  likely
to  have  upon  mankind  200  years  hence,  if  for  some
reason  or  other  aU  work  on  and  interest  in  the  subject


142


J.  G.  Piddington


[part


suddenly  came  to  a  full  .stop  to-morrow,  and  all  existing
records  of  psychical  phenomena  were  utterly  lost  sight
of  until  by  a  happy  accident  in  the  year  2124  a  com-
plete set  of  S.P.R.  Proceedings  was  discovered  and
attracted  the  attention  of  a  group  of  thinkers  like  the
group  that  founded  our  Society.  These  men  would,  I
fancy,  not  fail  to  recognise  that  they  had  Lighted  on  a
body  of  first-class  evidence  collected  with  every  proper
care  and  analysed  with  critical  acumen,  which  prejudice
alone  could  ignore.  But  would  they  accept  the  evidence
as  it  stood  ?  I  very  much  doubt  it.  I  think  they
would  say  :  "  This  evidence  is  too  old  ;  it's  200  years
old  ;  and  before  we  accept  it,  we  must  see  whether
our  own  investigations  and  experiences  will  corroborate
it."  In  the  same  way  our  past  evidence  will  with  every
decade  or  so  lose  some  of  its  cogency  with  the  new
generation  unless  it  is  being  constantly  reinforced  by
new  evidence.  Yet,  notwithstanding  that  I  take  this
view  of  our  sort  of  evidence,  I  should  presume  that
evidence  given,  say,  in  a  trial  for  murder  200  years
ago  would  be  worth  as  much  now  as  then,  if  fully  and
carefully  recorded.  How,  then,  should  I  explain  the
enduring  worth  of  the  evidence  in  the  one  case  and
its  diminishing  worth  in  the  other  1  I  should  hesitate
to  assert,  but  I  would  venture  to  suggest  that  the  differ-
ence would  be  due  to  the  fact  that  in  the  one  case  we
are  absolutely  certain  that  murder  is  committed,  even
if  we  have  never  seen  a  murder  committed  or  com-
mitted one  ourselves  ;  while  none  of  us  is  quite  so
absolutely  certain,  and  most  people  are  far  less  certain,
that  anything  "  supernormal  "  ever  occurs.  Will  it,  then,
be  always  necessary  to  go  on  collecting  fresh  evidence  ?
And  if  we  don't,  will  the  effect  of  all  the  evidence  so
far  collected  gradually  disappear  in  course  of  time  ?
Once  more  I  would  not  like  to  attempt  a  dogmatic
answer  ;  ])ut  I  should  anticipate  that  it  will  l)e  necessary
to  hammer  away  at  the  task  of  renewing  the  evidence
until  supernormal  phenomena  come  to  be  believed  in
nearly  as  readily  as,  say,  murder  ;  until,  in  fact,  a  habit
of  belief  in  them  has  become  general.


XCI.]


Presidential  Address


143


While  I  am  on  this  subject  of  deterioration  in  the
value  of  evidence  through  lapse  of  time,  I  should  Hke
to  touch  on  the  effect  on  it  of  distance,  especially  where
distance  involves  difference  of  nationality,  although  to
do  so  involves  a  digression.  I  find  in  my  own  case
that  as  a  general  ride  I  do  not  attach  the  same  weight
to  the  evidence  of  foreigners,  even  of  Americans,  as  to
the  evidence  of  my  own  countrymen  ;  and  having  no
reason  .to  think  that  I  am  singular  in  this  respect,  I
assume  the  impression  to  be  a  common  one.  At  first
sight  this  may  appear  like  mere  insular  prejudice  ;  but
I  think  it  is  really  nothing  of  the  kind,  and  that  the
feeling  has  a  rational  basis.  For  it  is  not  based  on
distrust  of  foreigners,  but  on  distrust  of  my  own  ability
to  estimate  the  value  of  evidence  given  by  foreigners.
When  trying  to  make  up  one's  mind  what  amoimt  of
trust  to  repose  in  the  testimony  of  a  fellow-countryman,
one's  judgement  is  influenced,  conscioiisly  and  unconsciously,
by  innumerable  little  impalpable  imponderable  indications  ;
and  I  feel  sure  that  in  the  main  such  indications  do
really  help  towards  the  formation  of  a  correct  conclusion.
But  with  witnesses  of  foreign  nationality  one  is  all  at
sea  in  this  respect.  If  you  question  this,  imagme  to
3'^ourselves  an  Enghshman  being  tried  in  this  country
on  a  criminal  charge  before  a  jury,  not  of  his  own  country-
men, but — by  some  Gilbertian  freak — of  Italians  perfectly
familiar  with  colloquial  English  but  with  no  experience
of  English  life  ;  and  then  imagine  this  jury  trying  to
assess  the  value  of  evidence  given  by  the  following  English
witnesses  ;  an  archdeacon,  a  laundryman,  an  official  of
the  Post  Office,  a  lodging-house  keeper,  a  veterinary
surgeon,  a  lady's-maid,  an  Oxford  don,  a  poKce-constable
and  a  West-end  tailor.  How  they  would  flounder !
When  we  try  to  form  an  opinion  of  cases  in  which
the  evidence  comes  from  foreigners,  our  task  is  akin
to  the  one  I  have  imposed  on  my  hypothetical  Italian
jury.  And,  reciprocally,  if  foreigners  do  not  feel  towards
our  evidence  what  I  feel  towards  theirs,  I  think  they
ought  to.

The  extreme  difficulty  of  making  the  evidence  in  such


144


J.  G.  Piddmgton


[part


X(


matters  as  we  investigate  equally  valid  for  other  nation-  it
alities  makes  me  sceptical  of  the  utility  of  international  ei
co-operation  in  psychical  research  ;  and  inclines  me  to  ti
think  that  if  a  nation  desires  to  learn  the  truth  about  a
psychical  phenomena  it  must  to  a  very  large  extent  work  1)'
out  its  own  salvation.  8

After  this  long  digression  you  may  well  have  forgotten  1)
where  I  was  when  I  started  upon  it.  I  had  been  men-  If
tioning  two  disappomting  features  in  the  history  of  the  »
Society  :  namely,  the  small  number  of  members  who  o
have  systematically  devoted  themselves  to  psychical  a
research,  and  the  falling-off  in  recent  years  in  the  number  -
of  cases  contributed  by  members.  i

I  turn  now  to  speak  of  certain  drawbacks  which  our  t
existence  as  a  Society  has  entailed,  or  may  entail.  ,  s

The  first  and  most  obvious  one  is  that  the  work  of  t
running  a  Society with  a  membership as  large  as  ours  f
means  the  expenditure  of  a  good  deal  of  time  and  energy  i
that  might otherwise  be  spent on  investigation  ; for  it  '  \
so happens that those who have borne a large share  i
of  the  research  work  have  also  borne  a  large  share  in  i
the management of the business affairs of the Society.  (
Why  not  divide the  labour, it may be asked, and  so  ]
relieve the investigators from mere routine work  ?  '
Theoretically  that  sounds  plausible  ; but  I  doubt  whether  1
it  would  work  well  in  practice. It  is  right  that  those  i
who have the most extensive first-hand experience of  ;
the  phenomena  that  the  Society  was  formed  to  investigate
should  also  have  a  controlling  voice  in  the  direction  of
its  policy,  and  questions  of  policy  are  too  closely  bound
up with the business side of the organisation for the  ]
two  to  be  under  separate  management.

A  second,  and  more  serious,  drawback  that  our  existence
as  a  corporate  body  entails  is  the  risk  of  the  control
of  the  Society  passing  into  the  hands  of  a  section  of
its  members,  who  would  be  hkely  to  lower  the  severely
critical  standard  that  has  so  far  been  maintained — and
mamtained  sometimes  in  the  face  of  considerable  dis-
satisfaction. It  is  not  easy  to  find  a  name  for  this
section,  whose  existence,  in  spite  of  its  not  being  organised,


I


XCI.]


Presidential  Address


145


it would be idle to deny. I would not call it  the
credulous  section,  for, apart  from  the  offence  that  that
title  would  probably  give,  I  do  not  think  that,  exceptis
excipiendis,  they  are  credulous  as  a  body. They  doubtless
believe some things that most members of the  Royal
Society  in  common  with  the  man  in the  street  do  not
beheve  ; but that is no criterion of credulity  ;| or  at
least  I  hope  it  isn't,  for  if  it  is, I am "of all  men
most miserable." Sir OHver Lodge on one occasion —
or  so  I  believe,  though  I  have  failed  to  trace  the  reference,
and  so  if  I  am  misrepresenting  him,  I  ask  his  forgiveness
— Sir  Oliver  once  divided  the  members of  this  Society
into a  Bight and  a  Left  Wing. The Right  comprised
those  of  cautious  and  conservative  views  who  uphold  the
strictest methods of investigation  ; the Left  comprised
those who  beheve more  than  the Right think  is  good
for them, who desire to join hands with or to  enter
into closer touch mth professed Spiritualists and  to
propagate  their  faith  in  partibus  infidelium  with  a  mission-
ary  zeal distasteful  to the Right, and who would  not
view  with  alarm  some  relaxation  in  the  rigorous  methods
of investigation hitherto pursued. But to christen  the
particular section I am seeking to define "  the  Left
Wing " would be misleading  ; for though it  doubtless
belongs  to  the  Left,  it  is  quite  possible,  as  I  know  from
my  own  case,  to  belong  to  the  Left  in  matters  of  belief,
and  yet  to  adhere  to  the  Bight — even  to  the  Extreme
Bight — in  respect  of  all  that  concerns  methods  of  investi-
gation. For my immediate purpose, then, Sir  Oliver's
dichotomy will not serve  ; and to bring out what  it
is that separates the particular section of members  of
whom I am speaking from those opposed to them,  I
shall call the latter the High-and-Dry School and  the
former — since  the  obvious  antithesis  might  be  actionable
— ^the  Not-High-and-Dry  School. The dividing line  here
has  nothing  to  do  with  how  much  or  how  little  of  the
phenomena  under  investigation  one  accepts  as  supernormal,
and  concerns  only  opinions  as  to  methods  of  investigation
and standards of evidence. The Not-High-and-Dries,  if
I  do  not  misrepresent  them,  take  the  line  that  so  much


14fi  J.  n .  Pifldinqfon  [par\

has been established be3^ond cavil that we can  now
safely  relax  to  some  extent  the  stringent  precautions  and
the  very  high  standard  of  evidence  on  which  the  Society
has  hitherto  insisted,  and  generally  adopt  a  less  suspicious
and more  genial  attitude  towards  mediums,  automatists,
dreamers of dreams, seers of apparitions,  corroborating
witnesses and so forth. ,  The High-and-Dries take  the
line  that  we  cannot  now,  or  for  a  long  time  to  come,
and probably ever, afford to lower our "  evidential "
standard,  or  modify  our  methods — our  admittedly  irritating
and meticulously wary methods — of investigation.  Well,
I for one am whole-heartedly on the side — I will  not
say, of the Angels, but — of the High-and-Dries  ;  and
that there exists a school of opposite views is due,  I
cannot but suspect, to a failure to realise — to  realise
not  momentarily  but  always and  vividly — one  dominant
characteristic  of  all,  or very  nearly all,  the  phenomena
we investigate  : I mean  their easy simulalnlity.  For
genuine  supernormal  phenomena  can  be  aped  in  various
ways  : by  dehberate  fraud,  by  subliminal  fraud,  and  by
fraud  that  hovers  between  these  two  ; and,  furthermore,
a  semblance  of  them  may  be  created  by  faulty  memory,
by  careless  recording, or  by  chance. Had the  labours
of the S.P.R. resulted in the accumulation of  good
evidence  for  witches  riding through the air on  broom-
sticks, or for repeated correct predictions in  minute
detail  of  events  apparently  beyond  the  powers  of  ordinary
foresight  and  inference  ; if , in  a  word,  there  had  been
placed  on  record  a  mass  of  good  evidence  for  the  occur-
rence of  things  simulable  only  by  extraordinary  and  costly
mechanical devices, or not simulalile by any  known
normal  agencies, then  there  might  have  been  something
to say  for  the  policy of  less  stringency. But  there  is
no  such  evidence,  none  for  witches  riding  on  broomsticks
or  similar  marvels  ; and  unless  and  until  there  is  good
evidence — not an occasional scrap, but a mass of it —
for phenomena outside the range of easy  simulation,
there  is  only one  safe  and  sane  policy,  and  that  is  to
maintain our High-and-Dry methods and standards.  In
a  trance-sitting,  of  which  I  have  seen  the  record,  Frederic


paeI'^'^^"^  Presidential  Address  147

JVtyers  is  represented  as  commenting  disapprovingly  on
an  unpublished  piece  of  investigation  recently  carried  out.
Whether  IMyers  was  really  in  any  Avay  concerned  is,  of
coui-se,  open  to  question;  but  the  plu-ase  with  which  the
soi-disant  Myers  brought  liis  critical  remarks  to  an  end
was  at  least  true  to  life:  "No  sloppy  work,  please";  and
if  I  quote  it  at  this  point  it  is  not  because  I  think  the
Not-High-and-Dries  like  sloppy  work,  but  because  I
believe  that  if  our  standards  were  to  be  lowered,  sloppv
work  would  be  the  inevitable  result.

I  have  to  deal  with  only  one  other  disadvantage  that
may arise from investigation being conducted  through
the  agency  of  a  Society,  and  then  I  have  almost  done.
It IS obvious that a membership such as ours  must
include a large number of persons whose interest  in
psychical  research  is  not  that  of  the  expert,  Init  rather
that  of  the  amateur  ; and.  again,  a  considerable  number
whose interest m the subject is emotional rather  than
intellectual. I hope I may say this without  giving
offence, and that for two reasons  : one being that  I
think  it  is  a  good  thing  that  it  should  be  so;  the  other,
that  I  am  myself  a  member  of  other  Societies  with  whose
objects  I  feel  sjanpathy,  but whose work I am  either
unable  to  follow,  or  can  follow  only  in  a  very  amateurish
way. Now,  if  our  Society  is  composed  largely  of  members
of these types, there must always be a risk of  then?
severing  then-  connexion  with  it  should  they  find  our  papers
difficult  to  follow,  or  should  they  fail  to  obtain  satisfaction
for  their  emotional  requirements ; or  else  a  risk  of  their
bringing  such  pressure  to  bear  that  genuinely  scientific  Avork
will  be  sacrificed  for  the  sake  of  making  our  Proceedings'
more  popular  and  attractive. Experience  shows  that  all
sciences, simple enough in their infancy, increase  in
complexity as they grow older. Take, for  example,
the simple experiments undertaken in the early  days
of the Royal Society by men with little or  no
specialised training and easily followed by anyone  of
decent intelligence, and compare the reports of  them
with the Transactions and Proceedings of that  Society
to-day. These pubhcations, I have heard it  whispered,


148


J.  G.  Piddington


[part


contain  many  papers  so  abstruse  as  to  be  unintelligible
to  the  majority  of  Fellows  and  digestible  by  only  a  very
few  experts  in  the  particular  branch  of  science  of  which
they  treat.  Now  imagine  for  a  moment  that  as  soon
as  physical  science  had  begun  to  make  progress,  and  as
a  consequence  had  begun  to  be  split  up  into  different
specialised  departments,  and  the  Transactions  as  a  further
consequence  had  become  increasingly  difficult  to  under-
stand,— imagine,  I  say,  that  the  lay  members  of  the
Royal  Society  had  objected  on  the  ground  that  though,
of  course,  they  weren't  asking  for  light  reading,  they
really  did  think  that  these  recent  papers  were  too  stiff.
Suppose  further  that  thek  protest  had  met  with  such
success  from  a  sympathetic  but  weak  Council  that  thence-
forward only  records  of  experiments  and  observations
which  the  average  layman  could  follow  without  taxing
his  brains  had  received  official  publication — well,  if  that
had  happened,  what  would  be  the  position  of  physical
science  in  this  country  to-day  ?  Luckily  for  science
and  for  the  Royal  Society  no  such  catastrophe  as  I
have  asked  you  to  imagine  overtook  it  ;  and  I  hope
that  such  a  catastrophe  may  never  debilitate  or  destroy
our  Society.  But  if,  like  other  sciences,  psychical  research
increases  in  complexity,  I  can  well  imagine  that  the
result  might  be  either  a  very  serious,  even  fatal  loss
of  interest  and  consequently  of  members,  and  consequently
of  income ;  or,  still  worse,  surrender  to  a  demand  for
publications  of  a  more  popular  kind  : — a  surrender  that
might,  indeed,  preserve  the  Society,  but  which  would
destroy  its  real  utility.  For  what  would  it  profit  to
save  the  Society  and  to  forfeit  the  end  to  which  the
Society  is  but  a  means  ?  It  might,  indeed,  matter
little,  if  there  were  in  this  country  other  bodies  ready
and  competent  to  perform  what  I  conceive  to  be  our
special  duty  ;  and  that  is  to  investigate  certain  obscure
phenomena,  and  to  carry  on  that  investigation  not  for
the  sake  of  entertaining  people,  or  with  a  view  to  con-
verting people  to  any  particular  articles  of  faith,  but
simply  and  solely  in  the  hope  of  discovering  the  true
facts. Though  various  other  organisations  exist  for  the


,Oji


true


xci.]  Presidential  Address  149

study  of  psychical  phenomena,  they  seem  to  me  to
approach  the  subject  with  a  definifce  parti  pris  :  and  I
know  of  no  other  body  actuated  solely  by  scientific
curiosity  and  with  a  set  determination  to  follow  the
evidence  wheresoever  it  may  lead,  that  could  take  our
place,  were  we  to  prove  false  to  our  trust  ;  and  that  is
why  I  am  a  little  apprehensive  lest,  as  our  subject  becomes
more  complex,  we  should  either  suffer  so  large  a  loss
of  members  as  to  cripple  our  activities,  or — what  would
be  much  worse — cater  for  popularity  by  neglecting  the
investigation  or  cold-shouldering  the  presentment  of  the
more  involved  phenomena.  And,  as  I  have  already  said,
as  the  enquiry  proceeds,  unless  Psychical  Research  is
to  prove  an  exception  to  the  general  rule,  the  subject
is  bound  to  become  more  complex.  Indeed,  it  has  become
so  already,  partly  from  the  mere  accumulation  of  material  ;
but  also  from  another  cause.  I  have  pointed  out  before
— and  I  do  not  apologise  for  doing  so  again,  because
the  thing  deserves  attention — that  up  to  the  time  of
Frederic  Myers's  death  in  January,  1901,  the  phenomena
recorded  in  our  Proceedings  were,  to  speak  broadly  and
roughly,  of  a  simple  and  straightforward  type.  Within
a  few  weeks  of  his  death  a  change  takes  place,  though
it  is  not  realised — at  least  not  fully  realised — till  much
ater.  I  am  not  speaking  at  this  moment  of  what  are
sailed  cross-correspondences,  for  that  development  came
ater,  but  of  Mrs.  Verrall's  scripts.  I  cannot  go  into
ietail  now,  but  speaking  briefly  I  may  say  that  these
jcripts  mark  a  new  departure  in  so  far  as  they  exhibit
^reat  complexity  of  structure,  each  several  script  forming
I  minute  piece  of  a  most  elaborate  and  extensive  mosaic,
ihe  pattern  of  which  cannot  be  traced  until  all  the
ittle  pieces  are  put  together  in  accordance  with  subtle
ndications  furnished  in  the  scripts  themselves.  Then,
n  1903,  with  the  advent  on  the  scene  of  Mrs.  Holland,
I  further  complication  ensues.  Her  script,  which  is  of
•he  same  tessellated  character  as  Mrs.  Verrall's,  exhibits,
iS  was  soon  recognised,  coincidences  with  Mrs.  Verrall's
ar  beyond  what  chance  will  account  for.  Then  in  rapid
uccession  other  automatic writers mingle  in  the game  :


150  J.  G.  Piddingfon  [pa.rt


M.


So


Mrs.  Salter,  the  Macs.,  Mrs.  Willett,  Mrs.  Stuart  Wilson,
and  Mrs.  Lyttelton.  The  scripts  of  all  these  automatists,
too,  show  just  the  same  complexity  of  structure  as  Mrs.
Verrall's  and  Mrs.  Holland's  ;  and  embedded  in  them
all  is  a  very  galaxy  of  cross-correspondences.  Of  these
cross-correspondences  so  far  only  a  comparatively  few
specimens  have  been  published  ;  and  yet  enough,  I  think,
to  convince  a  careful  student  of  them,  even  if  the  utmost
allowance  be  made  for  chance  coincidence  and  ingenuity
of  interpretation,  that  there  are  purpose  and  intelligent
direction  at  work.

So,  then,  we  have  not  had  long  to  wait  for  psychical
research  to  follow  the  example  of  other  sciences  and  be-
come more  and  more  complex.  It  has  already  become
so,  and  become  so  not  only  from  mere  accumulation  of  I  to
material  and  from  the  growth  of  literature  on  the  subject,  it
but  from  the  greater  complexity  of  the  phenomena  them-
selves. And  here  incidentally  I  would  call  your  attention
to  the  fact  that  this  greater  complexity  arises  from
someone's  intelligent  design.  I  am  not  troubling  about
the  question  of  what  intelligence  or  intelligences  are
responsible  for  the  design.  Assume,  if  you  will,  the
design  and  the  carrying  out  of  it  to  be  the  work  of
an  unknown  living  person  ;  or  assume  them  to  be  the
work  of  more  than  one  of  the  automatists  themselves
— I  say  "  more  than  one,"  because  for  various  reasons  a
they  cannot  possibly  be  entirely  the  work  of  one  only  1
of  the  automatists  ;  or  assume  them  to  be  the  work  I  nil
of  discarnate  intelligences  ;  the  fact,  or  so  I  hold,  remains  it
that  some  intelligence  is  deliberately  complicating  some !  1
of  the  phenomena  which  this  Society  investigates.  If  j
that  be  true,  we  are  faced  with  a  difficulty  peculiar,  I
I  believe,  to  our  own  field  of  research,  and  certainly
unknown  to  physical  science.  For  though  physical  science
has  to  deal  with  immensely  complex  problems,  it  never
has  to  assume  that  its  problems  are  being  intentionally
complicated  for  it  by  some  designing  Demiurge.  Our
Demiurge  may  have  the  best  of  motives,  and  may
introduce  his  complexities,  not  in  order  to  bewilder  us,
but for the purpose of rendering the phenomena  as


tre;


eei


XCI.]


Presidential  Address


151


difficult  as  possible  to  explain  by  telepathy  inter  vivos,
or  for  other  reasons  ;  but  however  excellent  his  intentions,
there  is  no  escaping  from  the  fact  that  the  increased
complexity  has  increased  the  difficulty  of  presenting  the
evidence  in  a  form  palatable  to  the  average  member,
who  naturally  cannot  be  expected  to  give  the  same
minute  attention  to  the  problems  involved  as  the  in-
vestigators. And  yet  without  minute  attention  these
complicated  phenomena  cannot  be  properly  understood.
So  far  our  members  have  shown  a  laudable  long-sufferance,
and  if  I  have  ventured  to  voice  a  doubt  of  its  con-
tinuance, it  is  because  I  realise  to  the  full  how  large
is  the  draft  Ave  have  made  upon  it.  But  such  of  us
as  have  been  guilty  of  contributing  papers  about  these
complex  phenomena  to  the  Proceedings  may  in  one  respect
at  least  claim  the  gratitude  of  our  readers  ;  for  we  have
not,  as  we  easily  might  have,  inflicted  on  them  the  labour
of  making  themselves  acquainted  with  a  lot  of  new-
fangled technical  terms.  When  I  come  across  some  of
the  monstrosities  of  this  kmd  that  disfigure  the  writings
of  modern  psychologists,  and  especially  of  those  who
treat  of  psycho-analysis,  I  admit  that  I  am  seized  with
the  spirit  of  the  Pharisee,  and  thank  God  that  we  are
not  as  other  men  are.

On  reading  over  what  I  had  written  thus  far,  with
a  view  to  seeing  how  to  bring  this  address  to  a  close,
I  was  reminded  of  a  remark  made  to  me  by  a  friend
who  happened  to  know  that  I  was  engaged  upon  wTiting
it.  "Don't  be  too  depressing,"  she  said.  Holding,  as
I  do,  that  results  of  a  far-reaching  and  inspiriting  kind
have  been  attained  through  the  labours  of  the  S.P.R.,
I  certamly  did  not  set  out  with  the  intention  of  producing
a  depressing  effect  ;  and  I  hope  I  have  not  produced
one  unwittingly.  Yet,  at  the  same  time,  I  confess  that
I  should  not  be  sorry  if  anything  I  have  said  should
help  to  check  exaggerated  notions  of  the  degree  of
certainty  attained  and  attainable  in  such  researches  as
ours.  There  seems  to  me  to  be  a  growing  risk  of  belief
outrunnmg  the  evidence,  and  too  Kttle  reahsation— at
any rate among the public— of the patience and  care


152


J.  0.  Piddington


[part


required  to  discriminate  phenomena  in  appearance  super-
normal but  in  reality  of  normal  origin  from  genuine
supernormal  phenomena.  How  ready  and  eager  many
are  to  seek  after  signs,  and  how  utterly  uncritical  in
their  search,  no  unprejudiced  observer,  alive  to  what
has  been  going  on  around  him  during  the  past  10  years
of  crisis,  can  surely  deny.  Credulity  and  superstition,
two  of  the  greatest  evils  that  afflict  mankind,  are  plants
of  rapid  growth  ;  and  when  sooner  or  later  the  day
comes — as  come,  I  firmly  believe,  it  will — when  com-
munication between  the  dead  and  the  living  has  become
part — rightly  become  part — of  the  accepted  beliefs  of
mankind,  there  will  ensue,  I  greatly  fear,  a  period  in
which  these  two  evils  will  flourish  ;  and  the  general
public,  incapable  of  making  fine  distinctions,  will  swallow
genuine,  ambiguous,  illusory  and  fraudu.lent  phenomena
with  equal  avidity.  I  do  not,  of  course,  flatter  myself
that  any  words  of  mine  could  directly  serve  to  prevent
or  counteract  so  unfortunate  a  state  of  things — and  one,
moreover,  calculated  to  bring  unmerited  contempt  upon
the  whole  subject.  To  do  that,  one  would  have  to
have  the  ear  of  the  public.  But  the  danger,  I  believe,
is  a  real  one,  and  I  should  feel  I  have  not  wasted  breath
if  what  I  have  said  to-day  should  bring  home  to  members
how  desirable  it  is  that  they  as  individuals,  and  this
Society  as  a  body,  should  set  an  example  of  level-
headedness and  discrimination  to  the  public.  "  II  ny  a
de  verite  que  dans  les  nuances.''  If  we  could  once  impress
on  the  public  mind  how  profoundly  true  is  that  aphorism
of  Benjamin  Constant's  in  respect  of  the  things  we
investigate,  we  should  be  rid  of  the  risk  of  our  work
being  discredited  at  some  future  time  in  consequence  of
popidar  outbreaks  of  undiscriminating  credulity.  Our
cause,  indeed,  stands  to  lose  more  through  the  credulity
of  the  crowd,  than  through  its  indifference  or  its
scepticism.


XCI.]


"  One-Horse  Dawn  Scripts  "


153


ELUCIDATION  OF  TWO  POINTS  IN  THE
"  ONE-HORSE  DAWN  SCRIPTS."

I.  thp:  herb  moly.

By  W.  H.  Salter.

If  the  "  One-Horse  Dawn  Experiment "  were  of  less
interest  to  students  of  Psychical  Research,  I  should  feel
that  some  apology  was  necessary  for  recurring  to  so
ancient  a  topic.  Happening,  however,  recently  to  have
stumbled  on  a  fact  which  seems  to  throw  light  on  an
important  script  of  Mrs.  Verrall,  which  has  never  been
satisfactorily  explained,  I  have  ventured  to  contribute  this
note  to  a  discussion  which  cannot  be  regarded  as  closed
so  long  as  the  smallest  dark  corner  remains  unexplored.

For  full  details  of  the  experiment  I  must  refer  the
reader  to  Mrs.  Verrall's  paper  {Proc,  Vol.  XX.)  and  to
Mr.  Piddington's  comments  {Proc,  Vol.  XXX.,  pp.  175-229
and  296-305),  but  the  following  short  summary  may  be  of
assistance.

In  April  1901  Dr.  Verrall  attempted  to  transmit  tele-
pathically  to  Mrs.  Verrall  three  Greek  words  (moioVwAoc  e?
'Aw)  from  the  Orestes  of  Euripides,  mth  a  view  to  their
influencing  her  automatic  scripts.  Between  this  date  and
October  1902,  when  the  nature  of  the  experiment  was  dis-
closed to  her  by  Dr.  Verrall,  Mrs.  Verrall  wrote  a  large
number  of  scripts  containing  apparent  attempts  to  repro-
duce either  the  sound  or  the  sense  of  these  three  words.
The  scripts  of  this  period  also  contained  numerous  allu-
sions, (1)  to  Dr.  Benson  and  Welhngton  College,  where
Dr.  Verrall  had  been  at  school  under  Dr.  Benson  and
where  the  lifelong  friendship  between  them  began ;  and
(2)  to  a  blind  old  man,  journeying  alone  and  dressed  in


154  W.  H.  Salter  [part

white  robes,  whose  identity  is  the  main  subject  of  Mr.
Piddington's  papers  in  Proc,  Vol.  XXX.

The  particular  script  to  which  I  wish  to  refer  is  that  of
the  9th  September,  1901,  which  contained  the  following
words  : —

Find  the  herb  moly  that  will  help — it  is  a  guide
(I'jTii. i<al Tt/Vos- A/yi^e(s (  =  seek and in  the  end you  will
understand).

The  words  '  herb  jnoly  '  were  written  larger  than  the  rest
of  the  script.

When,  at  the  close  of  the  experiment,  Dr.  and  Mrs.
Verrall  went  over  the  scripts  together,  they  noticed  several
attempts  to  reproduce  the  sound  of  /jlovottwXov  (monopolon),
and  considered  that  '  moly  '  was  a  not  very  successful
specimen  of  this  class.  They  were,  however,"  puzzled  by
the  fact  that  more  emphasis  seemed  to  be  laid  by  the
scripts  on  '  herb  moly  '  than  on  other  similar  attempts  at
assonance.  They  considered,  and,  I  think,  there  can  be
no  doubt,  rightly,  that  a  reference  was  intended  to  the
passage  in  Milton's  Comus,  where  the  Attendant  Spirit
gives  to  the  two  brothers  the  magic  herb  haemony.  The
passage  (11.  623-637)  runs  as  follows

He  [i.e.  '  a  certain  shepherd  lad  ']  loved  me  well  and  oft

would  hear  me  sing
Which,  when  I  did,  he  on  the  tender  grass
Would  sit,  and  hearken  even  to  ecstasy,
And  in  requital  ope  his  leathern  scrip,
And  show  me  simjiles  of  a  thousand  names,
Telling  their  strange  and  vigorous  faculties.
Amongst  the  rest  a  small  unsightly  root
But  of  divine  effect,  he  culled  me  out.
The  leaf  was  darkish,  and  had  prickles  on  it.
But  in  another  country,  as  lie  said,
Bore  a  bright  golden  flower,  but  not  in  this  soil.
Unknown  and  like  esteemed,  and  the  dull  swain
Treads  on  it  daily  M'ith  his  clouted  shoon  :
And  yet  more  med'cinal  is  it  than  that  moly
That  Hermes  once  to  wise  Ulysses  gave.


)Ir.


rag


XCI.]  "  One-Horm  Dawn  Scripts  "  155

It  will  be  remembered  that  in  the  Odyssey  (X.  281-306)
Hermes  gives  the  herb  moly  to  Odysseus  (Ulysses)  as  a
counter-charm  against  the  spells  of  Circe,  just  as  in
Milton's  poem  the  Attendant  Spirit  gives  the  herb  haemony
to  the  two  brothers  as  a  counter-charm  against  the  spells
of  Circe's  son,  Comus.  But  what  was  the  connection
between  the  passage  from  Comas  and  the  passage  from
the  Orestes  ?

When  Dr.  Verrall  sat  for  the  Classical  Tripos  in  1873,
one  of  the  papers,  as  he  remembered,  had  included  the
Orestes  passage.  After  she  had  been  told  all  about  the
experiment,  Mrs.  Verrall  looked  through  the  other  papers
set  for  the  same  examination,  and  discovered  the  curious
fact,  which  Dr.  Verrall  had,  consciously  at  any  rate,  quite
forgotten,  that  the  Comus  passage  had  been  set  for  trans-
lation into  Latin  verse.  Mrs.  Verrall  in  her  paper  iia
Proc,  Vol.  XX.  (p.  164),  expressed  the  view  that  the
script  registered  not  only  an  existing  mental  impression  of
her  husband's,  but  also  a  forgotten  past  impression,  once
closely  associated  with  the  first.  This  view  is  not  accepted
by  Mr.  Piddington  {Proc,  Vol.  XXX.,  pp.  225-228),  partly
on  the  ground  that  the  opportunities  for  chance-coincidence
in  papers  set  in  a  Classical  Tripos  examination  are  ex-
ceedingly wide.  It  would  not  be  relevant  to  the  purpose
of  this  note  to  express  any  opinion  as  to  which  of  these
two  views  is  justified.

Recently,  however,  I  chanced  upon  another  association
of  the  Comus  passage,  which  links  it  very  closely  with
Euripides,  Dr.  Verrall,  Mrs.  Verrall,  Dr.  Benson,  Welhngton
College,  and  also,  though  the  connection  in  this  last  case  is
not  quite  as  clear,  with  the  blind  Old  Man  in  White.

In  1881  Dr.  Verrall  pubhshed  his  first  book,  an  edition
of  the  Medea  of  Euripides.  He  was  at  the  time  engaged
to  Mrs.  Verrall,  to  whom  he  presented  a  copy  now  in  my
wife's  possession.  This  copy  has  on  the  fly-leaf  in  Dr.
Verrall's  handwriting,  "  if.  de  G.  if.,"  the  initials  of  Mrs.
Verrall' s  maiden  name,  and  on  the  page  opposite,  above
his  own  initials,  A.  W.  V.,  a  line  from  the  play  which  is
evidently  intended  by  him  as  a  chaffing  allusion  to  their
engagement. The book is dedicated "  To the  Right


1

156  W.  H.  Salter  [part

Reverend  Edward  White  Benson,  D.D.,  Lord  Bishop  of
Truro  and  formerly  Head  Master  of  WelUngton  College."

In  the  Introduction  (pp.  viii  to  xi)  Dr.  Verrall  discusses
the  various  ways  in  which  classical  texts  become  corrupted,
and  the  principles  which  he  considers  should  be  applied  in
restoring  them.  He  illustrates  his  argument  by  supposing
that  Milton's  Covins  had  been  "  preserved  in  manuscript
copies  only,  made  by  ill-educated  persons,  and  that  we
have  to  ascertain  from  five  such  copies  .  .  .  the  description
of  the  magic  haemony."  He  then  proceeds  to  take  the
two  lines  : —

Unknown  and  like  esteemed  : and  the  duU  swain
Treads  on  it  daily  with  his  clouted  shoon,

and  supposes  that  one  group  of  manuscripts,  while  pre-
serving the  sense,  has  departed  from  the  exact  form  of
the  words,  and  that  the  other,  while  keeping  closer  to  the
sound  of  the  original,  has  degenerated  into  sheer  nonsense.
Finally  he  shows  how  by  comparing  the  different  per-
versions of  the  manuscripts  in  detail,  it  would  be  possible
to  restore,  with  a  fair  degree  of  certainty,  the  original
text.

Here  then  we  have  a  play  of  Euripides,  the  aixthor  from
whom  the  subject  of  the  experiment  was  drawn,  edited  as
his  first  published  work  by  Dr.  Verrall,  the  agent  in  the
experiment,  presented  by  him  to  Mrs.  Verrall,  the  per-
cipient, on  a  memorable  occasion,  and  dedicated  to  Dr.
Benson,  formerly  Head  Master  of  Wellington,  to  whom
and  to  whose  former  school  the  scripts  have  made  frequent
references ;  and  in  the  Introduction  we  find  that  this
particidar  passage  of  Conius  is  discussed  at  considerable
length.  These  correspondences  taken  together  seem  to  me
to  go  far  beyond  the  possibilities  of  chance-coincidence.

Mr.  Piddington  has  reminded  me  of  a  later  script  of
Mrs.  Verrall's,  written  during  the  course  of  the  experiment,
which  is  also,  I  think,  designed  to  draw  attention  to  Dr.
Verrall' s  edition  of  the  Medea.  1  mean  the  script  of  the
21st  June,  1902,  printed  on  pp.  425,  426  of  Proc,  Vol.  XX.
The  relevant  part  of  the  script  for  the  present  purpose  is
as  follows  : — "  Not  Luria  but  Lyssa  gives  the  keynote,  he


I


XCI.]  "  One-Horse  Dawn  Scripts  "  157

must  complete.  It  is  better  than  the  Editing — more  full
of  life — more  a  thing  for  men."

The  script  was  recognised  by  Mrs.  Verrall  as  having
Dr.  Benson  for  the  ostensible  communicator,  and  as
referrmg  by  the  words  "  Luria "  and  "  Lyssa  "  to  an
Essay  on  Euripides'  Hercules  Fur  ens  on  which  Dr.  Verrall
was  then  engaged.  For  the  sake  of  brevity  I  would  refer
the  reader  to  ]\Irs.  Verrairs  own  comments  on  pp.  1-iO,
141  and  302  of  Proc,  Vol.  XX.  The  "  he  "  of  the  script
is,  of  course,  Dr.  Verrall.

Now  the  script  clearly  draws  a  distinction  between  the
nature  of  the  work  which  Dr.  Verrall  was  then  doing,  and
"  the  Editing,"  and  the  point  of  the  distinction  is  this.
Dr.  Verrall  edited  two  plays  of  Euripides  {Medea  and  Ion)
and  four  of  Aeschylus,  and  achieved  a  high  reputation  by
the  brilliance  of  his  textual  criticism.  But  his  most  dis-
tinctive work  was  as  an  interpreter  of  these  authors.  In
particular  he  propounded  a  quite  revolutionary  view  as  to
the  aims  and  method  of  Euripides.  The  Essay  on  the
Hercules  Furens  was  a  work  of  interpretation  not  of
editing,  and  his  editions  of  the  Ion  and  the  four  plays  of
Aeschylus  consist  largely  of  interpretative  matter.  There
is  one,  and  only  one,  of  Dr.  Verrall's  works  which  can  be
considered  as  an  edition  in  the  ordinary  sense,  and  that  is
the  Medea.

I  may  add  that  the  Essay  on  the  Hercules  Furens  was
pubHshed  in  1905  in  a  volume  which  also  contained  an
Essay  on  the  Orestes.  I  have  not,  however,  been  able  to
ascertain  when  this  last  Essay  was  begun,  and  accordingly
do  not  suggest  any  direct  connection  between  the  script
in  question  and  that  play,  from  which  were  drawn  the
words  which  were  the  subject  of  the  experiment.

To  revert  to  the  '  herb  moly  '  script,  while  I  have  no
doubt  that  the  object  of  this  script,  and  of  the  Benson-
Wellington  scripts,  was  to  establish,  via  the  Medea,  an
Euripides -Dr.  Verrall -Mrs.  Verrall  connection,  I  also  sug-
gest, more  speculatively,  that  there  is  an  attempt  to  add,
by  means  of  the  Introduction  to  the  play,  an  essential
item  to  the  description  of  the  Old  Man  in  White.

One  of  the  causes  of  manuscript  errors  to  which  Dr.


158


W.  H.  Salter


[part


5


Verrall  refers  is  the  substitution  of  common  words  for  rare
or archaic ones, e.g. '  peasant ' for '  swain.' '  Peasant '  i
might  be  written  over '  swain '  by  way  of  gloss  or  ex-  (
planation  in  one  MS.,  and  be  substituted  for  'swain'  in  [
a  later  MS.  deriving  from  the  first. He  supposes  that  we
have  among  our  MSS.  a  glossary  to  JMilton,  containing  the
entries  Swain,  a  peasant,  and  Sckip,  a  hag ;  and  that  in
consequence  some  of  the  MSS.  gave  in  11. 634  and  626
respectiveh'  the  readings  '  peasant  '  and  '  leathern  bag  '  for
the  '  swain  '  and  '  leathern  scrip  '  of  the  original.

Now  the  f)articular  example  he  gives  of  the  supposed  1
perversion  of  '  scrip  '  into  '  bag  '  seems  to  me  significant.  [
Readers  of  Mr.  Piddington's  paper  will  remember  that  he  i
identifies  the  Old  Man  in  White  of  Mrs.  Verrall's  scripts  'i
with  Oedipus  as  described  by  Sophocles  in  the  Oedipus  \<
Coloneus,  and  by  Jebb  in  his  notes  to  that  play.  All  the  ^
details  of  the  description,  Oedipus'  blindness,  his  age,  his
white  hairs,  his  staff,  his  loneliness  '  alone  with  God  and  i
none  other,'  the  white  robes  put  on  by  him  before  his  t
passing,  appear  clearly  in  the  scripts.  One  detail  only  is  s
missing,  or  rather  fails  to  come  out  distinctly.  Oedipus,  i
as  beggar,  should  carry  a  wallet  :  the  old  man  of  the  I
scripts  carries  '  a  small  square  box  '  which  '  might  be  a  [
book."  Mr.  Piddington  conjectures,  with  great  probability,  e
that  the  box  or  book  of  the  scripts  was  a  visual  misinter-  a
pretation  by  the  automatist  of  the  idea  of  a  wallet,  c
'  which  was  squarish  and  made  of  leather.'  i

If  the  idea  of  '  wallet  '  had  come  through  correctly,  it  ?
seems probable that Dr. and Mrs. Verrall would have  '[
recognised  the  allusions  to  Oedipus,  have  Ijeen  led  thereby
to refreshing their memory of Jebb's edition, and  so
arrived  at  the  connection  with  the  Orestes  passage  which
Mr.  Piddington  has  elucidated. The  mistake  of  '  box  ' .  or
'  book,'  small  as  it  was,  appears  to  have  sufficed  to  put
them  oft'  the  track. I  suggest  that  the  emphatic  advice
to  '  find  the  herb  moly,'  i.e.  to  consult  the  Introduction  '
to  the  Medea,  had,  as  one  of  its  objects,  l)y  drawing  their  ]
attention  to  perversions  of  sense,  substitution  of  words  and
the  idea  of  a  '  leathern  scrip  ' or  wallet, to  put  them
back  on  the  right  line  of  enquiry.


'  XCI.]  "  One-Horse  Dawn  Scripts  "  159

'  On  my  communicating  the  substance  of  this  note  to
Mr.  Piddington,  he  wrote  in  reply,  "  I  think  there  is
confirmation  of  your  conjecture  to  be  found  in  the  follow-

»  ing  script  of  M.  V.'s,  dated  Feb.  10,  1913  :—

t

J  '  Treads  on  it  daily  with  his  clouted  shoon

Colin  Clout's  come  home  agaui
j  But  perhaps  the  French  word  is  more  intelligible

J  Clou,  to  hit  the  nail  on  the  head. That  is  what  I

want  to  say.'  "

1  This  script,  of  which  I  was  not  previously  aware,  was
,  produced  after  Dr.  Verrall's  death.  Whoever  may  have
f  inspired  it,  there  seems  a  clear  intention  to  emphasise  the
i  importance  of  the  only  previous  reference  in  Mrs.  Verrall's
'  scripts  to  this  passage  of  Comtis,  namely  that  of  the  9th
■  September,  1901.

In  any  case,  and  whether  my  interpretation  be  right  or
wrong,  it  is  curious  that  both  Dr.  and  Mrs.  Verrall,  when
casting  about  for  possibly  relevant  associations  with  Comus,
should  have  overlooked  the  Introduction  to  the  Medea,  in
view  of  the  circumstances  attending  the  publication  of  the
book  and  its  presentation  by  one  to  the  other.  It  would,
however,  seem  not  infrequently  to  be  the  case  that  persons
engaged  in  the  production  of  scripts  fail  to  recognise
allusions  and  associations  which  they  would  in  other
circumstances  be  the  first  to  seize  on.  Perhaps  this  is  a
merciful  dispensation,  framed  so  as  to  enable  those  of  us
who  have  not  the  gift  of  automatism  to  take  a  part,
however  small,  in  the  great  game.

II. THE  PRECOCIOUS  OLIVE.
By  J.  G.  Piddington.

In  her  account  (Proc,  Vol*  XX.,  pp.  156-167)  of  the
"  One-Horse  Dawn "  experiment  Mrs.  Verrall  (p.  157)
wrote  as  follows  : —

This  experiment  was  devised  by  my  husband  in  April
1901,  and  the  three  words  [/^oi'OTrojAoi'  k  'Aw,  i.e.  "  to  the
one-horsed Dawii  "] were then written down, with  the


160


J.  O.  Piddington


[part


intention  of  seeing  whether  my  hand  {i.e.  script]  would
make  any  attempt  to  reproduce  his  thought.  The  paper  on
which  the  words  were  written  was  put  into  an  envelope,
placed  by  him,  to  the  best  of  his  belief,  in  the  drawer  of
his  writing-table,  where  he  is  in  the  habit  of  keeping
papers.  The  drawer  is  not  used  by  anyone  but  himself.
He  had  not  made,  he  tells  me,  any  experiment  before.

Mrs.  Verrall  added  a  footnote  to  the  effect  that  the  paper
on  which  Dr.  Verrall  wrote  the  three  words  was  "  mislaid
or  lost,"  and  "  could  not  be  found  when  the  experiment
was  ended."

The  experiment,  it  should  be  observed,  is  here  said  to
have  been  devised,  not  merelj^  started,  in  April  1901  :
that  is  to  say, — if  Mrs.  Verrall  chose  her  words  in  this
instance  as  carefully  as  she  usually  did — Dr.  Verrall  did
not  begin  to  think  about  the  experiment  until  April  1901.
It  is  not  stated  whether  the  note  made  of  the  three  words
bore  a  date,  and  as  this  note  was  lost,  we  cannot  now
ascertain  ;  and  we  have  to  depend  on  Dr.  Verrall's  memory
for  the  date  on  which  the  experiment  was  devised.  Dr.
Verrall,  however,  was  a  man  of  an  accurate  habit  of
mind,  and  there  is  a  strong  presumption  that,  if  he  stated
that  he  devised  the  experiment  in  April  1901,  he  did
devise  it  in  that  month,  and  not  in  March  or  May  or  any
other  month  of  1901.

In  a  paper  called  "  Fresh  Light  on  the  '  One-Horse  Dawn  '
Experiment,"  and  published  in  Proc,  Vol.  XXX.,  pp.  175-
229,  I  discussed  a  number  of  references  in  Mrs.  Verrall's
//oi'OTTwXoi'  e?  'Aw  (or,  "  One-Horse  Dawn  ")  scripts  of  1901
and  1902  to  an  Old  Man  in  White,  and  argued  that  they
were  all  references  to  Oedipus  :  chiefly  to  Oedipus  as  he
appears  in  the  Oedipus  Colonens  of  Sophocles,  though  one
very  significant  reference  was  implied  to  a  passage  in  the
Oedipus  Tyr annus.  I  argu^  further  that  the  point  of
these  references  was  to  be  found  in  various  notes  of  Jebb's
on  the  Oedipus  Coloneus,  and  especially  in  a  note  of  his
on  the  Oedijms  Tyrannus  in  which  he  gives  his  view  of
the  meaning  of  the  disputed  word  iJLovoirwXov  in  the
phrase  /jloi'ottwXov  eV Aw ; and  I  pointed  out  that  Jebb


I  XCI.]  "  One-Horse  Dawn  Scripts  "  161

1  gives  a  cross-reference  to  this  particular  note  of  his  own
in  his  comments  on  a  Chorus  in  the  Oedipus  Coloneus  to
which  Mrs.  Verrall's  scripts  allude. Part  of  this  Chorus

[  consists  of  a  eulogy  of  the Olive  of  Attica, and  is  thus

,  translated  by  Jebb  : —

And  a  thing  there  is  such  as  I  know  not  by  fame  on
Asian  ground,  or  as  ever  born  in  the  great  Dorian  isle  of
Pelops, — a  growth  unconquered  [(fivrevij.'  axeiponoi'],  self-
renewing,  a  terror  to  the  spears  of  the  foemen,  a  growth
which mightily flourishes in this land, — the  gray-leafed

'  olive,  nurturer  of  children  [yXavi<a^  Tr(LiooTp6(f>ov  (fivkkov
eAai'as]. Youth shall not mar it by  the  ravage of  his

'  !  hand,  nor  any  one  who  dwells  with  old  age  ;  for  the
sleepless eye of the Morian Zeus beholds it,  and  the

J gray-eyed  Athena  [yu  yAiu'KUJTrt^  'Addva].

Co  this  passage  I  maintained  references  were  made  in  the
'ollowing  manner  in  Mrs.  Verrall's  scripts  : —

M.  V.  3049  {July  31,  1901).

.  .  .  viridenti  coma  ikcuov  rrj^  TkavKioiriShs  ai'T/}?  .  .  .

.  M.  V.  3055  {Aug.  20,  1901).

i  ...  Kal  (TTefxiuiiTa  h'rjv. ov  Sacfiveto. aAAix  (fjvkXa  Sei'Spos  [sic]

I  Ttl'OS iK(l (peVTOl'TOi KfiVTOVfJLei'OV . .  .

I  M.  V.  3118  {April  14,  1902).

. . .  yAaiiKCDTTts  KOi'ivrj . .  .

The  word  eXulov  ("  of  olive-oil ")  in  M.  V.  3049  is  an
)bvious  slip  for  eXalai  ("of  the  olive-tree  "),  as  is  shown
ijy  the  context  on  both  sides  of  it,  which  means  : —

"  With  the  green  foliage  of  the  olive
of  the  Green-eyed  (Athena)  herself."

With  regard  to  the  epithet  TXuuKunrn  ("  green-eyed,"  or
'  gray-eyed  "),  applied  to  Athena  by  Sophocles  in  the
ines  quoted  above,  Jebb  observes  that  it  was  suggested
Dy  the  epithet  yXavKu^  ("  green,"  or  "  gray-green  ")
ipplied  by  Sophocles  a  few  Lines  earlier  to  the  olive  : —

yAaii/cas  -aiSoTpocfiov  (f>vkkoi'  ekai'wi
("  the  gray-leafed  olive  nurturer  of  children  ").

On  the second epithet, iruiSoT^ocpou ("  child-nurturing  ")


I


162  '  J.  G.  Piddington .  [pARTjsoi:

that  Sophocles  here  bestows  on  the  olive,  Jebb  has  a  note,
of  which  I  transcribe  a  part  : —

"  •iraiSoTp6<j)ov,  nourishing  tlie  young  lives  in  the  land.
.  .  .  Cj).  Juv.  Sat.  3,  84  :  guod  nostra  infantia  caelum
Hausit  Aventini  baca  mitrila,  Sahma^  (the  olive)."

The  compressed  style  of  this  note  might  mislead.  Jebb
does  not  mean  that  baca  Sahina  is  a  regular  name  for
olives,  like  our  '  Brazil  nuts  '  for  a  particular  kind  of  nut.
He  means  that  baca,  literally  a  berry,  is  here  used  for  the
fruit  of  the  olive-tree — as,  indeed,  it  often  is  by  other
Latin  authors,  with  or  without  an  epithet  to  distinguish
it  from  other  '  berries.'  By  baca  Sabina  Juvenal  meant
Sabine  olives.

Meanwhile,  the  bewildered  reader  may  be  wondering
what  Sabine  berries  and  Jebb's  note  on  TratSoTpncpou  have
got  to  do  with  the  "  One-Horse  Dawn  "  experiment.

The  experiment,  it  will  be  remembered,  was  devised  in
April  1901.  On  the  afternoon  of  March  31,  1901,— that  is
to  say,  before  Dr.  Verrall  devised  the  experiment — Mrs.
Verrall  wrote  a  script  containing  a  good  many  discon-
nected and  apparently  meaningless  phrases,  and  among
them  this  one  : —


praecox  aha  baccis  Sabinis  ponetur  dis  adiuventibus.

It  may  be  translated  : —

"  the  early  olive  with  Sabine  berries  will  be  planted  with
the  help  of  the  gods."  . '  _

Even  taken  by  themselves,  the  words,  olea  baccis  Sabinis,
would  be  an  almost  absolutely  certain  reference  to  the
Juvenal  passage  ;  but  when  we  consider  that  later  scripts
of  Mrs. Verrall's  make  repeated  allusions  to  the  Oedipus


^  The  quotation  from  Juvenal  means  :  "  (Is  it  to  go  so  entirely  for
nothing)  that  as  a  boy  I  drank  in  the  air  of  the  -Aventine,  and  was
nurtured  on  the  Sabine  berry  ?  "

J.  E.  B. Mayor  in the Addenda  to his Notes on  Juvenal's  Third
Satire,  gives  under  the  heading  "  Baca  Sabiria  "  a  reference  to  Sophocles,  L|
Oed.  Col.  694-706:  that  is  to  say,  to  the  precise  part  of  the  chorus  in
praise  of  the  olive  in  the  Oedipus  Goloneus  to  which  reference  is  made
above,  j|(


orwi
Daw


aid
Sf

)r,

b,
ke
lote


Aic
ilk
?i
m


xci.]  "One-Horse  Dawn  Scripts  "  163

Goloneus,  that  the  point  of  these  allusions  is  to  be  found
in  Jebb's  notes  on  that  play,  and  that  the  only  other
mention  of  the  ohve  in  Mrs.  Verrall's  scripts  for  nearly
Sve  years  to  come  ^ — namely,  "  vu-identi  coma  e\(dou  t^??
rXai'/cw-K^o?  uvTn'i  in  M.  V.  3049 — is  effected  by  means  of
in  allusion  to  the  very  lines  containing  the  word  ttulSo-
rpocpov,  we  are  forced,  it  seems  to  me,  to  conclude  that
jhe  words  olea  baccis  SaUnis  in  the  script  of  March  31,
1901,  are,  not  only  a  reference  to  the  Juvenal  passage,
out  a  certain  reference  to  the  quotation  of  the  Juvenal
Dassage  in  Jebb's  note  on  TraiSoTpocjjov.

If  that  conclusion  is,  as  I  believe,  inevitable,  two  things
ollow  from  it.  First,  it  clinches  the  argument  put
orward  in  ray  paper  "  Fresh  Light  on  the  '  One-Horse
Dawn '  Experiment,"  which  was  that  the  clue  to  the
•epeated  allusions  in  the  "  One-Horse  Dawn "  scripts  to
.he  Old  Man  in  White  and  to  a  good  deal  of  the  contexts
)f  these  allusions  is  to  be  found  in  the  Oedipus  Goloneus
lid  in  Jebb's  notes  thereon.

Secondly,  it  leaves  us  faced  with  a  very  pretty  problem.
?or,  at  least  one  day,  and  perhaps  several  days,  before
Dr.  Verrall  devised  his  experiment,  allusion  was  made  in
tirs.  Verrall's  script  to  a  note  of  Jebb's  on  a  passage  in
•he  Oedipus  Coloneus  ;  and  this  passage,  as  well  as  other
lotes  of  Jebb's  on  the  same  play  and  on  the  companion
)lay  Oedipus  Tyrannus,  was  subsequently  utilised  in  Mrs.
Verrall's  scripts  to  indicate  the  words  fxoi'OTrwXov  e?  'Aw
v^hich  Dr.  Verrall  fixed  upon  in  April  1901  as  the  subject
)f  his  experiment.

Various  ways  of  accounting  for  this  odd  fact  may  be
nvented.  If  we  assume  that  there  is  no  mistake  as  to
he  time  when  the  experiment  was  first  devised,  we  might
ake  the  hne  that  this  new  piece  of  evidence  only  goes  to
how  the  diabohcal  ingenuity  of  Mrs.  Verrall's  subliminal

^The  first  mention  of  'olive'  after  July  31,  1901,  is  on  March  21,
906  ;  but  this,  like  all  other  mentions  of  the  olive  in  Mrs.  Verrall's
3ripts,  is  in  English.  The  only  '  olive  '  reference  in  Latin  is  on
larch  31,  1901  ;  the  only  one  in  Greek  on  July  31,  1901  :  the  use  in
.lese  two  instances  of  Greek  and  Latin  corresponding  to  the  Greek  olive
t  the  Oedipus  Goloneus  and  to  the  Sabine  olive  of  Juvenal's  Satires,


L


164


J .  G.  Piddington


[PAET


mind,  which,  not  content  with  contriving  an  intricate
response  to  Dr.  Verrall's  experiment,  went  further  and
fitted  this  response  on  to  a  hterary  reference  that  had
happened  to  emerge  in  her  script  before  the  experiment
was  thought  of.

Or,  we  might  assume  that,  though  consciously  Dr.  Verrall
neither  devised  nor  thought  about  his  experiment  until
April  1901,  he  had  nevertheless  been  subconsciously  turning
the  matter  over,  and  considering  ijlovottwXqv  e?  'Aw  as  a
possible  subject  for  experiment.  If  this  were  really  the
case,  the  promptitude  and  appositeness  of  Mrs.  Verrall's
first  reaction  to  her  husband's  subconscious  thought  stand
out  in  marked  contrast  to  the  slowness  and  difficulty  with
which  the  response  was  afterwards  completed  when  Dr.
Verrall  was  consciously  trying  to  convey  his  thought.

Or  again,  we  might  assume  that  Dr.  Verrall's  memory
played  him  false,  and  that  he  consciously  devised  the
experiment  before  the  afternoon  of  March  31,  1901.  But
those  who  knew  Dr.  Verrall  will  not  readily,  I  think,  call
in  question  the  accuracy  of  his  memory.

There  is  a  fourth  hypothesis  that  I  am  not  disposed  to
press,  but  which  should  not  be  entirely  ignored.  It  is
that  Dr.  Verrall  was  not  the  real  originator  of  the  experi-
ment, but  that  he  carried  out  an  experiment  which,
though  he  did  not  know  it,  another  intelligence  had  devised
and  imposed  vipon  him.  This  hypothesis,  lilce  the  other
hypotheses,  is,  of  course,  incapable  of  proof  ;  but  it  at
least  has  the  merit  of  simplicity,  and  only  assumes  the
possibility  of  Dr.  Verrall's  being  open  to  teiepathk
influence.

Those  who  prefer  to  regard  all  the  phenomena  of  th(
"  One-Horse  Dawn  "  case  as  due  to  telepathy  inter  viva
can  pitch  upon  Mrs.  Verrall  as  the  intelligence  thai
subliminally  devised  the  experiment  and  telepathicall;5
imposed  it  on  Dr.  Verrall.

I  may,  perhaps,  be  allowed  to  add  that,  knowing  th(
ways  of  scripts,  I  had  often  j)uzzled  over  the  '  olive
reference  in  the  script  of  March  31,  1901,  and  felt  that  i
ought  to  hitch  on  to  the  '  olive  '  reference  in  the  scrip
of  July  31,  1901,  in  spite  of  the  fact  that  Dr.  Verrall  di(


XCI.]  "  One-Horse.  Dawn  Scrij^ts  "  165

not  begin  his  experiment  until  April  1901  ;  but  I  never
could  see  any  sense  in

praecox  olea  baccis  Sabinis

until  a  few  months  ago  when  I  happened  to  read  Jebb'fe.
note  on  TraiSoTpocpou.

The  epithet  praecox,  perhaps,  deserves  attention,  for
there  is  nothing  in  the  Juvenal  passage  or  in  the  Chorus
in  the  Oedipus  Coloneus  in  any  way  answering  to  it.  The
adjective  praecox  is  applied  in  Latin  literature  not  only  to
plants  that  flower  or  fruit  early,  but  to  plants  that  fruit
before  their  time.  And  that  is  exactly  what  the  praecox
olea  of  Mrs.  Verrall's  script  did  when  it  put  in  a
precocious  appearance  before  the  "  One-Horse  Dawn  "
experiment  officially  began.

Jan.  G.  1924,


166


Dr.  Sydney  Alrutz


[part


xc


THE  MECHANISM  OF  THE  SO-CALLED  MEDIUMISTIC

TRANCE.


By  Dr.  Sydney  Alrutz.

Lecturer  in  P.sycho^o'j j  at  the  University  of  Upsala,  Sweden.


^1


The  relation  of  this  article  to  my  j^ai^er  "  The  Psychology  and
Physiology  of  the  so-called  Mediurnistic  Trance,"  read  at  the
2nd  Congress  for  Psychical  Research  at  Warsaw,  1923,  and
jmblished  in  its  Transactions,  is  as  folloivs.  In  this  article
I  only  give  a  very  brief  summary  of  ivhat  I  had  to  say  on
Mrs.  Piper  in  my  Warsaiv  j)a'per,  and  I  must  therefore  be
allowed  to  refer  readers  of  these  Proceedings  to  the  fuller  dis-
cussion there.  A  few  new  -points  of  view  are  now  added  here,
however.  What  folloivs  upon  that  is  wholly  loritten  for  these
Proceedings,  and  does  not  appear  in  the  Warsaio  jiaper.

In  this  article  my  intention  is  to  view  the  so-called
mediurnistic  trance  and  its  more  important  features  in
the  light  of  hypnotic  phenomena.  I  believe  that  by  this
method  it  is  possible  to  attain  to  a  better  understanding
not  only  of  the  conditions  of  the  trance-state  itseK,  but
also  of  what  the  so-called  "  personalities,"  manifesting  in
the  state,  really  are  or — are  not.

Mrs.  Piper.

In  her  elaborate  exposition  of  the  psychology  of  Mrs.
Piper's  trance  (Vol.  XXVIII.  of  these  Proceedings)  Mrs.
Sidgwick  came  to  the  conclusion  that  Mrs.  Piper's  trance
very  probably  was  a  state  of  self-induced  hypnosis,  in
which  she  or  her  hypnotic  self,  by  the  help  of  sugges-
tion, personated  different  characters  either  consciously  or
iniconsciously.

To  begin  with,  I  wish  to  emphasize  the  importance  of
a  certain  symptom  which  Mrs.  Piper  more  or  less  often
showed  in  the  intermediate  stage  between  her  deep  sleep


xci.] Mechanism  of  So-Called  Mediumistic  Trance  167


or  trance  and  her  awake-condition,  i.e.  in  lier  coming-to-
state  or  awakening-condition.

This  symptom  was  echolaha  (repetition  of  words  or
sentences  uttered  by  persons  present).  This  proves  that
when  Mrs.  Piper  came  to  she  passed  through  a  state  of
consciousness  which  constitutes  or  corresponds  to  a
hystero -hypnotic  state,  called  by  Charcot,  Janet,  Ochoro-
wicz  and  others  the  cataleptic  state,  but  which  I  prefer
to  call  the  automatic  state,  this  being  a  more  general
term.  In  this  state  the  subject — according  not  only  to
my  own,  but  also  to  observations  made  by  others,  e.g.
0.  Vogt — hears  spoken  words,  but  does  not  understand
them.  He  repeats  them  parrot-like.  The  only  form  of
suggestibihty  of  which  he  might  be  said  to  be  capable
is  one  caused  by  images.  These  provoke  hallucinations
and,  on  the  motor  side,  correspoijding  automatic  actions.

It  is  interesting  that  echolalia  may  also  show  itself  not
only  in  certain  cases  of  mental  disease,  often  accompanied
by  echopraxia  and  echomimia,  but  also  in  encejjhalitis
lethargica  or  on  account  of  a  bullet-wound  in  the  frontal
lobe  of  the  bram  (F3),  etc.  Here  there  exists  no  reason
to  suppose  that  it  is  caused  by  suggestion  or  at  will.
It  can  therefore  very  well  be  conceived  to  show  itself,
when  functional  brain  disturbances  or  blockades  of  a
certain  kind  exist,  as  for  mstance  in  certain  trance-phases,
without  the  help  of  any  suggestion  or  volition  on  the
part  of  the  subject.  The  opinion,  held  by  probably  most
modern  hypnotizers,  that  echolalia  in  hypnosis  is  due  to
mental  suggestion,  as  Mrs.  Sidgwick  rightly  puts  it,  cannot
be  maintained  any  longer.  And  for  these  reasons  :  (1)  it
can  occur,  as  I  have  found  it  to  do,  quite  unexpectedly  and
unprovoked  ;  ^  (2)  it  occurs  in  a  definite  state,  lying  between
what  I  caU  "  light  "  and  "  deep  "  hypnosis,  which  can  be
produced  experimentally,  and  in  which  verbal  suggestions  are
not  obeyed,  because  not  understood  ;  (3)  mtelligent  intro-
spection, as  in  Vogt's  case,  confirms  the  truth  of  this  ;  and
(4)  similar  reactions,  for  instance  mimicry,  occur  in  the  same
hypnotic,  i.e.  the  automatic  state,  as  echolalia  does.

^  This  is  also  the  opinion  of  Ochorowicz  and  Wingfield,  as  stated  in
a  personal  communication  to  me.


168


Dr.  Sydney  Alrvtz


[part


As  the  echolalia  occurred  in  the  awakening-stage,  it  is
evident  that  Mrs.  Piper's  deep  sleep  and  trance  proper —
see  the  synoptic  table  below — represented  a  nervous
condition  in  which  the  inhibition  was  still  more  profound
than  in  the  automatic  stage.  She  was,  consequently,  in
a  state — let  us  call  it  a  state  of  lethargy — where  her
capabilitj^  of  giving  herself  auto-suggestions,  or  d  fortiori
of  receivuag  and  realismg  suggestions  from  without,  had
ceased  to  exist.  It  is  also  evident  from  other  symptoms
that  the  trance-sfcate  involved  a  diminution  of  excitability
stretching  more  or  less  far  down  in  the  central  nervous
system:  the  lessened  respiratory  frequency  (7-10  per  minute)
the  general  insensibility  and  inertness,  the  lessened  or
inhibited  reflexivity,  the  total  colour-blindness  (Mrs.  Piper
saw  objects,  faces,  black),  the  micropsia  (objects  were
seen  very  much  diminished),  etc.

In  this  deep  hypnosis  Mrs.  Piper  doubtless  also  was
incapable  of  receiving  telepathic  suggestions.  The  experi-
ments of  Ochorowicz  seem  to  prove  this.  One  of  his
subjects  was  very  clearly  susceptible  to  telepathic  impulses
of  a  motor  kind  in  the  automatic  state.  This  form  of
sensibility  ceased  however  in  the  lethargic  state.

The  ijrobability  tliat  the  personalities  of  Mrs.  Piper's
trance  and  their  sayings  and  doings  depended  on  auto-
suggestion from  the  medium  or  on  telepathic  suggestions
from  the  sitters,  as  Mrs.  Sidgwick  supposes,  must  therefore
be  considered  very  small  indeed.

I  do  not  want  to  give  the  impression  that  I  accept  all
tlie  characteristics  of  Charcot's  well-known  and  much
criticized  three  states  of  hystero-hypnosis  :  the  somnambulistic,
the  cataleptic  and  the  lethargic  states.  The  important
point  is  whether,  when  hypnotising  persons  of  a  certain
nervous  type  deeper  and  deeper,  an  inhibition  of  the
mental  and  nervous  functions,  the  brain  and  nerve  centres
respectively,  as  well  as  a  corresponding  secondary  enhance-
ment of  other  functions  and  centres,  takes  place  in  a
certain  general  order,  independent  of  suggestions  and  auto-
suggestions, and  whether  these  progressive  alterations  in  the
excitability  of  the  different  parts  and  levels  of  the  nervous
system  are  in  the  main best accounted  for  by  assuming


xci.] Mechanism  of  So-Called  Mecliumistic  Trance


169


the  existence  of  three  distinct  states.  I  am  inclined  to
believe  that  this  really  is  the  case.  It  is,  on  the  other
hand,  of  minor  importance  whether  the  speciiic  and  con-
stant characteristics  of  each  stage  were  correctly  appre-
hended and  described  by  Charcot,  or  not  ;  whether  these
states  represent  hard  and  fast  divisions  or  not  ;  whether
they  can  be  transformed  into  each  other  in  all  the  ways
described  by  Charcot  and  his  school,  or  not  ;  whether  in
certain  persons  irregularities  are  to  be  found,  dependent,
perhaps,  on  nervous  changes  or  ideas  already  existent  in
the  awake  condition,  or,  perhaps,  on  different  methods  of
hypnotization,  etc.  I  have  given  a  more  extensive  expose
of  my  oi^inion  of  the  nature  of  different  hypnotic  states
than  I  have  been  able  to  do  here  in  my  paper  "  The
Psychological  Importance  of  Hypnotism  "  (read  before  the
7th  Congress  of  Psychology,  Oxford,  1923,  and  pubhshed  in
Psyche,  1923,  p.  129-140).


IVIi's.  Piper's  trance-
states,  according
to  Mrs.  Sidg-
wick's  description.

1.  The a  w  a

2.  The  going-into

trance  state.

H. Deep  sleep.

4.  Trance  proper.

5.  Deep  sleep.

6.  The  waking  (or

awakening)
stage.

7.  T  h  e aw  a


SYNOPTIC  TABLE.

Corresponding

hypnotic  states,
according  to  my
conception.

k  e  condition.

Light  Hypnosis.^
Intermediate  state  or
Automatic  state.

Deep  Hypnosis,
with  partial  resti-
tutions during  the
existence  of  the
"  trance  proper."

Intermediate  state  or

Automatic  state.
Light  Hypnosis.^

ke  condition


Corresponding
states  in  Pierre
Janet's  patient
Rose.


[Somnambulism.]
[Catalepsy.]


[Lethargy.]
Syncope.
Lethargy.

Catalepsy.
Somnambulism .


■•■My  "light  hypnosis"  inclvides  also  such  hypnotic  states  for  which
amnesia  exists  afterwards.


170


Dr.  Sydney  Alrutz


There  is  another  curio  vis  feature,  which  occurred  in  the
awakening  state  of  Mrs.  Piper  :  the  so-called  "  head-
snaps.  "Shortly  before  normal  consciousness  returned
an  experience  constantly  occurred  which  Mrs.  Piper  de-
scribed as  her  head  snapping,  and  which  she  half  seemed
to  expect  the  sitter  to  hear.  Generally  this  snap  occurred
twice,  with  a  short  interval  between,  before  she  completely
recovered  her  normal  consciousness.  {Proc,  Vol.  XXVIII.
p.  23.)

Mrs.  Sidgwick  imagines  that  the  sensation  is  due  to
some  change  in  the  flow  of  blood  to  the  brain,  and  adds
that  "  Mrs.  Piper  takes  this  view  herseK,  perhaps  as  the
result  of  a  suggestion  from  some  sitter."  She  said  once  :
"  My  head  goes  s-s-click.  I  think  the  blood  settles  back
in  my  brain  and  then  I  am  conscious."

Only  quite  lately  I  have  been  able  to  find  an  experience
analogous  to  ]Mrs.  Piper's  clicks.  In  a  few  articles  Mr.
Oliver  Fox  (really  Mr.  Hugh  G.  Callawaj')  has  described
experiments  in  "  Dream-travelling."  These  are  too  com-
plicated to  be  given  here  in  full.^  I  can  only  give  certain
points  in  this  paper.  Mr.  Callaway  had  been  trying  to
prolong  a  certain  kind  of  dream  :  "  Dreams  of  knowledge,"
i.e.  dreams  in  which  he  had  the  knowledge  that  he  was
dreaming.  He  found  that  by  exercising  his  will  he  could
resist  the  "  attraction  "  of  the  body  and  considerably
prolong  the  dream.  The  effort,  however,  produced  a
slowly  increasing  pain  in  what  he  imagined  to  be  the
region  of  the  pineal  gland.  He  made  the  experiment  of
fighting  this  pain.  It  then  ceased  quite  suddenly  and
something  seemed  to  "  click "  in  his  head.  Upon  this  he
appeared  "to  be  in  the  position  of  a  permanently
disembodied  spirit,"  i.e.  "  out  of  the  body."  By  will
power  he  managed  "  to  return  to  his  body,"  but  the
after  effects  were  bad.  After  this  he  found  that  when
he  was  in  the  iro/?ce-condition  he  could  "  leave  the  body  "
by  a  sudden  effort  of  will,  and  still  later  he  found  that  the
"  right  "  method  to  do  this  was  to  will  that  his  incorporate
self  should  pass  through  the  doorway  of  the  pineal  gland.
When  this  was  done  the  little  click  sounded  in  his  brain.

1  See  The  Occult  Review,  1920,  pp.  190  and  251,  and  1923,  p.  332.


xci.] Mechanism  of  So-Called  Mednimistic  Trance  171

When  this  method  was  -used  there  was  no  restrictmg:
"  pineal "  pain  as  before,  no  break  in  consciousness,  no
difficulty  in  "  re-entering  the  body  "  when  he  wished.

Mr.  Callaway  puts  forward  the  theory  that  when
"  dreams  of  knowledge  "  take  place,  a  third  state  of  con-
sciousness is  the  result,  and  he  adds  :  "To  prove  that
the  soul  actually  leaves  the  body  is  practically  impossible,
for  the  experience  may  be  purely  subjective."  Still  he
considers  that,  to  his  ow7i  satisfaction,  he  has  proved  the
"  existence  of  his  soul."

In  a  letter  to  me  Mr.  Callaway  Avrites  that  he  has
never  read  any  detailed  account  of  Mrs.  Piper's  trances,
though  her  name  was,  of  course,  known  to  him.

It  would,  of  course,  be  wrong  to  attach  much  import-
ance to  a  single  person's  experiences  of  this  kind.  But  it
certainly  is  rather  curious,  that  in  the  .  only  case  besides
Mrs.  Piper's — known  to  me,  at  least, — where  such  clicks  in
the  brain  can  be  produced  quasi-experimentally,  they
should  occur  just  at  that  point  or  moment  when  the
experimenter  feels  and  considers  himseh  to  have  "  left  the
body  " — whatever  this  may  mean  ^ — diiring  a  trance
condition.

There  is  another  experience  of  Mr.  Callaway's  which
reminds  me  of  one  of  Mrs.  Piper's.

Once,  when  coming  to  and  after  the  head-snap,  Mrs.  Piper
said  :  "I  want  to  tell  you  the  strangest  thing.  I  had
two  distinct  pairs  of  eyes.  I  used  the  one  pair  behind
the  other  and  looked  through  these  eyes  (touching  her
own)  as  if  they  were  spectacles.  They  looked  like  marbles  .  . .
And  Mr.  Hodgson,  when  I  saw  you  first  ifc  was  through
the  other  pair  of  eyes  and  you  didn't  look  as  you  do
now."  (Just  before  she  had  said  that  she  had  two
distinct  brains  ..."  one  looks  like  sulphur  burning,  the
otlier  like  flesh")  {Proc,  Vol.  XXVIII,  p.  222).

Mr.  Callaway  relates  that  when  in  a  certain  experiment
he  "  concentrated "  on  its  preliminary  stages,  he  felt  a
general  numbness,  his  whole  body  stiffened  and  his  eyes

1  As  to  the  nature  of  Mr.  Callaway's  experiences  and  his  own  reasons
for  considering  himself  to  have  been  out  of  his  bodj^  see  Mr.  Callaway's
articles.


172


Dr.  Sydney  Alrutz


[part


closed  tightly  {The  Occult  Review,  1923,  p.  336).  Then
came  the  sensation  of  possessing  another  pair  of  eyes,  and
these  "  astral  eyes  "  he  opened.  As  he  did  this  he
seemed  to  turn  right  round  within  his  physical  body,  so
that  he  faced  the  other  direction,  etc.

What  this  felt  duplication  of  eyes  (and  brain)  really
means  is  difficult  to  decide.  Still,  the  coincidence  between
Mrs.  Piper's  and  IMr.  Callaway's  experiences  deserves  to  be
noted,  and  investigators  ought  to  be  on  the  look-out  for
similar  observations  in  the  future.

Mrs.  Leonard.

I  now  intend  to  give  as  a  further  example  of  the
mediumistic  trance  the  case  of  the  well-known  medium
Mrs.  Osborne  Leonard,  because  she  is  still  in  full  activity,
and  it  is  therefore  probably  quite  possible  to  get  a
thorough  examination  of  her  different  trance  or  hypnotic
stages  from  a  purely  psychological  and  neurological  point
of  view,  which  hitherto  has  not  been  done.

This  medium  presents,  according  to  Una,  Lady  Trou-
bridge  (Proc,  S.P.R.  Vol.  XXXII. ,  p.  349),  first  of  all^  a
condition,  characterised  by  a  slight  drowsiness,  productive
of  automatic  script,  which  has  proved  on  several  occasions
to  convey  accurate  knowledge  of  events  unknown  to  the
medium.  Lady  Troul)ridge  asks  if  we  iftay  see  in  this
condition  a  relatively  light  hypnosis  not  followed  by  any
amnesia.

Mrs.  Leonard  further  presents  a  partially  analgesic  trance,
in  which  she  appears  to  be  somewhat  hyperaesthetic  of
hearing.  In  the  trance  she  shows  the  characteristics  of  a
personality  quite  foreign  to  her  waking  self.  This  is  the
personality  known  as  Feda.  Also  in  this  state  Mrs.
Leonard  gives  evidence  of  supernormal  knowledge.  Lady
Troubridge  believes  this  state  to  be  a  lower  hypnotic
level  than  the  former  one,  a  deep  somnambulism.  I  wish  to
say  that  the  hyperaesthesia  of  hearing  seems  to  me  in
this  case  certain  only  for  the  time  which  precedes  a  sitting,
i.e.  when  hypnosis  is  coming  on.  and  is  then  quite  what
we should  expect. This  hyperaesthesia  consequently  does


xci.] Mechanism  of  So-Called  Mediumistic  Trance  173

not  ill  an}^  way  preclude  the  trance  itself  being  a.  deep
condition.  A,s  to  the  analgesia  I  should  like  to  know
what  is  really  meant  by  partially  or  "to  some  great
extent "  anaesthetic  and  analgesic.

Fmally  comes  another  trance  condition,  in  which
according  to  I^ady  Tronbridge  IN'Irs.  Leonard  reproduces
the  vocal  characteristics  and  mannerisms  of  deceased
persons  of  both  sexes,  who  were  never  known  to  her
during  their  lives.  In  this  state  the  motor  faculties  are
largely  in  abeyance.  Whereas  Feda  can  easily  move
about  and  talk  loudly,  these  so-called  personal  controls
have,  as  Lady  Troubridge  expresses  it,  very  limited
command  of  the  organism  as  regards  motion  and  vocal
energy  (p.  362).  Mrs.  Leonard  lies  like  a  log  against  the
chair,  and  therefore  seems  to  have  lost  her  muscular  tonus
to  a  great  extent.  The  arrival  so  to  say  of  a  personal
control  is  announced  by  a  long,  sometimes  very  long,  and
steady  exhalation  of  breath,  whereas  Peda's  arrival  is
only  heralded  by  a  few  moments  of  mere  quiescence
(p.  365).  At  least  one  personal  control  shows  a  pronounced
hyperaesthesia  of  touch  affecting  the  fingers.  The  personal
controls  can  only  be  mamtained  for  a  short  time.  On
account  of  this  and  other  features  (the  power  of  mental
concentration  is  for  instance  weakened),  Lady  Troubridge
beheves  that  this  condition  is  possibly  yet  another  and
still  lower  hypnotic  level.

Later,  on  account  of  Mi'.  Irving's  letter  {Journal,  1922,
p.  266),  Lady  Troubridge  emphasises  the  circumstance
that  the  personal  controls  have  access  to  the  Feda  material,
whereas  Feda  has  only  a  very  fragmentary  and  occasional
knowledge  of  the  personal  control  material.  This,  however,
we  might  regard,  writes  Lady  Troubridge,  as  some  unusual
and  momentary  shiftmg  of  the  levels,  which  gives  Feda,
for  an  instant  only,  access  to  material  which  is  generally
outside  her  purview  and  which  might  be  acquired
telepathically  by  her  durmg  the  periods  when  she  herself
governs  the  organism  (p.  291).  This  superiority  in  the
field  of  knowledge  on  the  part  of  the  personal  controls
would  then  be  another  point  in  favour  of  regarding  them
as representing  a  still deeper  hypnotic  level  then  Feda.


i74


Dr.  Sydney  Alruiz  .


[part


I  should  like  to  accentuate  the  desirability  of  distinguish-
ing here  more  exactly  between  two  things.  On  the  one
hand  the  condition  of  Mrs.  Leonard's  organism  during  the
emergence  of  Feda  or  the  personal  controls,  i.e.  the  trance
state  per  se  ;  on  the  other  hand  the  psycho-physiological
nature  of  these  personalities  themselves.^  But  can  such
a  division  be  made  ?  How  can  we  know  what  belongs
to  the  one  and  what  to  the  other  ?  Three  points  seem
able  to  help  us  here  :  (1)  our  general  knowledge  of  pure
(hystero-)  hypnotic  states  ;  (2)  our  knowledge  of  the  nature
of  Mrs.  Leonard's  condition  immediately  before  and  after
the  emergence  of  the  personalities  ;  (3)  the  circumstances
that  these  different  outbursts  apparently  form  coherent
organic  unities,  of  which  certain  utterances,  movements,  etc.,
are  integral  parts.

To  begin  with  the  personal  controls.  It  seems  from  the
description  given  by  Lady  Troubridge  as  i£  there  existed  a
special  nervous  condition,  which  precedes  the  trance  per  se,
runs  through  this  and  also  succeeds  it  for  about  a  minute.
I  admit,  however,  that  the  data  for  this  assertion  are
rather  poor.  In  the  case  of  Mrs.  Piper  they  are  much
stronger.  Still  it  seems  as  if  there  exists  such  a  condition
also  here,  and  that  this  is  a  state  corresponding  to  a  very
deep  stage  in  (hystero-)  hypnosis  (the  lethargic  stage).
During  this  condition  a  partial  restitution  or  revivification
of  certain  functions  for  an  unknown  reason  takes  place  in
the  form  of  speech  (usually  very  weak),  movements  (very
limited),  increase  of  muscular  tone  (hardly  sufficient  to
keep  the  vertebral  column  erect),  and  in  one  case  hyper-
aesthesia  (of  fingers).  Of  these,  speech  seems  to  be  the
only  restitution  which  necessarily  belongs  to  or  expresses
the  mental  activity  behind.  Regarding  the  other  symptoms
this  connection  is  not  quite  clear,  at  least  as  far  as  Lady
Troubridge's  information  goes.  They  probably,  however,
also belong to these personalities, as  they  occur  simul-

1  Lady  Trovibridge  herself  in  her  first  paper  {S.P.R.  Proc.  Vol.  XXXII.)  writes
of  the  possibility  of  the  different  trance  conditions  being  different  hypnotic
levels  (p.  361).  Then  Mr.  Irving  writes  about  the  personal  controls  being
this,  and  finallj.  Lady  Troubridge  in  lier  reply  writes  that  her  suggestion
was  that  these  controls  represent  a  deeper  hypnotic  level.


xci.] Mechanism  of  So-Called  Mediumistic  Trance  175


taneously  with  their  utterances.^  But  even  if  this  is  so,  they
may  be  only  secondary  and  irradiative  eifects  of  the  resti-
tution of  speecli  and  its  corresponding  nervous  apparatuses.

As  to  the  personal  controls  themselves,  I  think  there  is
very  little  evidence  that  these  "  entities  "  as  such  represent
or  constitute  a  still  deeper  hypnotic  level  than  Feda.
Even  assuming  Lady  Troubridge  to  be  in  the  right  as  to
their  wider  memory-range,  I  do  not  think  that  this  is  any
evidence  in  this  respect.  And  for  this  reason,  that  they
are  not  really  the  inner  side  of  coinjyhte  hypnotic  states,
but  oiily — at  the  best — partial  restitutions  of  such  states.
Only  of  the  former  has  it  been  assumed,  with  more  or  less
reason,  that  the  deeper  the  hypnosis  the  more  com-
prehensive the  memory-range.^  Further  :  if  we  accept
telepathy  as  an  explanation  of  Feda's  incidental  knowledge
of  a  personal  control,  why  shouldn't  telepathy  also  be  able
to  work  the  other  way  ?

The  weakness,  short  duration  and  incompleteness  of  the
personal  controls  in  comparison  to  that  of  Feda  might  very
easily  be  explained  by  the  circumstance  that  Feda
obviously  "  emerges  "  from  a  lighter  hypnotic  state,  where
the  resistance  to  be  overcome  is  less  than  in  the  lethargic
state,  while  the  restitution,  apparently  brought  about  in
some  way  by  the  personal  controls,  demands  a  greater
output  of  energy.

In  conclusion  :  all  we  can  say  is  that  the  manifestation
of  the  personal  controls  takes  place  in  a  state  of  trance  or
auto-hypnosis  probably  much  deeper  than  the  state  from
which  Feda  emerges.  As  to  the  personaUties  themselves,
it  is  of  very  little  use  comparing  them  to  hypnotic  levels
or  egos at  all, much less considering them  to he  such

^  Note  here  Lady  Troubridge's  observation,  that  the  sitter  must  be  on
the  alert  to  catch  Mrs.  Leonard's  body  as  the  personal  control  comes  to
an  end  (p.  366).  May  I  ask  a  question  :  Who  complains  of  the  hyperaes-
thesia  of  the  fingers  as  being  "  actually  distressful "  ?  And  does  this
sensitiveness  serve  any  purpose  ?

^  There  exists,  however,  no  proof  that  Prof.  Morton  Prince  in  the  case
of  Miss  Beauchamp  had  hypnotised  B2  deeper  than  usual  on  the  first
occasion  B3  appeared.  B3  had,  however,  a  wider  memory-range  than  B2.
And  can  we  also  in  other  cases  be  certain  at  \^'hat  "  level  "  a  "  person-
ality "  is  formed  ?


176


Dr.  Sydney  Alrutz


[part


xc


levels.  The  mental  life  of  the  personal  controls  is  not
inferior,  seemingly,  to  that  of  Feda,  whereas  the  deepest
(hystero-)  hypnotic  stage  (the  lethargic  one)  generally
shows  much  less  mental  activity,  if  any  at  all,  than  the
lighter  ones — imless  complications  exist.  As  to  the  memory-
range,  I  should  like  to  ask  Lady  Troubridge  a  question
or  two.  Is  there  not,  to  begin  with,  some  evidence  of
Feda's  knowing  the  contents  of  the  minds  of  the  personal
controls  from  the  circumstance  that  Feda,  at  least  on  the
face  of  it,  transmits  the  thoughts  of  the  personal  controls,
for  instance  of  A.  V.  B.  1  Now,  seeing  that,  according  to
Lady  Troubridge,  Feda  generally  has  no  knowledge  of
personal  control  material,  whereby  no  doubt  is  meant  the
utterances  of  a  personal  control  when  really  controlling,  i.e.
when  influencing  Mrs.  Leonard  without  intervention  from
another  source,  the  question  arises  :  is  there  any  evidence
that  the  thoughts  of  a  certain  personal  control,  say  of
A.  V.  B.,  which  Feda  transmits,  and  the  utterances  of  A.  V.  B.
as  a  personal  control,  really  belong  to  each  other  or  to  a
common  personal  source  ?  If  there  is  such  evidence,
would  not  this  then  show  that  Feda  at  times  really  does
get  at  the  minds  of  what  we  call  the  personal  controls  ?

When  using  the  expression  "  restitution "  of  Mrs.
Leonard's  organism,  I  do  not  of  course  mean  that  the
whole  thing  is  explained  by  such  a  process.  I  can  locally
or  partially  restitute  a  subject  in  deep  hypnosis  by  simply
holding  my  hand  above  his  :  the  sensibility  returns  then  at
this  place  (on  the  hand).  I  can  also  by  upward  passes
over  one  arm,  again,  as  in  the  former  case,  without
contact,  e.g.  through  a  sheet  of  glass,  and  taking  as  before
every  precaution  so  that  the  subject  cannot  Imow  or
suspect  what  I  am  doing,  restore  the  sensibility,  etc.,  on
that  half  of  the  body.  That  is  not,  however,  a  complete
analogy  to  what  occurs  in  Mrs.  Leonard's  case,  when  a
personal  control  comes  on.  But  if  we  suppose  that  in  some
such  way,  by  nervous  effluence  or  otherwise,  I  could  first
restore  Mrs.  Leonard's  vocal  organs,  peripheral  and  central,
and  then  by  the  help  of  telepathy  make  these  restored
parts  of  Mrs.  Leonard's  organism  talk  and  give  utterance
to  my  thoughts — then  we  should  have,  I  believe,  a  process


xci.] Mechanism  of  So-Called  Medhimistic  Trance  177

which  at  least  could  be  compared  to  what  seems  to  take
place  when  a  personal  control  manifests.

Other  Mediums.

I  lately  examined  (at  the  British  College  for  Psychic
Science)  a  young  man  who  put  himself  into  an  apparent
trance  without  any  help  from  anybody  present,  and  who
in  this  state  manifested  at  least  two  different  trance-person-
alities. There  was  a  very  great  difference  in  the  easiness
with  which  the  knee-jerk  reflexes  could  be  evoked  in  the
awake  condition,  and  the  difficulty,  not  to  say  impossibility,
with  which  they  could  be  shown  to  exist  at  all  in  the
trance  state.  And  when  the  subject  was  awakening  from
the  trance  state  the  returning  of  the  knee-jerk  reflex  by
degrees  could  be  very  nicely  observed.  This  was  also
confirmed  by  a  medical  man  present.  There  were  also
interesting  alterations  in  the  sensibility.  These  changes
gave  me  the  conviction  that  no  shamming  of  the  trance-
state  as  such  occurred  in  this  case,  and  also  that  the
trance-state  in  question  involved  a  deep-reaching  inhibition
of  the  excitability  of  the  nervous  system  (as  far  as
the  spmal  cord).  I  was  prevented  from  making  further
examinations,  but  what  I  have  put  forward  may  be  enough
to  show  once  more  the  importance  of  always  making  a
neurological  examination  in  such  cases,  if  possible.

Sir  Arthur  Conan  Doyle  ^  has  made  some  observations
which  show  the  importance  of  studying  .  the  pulse-rate  in
trance.  He  found  that  a  medium,  Mr.  Tickner,  showed
remarkable  variations  in  this  respect.  Before  and  after
a  certain  sitting  the  pulse  rate  was  78  per  minute,  but
during  trance  and  when  a  certain  "  personality  "  manifested
it  showed  124  (for  about  twenty  minutes  running),  and
when  another  "  personahty  "  came  on  the  scene  it  showed
100.  Sir  Arthur  writes  with  much  reason  that  it  may  be
that  we  have  an  exceUent  check  against  fraud  in  these
pulse-variations.  I  should  like  to  add  that  they  may
also  aid  us  in  understanding  the  mechanism  of  the  trance-
condition  and  the  restitutions  taking  place  there.

1"  Pulse-rate  in  Trance." Jour,  of  the  Am.  S.P.R.,  July  1923,  p.  374.


178


Dr.  Sydney  Alrutz


[part


I  once  registered  the  respiration  and  pulse  of  a  gentleman
who  claimed  that  he  could  "  leave  his  body,"  and  who,
in  order  to  do  this,  sent  himseK  into  a  trance.  No
reactions  followed  in  this  state  on  stimulation  of  the  skin
senses,  the  knee-jerk  reflex  was  absent,  etc.  During  the
trance  I  held  a  sharp-smelling  liquid  under  his  nostrils  ;
no  reactions  ensued,  excepting  a  flattening  out  of  the
respiration-curves  for  about  20  seconds.  When,  however,
the  subject  commenced  the  deep  respiration  which  he
usually  employed  in  order  to  "  bring  himseK  back,"  and
had  made  two  inspirations  and  expirations,  he  very
suddenly  began  to  sneeze  and  complained  of  a  sharp  and
nasty  smell.  This  seems  to  me  good  evidence  of  the
absence  of  the  sense  of  smell  during  the  trance-state.
The  phenomenon  itself  can  be  interpreted  in  two  ways  :
either  there  remained  enough  smelling-particles  in  the
nostrils  to  prodiice  the  reaction  when  the  olfactory  organ
had  regamed  its  sensitiveness,  or  an  excitation  of  the
olfactory  nerve  and  tract  occurred  already  during  trance,
but  could  not  lead  to  a  result  because  of  the  lessened
excitability  of  the  corresponding  centres  in  that  state.

The  Method  of  the  Psycho-Galvanic  Reflex.

Mr.  Whately  Smitli  has  put  forward  the  idea  {Proc.
S.P.B.,  Vol.  XXXT.,  p.  401)  that  these  problems  might  be
elucidated  with  the  help  of  the  phenomenon  known  as
the  psycho-galvanic  reflex,  already  inaugurated  by  Prince
and  Peterson  for  this  purpose.

There  seems  to  exist  a  difficulty  here,  which  Mr.  Whafcely
Smith  in  my  opinion  undervalues.  I  mean  the  loss  of
sensibility  which  encounters  us  in  most  trances  or  deep
hypnotic  istates.  Also  hyperaesthesia  may  obtain  here,  at
least  locally,  as  we  have  seen,  and  probably  as  a  sign  of
restitution.  In  light  hypnosis  we  also  often  meet  hjrper-
aesthesia,  mostly  I  should  think  as  a  secondary  symptom.
Mr.  Whately  Smith  observes,  however  (p.  409,  note),  that
in  cases  of  functional  anaesthesia  in  connection  with
dissociation  the  subject  will  re-act  just  as  well  on  the
anaesthesic  areas  as  on  the  normally  sensitive  ones.  But


xci.] Mechanism  of  So-Called  Mednmiistic  Trance  179

the  possibility,  not  to  say  the  probability,  exists  here
that  functional  disturbances  of  sensibihty  may  occur  which
do  not  depend — or  do  not  depend  solely — on  dissociation,
and  that  in  such  cases  the  disturbances  may  involve
changes  in  the  excitability  even  of  the  periplieral  sensitive
nerves  or  nerve-organs.  This  is  far  from  improbable,
because  such  changes  can  be  shown  to  exist  in  regard  to
motor  peripheral  nerves  in  the  deep  hyjmosis  of  certain
subjects.  The  electric  kritabihty  of  such  nerves  has  in
point  of  fact  been  found  to  be  considerably  lessened  in
such  a  state  (see  my  article  "  Problems  of  Hypnotism,"
Proc.  S.P.R.,  Vol.  XXXII.,  1921,  p.  169).  On  the  other
hand  this  irritability  has  been  found  to  be  increased  ui
certain  other  hypnotic  states,  and  Krafft-Ebuig  found  that
such  an  enhancement  could  be  observed  as  a  result  of
paralysis  by  suggestion  {Eine  experimenteUe  Studie  auf  dem
Gebiete  des  Hypnotismus,  3rd  ed.,  1893,  p.  62).  We  must
therefore  reckon  with  the  possibiUty  that  functional
anaesthesia  may  also  mean  a  decrease  of  nervous  excit-
ability stretching  down  as  far  as  to  the  periphery.  And  this
form  of  anaesthesia  ought  certainly  to  affect  the  psycho-
galvanic reflexes.

In  such  circumstances  it  would  seem  to  be  far  the
best  thing  to  begui  the  study  of  the  psycho-galvanic
reflex-phenomena  on  different  forms  of  hjrpnosis,  for
instance,  on  hypnosis  with  hemilateral  changes,  and,
perhaps  most  important  of  aU,  on  forms  where  the  anaes-
thesia has  been  produced  by  suggestion,  or  by  passes,  or
by  the  deep  hypnosis  itself.  When  all  this  has  been
cleared  up  the  time  may  be  ripe  to  attack  the  "  big
problem "  proposed  by  Mr.  Whately  Smith.

I  have  entered  rather  deeply  mto  this  question,  because
1  am  of  the  opinion  that  the  psycho-galvanic  reflex  really
is  an  important  method  for  our  purpose,  and  because
Professor  Veraguth  himself,  the  uiventor  of  the  method,
proposed  to  me  some  time  ago  to  use  it  in  order  to
examine  if  the  changes  in  the  sensibihty  brought  about
by  passes  are  of  a  peripheral  nature  or  not.  I  have  not
yet,  however,  had  the  opportunity  to  do  this.  I  hope  now
that  Mr.  Whately  Smith,  with  his  large  experience  of  how

M


180


Dr.  Sydney  Alrutz


[part


this  method  works,  will  devote  some  of  his  time  and
interest  to  the  application  of  it  to  the  important  neuro-
logical problems  which  I  have  put  forward  and  discussed
here.

Conclusion.

I  hope  that  what  I  have  advanced  in  this  paper  justifies
the  following  assertion.  If  we  have  comjjlete  and  clearly
formulated  examinations  of  how  a  medium  behaves  and
reacts  in  different  states  to  questions  and  suggestions,  how
his  or  her  senses,  pulse,  respiration  and  reflexes  function,
etc.,  we  can  with  much  greater  confidence  decide  to  what
hypnotic  level  a  certain  trance  condition  per  se  corresponds,
and  consequently  also  what  sort  of  mental  activity  the
medium  himself  in  such  a  condition  is  capable  of,  e.g.  if
he  is  suggestible  or  not,  and  also  what  kind  of  suggesti-
bility exists.  And  we  might  also  be  able  to  decide  if
the  trance  condition  is  of  a  kind  which  permits  the
receiving  of  real  telepathic  impressions  or  not.

Furthermore,  when  we  encounter  trance  states  where
certain  curious  upheavals  or  restitutions  occur  which
sometimes  seem  to  form  a  "  personality  "  of  some  kind  or
other,  if  we  then  examine  also  these  personalities  not  only
from  a  psychological  but  also  from  a  neurological  point
of  view,  we  shall  be  able  to  distinguish  better  between
the  medium's  "  own  "  states  and  the  foreign  ones,  and
consequently  be  in  a  more  favourable  position  to  judge  of
the  origin  and  nature  of  the  latter.


XCI.

I


Method  of  Scoring  Coincidences


.181


A  METHOD  OF  SCORING  COINCIDENCES  IN
TESTS  WITH  PLAYING  CARDS.

By  R.  a.  Fisher,  M.A.,

Fellow  of  Gonville  and  Cains  College,  Cambridge  : Chief  Statistician,
Rothamsted  Experimental  Station.

The  problem  of  scoring  a  series  of  possible  events  so  as  to
measure  appropriately  the  degree  of  success  attained  in
each  trial  seems  to  He  on  the  borderline  between  the
purely  deductive  region  of  mathematical  probability  and
the  region  of  arbitrary  choice.  The  particular  problem  in
respect  of  which  this  note  is  written  serves  to  illustrate
what  abstract  principles  are  available  in  arriving  at  a
rational  system  of  scormg,  and  may  be  of  use  in  dealuig
with  more  complex  cases.

If  two  playing  cards  are  obtained  from  different  packs,
the  maximum  degree  of  success  is  clearly  obtained  if  they
are  corresponding  cards  of  the  same  suit  ;  but,  short  of
this  we  shall  have  obtamed  some  degree  of  resemblance  if
the  cards  are  either  corresponding  cards  of  different  suits
or  if  they  are  of  the  same  suit.  A  lower  degree  of  success,
but  still  one  which  is  worth  counting,  will  have  been
attained  if  the  two  cards  are  of  the  same  rank  (both
plain  or  both  picture  cards),  or  even  if  they  are  of  the
same  colour.  There  are  in  fact  nine  possibilities,  to  each
of  which  we  need  assign  an  appropriate  score,  and  these
wiU  be  represented  as  follows  :

00 No resemblance, a j^lain card and a picture card  of

different  colours.
CO A  plain  card  and  a  picture  card  of  the  same  colour,  but

of  different  suits.
SO A  plain  card  and  a  picture  card  of  the  same  suit.
OR Both  plain  or  both  picture  cards  of  different  colours.


182


R.  A.  Fisher


[PAET


CR Both  plain  or  both  picture  cards of  the  same  colour,

but  of  different  suits.
SR Both  plain  or  both  picture  cards  of  the  same  suit.
ON Corresponding  cards  of  different  colours.
CN Corresponding  cards  of  the  same  colour,  but  of  different

siiits.  \
SN Corresponding  cards  of  the  same  suit.

If  the  cards  are  both  plain  or  both  picture  cards  we
may  speak  of  them  as  having  the  same  rank  ;  if  they  are
corresponding  cards  we  may  speak  of  them  as  having  the
same  value,  using  this  term  to  include  the  distinction
between  Knave,  Queen  and  King.

There  are  certain  conditions  respecting  the  order  of  tht,
classes,  which  any  satisfactory  system  of  scoring  musi
satisfy.  It  is  evident  that  each  S  class  must  score  more
than  the  corresponding  C  class,  and  still  more  than  the
corresponding  0  class  ;  equally  each  N  class  must  score
more  than  the  corresponding  R  class,  and  still  more  than
the  corresponding  0  class.  These  fundamental  conditions
may  be  represented  in  the  following  diagram,  in  whic^  ^
the  arrows  point,  in  each  case  from  a  class  with  the  lowe.
to  a  class  with  tlie  higher  score  :

^OR  . ^CN  i
00" 'CR  'SN
"'CO"''  "'SR^'

^so-^

These  conditions  as  to  the  order  of  the  scores  still
leave  much  latitude  as  to  the  actual  scores  to  be  assigned
to  each  class.  In  order  to  proceed  further  it  is  necessary
to  take  account  of  the  relative  rarity,  upon  purely  random
conditions,  of  the  several  possible  classes.

A  circimistance  which  gives  a  clue  to  a  rational  system
of  scoring  is  that  in  every  one  of  the  three  groups  0,
R  and  N,  the  class  S  differs  from  the  class  C  in  being
right  instead  of  wrong  on  an  even  chance  ;  for,  given  that
the  cards  are  of  the  same  colour,  it  is  an  even  chance
that  they  wiJl  also  be  of  the  same  suit,  consequently  the


AET


our,


xci.]  Method  of  Scoring  Coincidences  183

difference  iu  score  between  SO  and  CO,  should  be  the
same  as  the  difference  in  score  between  SR  and  CR,  and
the  same  as  the  difference  between  SN  and  CN.  Also
each  C  class  differs  from  the  corresponding  0  class  in
being  right  instead  of  wrong  on  an  even  chance,  and  we
may,  i£  not  as  a  logical  necessity,  at  least  as  a  rational
convention,  postulate  that  each  C  class  shall  exceed  the
corresponding  0  class  in  score  by  as  much  as  it  is  exceeded
by  the  corresponding  S  class.  If  the  difference  in  score
between  each  of  these  6  paks  of  classes  be  x  units,  evi-
dently each  S  class  will  exceed  the  corresponding  0  class
by  2x  xmits.

.  There  is,  I  think,  only  one  rational  generalisation  of
this  rule,  namely,  that  if  the  best  class  of  a  group  of
classes  occurs  in  random  samples  of  that  group  once  in
n  trials,  then  its  score  differs  from  the  lowest  score  in  the
group  by  a  quantity  proportional  to  the  logarithm  of  7i.

If  we  accept  this  rule  the  determination  of  the  relative
scores  in  the  R  and  ISl  classes  becomes  purely  a  problem
probabihty  ;  the  cards  wUl  be  of  the  same  rank  109
.jiimes  in  169  random  samples,  and  of  these  13  give  the
same  value  ;  the  differences  between  the  nine  classes  wiU
therefore  be  proportional  to  the  following :

C  =  log  2=  -3010300
S=2C =  -6020600

B=logi^=  -1904602
109

N  =  log  13  =  1-1139434;
giving  the  following  9  scores  :

-0  -R  -X

O- 0  -1904602  1-1139434

C- -3010300 -4914902  1-4149734
S- -6020600 -7925202  1-7160034.

It  is  a  matter  of  indifference  to  the  principle  upon
which  these  values  ^^•ere  obtained,  and  to  our  actual
conclusions  from  any  experiment,  if  these  scores  are
altered  either  by  adcUng  any  constant  value  to  all  the
scores,  or  by  multiplying  them  by  any  factor,  or  by  both


184


B.  A.  Fisher


[PAET


processes.  Their  application  to  practical  tests  will,  however,
require  comparison  to  be  made  with  the  mean  value,  and
with  the  standard  deviation.  To  simplify  these  applications
it  will  probably  be  most  convenient  to  bring  the  mean
value  to  zero,  so  that  in  any  experiment  the  observed
mean  score  shall  measure  the  actual  deviation  from  the
mean  to  be  expected  upon  purely  random  conditions.
It  will  also  be  convenient  to  make  the  standard  deviation
to  take  some  simple  value,  such  as  10,  in  order  to  facili-
tate tests  of  whether  the  observed  deviation  from  expecta-
tion is  really  significant  of  something  more  thaii  chance.
If  we  do  this  the  following  scores  are  obtained  :


-0

-R

-N

0-

-11-18

-6-11

+  18-50

C-

-  3-16

+  1-91

+  26-53

s-

+  4-86

+  9-94

+  34-55.

Using  these  scores  the  statistical  significance  of  a  series
of  observations  may  be  tested  by  calculating  the  average
score,  and  comparing  it  to  its  standard  error  10/Jn,
where  n  is  the  number  of  observations  averaged.

To  illustrate  this  test  I  am  indebted  to  Dr.  V.  J.
Woolley  for  the  following  results  of  49  cards  drawings
under  approximately  random  conditions  ;  the  numbers  of
occurrences  in  each  class  were


-0

-R

-N

0-

10

18

1

c-

1

C)

2

s-

3

7

1

The  total  score  on  the  above  system  is -31-21,  from
which  the  mean  score  is -0-64;  the  square  root  of  49  is  7,
so  that  the  standard  error  is  10/7  =  1-43.  The  mean  score
is  thus,  in  this  case,  negative,  and  distinctly  less  than  the
standard  error.  In  all  cases  where  the  mean  score  is  less
than  twice  its  standard  error  it  is  unsafe  to  argue  that
any  cause  other  than  pure  chance  is  required  to  produce
the  observed  deviation  from  expectation.

Some  error  is  necessarily  introduced  by  using  a  limited
number  of  decimal  places. If  we  use  two  places,  as  above,


XCI.]  Method  of  Scoring  Coincidences  185

the  scoring  appears  to  be  sufficiently  accurate  for  dealing
with  samples  up  to  a  hundred  million  ;  if  we  cut  off  the
last  place  the  bias  begins  to  show  at  about  17,000.
Very  little  labour  is,  however,  saved  by  excluding  the
extra  figure,  and  if  we  retain  it  the  error  is  quite  negligible
even  if  a  large  body  of  data  is  compiled  on  this  system
from  different  sources.

Summary.

To  each  guess  is  allotted  one  of  the  following  scores  :


Nothing  correct- ......  -11-18

Rank {i.e. plain or picture) correct,  but

nothing  else - - - - - -  -  6-11

Colour  correct,  but  nothing  else - - -  -  3-16

Colour  and  rank  correct - - - - -  +1-91

Suit  correct,  but  nothing  else  - - - -  +  4'86

Suit  and  rank  correct - - - - -  +  9-94

Value  correct,  but  colour  wrong - - -  + 18-50

Value  and  colour  correct,  but  suit  wrong -  +26'53

Value  and  suit  correct .....  +34-55


If  the  average  score  of  n  guesses  is  greater  than  twice
~j-  we are jastified in assuming that the guesses  are

more  accurate  than  we  should  expect  them  to  be  if  they
were  due  entirely  to  chance.


186


Eleanor  Mildred  SidgivicJc


[part


REVIEWS.

The  "  Oscar  Wilde  "  Script.

I.  Psychic Ilessages  frotn Oscar Wilde. Edited by  Hester

Travers  Smith,  with  a  preface  by  Sir  Wu.liam  Barrett,
F.R.S.  (Published  by  T.  Werner  Laurie  Ltd.,  London,  1924.
8vo. Pp.  179.)

II.  "  A  New  Message  from  Oscar  Wilde,"  with  introduction  and
discussion  by  Mr.  V.'s  brother.  [Occult  Review  for
November,  1923.)

III.  "  The  Oscar  Wilde  Scri2)t :  A  Criticpie  by  the  brother  of  31  r.  F."
{Psycltic  Science  for  January,  1924.)

I  SHALL  refer  to  the  above-mentioned  book  and  articles  in  what
follows  as  I.,  II.,  and  III.  The  "  messages  "  with  which  they  are
concerned  came  through  Mx.  V.  by  automatic  writing,  or  Mrs.
Travers  Smith  by  an  ouija-board,  and  all  between  June  8  and
October  8,  1923,  except  that  Mrs.  Travers  Smith  has  included  in
her  book  two  fragments  of  later  date  (Dec.  14,  1923,  and  January
4,  1924).  The  majority  of  them  have  been  published  from  time
to  time  in  newspapers  and  periodicals,  and  have  excited  con-
siderable interest.  But  this  scattered  pubUcation  does  not  afford
a  convenient  means  of  studying  them,  and  aU  serious  students
of  automatism  will  welcome  both  Mrs.  Travers  Smith's  book,
bringing  together  a  number  of  the  scrii^ts,  and  the  very  valuable
discussion  of  Mi\  V.'s  script  by  his  brother.  For  there  is  no
doubt  that  these  communications,  some  twenty-five  in  number
and  generally  of  considerable  length,  professing  to  come  from  Oscar
Wilde,  suggesting  his  style  throughout  and  (in  the  automatic
scrij^t)  his  handwriting,  and  also  mentionmg  a  few  true
incidents  in  his  life  of  which  the  automatists  had  no  conscious
knowledge — there  is  no  doubt  that  these  communications  form
an  addition  to  our  knowledge  of  automatism  which  no  one
studying  the  subject  can  afford  to  neglect.  But  when  we
examine  them  m  detail,  and  especially  when  we  look  for  the  source
of  the  inspiration — the  mmd  directing  the  script — and  ask  e.g.


XCI.]


Reviews


187


if  Oscar  Wilde  was  really  concerned,  many  difficulties  present
themselves.  No  hypothesis  so  far  formulated  is  without  them,
and  the  scripts  raise  problems  rather  than  solve  them.

Before  describing  the  development  of  the  communications
it  may  be  well  to  point  out  that  "  messages,"  though  a  con-
venient name  for  them,  is  perhaps  a  little  misleading.  For
there  is  no  suggestion  that  Oscar  Wilde  had  anything  he  wanted
specially  to  say  except  when  attempting  to  give  some  reminis-
cences which  might  afford  evidence  of  identity  (see  especially
I.  pp.  65-67  and  III.  320-323).  For  the  rest  the  communications
seem  for  the  most  part  attempts  to  amuse  and  interest  in
Oscar  Wilde's  manner  by  conversation  or  by  short  essays,  both
full  of  Avitty  or  cynical  epigrams,  intentional  exaggeration,
quaint  metaphors,  and  arresting  turns  of  phrase.

As  I  have  said,  two  automatists  were  concerned  in  the  pro-
duction of  these  scripts,  and  on  the  first  appearance  of  "  Oscar
Wilde  "  they  were  workmg  together.  Neither,  however,  had
any  special  interest  in  Wilde,  nor  are  they  aware  of  anything
having  occurred  to  recall  his  memory,  and  neither  was  well  read
in  Wilde's  witings,  though  Mrs.  Travers  Smith  had  read  more
than  Mr.  V.  Mr.  V.,  wishuig  if  possible  to  develop  a  power  of
automatic  writing,  had  jomed  a  class  held  by  Mi's.  Travers
Smith  for  the  purpose.  After  two  blank  sittings  his  hand
wrote  a  few  words  purportmg  to  come  from  a  deceased  friend,
and,  so  far  as  they  went,  appropriate  I  understand.  But  they
came  when  Mrs.  Travers  Smith's  hand  rested  lightly  oh  his,
and  without  partnership  of  this  sort  he  has  practically  not
succeeded  in  obtaming  automatic  writing  at  all — his  pencil
merely  taps  the  paper.  Nor  can  any  one  taken  at  random
serve  as  a  partner.  Mr.  V.  has  tried  with  a  good  many  in
vain,  but  in  the  scripts  before  us  three  ladies  besides  Mrs.
Travers  Smith  have  at  different  times  successfully  given  the
necessary  help  by  placing  hand  or  fingers  on  his  wrist.  One
question  that  arises  is,  m  what  way  does  this  partner  influence
the  writing  1  Does  she  merely  facilitate  it  by  increasmg  Mr.
V.'s  confidence  and  thus  perhaps  breaking  down  some  inhibition,
or  is  it  a  case  of  joint  automatism  ?  Does  the  partner's  mind
subconsciously  operate  jointly  with  Mr.  V.'s,  or  at  least  serve
jomtly  with  his  as  a  chamiel  of  communication  ■?  It  must  be
remembered  that  Mr.  V.  writes  with  his  eyes  shut,  and  is  not


188


Eleanor  Mildred  Sidgwich


[part


aware  at  the  moment  of  what  is  bemg  written  except  perhaps
a  word  now  and  then.^  In  fact  he  finds  it  advantageous  to
concentrate  his  mind  on  something  unconnected  with  the  work
in  hand — such  as  a  calculation  or  mathematical  question.  The
partner  on  the  other  hand  follows  the  writmg — or  at  least
Mrs.  Travers  Smith  does.^

At  the  next  sitting  they  had  the  same  deceased  friend  began,
"  I  want  my  daughter  Lily,  my  little  Lily,"  when  at  the  word
hly  anotlier  communicator  mtervened  with  the  words,  "  No
the  lily  is  mine  not  his  "  and  a  soi  disant  Oscar  Wilde  made
his  first  app.earance  and  took  possession  of  the  script.  It  is
not  unnatural  that  "  lily  "  should  suggest  Oscar  Wilde  to  any
one  who  remembers  the  aesthetic  movement  Avith  which  he  was
so  much  identified  in  the  last  quarter  of  the  nineteenth  century,
and  the  caricatures  of  it  by  Punch  and  Gilbert  and  Sullivan,  etc.
But  did  it  merely  suggest  hioi  to  the  subliminal  consciousness
of  the  automatist,  or  did  the  suggestion  give  Oscar  Wilde
himself  the  opjjortunity  of  coming  in  ?

The  script  on  that  day  (June  8th)  proceeded  in  a  style  and
handwriting  both  of  which  more  or  less  resembled  Oscar  Wilde's,
and  contamed  sentences  if  not  exactly  quoted  from,  at  any
rate  strongly  reminiscent  of,  sentences  in  his  writings.  One  of
these  apparently  came  from  a  work  Intentions  which  JVIr.  V.
had  not  read  but  which  Mrs.  Travers  Smith  had.  On  the  other
hand  there  is  a  sentence  almost  exactly  reproducing  one  in  a
letter  of  Mr.  V.'s  own — a  letter  descriptive  of  scenery — which  he
had  written  some  eight  years  previously,  and  which  was  recalled
to  the  memory  of  his  correspondent  and  unearthed  in  con-
sequence of  the  pubUcation  of  this  script  (see  III.  p.  314).
This  must,  one  supposes,  have  come  from  Mr.  V.'s  mmd,
though  he  had  no  conscious  recollection  of  it.

1  On  at  least  one  occasion,  however,  Oct.  8th,  1923,  when  Miss  Mac-
Gregor  was  his  partner,  he  seems  to  have  read  the  script  during  pauses
and  asked  questions  (see  II.  pp.  274-6).

2  There  is  I  think  a  difference,  not  easy  to  define,  in  tlie  style  of
communications  obtained  with  the  aid  of  three  of  the  partners.  The
fourth  was  Mrs.  Travers  Smith's  daughter,  who  took  her  mother's  place
in  the  middle  of  a  sitting,  with  the  result  that  the  writing  became  very
large  without  other  obvious  change.  For  what  is  said  in  the  scripts
about  the  relations  of  the  two  automatists,  see  below  p.  194.


XCI.]


Revleivs


189


Ten  days  later  Mr.  V.,  again  with  Mi-s.  Travers  Smith's
assistance,  produced  a  second  script  which  contamed,  among
other  things,  sarcastic  remarks  about  the  S.P.R.  m  Oscar  Wilde's
epigrammatic  manner.  The  siibject  was  probably  suggested
by  the  presence  of  our  Research  Officer,  Mr.  Dmgwall.  After
this,  begmning  from  that  evening,^  Mi-s.  Travers  Smith  obtained
frequent  "  Oscar  Wilde  "  communications  by  herself — usmg  an
ouija-board — an  instrument  with  which  she  is  a  very  expert
and  rapid  operator.

The  general  resemblance  to  Oscar  Wilde's  style  is  continued
in  the  communications  received  by  Mrs.  Travers  Smith  alone,
but  they  tend  to  be  less  spontaneous  and  more  conversatiojial,
the  subject  bemg  often  suggested  to  begin  with  by  the  auto-
matist  and  changed  by  questions  interposed.

Mrs.  Travers  Smith's  book,  which  I  have  numbered  I.  above,
contams  most  though  not  all  the  scripts  produced  by  Mr.  V.
with  her  as  partner  and  a  large  number  of  the  ouija-board
communications  received  by  her  during  the  period  in  question.
These  are  followed  by  several  chapters  of  analysis  and  dis-
cussion, pleasantly  written,  and  givmg  a  popular  account  of
arguments  for  and  against  various  theories  concernuig  the
intelhgence  behmd  the  scripts.

In  II.  we  have  two  long  scripts  produced  by  Mr.  V.  mth
the  hand  of  Miss  Helen  MaoGregor  (of  the  College  of  Psychic
Science)  on  his.  These  are  perhaps  the  most  interesting
scripts  of  the  series.  They  are  the  most  fully  developed  in
Kterary  form,  and  they  contain  the  most  vivid  and  lurid
imagery  m  then  account  of  the  communicator's  "  sort  of
amphibian  "  life  "in  the  twihght  of  existences  "  with  "  a  foot
in  either  world "  but  belonguig  "  properly  to  neither."  The
existence  of  the  communicator  in  twihght  is,  it  may  be  remarked,
spoken  of  in  several  scripts,  includmg  the  first,  and  is  possil)ly
reminiscent  of  Oscar  Wilde's  account  of  his  prison  hie.  The
two  scripts  in  II.  are  accompanied  by  very  interesting  and
careful  comment  and  discussion  by  Mr.  V.'s  brother.

This  comment  and  discussion,  but  now  covermg  the  whole  of
Mr.  V.'s  script,  is  continued  by  his  brother  in  III.  This  article,

1  This  date  is  an  inference  based  on  internal  evidence. It  does  not
,  quite  agree  with  the  dates  given  in  the  book,  but  this  is  probably  due
to  a  misprint. There  are  several  in  the  book.


190  Eleanor  Mildred  Sidgwick  [part

after  giving  a  list  (with  brief  descriptions)  of  the  scripts,  is
divided  into  three  sections.  The  first  is  a  careful  study  of  the
handwritmg,  comj)aring  it  in  detail  with  that  of  the  living
Oscar  Wilde.  (Facsimiles  of  both  are  given.)  There  were
definite  resemblances  in  the  first  script  of  the  series,  but  their
number  decidedly  increased  as  time  went  on,  becoming  remark-
ably complete  in  the  latest  scri^Dts.  This  need  not  have
surj)rised  us  very  much  if  Mr.  V.  had  been  familiar  with  the
handwriting,  for  to  imitate  (without  cojiymg)  a  marked  hand-
writing is  apparently  a  not  very  difficult  accomplishment  even
when  the  imitation  is  carried  on  through  many  pages. ^  But
the  puzzle  here  is  that  Mx.  V.  is  not  aware  of  having  ever
seen  Oscar  Wilde's  handwriting  before  the  first  script  was
written,  and  he  did  not  afterwards  see  any  tiU  all  the  scripts
were  written  except  a  "  Beheve  me  your  sincere  friend  Oscar
Wilde  "  which  appeared  m  the  Occult  Review  in  August  1923 —
that  is  about  the  middle  of  Mr.  V.'s  scriptic  activities  (III.
p.  305).  Mrs.  Travers  Smith  was  also  ignorant  of  the  handwriting
when  the  first  script  came,  but  she  made  investigations,  and
at  the  Chelsea  Book  Club  (I  think  between  the  first  script  and
the  second)  sav/  "  a  facsimile  of  Wilde's  writing  "  and  "  an
autograph  letter  of  his  "  which  "  happened  to  be  there  for
sale  "  (I.  p.  81).  Whether  the  knowledge  she  had  thus  acquired
influenced  the  scripts  at  aU  we  cannot  tell.  Nor  of  course  is
it  possible  to  assert  positively  that — though  they  do  not  Ue
about  m  every  book  shop — ^Mr.  V.  had  never  at  some  unknown
date  himself  accidentally  come  across  an  autograph  letter  of
Wilde's  (or  a  reproduction  of  one)  which,  while  making  no
permanent  impression  on  his  conscious  mind,  remained  imprmted
on  his  subhminal  memory.  However  this  may  be  the  hand-
writing remains  a  very  curious  and  interesting  problem.

The  second  section  of  III.  (pp.  305-315)  deals  with  Oscar
Wilde's  style,  and  compares  that  of  the  scripts  with  it.  Space
forbids  my  going  fully  into  this.  I  will  only  say  that  this
section  will  be  found  both  interestmg  and  instructive.  The
author  is  evidentlj^  very  familiar  with  Wilde's  witings  and  a

Mr.  V.'.s  brotlier  has  shown  this  as  regards  Oscar  Wilde's  handwriting
by  experiments  of  Iiis  own  described  in  a  letter  to  the  Occult  Review  of
March  1924.  And  I  have  known  of  similar  success  in  an  experiment
with  another  liandwriting  many  years  ago.


XCI.]


Reviews


191


great  admixer  of  them,  and  his  articles  wOl  I  thinly  convince  the
reader  that  there  are  many  real  Wildean  traits  in  the  script
though  Little  plagiarism  after  the  first  day.  But,  as  we
should  expect  whether  Oscar  Wilde  was  himself  concerned  or
not,  the  imitation,  though  it  improves,  is  not  in  Mr.  V.'s
brother's  opinion  equally  sustained  throughout  each  script.
Remarkably  characteristic  of  Wilde  ui  parts  it  is  not  apparently
unmixed  Wilde.  And  as  the  exteiit  to  which  style  can  be
successfully  imitated  is  not  only  a  matter  about  which  opinions
differ,  but  one  which  is  essentially  indefinite,  we  cannot  I
think  through  style  alone  obtain  conclusive  evidence  as  to
origin  any  more  than  we  can  through  handwriting.  This
section  ends  with  a  portion  of  the  letter  written  by  Mr.  V.
himself  in  191.5  to  which  I  referred  above,  from  which  a  phrase
is  plagiarised  or  at  least  repeated  in  the  first  script,  and  which
shows  a  way  of  looking  at  scenery  somewhat  Wildean  though
no  doubt  c|uite  unconsciously  so.

The  third  section  of  III.  concerns  the  subject  matter  of  the
scripts.  It  is  pointed  out  that  ideas  and  opinions  are  expressed
in  the  scripts — in  some  criticisms  of  modern  authors  for  instance — ■
which  are  not  Mr.  V.'s  ;  and  Mi's.  Travers  Smith  says  the  same
for  herself  (see  I.  p.  110).  Also  that  both  by  excess  and
defect  the  general  knowledge  exhibited  by  the  scripts  does  not
appear  to  coincide  with  that  of  Oscar  Wilde  in  his  lifetime.
We  find  in  the  scripts  for  instance  a  knowledge  of  wild  flowers,
and  again  of  the  history  of  astronomy,  both  of  which  might
well  have  come  from  Ivlr.  V.'s  mind  but  of  which  there  is  no
appearance  in  W^ilde's  writmgs.  On  the  other  hand  Oscar
Wilde  was  "  a  very  competent  Greek  scholar  "  and  "  often
adorned  his  prose  with  quotations  from  the  Classics  "  while
the  automatists  knew  but  little  of  Greek.  It  accords  with  this
that  no  Greek  quotations  appear  in  the  scripts,  and  that  classical
allusions,  even  though  "  thoroughly  characteristic  of  Wilde,"
seem  to  be  all  contained  in  The  Iliad  and  The  Odyssey,  trans-
lations of  which  Mr.  V.  had  read.  On  July  13th  the  script
gives  a  "  remarkabl}^  accurate  reproduction  of  a  passage  "  from
Butcher  and  Lang's  translation  of  The  Iliad,  read  by  Mr.  V.
some  years  before.  The  script  reads  :  "  On  that  wondrous
shield  forged  by  Hephaestos  for  Achilles,  on  which  was  depicted
the  whole  of  the  life  of  man  in  its  joy  and  sorrow,  we  are  told


192


Eleanor  Mildred  Sidgwick


[part


was  wrought  '  the  earth  and  the  sea  and  the  unwearyhig  sun,
the  Pleiads  and  the  Hyads  and  (her  ?)  that  men  call  the  Bear
who  watches  Orion,  and  alone  hath  no  part  in  the  baths  of
Ocean.'  "  The  passage  in  Butcher  and  Lang,  evidently  the
source  of  this,  runs  :  "  Then  wrought  he  the  earth  and  the
heavens  and  the  sea  and  the  unwearying  sun  and  the  moon
waxing  to  the  full  and  the  Signs  every  one  wherewith  the
heavens  are  crowned,  pleiads  and  hyads  and  Orion's  might,
and  the  Bear  that  men  call  the  Wain  her  that  turneth  in  her
place  and  watcheth  Orion,  and  alone  hath  no  part  in  the  baths
of  Ocean." (See  III.  p.  316  and  I.  p.  59.)

Various  allusions  in  the  scripts  are  traced  by  his  brother  to
knowledge  stored  in  Mr.  V.'s  mind  as  their  probable  or  possible
source,  but  space  will  not  allow  me  to  dwell  on  these.  We
must  proceed  to  incidents  in  Oscar  Wilde's  life  to  which  the
scripts  refer.

The  Oscar  Wilde  of  the  scripts,  though  he  complained  that
"it  is  so  difficult  to  drag  the  past  from  memory's  black  cave,"
did  on  July  20th  (see  I.  pp.  05-67)  "  descend  for  once  into
the  dull  abyss  of  facts,"  and  recounted  some  seven  or  eight
alleged  incidents  in  his  life.  Mr.  V.'s  brother  has  been  at
considerable  pains  to  verify  these,  and  has  succeeded  in  doing  so
in  the  majority  of  cases.  But  it  is  in  five  or  six  different  books,
biographies  of  Wilde  and  others,  that  the  evidence  is  found,
and  with  none  of  these  was  Mr.  V.  consciously  acquainted.
More  curious  still,  the  way  the  incident  is  told  in  some  cases
sufficiently  resembles  the  account  in  the  book  Avhich  furnishes
the  verification  to  suggest  that  the  book  was  the  actual  source
of  the  supposed  memory.  I  will  quote  the  strongest  instance
of  this.  The  script  says  : — "  Other  memories  .  .  .  lunching  with
Margot  Tennant,  Mrs.  Fox,  Blunt,  and  others  in  London — jioor
Asquith  was  hke  a  fish  out  of  water,  I  did  most  of  the  talliing —
and  afterwards  I  told  Margot  stories — stayed  behind."  In  My
Diaries,  by  Wilfrid  Scawen  Blunt,  pp.  178-9,  Mr.  V.'s  brother
finds  the  following  entry  (III.  p.  322)  "  17th  July.  A  brilhant
luncheon  with  Margot  and  her  husband  at  30  Upper  Grosvenor
Street  .  .  .  The  other  guests  were  Mrs.  Grenfell,  Mrs.  Daisy
White,  Ribblesdale,  his  brother  Reggie  Lister  and  Oscar  Wilde.
All  immensely  talkative,  so  that  it  Avas  almost  like  a  breakfast
in  France. Asquith  alone  rather  out  of  it. 1 sat  next  him


XCI.]


Reviews


193


and  was  rather  sorry  for  him,  though  he  was  probably  happy
enough.  After  the  rest  had  gone  away  Oscar  remained  telling
stories  to  me  and  Margot."  There  are  two  mistakes  in  the
script — the  lunch  occurred  after  Miss  Tennant's  marriage  to
Mr.  Asquith  and  no  Mrs.  Fox  appears  to  have  been  present.
The  occurrence  of  the  name  Fox  may  possibly,  a.s  Mr.  V.'s
brother  pomts  out,  be  due  to  confusion  with  another  reminis-
cence which  had  just  been  spoken  of  ui  which  that  name
should  have  occurred  but  did  not.

Of  course  if  documentary  evidence  of  the  reahty  of  an
incident  cannot  be  found,  the  chances  of  being  able  to  verify  it
at  this  distance  of  time  (Wilde  died  in  1900)  would  be  rather
poor.  It  would  be  Avise  therefore  in  furnishing  evidence  of
identity  to  choose  uacidents  of  which  there  are  printed  accounts.
But  are  we  to  suppose  that  Wilde  himself  knew  where  to  look  -
in  books  pubhshed  after  his  death  for  mcidents  he  could  use  ?
Or  is  it  possible  that  the  subUminal  consciousness  of  one  of
the  automatists  put  them  together  from  then-  o^^Tl  subUminal
store  of  memories  picked  up  from  reviews,  or  conversation,  or
books  casually  glanced  at,  etc.  ?  Perhaps  more  light  may  yet
be  obtamed  on  this  cpaestion.

Before  concluduig  I  will  call  attention  to  two  curious  con-
tradictions or  uiconsistencies  in  the  Wilde  communications  which
come  to  light  by  comparmg  those  pubhshed  in  I.  and  in  II.
and  which  seem  different  from  the  kmd  of  confusion  we  might
expect  owing  to  real  communications  passmg  thi-ough  the  mmds
of  different  automatists  and  being  contaminated  by  them.  The
first  inconsistency  concerns  the  sensations  experienced  by  "  Oscar
Wilde  "  m  entering  the  brain  of  living  human  beings.

In  script  of  July  2nd  (see  I.  pp.  17,  18),  written  by  Mr.  V.
with  ]Virs.  Travers  Smith  assisting,  "  Oscar  Wilde  "  describes
how  he  has  gazed  thi'ough  the  eyes  of  others  on  the  sights  of
the  world :  "  Once  on  a  pleasure  steamer  on  its  way  to  St.
(Jloud  I  saw  the  green  waters  of  the  Seine  and  the  hghts  of
Paris,  through  the  vision  of  a  httle  girl  who  clung  weepmg  to
her  mother  and  wondered  why  ...  It  may  surprise  you  to  learn
that  in  this  way  I  have  dipped  into  the  works  of  your  modern
novehsts.  That  is,  I  have  not  drawn  the  whole  brew,  but
tasted  the  vintage."

In  the  evening  of  the  same  day  through  the  ouija-board—


1


194  Eleanor  Mildred  Sidgwick  [part

Mr.  v.,  of  coiirse,  not  present — "  Oscar  Wilde  "  says  (I.  pp.  20,
21):  "I  will  go  on  and  tell  you  how  I  have  wandered  into  the
minds  of  the  moderns,  as  you  are  pleased  to  call  them.  It
is  a  rather  entertainmg  process.  I  watch  for  my  opportunity,
and  Avhen  the  propitious  moment  comes  I  leap  into  their
minds  and  gather  rapidly  these  impressions,  which  are  largely
collective."

But  in  the  scripts  of  September  and  October  given  in  II.,  in
which  Mrs.  Travers  Smith  did  not  take  part,  the  same  process
is  spoken  of  in  a  much  less  light-hearted  way.  In  these  scripts
"  Oscar  Wilde  "  seems  to  describe  his  existence  as  consisting
largely  of  successive  brief  occupation  of  different  human
organisms,  and  says  :  "  It  is  a  strange  thing,  this  birth
into  a  new  brain.  You  may  analyse  it  or  dissect  it  as  a
scientific  curiosity,  but  for  us  who  hang  in  fearful  poise  twixt
the  daylight  and  the  dark  it  is  an  experience  no  less  terrible
than  strange,  and  one  which  repetition  cannot  rob  of  its  terrors.
By  some  central  mystery  of  existence  Life's  oldest  pangs  must
accompany  Life's  newest  creations  "  (II.  p.  271).

The  second  inconsistency  concerns  the  share  in  the  work  of
the  two  automatists.  At  the  ouija-board  on  June  18  (see  I.
p.  13)  "  Oscar  Wilde  "  was  asked  :  "  Who  did  you  communicate
through  at  the  sitting  for  automatic  writing  this  afternoon  ?
Through  Mr.  V.,  or  through  Mrs.  Travers  Smith  ?  "  He
replied  :  "  Through  you  dear  lady.  He  is  a  tool.  You  are
the  hght  that  lets  me  peep  again  into  the  world  that  seems  so
dazzling,  now  that  the  Divine  Justice  finds  it  His  pleasure  to
keep  me  m  dim  twihght."

And  again  through  the  ouija-board  on  July  2  (see  I.  pp.
21,  22)  when  asked  :  "  How  do  you  manage  when  Mr.  V.  and
I  are  together."  He  replies  :  "  I  can  control  his  hand,  I  can
only  control  your  mind. Your  hand  is  guided  by  your  mind."

And  again  on  July  5th,  when  asked  by  Mrs.  Travers  Smith
why  he  selected  her  as  his  medium,  he  gave  an  answer  too
long  to  quote  here,  but  in  the  course  of  it  said  (I.  pp.  35,  36)  :
"  I  tried  many  times  to  secure  a  vial  for  my  ideas  .  .  .  But
until  the  day  when  I  seized  the  pencil  from  some  unnoticeable
being,  who  seemed  to  make  an  effort  to  press  through  the
brain  of  '  the  tool  '  never  before  had  I  found  the  exact  quality
I  needed  ...  I  can  use  the  hand  of  the  tool.  .  .  .  But  his  brainy


XCI.]


Reviews


195


does  not  serve  me.  I  cannot  use  it,  for  ideas  would  stick
there  as  flies  do  in  a  cloyed  mass."

What  has  been  said  in  the  course  of  this  review  about  the
use  in  the  scripts  of  material  in  Mr.  V.'s  mind  is  in  itself  a
sufficient  disproof  of  this  account  of  the  matter.  But,  farther,
these  ouija-board  statements  are  flatly  contradicted  in  a  script
written  by  Mr.  V.  with  Mrs.  Travers  Smith  as  his  partner  on
July  20th,  1923.  In  a  part  of  this  script  not  included  in  Mrs.
Travers  Smith's  book,  but  published  in  the  Sunday  Ex-press  of
August  5th,  1923,  the  following  sentences  occur  and  have
been  copied  for  me  :  "  Oscar  Wilde  ...  It  is  through  your
temperament  that  I  am  al)le  to  give  my  thoughts  to  tlie  world.
You  have  that  curious  combination  of  the  literary  and  scientific
temperament  which  creates  a  sort  of  psychic  aftlruty  with
myself.  It  is  true  that  one  of  the  ladies  here  supplies  a
certain  motive  force — just  as  an  electric  machine  must  have  its
'  starters  '  or  whatever  one  may  call  them.  But  these  are
merely  the  accessories  and  the  accessories  are  not  the  machine.
Tlie  machine  I  use  is  your  human  temperament.  So  please
remember  that  there  is  only  one  Oscar  Wdde  and  that  you
are  his  prophet."

Nor  is  this  all,  for  it  does  not  seem  possible  to  reconcile
either  the  ouija-board  statements  or  the  script  . just  quoted  with
the  following  curious  statements  made  in  the  script  of  October
8th  when  Mr.  V.  wrote  with  Miss  MacGregor  as  a  partner  (II.
p.  275).  "  Oscar  Wilde  "  had  been  speaking  of  his  experiences
when  attached  to  different  brains,  and  Mr.  V.  asked  :  "  To  whose
brain  are  you  attached  at  present  ?  Ansicer :  To  your
own.  Question  :  How  is  it  you  are  able  to  communicate
through  Mrs.  Travers  Smith  if,  as  you  say,  you  are  imprisoned
in  my  brain  ?  Answer  :  That  is  most  probably  another  part
of  myself,  a  poor  fellow-unfortunate  who  suffers  even  as  I
suffer.  Question'  :  What  do  you  mean  ?  Surely  there  are  not
two  Oscar  Wildes  ?  Answer  :  Does  that  cause  you  to  wonder  ?
Yes,  it  reaUy  is  so.  Quite  possibly  our  name  is  legion.  The
soul  is  no  indivisible  iinity,  no  solitary  shadow  seated  in  its
house  of  sin.  It  is  a  thmg,  highly  complex,  built  up,  layer
upon  layer  .  .  .,  etc."

It  will  be  remembered  that  two  of  our  ex-presidents  in  their
presidential  addresses — Mr.  Gerald  Balfour  in  1906  [Proceedings,


19b


Eleanor  Mildred  Sidgwick


[part


Vol.  XIX.),  and  Dr.  McDoiigall  in  1920  {Proceedings,  Vol.  XXXI.)
— suggested  that  we  are  in  this  world  polypsychic  beings,  and
Mr.  McDougall  discussed  this  hypothesis  in  some  detail.  Mr.
v.,  however,  has  no  recollection  of  having  read,  or  thought
about  this  hypothesis,  and  the  subordinate  personahties  are
not  I  think  conceived  by  either  Mr.  Balfour  or  Mr.  McDougall
as  continuing  after  death  a  separate  and  independent  existence
in  which  they  can  masquerade  as  the  dominant  personality
wliile  they  Uve  in  the  hope  of  some  day  being  reunited  to  it
as  the  Oscar  Wilde  of  the  script  of  October  8th  professes  to  do.
"  I  yearn,"  he  says,  "  to  be  united  to  my  soul.  Somewhen
and  somewhere  I  must  surely  meet  my  soul  again.  That  is
my  little  taper  of  hope  in  infinite  darkness."

But  my  paper  is  already  too  long,  and  I  think  I  have  said
enough  to  justify  what  I  remarked  at  the  beginning,  namely  that
these  scripts  raise  problems  rather  than  solve  them.  For  myself  |
I  find  it  impossible  to  decide  on  the  evidence  before  us  whether
it  is  most  probable,  or  should  we  say  least  improbable,  that
we  have  here  to  do  with  an  extraordinarily  full  development  of
subliminal  power  both  as  regards  imagination,  dramatisation
and  memory,  or  on  the  other  hand  with  some  distorted  element
of  Oscar  Wilde  inspiring  the  scripts.  Or,  again,  is  it  conceivable
that  there  is  some  kind  of  combination  of  the  two.  I  believe
that  Mr.  V.  and  his  brother  are  in  the  same  attitude  of
complete  suspense  of  judgment  as  myself,  while  Mrs.  Travers
Smith,  if  I  understand  her  rightly,  inclines  to  the  spiritualistic
hypothesis.  But  both  those  who  feel  able  to  come  to  a  con-
clusion and  those  who  do  not  will  agree  that  we  have  here  an
important  addition  to  our  knowledge  of  facts  concerning
automatism.

Eleanor  Mildred  Sid o wick.

Problems  of  Belief.  By  F.  C.  S.  Schiller,  D.Sc.  "Library
of  Philosophy  and  Religion."  (Hodder  &  Stoughton.
1924. Price  3s.  6d.  net.)

No  one  can  have  followed,  even  sjooradically  and  unprofession-
ally,  the  controversies  of  the  last  forty  years  without  perceiving
the  crisis  through  which  philosophy  and  religion  are  passing.
The  questions  raised  are  "  Can  any  philosophy  be  true  t Is  any


i


XCI.]


Reviews


197


religion  true  '?  "  and  the  answers  seem  to  be  in  the  negative  to
both  questions.  Mr.  Schiller,  no  doubt,  would  quarrel  with  this
statement  and  retort — "  What  do  you  mean  by  true  ?  "  involv-
ing one  at  once  in  the  whole  controversy  about  "  pragmatism."
On  that  ground,  so  far  as  it  is  a  question  of  logic,  he  has
nothing  new  to  advance.  But  if  a  reader  prefers  to  consider
the  way  in  which  men  do,  in  fact,  arrive  at  then-  conclusions,
he  will  find  this  book  full  of  interest.  Sometimes  the  human
mind  will  seem  merely  grotesque  or  mad,  as  in  the  account  of
Jeremiah,  the  Indian  chief,  who  conducted  three  times  a  day,
for  a  naked  congregation,  a  service  which  consisted  in  repeating
ten  times  over  the  English  alphabet  and  the  numbers  from  one
to  ten.  Sometimes  it  will  a.ppear  dishonest,  sometimes  confused,
sometimes  pitifully  inadequate  ;  with,  always,  that  little  lamp
of  what  we  call  reason  floating  so  desolately  on  so  vast  a  sea
of  instmcts,  desires,  hopes,  fears,  passions,  cupidities,  necessities.
And  he  will  be  a  bold  or  an  uiiimagmative  man,  Avho  is  not
constrained  to  say  m  the  end  :  There,  but  for  the  Grace  of
God,  go  I."

The  analysis  and  classification  of  all  this  chaos  of  beliefs
is  a  principal  object  and  achievement  of  this  little  book.
But  it  has  other  piirposes.  One,  perhaps  too  promuient,  is  a
further  attack  on  those  forms  of  ideahsm  agamst  which  Mr.
Schiller  has  so  long  been  tilting.  Possibly  residence  in  Oxford
has  made  him  exaggerate  the  importance  of  these  would-
be  rational  philosophies.  Perhaps  too,  in  his  controversial  zeal,
he  neglects  the  real  qualities  of  some  of  the  men  he  attacks.
The  present  reviewer,  at  any  rate,  when  he  thinks  of  Plato
and  Spinoza  and  even  Hegel  does  not  feel  them  to  be  the
merely  ridiculous  or  dishonest  figures  that  they  are  apt  to
appear  in  Mr.  Schiller's  polemics.  That,  no  doubt,  is  because
philosophers  of  that  kmd  are  also  poets  ;  and  one  does  not
laugh  at  or  quarrel  with  Dante  because  one  does  not  accept
his  theology.  But  that  by  the  way,  for  it  is  not,  hi  this  book,
the  important  pomt.

The  important  point  is  Mr.  SchiUer's  insistence  on  the  real
character  of  the  beliefs  that  may  claim  to  be  scientific  ;  how
relative,  how  tentative,  how  modest  they  are,  m  the  minds  of
their  best  exponents.  And  since  it  is  here,  if  anywhere,  that
the  possibility  of  human  progress  lies, the  service  done  is  a


108


Cr.  Lowes  Dickinson


[part


real  one.  Science  has  to  steer  its  way  betAveen  credulity  and
scepticism  ;  and  how  arduous  that  tasit  is  those  l^est  know  who
have  tried  to  perforin  it.

Perhajjs  the  most  important  of  Mr.  Schiller's  points  is  the
one  he  makes  about  the  connection  of  belief  with  action.
Can  you  be  said,  really,  to  believe  anything,  unless  you  are
prepared  to  act  upon  it  ?  Broadly,  and  admitting  qualifica-
tions, Mr.  Schiller  says  "  No."  And  certainly  for  the  truths
of  morals,  action  is  a  real  and  searching  test,  the  candid
application  of  which  must  make  most  of  us  feel  uncomfortable.
Moral  genius  implies  the  power  of  living  the  beliefs  that
are  professed.  But  it  implies  also  that  the  beliefs  shall  be
"  true."  In  what  sense  ?  Mr.  Schiller  would  like  to  reply,
and  does  in  great  part  reply,  in  the  sense  that  they  tend  to
survival.  Clearly,  however,  they  do  not  tend  to  the  survival
of  the  genius  who  propounds  them  ;  or  Socrates  would  not
have  been  heralocked,  nor  Jesus  crucified.  It  may  be  said,
however,  that  they  tend  to  stu  vive  in  others  ;  and,  if  not,  they
are  false.  But  something  hi  us  certainly  rebels  against  this
doctrine.  We  remember  "  si  fractus  illabatur  orbis,  Impavidum
ferient  ruinae  "  ;  whicli  brings  one  quickly  to  the  question  of
o])timism  and  pessimism  ;  for  it  is  optimism  that  assumes
that  the  true  valuations  survive,  and  pessimism  that  holds  the
contrary.  This  question  of  ojitimism  and  pessimism  Mi'.
Schiller  discusses  ;  concluding  apparently  that  it  is  an  open
question,  and  that  there  is  a  fair  choice  between  the  alter-
natives. If  uideed  the  pessimists  shoAA'ed  signs  of  being  extin-
guished, he  seems  to  think  that  then-  doctrine  would  be  false.
But  in  fact  they  survive.  So,  by  that  test,  pessimism  might  be
"  true."  Anyhow  Mr.  Schiller  is  himself  enough  of  a  pessimist
to  hold  that  optimism  requires  the  admixture  of  a  good  deal
of  pessimism  before  it  becomes  anything  but  frivolous.  "  Sur-
vival "  does  not  helj)  to  conclusions  about  truth  in  this  case,
nor  yet  in  other  dilemmas,  such  as  that  of  determinism  or  free
will.  Mr.  Schiller  says  that,  in  such  cases,  we  can  and  should
choose,  and  ovu-  choice  may  affect  the  course  of  the  wox'ld,
however  faintly.  Perhaps.  But  all  this  seems  to  be  a  hazardous
skating  over  the  jjrecarious  smiace  of  our  dangerous  world.
There  comes  a  pomt,  in  these  discussions,  at  which  si:)eech
seems  inadequate, unless  it  be  the  speech  of  poets  or  sauits.


XCI.]


Reviews


199


But  it  is  not  always,  or  commoiily,  that  we  are  effectively
brought  up  against  such  issues.  And  for  the  issues  of  common
life  Mr.  Schiller  has  indicated  very  fruitfully,  both  how  men
do  form  behefs,  and  how  they  should  form  them.

One  of  the  questions  he  touches  on  is  of  peculiar  interest  to
the  iS.P.R.,  for  it  is  the  question  of  survival  after  death.
Many  years  ago,  as  is  well  known  to  the  older  members  of  the
society,  Mr.  Schiller  and  Mr.  Hodgson  sent  out  a  question-
naire enquuing  what  the  recipients  believed,  hoped,  feared,
and  so  on,  about  that  problem.  The  replies,  some  of  which
are  quoted  here,  showed  great  diversity  of  opinion  and  much
reluctance  to  attempt  to  pursue  the  question  in  a  scientific  way.
This  reluctance  most  people  must  have  come  across,  and  it
seems  to  be  due  partly  to  disbelief  in  there  being  any  method
of  enquiry,  partly  to  a  desire  to  beheve,  or  disbelieve,  what  one
wants.  Mr.  Schiller  discusses  the  reasons  for  this  attitude
and  concludes  that  they  are  serious  obstacles  in.  the  path  of
enquiry.  "  I  have  not  yet  despaired,"  he  concludes,  "  of  the
S.P.R.,  but  I  realise  that  its  path  lies  through  a  terrible
complex  of  conflicthig  emotions."  When  to  this  is  added  the
difficulty  that  people  are  almost  ine\dtably  either  unduly
credulous  or  unduly  sceptical,  and  that  it  is  very  hard  to  know
what  degree  of  either  quality  is  really  "  scientific,"  the  obstacles
to  the  work  of  the  Society  seem  formidable.  But  w-e  have  no
right  to  pronounce  them  insuperable,  and  it  ^^'ould  be  very
"  unpragmatic  "  to  do  so.

G.  Lowes  Dickinson.

MaJcing  of  Man;  a  Study  in  Evolution. By  Sir  Oliver  Lodge,
F.R.S (Pp.  Lx  +185. Hodder  and  Stoughton.  6s.)

In  this  book  Sir  Oliver  Lodge  discusses  the  Evolution  and
Destiny  of  man  from  a  somewhat  novel  standpoint.  Realising
to  the  full  the  achievements  of  physical  science,  and  in  no
way  underestimating  the  rigidity  of  its  demonstrations,  he
none  the  less  considers  that  there  is  ample  place  for  a  super-
physical  order  of  reality — a  reality  distinguished  from  that
with  which  jihysicists  normally  deal  by  permanence  and  im-
munity from  decay.  This  order  of  existence  he  associates  with
the  Ether  as opposed to Matter, though he considers  that


200


W.  Whately  Smith


interaction  between  the  two  may  and,  indeed,  habitually  does
take  place.

An  original  and  interesting  view  is  developed  in  the  second
chapter,  "  The  Effort  of  Evolution,"  where  Sir  Oliver  com-
pares Evil  with  "  inertia  " — a  fundamental  property  of  matter —
pointing  out  that  although  effort  implies  a  resistance,  that
resistance  need  not  necessarily  be  active — it  is  not  necessary
to  postulate  an  Evil  Force  deliberately  opposing  our  strivings
towards  perfection — for  the  opposition  encountered  may  be
merely  analogous  to  that  experienced  in  acceleratmg  a  mass  to
the  required  state  of  motion.

In  a  later  chapter  the  same  concej^tion  dominates  the
discussion  of  "  The  Best  of  All  Possible  Worlds,"  in  which  the
view  is  advanced  that  given  the  conditions  under  which
the  Universe  was  in  fact  evolved  the  World  is  as  perfect  as
is  possible.  Another  corollary  is  an  approximation  to  that  idea  of
the  nature  of  the  Deity  of  which  the  Rev.  Studdert  Kennedy
is  j^erhaps  the  most  notable  exponent  in  ecclesiastical  circles.
According  to  this  view  God  is  represented  not  as  Omnipotent
and  Omnisicient  Being  who,  for  inscrutable  reasons,  elects
to  permit  the  existence  of  Evil,  but  rather  as  a  beneficent
Power  demanding  and  needing  our  cooperation  in  combating
it — or  as  Sir  Oliver  would  say — in  overcoming  the  inherent
inertia  of  the  Universe.

The  book  is,  in  fact,  full  of  suggestive  passages  of  which
the  above  are  but  samples  taken  almost  at  random  and  is
certain  to  appeal  to  many  who,  while  unwilling  to  violate
the  established  conclusions  of  physical  science,  still  feel  the
need  for  behef  in  possibihties  transcendent  thereto.

W.  Whately  Smth.


PROCEEDINGS

■ ■  OF  THE  .

Society  for  Psychical  Research

PART  XCII.
DECEMBER.  1924

IN  MEMORIAM— GUSTAVE  GELEY.
1868-1924.

By  Sir  Oliver  Lodge.

The  sudden  and  untov/a.rd  calamity  which  has  removed
from  us  an  indefatigable  and  devoted  worker  in  meta-
psychic  science  calls  for  an  ai^preciation  of  his  personality
as  well  as  of  his  work.  Dr.  Geley  is  not  well  known  in
this  country  :  I  doubt  if  he  is  well  known  personally  in
any  country  except  in  France  and  Poland  ;  for,  whether
through  overwork  or  through  a  habit  of  concentrated
thinking,  there  was  an  outer  husk  to  break  through,
before  one  came  upon  the  man  himself.  The  first  time
I  saw  him  v/as  at  Mariemont,  Edgbaston,  in  1919,  when,
in  company  with  Mr.  Stanley  de  Brath,  he  called  upon  me
unexpectedly  one  afternoon  during  what  was  at  that  time
an  infrequent,  perhaps  exceptional,  visit  to  England.  I
too  was  very  busy  at  the  time  ;  and  though  he  brought
a  letter  of  introduction  from  my  friend  Charles  Richet,
calculated  to  predispose  me  in  his  favour,  I  found  him
rather  reserved  and  difficile.  Very  hkely  he  got  the  same
impression  of  me  ;  and  I  was  by  no  means  as  hospitable
as  I  v/ould  now  like  to  have  been. Doubtless  the  diffi-


202


Sir  Oliver  Lodge


[part


culty  of  language  and  of  nationality  is  partly  responsible  ;
but  something  of  the  same  kind  was  felt  at  first  by
others  whose  control  of  language  was  much  superior  to
my  own.  Later,  during  several  visits  to  France,  I  got
to  know  him  and  his  family,  and,  with  the  friendly
assistance  of  Madame  Geley,  felt  that  I  knew  him  better,
and  established  the  beginning  of  a  friendship.  Moreover,
I  met  at  his  house  some  delightful  people,  and  realised
the  importance  of  his  life  and  mission.

He  was  a  philosophic  thinker  of  no  small  magnitude.
His physiological and medical training gave him  many^
advantages,  he  was  well  read  in  the  writings  of  philoso-
phers  who had dealt with the relations between  the
conscious  and  the  unconscious,  and  he  had  made  a  special  j
study  of  the  views  of  M.  Bergson.

His  best  known  book,  De  Ulnconscient  au  Conscient}
aroused  the  attention  of  many  in  France.  In  it  he  tried
to  deal  with  the  philosophy  and  rationale  of  psycho-
physical phenomena  in  general,  and  it  may  be  regarded
as  the  most  important  treatise  on  that  aspect  of  the
subject  since  F.  W.  H.  Myers's  great  and  more  comprehen-
sive work.  Moreover,  Geley  had  the  advantage  of  being
better  acquainted  with  physiological  phenomena  (which  are
evidently  of  vital  importance  in  supernormal  psychology)
than  even  Myers  was.  And  whether  his  views  hold  their
ground,  whether  they  really  form  the  initial  chapter  of  a
new  science,  or  whether  they  are  destined  to  be  replaced
as  well  as  supplemented, — questions  which  cannot  be
lightly  or  quickly  decided, — they  are  certainly  based  on  an
apj)rehension  of  ectoplasmic  phenomena,  some  personally
apprehended,  some  collated  from  the  experience  of  others,
which,  as  far  as  I  know,  is  without  a  parallel.  Had  he
lived  there  seemed  every  prospect  of  our  learning  a  great
deal  more  through  his  indefatigable  work  amid  the  oppor-
tunities which  friends  of  the  subject  had  provided,  and  of
which,  with  rare  self-sacrifice  (comparable  with  that  of
Richard  Hodgson),  he  availed  himself  to  the  uttermost.

^Published  by  Alcan  in  1919,  and  now  translated  into  English,  From  the
Unconscious  to  the  Conscious  (Collins.)


xcii.]  In  Memoriam — Gustave  Oeley  203


In  addition  to  his  own  contemplation  and  study  of
the  subject  he  patiently  devoted  a  great  part  of  his  time
to  the  convincing  of  others,  especially  of  his  medical  con-
freres, or  the  few  who  would  allow  themselves  to  be
subjected  to  a  demonstration,  through  first-hand  experience,
of  the  reality  of  the  supernormal  physiological  phenomena,
which  had  long  attracted  the  attention  and  overborne  the
scepticism  of  Richet,  Schrenck  Notzing,  Osty,  and  others.

Gustave Geley— killed by the crash of an  aeroplane
as he was leaving Warsaw for Paris on the  15th
of  July  1924— was  born  in  1868 at  Montceau-les-Mines.
He  studied  in  the  hospitals  of  Lyons  (where  incidentally
he  obtained  the  first  prize  from  the  Faculty  of  Medicine
for  his  thesis),  and  then  established  himself  as  a  medical
practitioner  at  Annecy, being  at  an  early  age  specially
attracted  by  the  study  of  metapsychic phenomena.  His
first  book  was  virtually  on  the  origin  of  species,  or  what
was  called  in  France  (and  occasionally  by  Huxley)  "  Trans-
formisme;' to express capacity for racial change,  Les
Preuves  du  Transformisme,  with  a  sub-title  Enseignements
de  la  Doctrijie  Evolutionniste, in  which  he criticised  the
doctrmes  both  of  Darwin  and  of  Lamarck,  and  argued  for
an  element  of  guidance  or  plan  as  necessary  to  account
for  the  origin  of  variations. In  his  second  book,  UEtre
Subconscient (published in 1899), he attempted a  syn-
thetic explanation  of  obscure  phenomena  m  normal  biology
as well as in abnormal psychology, and broached  his
doctrine  of  what  he  called  "  dynamo  psychism,"— a  sort  of
soul-energy  akin  to  the  elan  vitale,  and  not  very  different
perhaps from the conceptions, otherwise arrived at  by
ancient writers, of  entdechy,  and the Logos. This  con-
ception of  dynamo  psychism  was  fundamental  in  Geley's
scheme,  and  in  his  mind  took  the  form  of  a  vitahstic
theory which sought to escape from the trammels  of
materiaUstic  philosophy  through  what  may  be  treated  in
a  wide  sense as  the  interaction  of  soul  and  body,  or,
more generally, a dynamic power of the mental '  and
spuritual  regions  competent  to  control,  guide,  and  rearrange
I  atoms  of  matter. The  fact  of  such  control  is  famihar  in


204  Sir  Oliver  Lodge  [part

the  bodily  processes  of  digestion  and  the  like,  carried  on  with
a  definite  object  or  on  a  definite  plan,  but  quite  uncon-
sciously ;  and  of  these  normal  analogies  he  makes  full  use.

This  book  attracted  some  attention,  but  not  till  1920
did  it  develop  into  a  more  comprehensive  treatise,  the
outcome  probably  of  a  philosophy  which  was  no  longer
satisfied  with  the  duality  inseparable  from  the  usual  idea
of  interaction,  but  was  seeking  for  a  unification  of  the
two  main  aspects  of  the  universe  by  postulating  a  passage
or  development  or  evolution  of  one  into  the  other,— the
gradual  growth  of  the  conscious  at  the  expense  of  the
unconscious,— somewhat  perhaps  as  is  suggested  by  De
Morgan's  title  From  Hatter  to  Spirit.  Geley's  thesis,  how-
ever is  purely  biological,  it  does  not  deal  with  the  non-
living, it  trealts  of  the  gradual  unfoldmg  or  emergence  of
consciousness  out  of  subconscious  or  unconscious  life^

In  this  work  {De  Ulnconscient  au  Conscient)  Geley
traces  many  analogies  in  the  animal  kingdom,  where  from
a  formless  mass  of  protoplasm  a  full-fledged  seK-determm-
ino-  and  in  some  sense  conscious  or  ultimately  conscious,
orSknism  is  gradually  elaborated.  From  the  formless  pulp
of  the  chrysahs,  in  which  all  the  organs  except  the  nervous
system  of  the  larva  have  completely  disappeared,  bio-
logists odmit  that  Hmbs  and  organs  are  reconstituted,
under  the  guiding  influence  of  "  Life  "-a  term  which  here
at  any  rate  must  be  left  vague,— operating  apparently
through  the  residual  trace  of  nervous  mechanism,  until  a
fully  ^developed  insect  appears,  with  characteristics  quite
different  from  those  of  the  larva,  though  doubtless  to
some  extent  foreshadowed  by  them  in  rudimentary  and
barely  recognisable  form.  From  an  egg  again,  which  is
mairly  a  mass  of  unorganised  food  material,  isolated
from  "all  external  influence  save  the  random  molecular
agitation  which  we  call  heat,— yet  which  must  contain  a
microscopic  germinal  vesicle,  the  nucleus  and  container  or
vehicle  of  the  vital  principle,— a  bkd  emerges,  completely
constructed  and  able  to  function  in  every  detail,  with  an
inteUigence  enabluig  it  to  stand  erect,  to  move,  to  see,
and  intentionally  seek  its  food.

In  analogies  such  as  these,  and  by  appeal  to  the  pheno-


XCII.]


In  Memoriam — Gusfuve  Geley


205


mena  of  reproduction  generally,  whether  in  association
with  a  placenta  or  otherwise,  Geley  and  others  are  seeking
to  rationalise  the  strange  jphenomena  exhibited  by  ecto-
plasm— the  reality  of  which  is  testified  to  also  by  Prof.
Richet,  who  gave  it  its  name, — from  which  there  appears
to  be  quickly  formed  a  temporary  living  organism,  having
inevitably  some  of  the  main  characteristics  of  the  pre-
existing normal  organism  whence  the  ectoplasm  must
have  been  derived.  In  beginning  the  study  of  such
temporary  formations,  controlled  by  intelMgence  and  yet
arising  out  of  apparently  formless  pulp,  we  seem  at  first
to  be  in  the  region  of  the  frankly  incredible,  certamly  of
the  plainly  mysterious.  But  biological  analogies,  which
are  undeniable  though  equally  mysterious,  may  serve  to
mitigate  our  initial  increduUty,  and  enable  us  more  placidly
to  contemplate,  and  perhaps  accept  gradually  and  circum-
spectly, the  strong  and  repeated  evidence  for  the  existence
of  such  thiags,  which  from  time  to  time  is  forthcommg.

For  these  apparitions  or  simulacra,  or  whatever  they
may  be  called,  are  able  to  make  an  appeal  to  our  senses  ;
not  only  to  the  sense  of  sight,  but  the  sense  of  touch,  and
the  muscular  sense  also.  They  are  visible,  they  are  some-
times tangible,  and  they  can  exert  force  on  matter  ;  they
simulate  human  bodies  or  limbs.  Indeed  the  analogy  of
our  own  bodies  may  be  pressed  into  the  service  ;  for  these
too  are  constructed  by  the  vital  principle  out  of  materials
which,  whatever  their  previous  history,  are  first  reduced
by  the  processes  of  mastication  and  digestion  to  a  form-
less pulp  or  even  to  thek  molecular  constituents.  Yet
under  the  mysterious  guidance  of  Life,  each  portion  of
food  or  assemblage  of  molecules,  when  it  arrives  at  its
destination,  is  there  converted  into  the  organ  or  structure
appropriate  to  that  particular  locaHty,  forming  here  a  skin,
there  a  hair,  here  again  a  blood-vessel,  or  a  part  of  some
internal  organ  ;  filling  up  artificially  made  cavities,  such
as  wounds,  to  the  proper  level,  and,  under  healthy  con-
ditions, stopping  there  without  going  beyond  the  normal
limits  ;  in  some  of  the  lower  organisms  actually  replacing
lost  limbs,  or  even  reconstructing  a  whole  amputated
body  ;  so  that  by  section  it  is  possible  to  get  two  animals


206


Sir  Oliver  Lodge


[part


where  only  one  existed  before.  In  vegetable  life  the
process  is  still  more  familiar,  as  when  the  mere  cutting
from  a  tree  reproduces  not  only  the  tree,  but  flowers  and
fruit  and  innumerable  descendants.

To  those  who  would  study  the  operations  of  Life,
whether  as  displayed  by  mediums  in  the  laboratory  or  by
organisms  in  the  field,  all  these  things  have  to  be  taken
into  account.  And  we  shall  presently  find  that  one  class
of  phenomena  is  no  more  incredible  than  any  other,  but
that  every  class  must  be  examined  and  verified,  and  the
laws  of  its  being  gradually  ascertained.  There  is  much
work  to  be  done,  and  Geley  was  on  the  track.  Fortun-
ately a  few  biologists  are  waking  up  to  the  importance  and
interest,  not  only  of  normal,  but  what  appear  now  to  be
supernormal  phenomena  :  and  in  the  course  of  a  few  gener-
ations we  may  hope,  not  for  a  full  understanding — for
that  must  be  far  distant — but  for  a  clearer  comprehension
and  more  active  receptivity  of  all  responsibly  vouched  for
occurrences,  not  only  in  the  chemical  and  physical  and
biological,  but  in  the  psycho-physical  direction  as  well.
For  the  boundary  between  the  normal  and  the  super-
normal shows  signs  of  breaking  down.  We  are  beginning
to  get  a  glimpse  of  a  continuity  running  through  the
whole  of  animate  nature.  The  interaction  of  mind  and
body  is  attracting  more  attention  than  ever  before,
and  in  due  time  Philosophy  may  succeed  in  its  great  and
difficult  and  perennial  task  of  unifying  the  vital  and  the
material,  and  realising  that  the  ultimate  clue  is  to  be
found  not  in  the  material  and  transient  but  in  those
permanent  realities  which  appeal  to  us  as  Life  and  Mind.

But  to  return  to  Geley  the  man.  In  1918  the  Institut
Metapsychique  Internationale  was  founded  by  the  munifi-
cence of  M.  Jean  Meyer,  and  was  established  by  him  at
89  Avenue  Niel,  Paris  ;  and  Geley  was  invited  to  become
its first Director.^ This involved his abandoning  his

^  Prof.  Charles  Richefc  accepted  its  Honorary  Presidency,  and  some
responsibility  for  experiment.  The  President  is  Dr.  Santoliquido,  lately
the  head  of  the  Italian  Sanitary  Service.  The  Committee  included  Dr.
Leclainche, Inspector-General  at  the  Ministry  of  Agricultui'e  ; Dr.  Cal-


xcn.]  In  Memoriam — Oicsfave  Oeley  207

medical  practice  and  prospects  of  success  in  his  profession,
and  entering  upon  an  arduous  and  unpopular  task,  which
he  must  have  known  would  subject  him  to  a  painful
amount  of  ridicule  and  hostility.  Even  in  this  country-
such  a  step  would  be  a  sacrifice  ;  although  here,  through
the  exemplary  and  cautious  labours  of  Sidgwick,  Myers,
Gurney,  not  to  mention  such  of  the  founders  of  the  S.P.R.
as  are  still  hving,  the  ground  has  been  to  some  extent
prepared ;  the  hostility  of  the  press,  of  the  scientific
world,  and  of  theologians,  has  been,  not  indeed  removed,
but  to  some  degree  restrained  or  mitigated.  In  France,
however,  it  must  be  conceded  that  both  among  clerics  and
among  professional  men  hostility  is  rampant,  though  the
eminence  of  some  of  the  workers  is  such  as  to  render
them  more  or  less  immune  from  personal  attacks.  Geley
was  not  immune.  His  standing  in  normal  and  medical
science  was  not  such  as  to  curb  the  fiercest  kind  of
criticism.  Scientific  men  in  this  country,  as  elsewhere,
have  been  accused  of  a  kind  of  insanity,  over  credulity,
mal-observation,  and  the  hke  ;  but  Geley  was  accused,  not
so  much  of  those  things,  or  not  only  of  those,  but  of
downright  fraud  and  deceitful  co-operation  ;  in  other  words,
he  was  accused  of  being  an  accomplice  and  a  liar.

Older  members  of  the  Society  for  Psychical  Research
will  remember  that  it  was  Henry  Sidgwick's  ambition  to
make  the  evidence  so  strong  that  this  accusation  of  com-
phcity  would  be  the  only  one  left  to  opponents.  He
could  well  afford  to  take  that  line  ;  for  his  transparent
honesty  was  such  that  accusations  of  that  kind,  in  his
case,  would  have  been  preposterous.  But  a  comparatively
unlmown  and  junior  man  could  hardly  suffer  such  accusa-
tions without  pain  ;  and  to  rebut  such  scandal  Geley  con-
sented to  have  his  premises  examined  for  secret  doors  and
the  like,  and  to  being  chained  up  along  with  other  investi-
gators,— himself as well as the medium being  subject

mette,  Medical  Inspector-General  (France)  ;  Professor  Bozzano  (Italy)  ;
Professor  Cuneo  ;  the  veteran  astronomer  Camille  Flammarion ;  Count
de  Gramont  of  the  French  Academy  ;  M.  Jules  Roche  ;  M.  Gabriel  j;De-
lanne  ;  and  Professor  J.  Teissier.  A  bi-monthly  journal,  Revue  Mdta-
psychique,  is  published  by  the  Institut.


208


Sir  Oliver  Lodge


[part


to  control.  In  the  interests  of  truth,  all  these  things
were  submitted  to  ;  and  a  v/hole  year  of  work  was  de-
voted for  the  most  part  to  convincing  doctors  and  pub-
licists and  men  of  science  that  under  the  most  rigid
scrutiny  and  complete  control  of  everybody  present,
normally  inexplicable  phenomena  actually  occurred.  That
at  least  was  the  aim.  Whether  it  was  accomplished  or
not,  is  not  a  matter  for  assertion.  Some  were  convinced,
others  were  not  :  each  must  speak  for  himself.

It  may  be  argued  that  the  effort  to  convince  people
against  their  v/ill  is  neither  necessary  nor  mse.  It  may
be  argued  on  the  other  hand  that  the  asserter  of  strange
and  apparently  unwelcome  truth  is  bound  to  make  the
attempt.  Crookes  made  the  attempt,  and  failed.  But
many  things  have  happened  since  the  seventies  of  last
centur5^  Geley  made  the  attempt,  and  partially  suc-
ceeded ;  the  most  stringent  evidence  that  he  has  been
able  to  produce — evidence  from  which  it  is  difficult  to  see
any  loophole  for  escape — being  the  casts  of  hands  and
other  hmbs,  but  mainly  of  hands,  which  he  obtained  at
Warsaw  through  the  unpaid  mediumship  of  Franek  Kluski.
I  use  the  term  "  unpaid  "  because  it  was  so,  not  because
that  is  a  matter  of  ?^ny  importance.  Precautions  are  just
as  necessary  in  one  case  as  in  another  ;  and  remuneration
is  perfectly  reasonable  if  a  medium  is  wiUing  to  accept  it.
Kluski,  though  a  manual  worker,  was  not.

The  jjaraffin  gloves  from  which  these  casts  were  made,
considered  in  conjunction  with  the  conditions  under  which
they  were  produced  and  the  crucial  tests  made  to  ensure
their  genuineness,  are  a  standing  demonstration  of  some-
thing inexphcable  by  normal  science  ;  they  constitute  the
kind  of  demonstrative  evidence  which  Zolhier,  long  ago,
and  many  others  have  sought,  without  success  ;  a  per-
manent material  record,  which  can  be  examined  at  leisure,
and  which,^ — given  ascertainable  and  recorded  conditions, —
are,  as  it  were,  a  standing  miracle.  These  casts  repose
on  the  shelves  of  a  cabinet  in  the  Institut  Metapsychique,
and  this  is  not  the  place  to  describe  them.  They  repre-
sent or  tyi^ify  the  material  side  of  Geley's  achievements  :
his  books  represent  the  other  side.  ...


XCII.]


In  Memoriam — Gtistave  Geley


209


The  last  book  he  wrote  was  an  account  of  these  and
other  experiments  conducted  at  the  Institut,  or  in  other
countries  with  the  Institut  as  base.  Under  the  title
L'Ectoplasmie  et  la  Clairvoyance,  it  narrates  experiments
establishing  his  assurance  of  the  genuineness  of  meta-
psychic  phenomena.  The  book  has  only  just  appeared  ;
and  I  hope  that  a  translation  will  be  forthcoming  through
the  industry  of  ]\Ir.  Stanley  de  Brath,  whose  friendship
with  the  a;Uthor,  and  whose  close  acquaintance  with  his
work,  will  certainly  make  it  a  labour  of  love.

On  the  note  of  friendship  and  personal  appreciation  I
propose  to  conclude  this  notice.  In  answer  to  my  en-
quiries, one  of  my  daughters,  who  a  year  ago  was  kindly
invited  by  the  Geley  family  to  pay  them  a  long  visit,  has
sent  me  the  following  personal  information  : —

"  Dr.  Geley  was  quiet  and  difficult  to  understand,  but
always  felt  friendly  and  kind.  He  v/orked  much  too  hard  :
it  seemed  as  if  he  was  always  writing  in  his  study  or
holding  a  seance.  These  sittings  seemed  to  take  it  out  of
him,  giving  him  a  tired  look,  and  making  him  rather
abrupt  in  his  manner ;  he  was  so  conscientious  about  them,
and  worried  if  sceptics  went  away  still  sceptical.  At
meals  he  was  never  too  tired  to  be  thoughtful  enough  to
talk  slowly  and  carefully  whenever  he  spoke  to  me,  so
that  I  should  understand.  There  seemed  but  httle  peace
for  him.  His  heart  was  in  his  work,  and  he  showed
great  dehght  when  any  important  person  obtained  favour-
able and  impressive  results.  Very  often  he  would  sit
silent,  apparently  immersed  in  thought.  Madame  Geley
of  course  managed  everything  in  the  house  :  and  the
family  hfe  was  peaceful  and  affectionate."

As  showing  the  estimation  in  which  Geley  was  held  by
his  friends  and  co-workers,  I  shall  here  translate  or
paraphrase  from  a  panegyric  in  La  Revue  Spirite  a  few
passages  which  speak  for  themselves  : —

"  What  we  would  speak  of,  we  who  have  known
and  loved  him,  is  his  magnificent  inteUigence  coupled
with  high  scientific  conscientiousness  ;  also  his  exem-
plary  simplicity, his  rare faculty of  reconciling  the


210


8ir  Oliver  Lodge


[part


enthusiasm  of  the  investigator  with  the  reflective
wisdom  of  the  savant  and  philosopher ;  finally,  and
above  all,  his  charity  which  extended  itself  unmeasured
to  his  most  sceptical  adversaries.  .  .  .  Serenely  he
persevered  in  his  honest  task,  remaining  indifferent
to  attacks,  seeking  only  one  end,  to  which  he  was
valiantly  devoted  :  namely,  the  advancement  of  the
status  of  a  subject,  of  which  the  principles  are  already
indisputable,  and  which  he  sought  to  raise  above  the
cloud  of  suspicion  in  which  it  had  too  long  been
enveloped  and  hampered  by  the  negation  of  orthodox
materiaHstic  science.  He  knew  that  time  was  on
his  side  and  that  by  slow  but  sure  increments  his  hypo-
thesis in  some  form  would  gradually  become  certainty.
His  faith  equalled  his  courage.  He  saw  opening  before
him  a  long  stretch  of  life.  He  preserved  that  quiet
faith  which  sustains  and  guides  all  the  great  leaders,
he  pressed  forward  in  spite  of  obstacles,  towards  the
goal  ;  striving  only  to  bring  about,  one  day,  this
victory,  towards  which  the  advances  are  better  and
securer  when  gradually  and  cautiously  made.  He
felt  assured  that  the  barriers  would  yield,  one  by  one,
to  persuasive  pressure  before  the  evidence  of  facts,
without  any  necessity  for  using  violence  ;  although
nevertheless  violence  was  employed  against  him  by
adversaries  who  doubtless  felt  that  their  ground  was
beginning  to  shake  under  them.

"  This  achievement  was  for  him  the  mission  of  the
future — of  his  future.  He  is  no  longer  among  us.
The  torch  has  slipped  from  his  fingers.  Those  who
hereafter  carry  on  the  interrupted  work  will  not  find
in  the  history  of  Truths  courageously  conquered  a
finer  example  than  that  of  Gustave  Geley.

"  For  VIS  spiritists,  Gustave  Geley  is  not  dead.  .  .  .
He  falls,  but  his  spirit  rises.  An  active  worker  for
truth  while  on  the  earth,  he  will  remain  the  same,
in  the  luminous  regions  which  he  has  entered,  without  '
surprise,  and  where  he  has  reopened  his  eyes  on  a
vaster  vision.  His  mission  has  entered  on  a  more
active  phase.


XCII.]


In  Memc/riam — Oustave  Geley


211


"  If  this  conviction  can  be  any  alleviation  to  the
grief  of  his  wife  and  children  and  many  friends,  we
may  bless  once  more  the  knowledge  which  enables
us  to  mingle  with  our  tears  the  vivifying  promise
of  future  reunion."

To  this  tribute  M.  Jean  Meyer  adds  a  touching  note  of
remembrance  and  sympathy,  speaking  of  the  admiration
and  regret  which  he  feels  for  "  this  great  savant  and
benefactor  of  humanity,  who  lived  only  for  the  advance-
ment of  his  nascent  science."  "  His  work  remains  :  it  is
founded  on  a  rock,  and  will  be  continued  m  the  same
spirit.  .  .  .  He  left  the  earth  in  that  fragile  aeroplane,  his
eyes  fixed  on  the  heavens  whence  he  came,  .  .  .  his  great
soul  will  continue  to  inspire  the  strictly  scientific  work  of
the  Institut."


212


Mrs.  Henry  SidgivicJc


[part


REPORT  ON  FURTHER  EXPERIMENTS  IN  THOUGHT-
TRANSFERENCE  CARRIED  OUT  BY  PROFESSOR
GILBERT  MURRAY,  LL.D.,  Litt.D.i

By  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick.

Professor  Gilbert  Murray's  experiments  in  Thought-
transference  are  perhaps  the  most  important  ever  brought
to  the  notice  of  the  Society,  both  on  account  of  their
frequently  brilhant  success  and  on  account  of  the  eminence
of  the  experimenter.  It  is  surprising,  I  think,  that  they
have  not  attracted  more  general  attention  than,  so  far  as
I  know,  they  have.  All  persons,  however,  who  remember
his  interesting  Presidential  address  in  1915  (see  Proceedings,
vol.  xxix.,  p.  46),  in  which  he  gave  an  account  of  the
experiments,  or  have  read  the  report  by  Mrs.  Verrall  on
the  504  experiments  then  before  her  (see  the  same  volume,
p.  64),  will  rejoice  to  hear  that  Professor  Murray  has  not
ceased  experimenting,  and  will  welcome  the  opportunity
of  studying  the  further  series,  comprising  259  experiments,
which  he  has  now  submitted  to  us.  I  should  Hke  to
say  first  that  though  I  win  try  to  make  the  present  report
intelhgible  by  itself,  all  who  really  wish  to  study  the
subject  should  also  read  the  above-mentioned  papers.

As,  however,  we  have  probably  not  all  of  us  got  either
the  Presidential  address,  or  Mrs.  Verrall's  report  fuUy  in
our  minds  at  the  moment,  I  will  quote  Professor  Murray's
brief  account  of  the  method  of  procedure.  He  says  :
{Proc.  vol.  xxix.,  p.  58.)

The  method  followed  is  this  :  I  go  out  of  the  room  and  of
course  out  of  earshot.  Someone  in  tlie  room,  generally  my
eldest  daughter,  thinks  of  a  scene  or  an  incident  or  anything
she  likes,  and  says  it  aloud.  It  is  written  down,  and  I  am
called. I  come  in,  usually  take  my  daughter's  hand,  and  then,

1  This  paper  was  read  at  a  General  Meeting  of  the  Society  on
December  12,  1924.


xciT.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  213


if  I  have  luck,  describe  in  detail  what  she  has  thought  of.  The
least  disturbance  of  our  customary  method,  change  of  time  or
place,  presence  of  strangers,  controversy,  and  especially  noise,
is  apt  to  make  things  go  wrong.  I  become  myself  somewhat
over-sensitive  and  irritable,  though  not,  I  believe,  to  a
noticeable  degree. ^

Mrs.  Verrall,  who  was  herself  present  on  one  occasion,
gives  a  somewhat  fuller  account  of  the  method  (pp.  64,  65).
As  to  the  way  he  gets  his  impression,  Professor  Murray
says  (same  page,  above)  :

When  I  am  getting  at  the  thing  which  I  wish  to  discover
the,  only  effort  I  make  is  a  sort  of  effort  of  attention  of  a
quite  general  kind.  The  thing  may  come  through  practically
any  sense-channel,  or  it  may  discover  a  road  of  its  own,  a
chain  of  reasoning  or  of  association,  which,  as  far  as  I  remember,
never  comcides  with  any  similar  chain  in  the  mind  of  anyone
present,  but  is  invented,  much  as  a  hallucination  is  invented,
for  the  purpose  of  the  moment.

I  have  not  myself  had  the  advantage  of  witnessing  any
of  the  experiments,  but  Mr.  Gerald  Balfour  was  present
one  evening,  August  26,  1916,  and  though  the  success  on
this  occasion  was  somewhat  below  the  average,  it  will
give  a  good  idea  of  the  experiments  if  I  quote  the  notes  of
this  sitting  in  full,  and  a  brief  note  by  Mr.  Balfour  as  to
tho  impression  produced  on  him.  The  persons  present  were
Lady  Mary  Murray  (Professor  Murray's  wife),  his  daughters
Mis.  Arnold  Toynbee  and  Miss  Agnes  Murray,  his  son  Mr.
Ba^il  Murray,  Mr.  Arnold  Toynbee,  and  Mr.  BaKour,  and  Miss
Blomfield  taking  notes.  On  this,  as  on  aU  other  occasions,
all  in the  room  were  aware  of  the  subject  selected  for

1  The  "  subject  "  is  written  down,  from  the  words  of  the  agent,  by
the  note-taker,  who  keeps  it  in  her  hand  and  writes  on  the  same  sheet
of  paper  the  remarks  made  by  Professor  Murray,  etc.  As  the  note-
taker  faces  Professor  Murray  after  he  enters  the  room  it  is  difficult
to  conceive  any  unconscious  reading  of  the  notes  by  him  as  has
been  suggested  by  one  critic.  I  may  add  that  it  is  written  so
quickly,  and  often  in  such  faint  pencil,  that  in  studying  the  records
for  the  purposes  of  this  paper  I  have  sometimes  found  them  quite
difficult  to  decipher,  and  have  at  times  used  a  magnifying  glass
with  advantage.


214


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


transmission ;  and  all  were,  or  may  have  been,  agents  in
the  transmission ;  but  I  shall  use  the  word  "  agent  "  for
the  principal  agent — the  person  responsible  for  the  subject
and  to  whom  Professor  Murray  attends.  In  what  follows
remarks  by  the  agent  and  contemporary  notes  are  in
round  brackets ;  additions  by  myself,  to  make  things
clear,  in  square  brackets.

1.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent):  "I  think  of  the
beginning  of  a  [story  by]  Dostoievsky  where  the  dog  of  a  poor
old  man  [is]  dying  in  a  restaurant."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  think  it's  a  thing  in  a  book.  I
should  think  a  Russian  book.  A  very  miserable  old
man,  and  I  think  he's  doing  something  with  a  dead  dog.
[A]  very  unhappy  one.  I  rather  think  it  is  in  a  restaurant
and  people  are  mocking,  and  then  they  are  sorry  and
want  to  be  kind.  I  am  not  sure."  ("  Nationality  ?  ")
"  No — I  don't  get  their  nationality.  I  have  a  feeling
it  is  a  sort  of  Gorki  thing.  I  have  a  feeUng  that  it  is
something  Russian."

([Mrs.  ToynbeeJ  had  not  said  it  but  it  was  aU  true.  Mr.
Murray  had  not  read  the  book.  It  was  a  German  restaurant,
but  Mr.  Mixrray  had  not  felt  that.)^

2.  Subject  {suggested  by  Mr.  Balfour).  Mrs.  Arnold  ToY!N-
BEE  (agent):  "As  he  [Mr.  Balfour]  v.'as  coming  up  the  road  he
was  thinking  : — The  shade  of  Nelson  watching  the  funeral  pro-
cession of  the  Duke of Wellington  at  St.  Paul's  Cathedral."

Professor  Murray. "  This  is  not  your  own. No,  I'm  aer^
getting  it. I  think  it  is  Mr.  Balfour['s]. I  [am]  onij'
getting  you [Mr. Balfour,]  walking  up  the  road.  No,
I'm  not  getting  it."

3.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of  a
thing  in  Burnt  Njal  where  Njal  and  his  sons  are  burnt  in  his
house,  and  [the  enemy  and]  his  sons  come  up  and  set  fire  to
the  house."

^  This  "  subject,"  but  perliaps  a  slightly  later  stage  of  it,  had
been  successfully  tried  by  the  same  agent  four  months  earlier,  on  April
23,  1916. See  Appendix,  No.  53.  ,


xcn.]


Experiments  in  Thought-Transference


215


Proitessob  Mtjbray  :  "  I  don't  think  I  shall  get  this.  No,
can't  get  it."

4.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of
Helena  Cornford  and  Tony  grown  uji,  walking  beside  the  river
at  Cambridge."

Peofessoe  Mtjbeay.  "  This  is  not  a  book.  It's  got  a  sort
of  Cambridge  feel  in  it.  It's  the  Cornfords  somehow. —
No — it's  a  girl  walking  beside  the  river,  but  it  isn't
Frances  [JVIrs.  Cornford].  Oh  !  is  it  baby  Cornford  grown
up  ?  Ought  I  to  know  what  she  is  doing  ?  "  ("  Who
she  is  with  ").  "  No,  I  don't  get  who  she  is  with— No—
I  should  only  be  guessing."  (Every  one  "  go  on  ").
No.  I  should  only  think  of  another  baby  grown  up —
Tony  [a  small  grandchUd]."

5.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "I  think  of
the  Australians  leaving  GaUipoli  and  one  man  gomg  back  that
wouldn't  leave."

(Tohu-bohu,  [noise  of]  running  about,  having  baths.)
Professor  Murray. "  No."

6.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "I  think  of  a
scene  in  [Hardy's]  Tess  [of  the  Durbervilles]  where  she  is  open-
ing a  letter,  rather  near  the  end,  sitting  by  the  fire."

( [A]  maid  [moving]  about  all  the  time).

Professor  Murray.  "  This  is  a  book— It's  a  sort  of  country
milkmaid  atmosphere  very  sad.  I  don't  think  it  is  Marie
Claire.  Oh,  I  think  it  is  Tess— No  I  can't  get  it— can't
quite — I  think  it  is  late  on  when  the  horrid  religious
man  has  come  back.  It  is  not  one  of  the  early  idyllic
scenes."

(Mrs.  Toynbee.  "  [I]  was  thinking  of  a  scene  in  Marie
Claire  with  the  nuns  going  through,  but  I  rejected  it.
Both  [in]  the  last  one  and  this  one,  but  I  rejected
it.")

7.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  Terence  [a
nephew  of  Professor  Murray's]  and  Napoleon  standing  on  a
hiU  above  the  Marne  and  watching  the  artillery  down  below."

Professor  Murray. "  This  is  a  war  scene— I  don't  get  the
persons  clearly,  but  I  think  on  the  hill  looking  down  on


216


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


the  artillery.  It  is  not  Saumarez.  They  may  be  Oxford
people.  I  get  the  bursting  of  shells.  I  should  think
it  was  Terence  and  somebody  else — I  don't  think  I  know
the  other  person.  I  don't  think  I  know  him.  No  I
can't  get  him."

8.  Subject  {suggested  by  Mr.  Balfour).  Mrs.  Arnold  Toyn-
BEE  (agent)  :  "Sir  Galahad  taking  his  seat  on  the  Siege  Peri-
lous, sajring  '  If  I  lose  myself  I  find  myself.'  "

Professor  Murray.  "  I  am  getting  this  very  weakly.  This
is  Mr.  Balfour  again.  I  feel  as  if  it  was  somebody
uttering  an  ajDothegm.  Somebody  saying  I  wiU  do
something  or  other. No  I  can't  get  it."

9.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I  think  [of]
Diana  of  the  Crossways.  Diana  walking  up  the  road  in  the
ram,  and  crouching  down  in  front  of  the  empty  grate  in  the
house."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  is  a  book.  Oh  it's  Meredith.
It's  Diana  walking.  I  don't  remember  the  scene  properly.
Diana  walkmg  in  the  ram.  I  feel  as  if  she  was  re-
visiting her  house,  but  I  can't  remember  when  it  hap-
pens "  ("A  little  more  ?  ") "  No— can't  oblige."

10.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I'll  think  of
Rupert  [Brooke]  meeting  Natacha  in  War  and  Peace.  Running
in  a  yellow  di'ess  ;  rumiing  through  a  wood."

Professor  Murray.  "  V/ell  I  thought  when  I  came  into  the
room  it  was  about  Rupert.  Yes  it's  fantastic.  He's
meetmg  somebody  out  of  a  book.  He's  meeting  Natacha
in  War  and  Peace.  I  don't  know  what  he  is  saying — •
perhaps  '  WiU  you  run  away  with  me  '  "  ("  Can  you  get
the  scene  ?  ")  "I  should  say  it  was  in  a  wood."
("  Colour  of  the  dress  ?  ") No. I  can't  get  it."

11.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "I  think  of
Rosalind  and  Arnold  with  Wiggs  [Mr.  and  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee
with  the  dog]  driving  in  a  dogcart  at  the  front  along  the
road  that  Dad  [Professor  Murray]  went  with  shells  dropping."

Professor  Murray. "  This  is  the  road  where  they  fired
shrapnel  at  me. There's  a  half-bu,rned  village,  and  I


xcii.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  2l1

think  it  is  Rosalind  driving  a  gig  along.  I  can't  re-
member the  name  [of  the  place]  "  ("  Who  is  with  her  V)
"  I  don't  know  who  is  ia  the  dogcart  with  her — some-
body else  I  don't  know  !  !  "

12.  Subject. Mr.  Balfour  (agent)  : "  The  last  line  of  the

Professor  Murray. "No. I  am  afraid  1  can't."

13.  Subject. Lady  Mary  Murray  (agent)  : "  Philip  B

[going]  into  his  dug-out  for  the  first  time,  and  being  told  to
look  out  for  the  flowers  in  the  morning  by  the  gardener."

(Too  much  noise.)  '  .  ■

14.  Subject.  Lady  Mary  Murray  (agent)  :  "He  and  I  at
the  lunch  party  at  the  C's  up  the  hiU  [at  Christiania],  and  all
the  little  green  sprouts  and  the  tricolors."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  think  I  shall  get  this.  I  feel  as  if
it  was  you  and  I  going  out  to  a  party  somewhere —
going  out  to  lunch,  and  there  are  flags  and  things — I
ought  to  get  it. Oh  it  must  be  at  the  C's."

(Mr.  Murray  had  got  the  flags  wrong.)

As  regards  this  sitting,  Mr.  BaKour  authorizes  me  to
state  that  "  he  came  away  from  it  with  a  conviction  that
hypercesthesia,  to  whatever  length  it  might  be  stretched,
could  not  be  made  to  cover  every  case.  In  one  instance
(No.  1)  Professor  Murray,  in  describing  a  scene  out  of  a
book  which  he  had  not  read,  added  certain  striking  details
that  were  present  to  the  mind  of  the  principal  agent,  but
of  which  no  mention  whatever  had  been  made  when  the
choice  of  a  subject  was  being  decided."  See,  however,
No.  53,  p.  250.

The  experiments  Mrs.  Verrall  reported  on  went  down
to  the  end  of  1915.  Among  those  now  before  us  I  find
that  23  are  dated  in  1913  and  1915  respectively,  and
were,  I  presume,  accidentally  omitted  when  the  notes  of
sittings,  which  are  all  written  on  loose  sheets  of  paper,  were
sent  to  Airs.  Verrall.  Subtracting  these  from  the  whole
259  there  remain  236  between  April  1916  and  April  1924,
and these were made on twenty-four separate  occa-


218


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[PABT


sions,  the  number  on  each  varying  from  3  to  26,^  with
an  average  of  about  10.  It  will  be  seen  therefore  that  the
attempts  were  infrequent.  They  were  also  very  irregu-
larly distributed.  Sometimes  sets  would  be  carried  out
at  short  intervals,  and  even  on  two  consecutive  evenings,
while  at  other  times  there  were  intervals  of  months,  and
twice  over  of  more  than  a  year.  The  company  present,
exclusive  of  Professor  Murray  himself,  varied  in  number  on
different  evenings  from  3  to  10,  but  the  most  common
number  was  6.  It  was  always  in  the  family  circle  that
the  work  was  done,  and  though  others  were  generally
present  there  were  never,  I  think,  fewer  than  two
of  Professor  Murray's  immediate  family — his  wife  or
children — in  the  party. ^  In  the  236  experiments  before
us,  however,  persons  outside  the  immediate  family'
have  been  present  and  taking  active  part  more  fre-
quently, I  think,  than  was  the  case  in  the  earlier
series  examined  by  Mrs.  Verrall.  Besides  6  members
of  the  immediate  family,  who  among  them  acted  as
principal  agents  167  times,  30  different  people  have
acted  as  principal  agents,  19  of  them  only  once.  And
the  success  obtained  by  these  principal  agents  outside  the
immediate  family  was  quite  considerable  enough  by  itself,
I  think,  to  convince  most  people,  though  it  was  propor-
tionately less  than  that  of  the  immediate  family.  Besides
the  36  persons  who  have  taken  the  part  of  principal
agents  about  20  others  were  present  at  different  times.
Indeed  only  on  two  occasions,  November  22,  1923,  and
January  27,  1924,  were  no  outsiders  present.  I  imagine
that none of these outsiders, whether they acted  as

^  It  is  perhaps  worth  noting  that  on  the  two  occasions  on  which  26
experiments  were  tried  at  a  sitting  (September  10,  1916,  and  July  14,
1918),  tliere  was  an  unusual  proportion  in  which  Professor  Murray
had  no  impression  at  all,  especially  early  in  the  sitting,  and  this  was
probably  the  reason  why  so  many  were  tried.  For  an  experiment  in
which  there  is  no  impression  is  apt,  I  imagine,  to  take  less  time  than
one  in  which  an  impression  is  gradually  developed,  or  is  oven  immediately
felt  and  discussed  by  the  company  afterwards.

2  Except,  T  tliink,  during  4  experiments  on  September  14,  1916,
when  Mrs.  Toynhee  went  out  of  the  room  while  Mr.  Mellor  acted  as
principal  agent.


'xcii.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  219

principal  agents  or  not,  were,  strictly  speaking,  strangers,
and  some  of  them  were  intimate  friends  or  relations.
Nevertheless,  that  so  many  should  have  shared  in  the
experiments  shows,  I  think,  a  widening  of  the  conditions
described  by  Professor  Murray  in  1915  (see  above,  p.  213).
And  the  same  is  true  of  another  restriction  named  by
Professor  Murray,  namely,  change  of  place,  for  the  24  sets
of  experiments  before  us  were  carried  out  in  at  least  four
different  houses.  Noise  appears  to  interfere  with  success
as  much  as  ever  ;  but  this  is  to  be  expected,  since  most
people  with  psychic  gifts  seem  to  find  noise  a  serious  and
often  a  complete  obstacle  to  the  exercise  of  them.^  It
should  be  added,  to  make  the  above  statement  complete,
that  in  one  only  of  the  24  sets  of  experiments  (January
2,  1918)  was  no  success  whatever  obtained.  There  were
6  experiments— all  failures— Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  being
agent  in  5  and  Lady  Mary  Murray  in  1.  In  4  of  these
cases  no  impression  at  all  was  received — an  interruption  in
one  and  noise  in  another  perhaps  accounting  for  two.  In
the  other  2  of  the  6  cases  wrong  impressions  uncon-
vincing to  the  percipient  were  experienced,  but  both
perhaps  show  signs  of  some  influence  from  the  thought  of
the  agent.  On  the  other  hand  there  were  two  occasions
when  no  failures  occurred,  the  number  of  experiments
being  4  and  3  respectively.  On  the  first  of  these  occasions
(December  3,  1919)  I  have  reckoned  2  experiments  as
successes  and  2  as  partial  successes.  An  outsider  present
took  the  part  of  principal  agent  in  one  of  the  partial
successes.  The  other  occasion  was  on  November  22,  1923,
when  only  members  of  the  family  were  present  and  only
3  experiments  were  tried,  of  which  I  reckon  two  as  suc-
cesses and  one  as  a  partial  success.

It  is  time  I  explain  this  classification  and  state  how
many  of  the  236  experiments  since  the  end  of  1915  I
reckon  as  successes,  etc.,  but  first  I  must  remark  that
236  is  of  course  too  small  a  number  to  base  rehable
statistical  conclusions  upon,  and  secondly  that  the  classi-

'  Seances  for  phyiieal  phenomena  at  which  noise — shiging,  talking,  etc.
—is  insisted  on,  form  an  exception  to  this,  if  psychic  gifts  are  really
exercised  at  them.


220


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


fication  is  essentially  indefinite ;  there  is  no  clear  line
between  one  class  and  another.  Endeavouring,  however,
to  follow  the  divisions  and  standards  adopted  by  Mrs.
Verrall  in  her  report  I  get  roughly  85  {i.e.  36  per  cent.)
successes,  55  (or  23"3  per  cent.)  partial  successes,  and  96
(or  40.7  per  cent.)  failures.  Mrs.  Verrall  gives  her  per-
centages as  33' 1,  27-9,  39-0  respectively,  so  that,  if  I  have
succeeded  in  dividing  the  classes  as  she  would  have  done,
both  the  successes  and  the  failures  in  the  present  set  are
proportionally  greater  than  in  the  previous  set,  at  the
expense  of  course  of  the  partial  successes.  But  I  have
doubts  about  the  standard,  and  particularly  in  the  failures.
Mrs.  Verrall  says  there  is  little  or  no  doubt  about  failures,
and  this  is  true  of  47  cases  in  which  no  impression  was
received,^  and  also  of  some  33  in  which  the  only
impressions  were  wrong.  But  there  remain  about  16
in  which  the  impression  was  on  right  lines  so  far  as  it
went,  but  in  which  it  hardly  seems  to  me  to  have  gone
far  enough  to  be  reckoned  as  even  a  partial  success.  How
would  Mrs.  Verrall  have  reckoned  these  ?  Nos.  2  and
8  on  August  26,  1916,  quoted  above  are  instances,  and
the  following  is  an  even  clearer  one  : —

September  10,  1916.

15.  Siibject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of
the  girl  in  [Barrie's]  Quality  Street  bringing  down  the  wedding
dress."

Professor  Murray.  "  No.  I  think  it's  a  girl  in  a  book,
but  can't  get  it."

Or  again  on  August  17,  1918.

16.  Subject.  Mr.  Geoffrey  Curtis  (agent)  :  "I  think  of
Charles  Lamb  sitting  by  the  fire  with  his  maniac  sister  Mary
and  dreaming  of  the  wife  he  would  have  married."

Professor  Murray  :  "I  don't  think  I  get  it.  I  have  a
faint  impression  of  a  man  writing  a  book  or  an  essay —
No — I've  got  a  little  bit  an  old  fashioned  literarj'  atmos-
phere."

^  I  have  included  in  these  10  cases  where  the  note-taker  has  merely
Jeft  a  blank  for  the  percipient's  statement,  as  I  feel  sure  these  were
cases  of  "no  impression."


xcii.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transfer Mce  221


Or  again,  to  give  more  complicated  examples — complicated
because  a  wrong  idea  intrudes  itseH  and  is  rejected  : —

February  24,  1918.

17.  Subject.  Mr.  Patok  (agent)  :  "  David  O'Rane  in  8onia
beginning  to  teach  in  his  [old]  school,  and  he  is  blind,  and  the
boys  don't  know  it."

Professor  Murray.  "I  get  a  faint  impression  of  a  school.
It's  not  a  Baltic  baron  who  can't  read."

[It  seems  likely,  as  regards  the  rejected  idea,  that  the  name
of  Mr.  Stephen  M'Kemia's  novel,  Sonia,  though  of  course  it  is
not  a  Russian  novel  nor  about  Russian  people,  was  responsible
for  the  idea  of  Baltic  barons,  and  the  blmdness  for  that  of
inability  to  read.]  -

July  14,  1918.

18.  Subject.  Lady  Atjrea  Howard  (agent)  :  [Her  only
attempt.]  "  I  think  of  the  American  who  was  taken  to  the
church  where  the  light  had  never  been  blown  out  for  hundreds
of  years,  and  he  blew  it  out."

Professor  Murray.  "  Is  this  a  sort  of  Gothic  medieval
thing  ?  "  ("  Yes.")  "  I  don't  think  I  know  the  book  or
the  story — It's  not  the  people  ItiUing  Beckett  in  a  church
— it's  something  like  that."

[Here  the  percipient  gets  the  church,  and  the  occurrence  of
something  tragic  in  it.]

If  these  16  cases  are  to  be  counted  not  as  failures,  but
as  partial  successes,  the  percentages  become  36-0,  30-1,
and  33-9  for  successes,  partial  successes  and  failures  re-
spectively.

A  similar  difficulty  occurs  in  drawing  the  line  between
successes  and  partial  successes.  When  the  subject  chosen
consists  of  several  elements  it  may  easily  happen  that
the  agent  fails  to  grasp  one  or  more  of  these  and  yet
gets  the  essential  ones.  Mrs.  Verrall  decided  to  count  as
successes  for  statistical  purposes,  "not  only  all  cases  where
the  complete  incident  is  described,  but  also  cases  where
what  may  be  called  the  essential  elements  are  given  by
the percipient," though, as she admits, "  opinions  will


222


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


differ  as  to  what  is  essential."  She  gives  examples  to
illustrate  her  mode  of  deciding,  and  I  have  endeavoured
to  judge  what  are  to  be  taken  as  successes  in  the  same
way,  though  of  course  without  complete  confidence  that
she  would  have  agreed  with  me.  Examples  of  successes
and  partial  successes  can  be  seen  in  the  sitting  of  August
26,  1916,  quoted  above.  Thus  No.  1  (p.  214)  is  clearly
a  success.  The  scene  from  a  Russian  book  is  fully
described  by  Professor  Murray  so  far  as  the  agent,  Mrs.
Toynbee,  had  spoken  of  it,  and  (what  is  specially  inter-
esting), though  he  had  not  read  the  book  he  gives  further
details  that  were  in  her  mind  but  had  not  been  men-
tioned by  her.  He  fails,  however,  to  perceive  a  final
point  she  was  thinking  of  and  would  have  hked  him
to  name.  No.  4  again — a  fantastic  subject — is  com-
pletely, though  only  gradually,  developed  by  Professor
Murray.  It  is  interesting  to  note  that  the  last  item,
drawn  out  by  a  question  by  the  agent,  appeared  to  the
percipient  to  be  merely  a  guess.  No.  14  in  which
Professor  Murray  recalls  the  real  incident  thought  of  by
the  agent  was  also  apparently  a  complete  success.

On  the  other  hand,  Nos.  9  and  10  though,  I
think,  undeniably  successes  by  Mrs.  Verrall's  standard,
each  fail  in  one  particular.  In  9  Professor  Murray  did
not  get  Diana  crouching  by  the  empty  grate,  and  in  10
he  did  not  get  the  colour  of  Natacha's  dress.  For  partial
successes  we  have  a  clear  case,  I  think,  in  No.  6.
The  percipient  recognises  that  the  subject  concerns  Tess
in  Hardy's  Tess  of  the  Durhervilles,  but  fails  to  get  the
scene.  Nos.  7  and  11  are  perhaps  more  difficult  to
decide  about,  as  they  are  so  nearly  complete  successes.
But  I  have  called  them  only  partial  successes  because  in
each  case  the  percipient  fails  to  recognise  a  person
important  in  the  supposed  incident.  Failure,  by  the
percipient,  to  get  some  name  or  other  item — impor-
tant or  unimportant — forming  part  of  the  subject  as
described  by  the  agent  happens  rather  often.  An  attempt
is  sometimes  made,  either  spontaneously  by  the  percipient
or  in  reply  to  a  question  by  the  agent,  to  supply  these
missing items. The attempt sometimes succeeds, as  in


XCII.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Tranaference  223

No.  4  above  (p.  215),  and  No.  23  below  (p.  224),  and  see,
e.g.  Appendix  Nos.  49,  68,  82,  88,  110,  134,  but  sometimes
leads  to  a  wrong  guess,  see,  e.g.  Appendix  Nos.  109,  111,
115,  120,  122.

It  will  have  been  realised  both  from  Mrs.  VerralFs
report  and  from  the  cases  already  reported  in  the  present
paper  that  the  subjects  selected  by  the  agents  are  very
various.  We  may  divide  them  roughly  into  five  classes  : —
(A)  Scenes  or  incidents,  either  real  or  imaginary  but
possible,  in  which  the  experimenters  themselves  or  their
friends  and  acquaintances  are  concerned.  Nos.  11,
13  and  14  above  are  instances,  and  see  also  Appendix,
e.g.  Nos.  46,  96,  108,  127,  etc.  ;  (B)  Scenes  or  incidents
from  books,  plays,  or  history  (real  or  imaginary,  but  not
fantastic)  or  newspapers.  Nos.  1,  3,  5,  6,  8,  9,  15,  16,
17,  18  above  are  instances,  and  see  also  Appendix,  e.g.
Nos.  58,  73,  92,  137,  etc.  ;  (C)  Fantastic  scenes  or
incidents,  including  dreams.  Nos.  2,  4,  7,  10  above
are  instances,  and  see  also  Appendix,  e.g.  Nos.  109,
110,  120,  128,  etc.  ;  (D)  Particular  quotations  asked  for.
No.  12  above  is  an  unsuccessful  instance.  The  following
are  successful  ones  : —

December  27  (1919  ?),

19.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Mtjrkay  (agent)  :  "  I  thmk  of  the
begimiing  of  Shelley's  Ode  to  the  West  Wind."

Professor  Murray. "  I think this is a poem— O  Wild

West  Wind."
[These  are  the  first  words  of  the  poem.]

December  3,  1919.

20.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I'll  think  of
The  Shropshire  Lad  : —

When  smoke  stood  up  from  Ludlow,
And  mist  blew  off  from  Teme,
And  blythe  afield  to  ploughing
Against  the  morning  beam,
I  strode  beside  my  team."

Professor  Murray. "This  is  a  poem— oh  it's  the  thing  in


224


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


The  Shropshire  Lad,  where  De  dum  de  dum  from  Ludlow
and  dum  de  dum  from  Teme — smoke — mist."

See  for  other  instances  No.  30  below  (p.  234)  and
Appendix  Nos.  65,  81,  and  perhaps  80.  In  the  fifth
class  (E)  are  inanimate  scenes,  or  rather  scenes  in  which
human  beings  do  not  appear,  e.g.  No.  21,  "The  sun
sparkling  on  the  water  yesterday  on  the  lake,"  on  J^lly  14,
1918,  and  No.  22,  "The  four  destroyers  we  saw  this  evening,"
on  September  10,  1916.  There  are  only  five  in  this  class
altogether,  and  only  one  was  successful,  and  it  is  perhaps
doubtful  whether  that  one  should  be  placed  in  the  class
as  it  certainly  strongly  suggests  human  activity.  It  is  as
follows  : —

December  30,  1919.

23.  Subject.  Mr.  Basil  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of  Sham-
rock IV.  coming  into  Southampton  water  in  a  storm,  after
winning  Atlantic  Cup."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  should  say  it  was  a  yacht  running
before  a  strong  wind — running  into  harbour — a  thing  I
have  never  had  before — yacht  running  into  harbour  in  a
storm.  I  should  say  a  West  country  place  like  South-
ampton or  Plymouth  "  ("  Any  particular  yacht  ?  ")
"One  of  the  Shamrocks."

are divided among the  classes


The  236  experiments
roughly  as  foUows  :

(A)  81  instances

(B)  102

(C)  30

(D)  18

(E)  5
Total,  236  instances

It  appears, therefore,  that
are  successful a little  below
tastic
judge


with  28
with  36
with  14
with  6
with  1
with  85


(or  34-5  per  cent.)  successes

(or  35-3  per  cent.)  successes

(or  46-7  per  cent.)  successes

(or  33-3  per  cent.)  successes

(or  20  per  cent.)  successes

(or  36  per  cent.)  successes

while  classes (A),  (B),  (D),
the  average, (C),  the  fan-
class,  is,  so  far  as  the  small  numbers  enable  us  to
markedly  above  the  average. Mrs.  Verrall  observed


the  same  thing.  She  says  {Proc,  vol.  xxix.,  p.  84),  "  There
is  no  doubt  that  the  fantastic  and  the  unusual  specially
lends  itself  to  the  successful  guessing  of  Professor  Murray."


Xcii.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  225

Probably  such  subjects  tend  to  be  more  amusing  to  the
agent,  and  thus  perhaps  to  be  more  vividly  in  his  mind,
or  to  be  there  with  what  one  may  call  a  more  explosive
quality.  Or  perhaps  their  oddness  more  easily  arrests  the
attention  of  the  percipient.

Inversely,  it  may  be  owing  to  then'  not  being  vividly
interesting  to  the  principal  agent  that  subjects  suggested
by  some  other  person  present  seem  apt  to  fail.  There
are  only  three  in  the  present  series,  two  of  which  are
quoted  above  (Nos.  2  and  8),  and  all  of  which  failed ;  ^
but  there  were  40  instances,  of  which  the  undue  proportion
of  20  failed,  among  the  experiments  reported  on  by  Mrs.
Verrall  (see  Proc,  vol.  xxix.,  p.  72).

This  brings  us  to  the  question  of  the  function  of
the  principal  agent.  As  already  said,  all  the  persons
present  know  the  subject  selected,  and  all  try,  or
are  supposed  to  try,  to  transfer  it  telepathically  to
the  percipient  as  soon  as  he  enters  the  room.  We
may  therefore  ask  (a)  whether  the  principal  agent  takes
any  larger  share  than  the  others  in  the  transfer-
ence, and  (6)  if  so,  why  ?  As  regards  (a),  it  is  clear,
I  think,  that  the  principal  agent  has  a  predominant
share  in  transferring  the  impression,  because  with  the
same  group  of  agents  in  the  room  the  success  with  certain
principal  agents  is  on  the  whole  greater  than  with  others.
Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee,  e.g.,  is  more  effective  as  principal
agent  than  when  she  is  merely  one  of  the  company.  As
regards  {b),  the  principal  agent  diifers  as  a  rule  from  the
rest  of  the  company  in  two  respects.  He  or  she  selects
the  subject,  and  therefore  is  likely  to  grasp  it  more  clearly
and  vividly  than  the  others  present  do.  And,  what  is
perhaps  more  important,  the  percipient  attends  especially
to  the  principal  agent,  which  probably  tends  to  bring
their  minds  into  special  rapport.

In  the  earlier  experiments  it  was  the  practice  to  try  to
intensify  this  rapport  by  the  percipient  holding  the  hand

1  In  two  other  experiments  (September  14,  1916,  and  July  14,  1918
respectively)  Professor  Murray  imagined  wrongly  that  the  subject  had
been  suggested  to  the  principal  agent  by  someone  else.  One  of  these
was  a  failure  and  the  other  a  success. (See  Appendix  No.  93.)


226


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


of  the  principal  agent.  I  am  not  sure  whether  this  is
still  the  usual  plan.  The  drawback  to  it  is,  of  course,
that  in  certain  cases  of  gradual  development  of  an  impres-
sion, indications  might  be  given  by  variation  in  hand
pressure.  Approval  or  disapproval  might  also  be  indicated
by  facial  expression  and  movements  of  the  agents  gener-
ally, but  more  delicate  shades  might  be  given  by  the  hand
of  the  principal  agent.  There  are  some  cases  where,  as
an  impression  develops  gradually  item  by  item,  the  with-
drawal by  the  percipient  of  some  item  already  mentioned
which  sometimes  occurs  (see,  e.g.  Appendix  Nos.  90,  102a,
105,  112,  129)  may  be  influenced  by  subconscious  perception
of  the  agent's  disapproval  ;  bvit  I  think  there  are  very  few,
if  any,  of  the  experiments  in  which  guidance  of  the  kind
required  to  draw  out  correct  items  could  have  been  ob-
tained in  this  way.  However  this  may  be,  there  have
been  enough  successful  experiments  in  which  the  hand  was
not  held  to  show  that  holding  it  was  not  a  necessary
condition. 1

It  seems  possible  that  agents  sometimes  interfere  with
each  other.  This  may  have  happened  in  the  sittings  on
September  10  and  14,  1916,  the  only  occasions  on  which
Mr.  W.  Mellor  was  present. Numerous  experiments — twenty-

1  We  have  in  the  present  series  7  experiments  in  which  it  is  ex-
pHcitly  stated  that  there  was  no  contact,  and  2  in  which  Professor
Murray  described  his  impression  as  he  entered  the  room,  and  therefore
cannot  have  been  holding  the  agent's  hand.  Among  these  9  there
were  1  failure,  2  partial  successes,  Appendix  No.  55  being  one  of
them,  and  6  successes,  for  which  see  Appendix  Nos.  52,  54,  71,  72,
80  and  No.  40  below  (p.  243).  After  starting  an  experiment  with
no  contact  the  hand  was  taken  in  tlie  middle  four  times.  In  one  of
these  (see  Appendix  No.  53),  with  good  results,  and  in  two  cases,  of
which  one,  No.  66,  is  given  in  the  Appendix,  with  apparently  no  result.
In  one  (.Appendix  No.  56),  contact  is  followed  by  a  correct  but  entirely
irrelevant  and  promptly  rejected  impression  about  a  book  the  agent  had
been  reading.  I  am  disposed  to  think  that  on  some  other  occasions,
even  when  nothing  is  said  abovit  it,  there  was  no  contact,  because
contact  is  mentioned  in  one  experiment  of  a  set,  as  e.g.  on  September
14,  1916,  Appendix  No.  66.  It  is  perhaps  worth  mentioning  that  on
December  27  (1919  ?),  when  Professor  M'Dougall  was  acting  unsuccess-
fully as  principal  agent,  Miss  Agnes  Murray  took  the  hand  in  the
middle  of  the  experiment  to  see  if  this  would  improve  matters,  but  it
did  not.


xcii.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  ^27

six  and  nineteen  respectively — were  tried  on  these  two
occasions,  and  Mr.  Mellor  was  principal  agent  in  eighteen  of
them,  with  a  degree  of  success  ranking  with  that  of  the
immediate  family.  But  they  were  pecuhar  sittings,  and
included  a  quite  unusual  proportion  of  failures.  Mrs.  Arnold
Toynbee  started  as  principal  agent  on  September  10,  and
began  with  four  failures.  Lady  Mary  Murray  followed  with
a  failure,  and  then  Mx.  Mellor  tried,  two  partial  successes
and  a  failure  resulting.  Then  Miss  Heath  tried  once  and
failed,  and  so  did  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee.  She  had  nothing
but  failures  on  this  day,  though  usually  a  very  successful
agent.  Mr.  Mellor  followed  with  two  partial  successes,  Mrs.
Toynbee  with  a  failure,  ]VIr.  Mellor  again  with  a  very  partial
success  and  three  failures,  and  then  Mr.  Basil  Murray,
Miss  Heath,  and  Lady  Mary  Murray  with  one  failure  each.
There  had  thus  been  twenty  experiments  with  nothing  that
I  have  counted  as  a  success.  But  at  this  point  success
began.  Mr.  Arnold  Toynbee  taking  the  part  of  principal
agent  obtained  a  complete  success  (No.  33,  p.  236  below),
and  an  interesting  partial  success  (Appendix  No.  61),  and
Mr.  Mellor  followed  with  two  successes  (Appendix  Nos.
62  and  63),  and  Mr.  Basil  Murray  with  one,  Appendix
No.  64.  The  sitting  ended  with  a  failure.  A  contem-
porary note  at  the  end  of  the  sitting  says  : —

"  A  curious  evening.  Mr.  Murray  had  a  feeling  the  whole
time  that  everyone  was  doing  it  very  badly.  Mr.  Murray
jumped  at  everythmg  with  Mr.  Mellor,  but  nothing  would  last
long.  Everything  was  very  short.  After  a  little  time  with  Mr.
Mellor  it  went  off,  and  after  trying  with  others — Rosalind  [Mrs.
Toynbee],  Lady  Mary,  Miss  Heath  and  Basil,  Mr.  Mellor  was
better  agam.  Again  Mr.  Mellor  fell  off,  and  Arnold  [Mr.
Toynbee]  was  a  success,  and  then  returning  to  Mr.  Mellor,  he
was  better  than  before.  Mr.  Murray,  the  whole  time,  had  to
do  it  in  Mr.  Mellor's  way,  which  rather  aggravated  [Note  breaks
off  here]."

At  the  next  sitting  on  September  14,  Mr.  Mellor  being
again  present,  there  was  more  success,  though  still  much
failure.  The  experimenters  must,  I  think,  have  had  the
idea  that  there  was  perhaps  in  some  unknown  way  inter-


22?


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


ference  between  agents,  for  the  plan  was  adopted  of  Mr.
Mellor  leaving  the  room  during  four  of  the  experiments
while  Mrs.  Toynbee  was  acting  as  principal  agent,  and
Mrs.  Toynbee  leaving  it  during  four  experiments  while
Mr.  Mellor  was  principal  agent  ;  and  it  certainly  happened
that  of  the  six  successes  obtained  that  evening,  five — two
with  Mrs.  Toynbee  and  three  with  Mr.  Mellor — occurred
while  the  other  was  out  of  the  room.  The  matter  is  not
commented  on  ui  the  contemporary  notes. ^

With  so  large  a  demand  for  suitable  subjects  to  transfer
as  these  experiments  involved,  one  would  expect  occasion-
ally to  meet  with  repetition.  And  there  is  a  httle.  In
the  present  series  there  are  two  iiistances  in  which  the
same  subject  from  a  book  is  selected  by  the  same  agent
after  an  interval  of  a  few  months,  and  is  successful  both
times.  (See  Appendix  Nos.  52  and  53.)  And  there
are  further  two  subjects  from  books — ^the  Bird-droves
chorus  from  Hippolytus  and  Shelley  rescued  from  drowning
— which  appear  once  m  this  series  and  also  once  in  that
reported  on  by  Mjrs.  Verrall  (see  Appendix  Nos.  45  and
99)  ;  but  while  the  hrst  of  these  produced  a  wrong  im-
pression on  the  earlier  occasion  and  was  successful  on  the

Apropos  of  above  paragraph  Professor  Murray  writes  to  me  : — "  In  the
two  cases  of  X  and  Y,  who  are  both  rather  psychic,  the  experiments  went
badly  wrong  until  we  made  them  themselves  the  agents.  I.e.  I  could  not
get  messages  from  Rosalind  while  X  or  Y  was  there,  but  when  she
went  away  and  one  of  them  was  agent,  or  if  they  went  away  and  left
her  as  agent,  all  went  well.  This  happened  only  with  these  two  persons,
and  once  or  twice  with  my  daughter  Agnes.  She  rather  disturbed  the
commimications  until  she  became  agent.  But  later  on,  when  she  had
her  full  fling  as  agent,  she  did  not  disturb  Rosalind's  communications
any  more.  (I  never  saw  enough  of  X  or  Y  to  be  able,  so  to
speak,  to  satiate  their  desire  to  act  as  agent.)  I  am  inclmed  therefore
to  think  that  the  disturbing  element  is  a  sort  of  restless  desire  on  the
part  of  some  one  present  to  act  as  agent.  If  so,  it  is  not  significant,
since  any  irritation  or  anger  ixi  the  room  acts  like  a  loud  noise  and
incapacitates  me  at  once.  I  do  not  think  I  ever  foimd  scepticism  any
particidar  obstacle.  Putting  this  more  briefly : — I  mean,  it  is  generally
supposed  in  our  circle  that  the  presence  of  another  '  medium  '  is  dis-
turbing ;  I  suggest  that  perhaps  it  is  not  the  '  mediumistic  '  quality,  but
a  certain  irritated  feeling,  '  I  could  do  that  :  I  want  to  do  that  rnyself,'
which  causes  the  disturbance."


xcii.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  229

second,  the  other,  very  successful  eariier,  produced  no
impression  at  all  when  given  again.  On  none  of  the
occasions  do  either  agent  or  percipient  appear  to  have
been  conscious  of  the  repetition.

So  far  the  experiments  have  been  discussed  either  from
the  pomt  of  view  of  success  and  failure,  or  from  that  of
the  agent's  share  in  them.  I  now  turn  to  the  interesting
and  important  question  of  what  light  is  thrown  by  the
records  on  the  way  the  ideas  the  agent  desires  to  transfer
reach  the  mind  of  the  percipient.  In  connection  with  this,
Professor  Murray's  own  discussion  of  the  subject  in  1915
{Proct^edings,  vol.  xxix.,  pp.  57-63)  should  be  read.  He
tells  us  in  his  Presidential  address,  among  other  things,
that  he  thuiks  that  when  experimenting  he  probably  gets
into  a  state  of  slight  hypersesthesia  and  is  particularly
sensitive  to  every  kind  of  impression — noises,  for  instance,
becoming  mtolerable.  He  also  says  he  inchnes  to  the
conclusion  that

"  the  basis  of  this  so-called  telepathy  is  unconscious  sense-
perception,  the  sensory  disturbance  itself  being  too  slight  for
consciousness,  but  the  state  of  mind  resiiltrag  from  it  being

fuUy  perceptible But,"  he  adds,  "we  must  be  prepared

for  the  possibility  that  this  sense-perception  is  not  confined  to
the  canonical  five  chamaels  of  Sight,  Sound,  Smell,  Taste,
Touch  .  .  .  Again,  some  of  the  information  which  seems  to
come  most  clearly  and  rapidly,  as  when  I  feel  a  certam  emo-
tional atmosphere,  or  the  country  to  which  an  uicident  belongs,
or  the  fact  that  it  is  in  a  book  and  not  in  real  life,  does  not
seem  to  be  the  sort  that  could  well  be  conveyed  by  mere
sense-impressions  of  the  canonical  sort.  Thus  1  should  be
inclined  provisionally  to  admit  the  likelihood  that  we  may
become  directly  sensitive  to  another  person's  state  of  mind."

In  this  last  sentence  Professor  Murray  of  course  admits
the  probability  that  telepathy  has  operated,  but  without
committing  himself  to  telepathy  bemg  a  purely  psychical
process.  He  leaves  the  way  open,  as  I  understand  him,
to  the  theory  which  used  to  be  described  as  "brain
waves,"  but  of  which  little  has  been  heard  of  late.  His


230  Mrs.  Hennj  Sidgivick  [part,,

suggestion  of  hyperaesthesia,  however,  makes  it  necessary  |
to  scrutinise  the  records  carefully  to  see  what  sign  of  it  ;
there  is. I will begin with the less important  senses.
Touch,  which  can, I  think, only  have  operated  through
holding  of  hands,  and  then  only  in  expressing  approval  or
disapproval  by  the  agent  of  what  has  already  been  said
by  the  percipient,  has  been  discussed  above  (p.  226).  Taste
and  smell  do  not  so  far  as  I  can  see  come  into  the  ques-
tion of  hyperaesthesia  at  all,  because  there  were  no  real
tastes  and  smells  to  be  intensified  by  it. It  is  true  that  i
the  percipient's  impression  began  with  a  sensation  of  smell
on  two  occasions,  but  this  had  nothing  to  do  with  any  '
physically  caused  sensation. I  shall  revert  to  the  matter  later.

The  possibility  of  hyperaesthesia  of  sight — unless  on  the
extreme  assumption  that  we  can  potentially  see  anything
anywhere  at  any  distance  and  through  any  obstacle,  and
that  therefore  the  percipient  can  read  the  note-taker's  record  I
of  the  "  subject  "—is  in  much  the  same  position  as  that  of  t
touch. The  only  scope  for  it  seems  to  be  in  the  seeing  of  I
slight  signs of  approval  or  disapproval  as  the  percipient
proceeds  with  his  description. He  cannot,  however  much  his
sensibility  is  heightened,  be  supposed  to  see  concrete  ideas
or  names  in  the  faces  of  the  agents. Sight  in  the  sense
of mental seeing — the share of mental pictures in  the
percipient's  impressions— like  imaginary  smells  and  sounds
we  must  return  to  later.

The  only  sense  through  which  we  can  seriously  imagine
hyperaesthesia  helping  Professor  Murray  in  his  '"'  guesses  "
is,  I  think,  it  will  be  agreed,  the  sense  of  hearing.  In  the
experiments  before  us  the  subject  selected  for  transmission
is  always  spoken  before  it  is  written  down,  and  I  learn
from  Professor  Murray  that  at  the  beginning  of  the  ex-
periments tests  were  made  to  see  if  any  fragments  of
ordinary  conversation  could  be  heard  at  the  place  where
he  usually  stood,  and  that  the  experimenters  were  satisfied
that  they  could  not.  His  own  ordinary  hearing,  he  tells
me,  is  normal,  but  certainly  not  unusually  acute.  It
may,  however,  be  that  though  out  of  earshot  so  far  as
consciousness  or  normal  hearing  is  concerned,  he  yet  sub-
consciously hears  the  agent's  description. There  are  some


xcu.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transfer ence  231

arguments,  both  for  and  against  this  possibiUty,  to  be
found  ^  in  the  experiments  under  consideration,  as  there
were  in  those  reported  on  by  Mrs.  Verrall.

Takuig  first  thuigs  which  suggest  hearing. There  were  first
and  foremost  two  experiments stopped because  Professor
Murray  heard,  or  thought  he  had  heard,  a  name. In  the
first  (No.  24)  (August  17,  1918)  the  subject  was  "Pendennis
at  Charterhouse,"  and  Professor  Murray  heard  the  word
'Pendennis.' In  the  second  (No.  25)  (December  20,  1919)
the  subject  was "Denis  motoring  from  here  to  London
by,  etc," and  Professor  Murray  heard  '  Denis.' In  both
cases  the  agent  was  Mr.  Basil  Murray. Professor  Murray
writes  to  me as regards these occasions, "  I am  not
clear  whether  accidentally  from  excitement  somebody  had
spoken  unusually  loud,  or  whether  my  hearing  was  super-
normal. It  seemed  to  me  hke  the  first,  but  this  is  not
evidence."

In  a  very  curious  case,  in  which  a  name  was  neither
consciously  heard  or  apprehended,  it  vet  seems  as  if  it
must  have  '  got  through,'  and  if  so,  was  the  only  part  of
the  "  subject  "  that  did. It  was  as  follows  :

July  14,  1918.

26.  Subject.  Mr.  Penmoklan  Main  (agent)  :  "  Sh  Francis
Drake  drinking  the  health  of  Doughty  before  he  was  led  out
to  be  hanged."

Pbofessor  Murray. "  Is  this  a-?-No,  I've  a  faint  feeling
of  Arabia  or  desert."

Now  Mr.  C.  M.  Doughty,  the  traveller,  wrote  a  well-
known  book  called  Travels  in  Arabia  Deserta,  and  it  seems
almost  certain  that  the  "  faint  feeling  of  Arabia  or  desert  "
arose  from  association  of  ideas  with  the  name  Douc^htv
—the  association  with  Thomas  Doughty,  the  mutineeV
tried  and  executed  by  Drake,  being  at  the  moment  absent
It  this  IS  correct,  how  did  the  item  Doughty  reach  the
percipient  with  the  exclusion  of  other  items  in  the  "sub-
ject "  proposed  ?  1 It  is  obviously  just  what  might  have

ca^e  of  orJy  a  single  word  of  the  "subject"  being  apprehended
given  m  Mrs.  Verrall's  record,  p.  74. Also  one  where  the  sound  of  a
word  was  grasped  and  at  first  misinterpreted.


232


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


happened  in  case  of  imperfect  hearing.  But  this  kind  of
imperfect  apprehension,  followed  by  wrong  associations  of
ideas,  might  also  happen  telepathically.^  In  the  following
case,  though  the  chain  of  association  is  more  doubtful
than  in  the  Doughty  case,  I  think  the  one  I  shall  suggest
is  probably  the  real  one  ;  and  if  so,  sound  is  not  a  link
in  it.

September  10,  1916.

27.  Subject. Mr. Mellor (agent)  : "  I'm thinking of  the
operating  room  in  the  nursing  home  in  which  I  was  operated."
Professor  Murray. "  I  got  an  impression  of  a  theatre.
No. I  can't  get  it. I'm  now  guessing — Covent  Garden
and  CEdipus."

I  think  that  here  the  idea  of  an  operating  room  reached
the  percipient's  consciousness  in  the  form  of  theatre —
operating  theatre  of  a  hospital — but  was  not  under-
stood, being  in  fact  taken  to  be  a  place  where  plays  are
acted.  But  the  mistake,  in  whatever  way  it  arose,  was
not  auditory.

It  should  perhaps  be  considered  on  the  side  of  auditory
hyperaesthesia  that  on  the  two  occasions  when  the  "  subject  "
had  been  suggested  to  the  principal  agent  by  Mr.  Gerald
Balfour  (see  Nos.  2  and  8  above),  the  fact  that  it  was
Mr.  Balfour's  suggestion  was  realised  by  the  percipient,
as  might  have  been  the  case  if  he  had  heard  his  voice.
But  again  this  might  equally  be  due  to  telepathy.

The  apprehension  of  the  rhythm  of  a  verse  or  a  sen-
tence before  that  of  its  meaning  may  be  suggestive  of  an
auditory  channel  of  transmission,  and  there  are  one  or  two
instances  of  this.  No.  20  above  (p.  223),  where  a  stanza
from  The  Shropshire  Lad  is  recognised  but  not  completely
quoted  by  the  percipient,  is  perhaps  a  case.  And  the
following  is  one  where  the  impression  of  rhythm  and  of
the  sound  of  counting  combine  to  suggest  possible  hearing.

1  We  must  not  altogether  ignore  the  possibility  that  some  one  of  the
agents  may  have  had  in  mind,  perhaps  subconscioiisly,  the  association
of  the  name  Doughty  with  Arabia  Deserta  and  conveyed  this  telepathic-
ally  to  the  percipient,  and  a  similar  possibility  must  be  kept  in  mind  in
some  other  cases.


xcn.]  Experiments  m  Thought-Transference  233

April  6,  1924.

28.  Subject. Mr.  Basil  Mitiiray  (agent)  :

"  He  stood  and  heard  the  steeple

Sprinkle  the  quarters  on  the  morning  town —
One,  two,  three,  four,  on  market  place  and  people —
It  tossed  them  down."

1  Professor  Murray.  "  Oh  this  is  a  bit  of  a  poem."  [He]
!  marks  the  metre  [with  his  hand]. Metre  wrong;  but

i  [he]  got "  One,  two,  three,  four."

I The  search  for  instances  of  possible  sensory  transmission
pleads  to  dwelling  on  experiments  that  failed,  and  it  will
be  refreshing  to  turn  to  one  that  succeeded,  but  in  which
the  rhythm  of  part  of  the  central  sentence  was  appre-
hended before  the  words  and  sense  were  gradually  grasped.

July  14,  1918.

29.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  This  is  the
gu-1  in  the  Cherry  Orchard,  by  TchekofE,  saying— When  I  was
in  Paris  I  went  up  in  a  balloon."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  think  this  is  a  Russian  story— a
particular  sentence,  words  '  De  dum  dum  de  dum  dum — I
went  up  in  a  balloon.'  '  When  I  was  the  something,  I
went  up  in  a  balloon  ' — '  when  I  was  in  Paris,  I  went
up  ui  a  balloon.'  "

[I  do  not  think  the  sentence  occurs  in  that  exact  form  in
ihe  book.]

i  I  have  not  noticed  any  instances  such  as  occurred  in
iihe  series  reported  on  by  IVIrs.  Verrall,  where  a  name  or
I  word  was  mistaken  for  one  similar  in  sound,  and  I  think
[  have  given  above  all  the  instances  which  in  any  way
lupport  the  idea  of  auditory  hypersesthesia,  unless  the
ilmost  verbatim  repetition  by  the  percipient  of  the  "  sub-
ect "  set,  whether  prose  or  poetry,  which  sometimes
>ccurs  be  regarded  as  such.  In  the  case  of  poetry,  how-
ver,  a  fuU  and  correct  transmission  of  the  idea  would  of
ourse  produce  the  quotation  asked  for  verbatim,  if  the
toem  is  known  to  the  percipient.  The  following  is  an
astance : —

Q


got


wlii


234  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick  [part

April  6,  1924.

30.  Subject. Mb.  Stephen  Muebay  (agent)  :

"  There  is  some  comer  of  a  foreign  field
Tliat  is  for  ever  England's. R.  Brooke."

Peofessob  Murbay.

"  There's  some  corner  of  a  foreign  field
That  is  for  ever  England."  .  '

[The  original  runs  :  '

If  I  should  die,  think  only  this  of  me  :  |

That  there's  some  corner  of  a  foreign  field

That  is  for  ever  England.]

The  only  instance  I  recall  of  the  almost  word  for  word
reproduction  of  the  whole  of  a  prose  "  subject,"  is  the
following  :  I

May  26,  1923.

31.  Subject. Me.  Denis  Mubeay  (agent)  :  "  Wiggs  throwing
the  Idtten  in  the  air  at  Overstrand."

Peofessob Muebay. "  This time I've got a clear  idea.
Wiggs  tossing  the  kitten  in  the  air  at  Overstrand."

Here  the  words  used  are  so  much  the  natural  ones  ir
which  to  describe  the  short  and  simple  incident,  that
whether  the  idea  reached  the  percipient  telepathically  oi
otherwise  he  would  be  hkely  to  clothe  it  in  that  form
Still,  of  course,  auditory  hypersesthesia  is  not  excluded.

I  now  proceed  to  cases  which  do  seem  to  exclude
auditory  hypersesthesia,  and  cases  where,  if  it  operated  al
all,  its  effect  on  the  percipient's  reproduction  of  the
"  subject "  must  have  been  indirect.  The  most  crucia
kind  of  case  is  that  in  which  the  percipient  has  corred
impressions  of  things  neither  mentioned  by  the  agent  ii
giving  the  "subject"  nor  such  as  would  necessarily  bej^j,
inferred  from  what  is  mentioned.  There  are  a  few  in
stances  of  this.  No.  1  (p.  214  above)  is  a  case  ii
point  ;  for  the  impression  that  in  a  scene  from  a  bool
the  people  present  were  mocking  and  then  were  sorry  anc
wanted  to  be  kind,  was  true,  but  had  not  been  mentioned
and  Professor  Murray  had  not  read  the  book.  Anothe


iroi
per

Kt

m
115


111!


ilrf(


iij  xcii.]  Experiments  in  Tkought-Transference  235

example  from  a  book  which  he  appears  not  to  have  read
will  be  found  in  the  Appendix  No.  88. That  the  person
to  whom  shelter  was  given  was  a  spy  and  an  Englishman
is  not  either  stated  or  implied  in  the  words  of  the  agent,
but  was  nevertheless  arrived  at  by  the  percipient.  Another
case  where  a  "  subject "  is  taken  from  a  book  is  somewhat
different  from  these. It  is  given  in  full  in  the  Appendix
No. 48. The subject consisted of "the gkl  skating,"
from  a  Swedish  book  named  by  the  agent. The  percipient
got  Scandinavia  and,  after  first  being  misled  by  another
association with Scandinavia and skating, which he  re-
jected, correctly  got  a  girl  skating  in  "a  very  wild  atmo-
sphere"  "and  wild  burly  people,"  and  named  the  book  in
which  the  scene  occurred  and  which  he  had  read.  But
the  book  he  named  was  different  from  that  named  by
the agent  ; and it turned out that he was right — ^the
scene  intended  was  in  the  book  named  by  him. It  is
clear  that  his  impression  went  far  beyond  anything  said
by  the  agent  or  necessarily  implied  in  what  was  said.  He
must  first,  it  would  appear,  have  got  the  scene  and  the
general  atmosphere,  and  then  remembered  where  it  came
j^ifrom. In  a  fourth  case  the  incident  described  was  not
jt;from a book. The agent imagined a high  two-wheeled
buggy  being  driven  down  Holywell  at Oxford, and  the
,^  J  percipient  got  this,  but  added  that  it  was  on  "a  muddy
jwet  day." The  agent  had  not  mentioned  mud,  but  after-
wards said  that  she  had  thought  of  it  (see  Appendix  No.
itl8jll5). It  is curious that though  the  percipient  appears
3t|t.hus  to  have  apprehended  a  sort  of  accidental  accessory
Ho  the  picture  in  the  agent's  mind,  he  failed  to  realise
iwho  the  person  was  who  was  supposed  to  be  driving  the
ect|buggy— a  person  well  known  to  him.

The  kind  of  case  which  may  be  put  next  in  order  as
svidence  against  auditory  hyperajsthesia  is  that  in  which
the  percipient  fails  to  recognise  a  person  or  book  named
ijby  the  agent  but  realises  something  which  is  true  about
Hhat  person  or  book  though  not  mentioned  by  the  agent—
somethmg which would, however, have been a  natural
inference  from  the  name  had  the  name  been  grasped.  A
li^^.ase  in  point  is  the  following  :


KI

Ifit
Jen
k
bi

C

h.


K


236  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick  [pabt

March  10,  1913.

32.  Subject. Mks.  Arnold  Toynbeb  (agent)  :  "  I'll  think  of

Margaret  K  ■  at  a  particular  restaurant  in  Munich  where  I

used  to  have  lunch."

Professor  Murray.  "  It's  some  girl  I  don't  know— a  Cam-
bridge girl,  I  think — I  can't  get  it  clear — is  she  standing
in  a  restaurant  or  something  like  that  1  "

Here,  if  the  agent  had  grasped  the  name,  Margaret  K  ,

he  would  have  known,  no  doubt,  that  she  was  a  Cam-
bridge girl  he  did  not  know  ;  but  it  is  difficult  to  see  how
he  can  have  arrived  at  these  unmentioned  facts  about  her
(except  telepathically)  without  the  name.  |*
Two  cases  in  the  Appendix  (Nos.  92  and  94)  may  fa
be  referred  to  in  this  connection.  In  No.  92  the  per-f"ai
cipient  does  not  realise  that  it  is  the  death  of  Hereward
the  Wake  that  the  agent  had  spoken  of,  though  he  does
realise  that  the  somebody  killed  was  early  Saxon  or  Norse
and  fought  with  a  battle-axe— which  facts  had  not  been
named.  In  No.  94  the  "  subject  "  is  taken  from  a  book
the  percipient  had  not  read,  but  he  realises  that  it  is  a
sort  of  legend  or  fairy  story,  though  this  is  not  implied
in  the  agent's  words,  at  least  apart  from  the  unappre-
hended name.

The  order  in  which  the  elements  of  a  "  subject  "  present
themselves  in  the  impression  of  the  percipient  is  often
very  unlike  what  one  would  expect  if  the  impression
depended  on  hearing  the  words  spoken  by  the  agent.
One  form  of  this  is  when  the  agent  names  a  person,  and
a  mental  picture  presents  itseH  to  the  percipient,  inter-
preted by  him  as  representing  that  person  whom  he  then,
but  only  then,  names.  For  example,  on  September  10,
1916  :

33.  Subject.  Mr.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I'll  do  Riff
Van  Winkle  coming  down  the  mountain."  i^'

Professor  Murray. "  Oh  I've  got  this. It's  an  old  sort  d
gnome-like  person  with  a  matted  beard  coming  down— r
very funny feeling expecting to be known  and  fine
things— Oh  it's  Rip  Van  Winkle."
Professor  Murray  gets  a  good  picture  of  Rip  Van  Winkle  [j^


lo,
liim

0,

T

ink


pec


xcn.]  Experiments  m  Thought-Transference  237

with  appropriate  description  of  his  mental  state — neither
"'  derived  directly  from  the  agent's  words — before  he  realises
that  his  picture  represents  Rip  Van  Winkle  after  awaking
ifrom  his  200  years'  sleep.

Other  somewhat  similar  instances  in  the  Appendix  are
No. 70, where the saUent personality in the  agent's
i  statement, is named only after being described  by
-  the  percipient; No.  82,  where Mr. Gladstone  is  spoken
II- of  by  the  percipient  as  a  dignified  person before  he  is
iwjrecognised  ;  Nos.  86  and  98,  where  the  name  Lusitania —
eri  prominent  in  the  "  subject  " — is  got  at  by  the  percipient
after  "Torpedoed  ship — people  getting  away  in  boats...
ly  great big ship  " has been said in the first case,  and
r- "  awful  impression  of  naval  disaster "  in  the  second.  A
rdname uttered by the agent, but only appearing  after
feeling  about  the  subject  by  the  percipient  occurs  also  in
some  cases of  confused  impressions  gradually  developing
into  the  right  one. A  conspicuous  example  is  Appendix
No.  90,  when  Rousseau  and  the  right  incident  concerning
tiim are at length grasped. Compare also  Appendix
ed'No.  102a.

e-j There are two instances where the idea required  is

jintroduced by a feeUng of an appropriate smell.  The

nt  'ollowing  is  one  of  them  :

pn  ...
April  22,  1923.

34.  Subject. Mr.  Patrick  Murray  (agent)  [The  only  time
ie  acted  as  such] :  "  The  lion  in  the  Zoo  tr\ang  to  reach  a  large
liece  of  meat  just  outside  the  cage."
Professor  Mtjrray. "A  sort  of  smell  of  wild  animals— car-
nivorous animals. Something  grabbing  through  bars  at  a
piece  of  meat  at  a  Zoo. Don't  know  the  animal."

.n the other instance which is quoted in  full in  the
Appendix No. 49, Professor Murray begins by  saying
'This  is  curious. I've  got  a  smell  of  some  kind  of  in-
^lensy  stufi — I  should  think  it  was  opium  or  hashish — "
■^he  "subject"  being  in  fact  a  night  club  and  opium  den.
The  smell  experienced  by  the  percipient  in  both  these  cases
Qust  have  been  an  imaginary  or  hallucinatory  smell ;  there
'°'an  hardly  have  been  any  real  smell  to  suggest  it.  And


238  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick  [paut

why  the  required  impression  should  enter  the  consciousness
of  the  percipient  in  this  particular  way  is  mysterious.  It  is
possible,  no  doubt,  that  the  agents,  or  one  of  them,  may
have  been  thinking  of  the  smell  appropriate  to  the  idea
they  wished  to  transfer  ;  but  had  they  been  conscious  of
doing  so,  the  fact  would  almost  certainly  have  been
mentioned  after  the  experiment.  I  think  it  must  be  \
assumed  that  the  idea  of  the  smell  originated  in  the  i
percipient's  mind,  and  if  so,  that  hypersesthesia  cannot
have  had  anjrthing  directly  to  do  with  it.

It  will  be  observed  that  there  is  a  difference  in  the
relation  of  the  smell  to  the  whole  impression  in  these
cases  and  in  the  experience  of  smell  in  the  case  mentioned
by  Professor  Murray  in  his  Presidential  address.  (Proc,  vol.
xxix.,  p.  59).  In  this  earlier  case  a  small  bit  of  tarry
coal  falling  out  of  the  fire  was  the  apparent  means  of
bringing  into  consciousness  the  smell  of  oil  or  paint  burn-
ing, and  so  the  scene  of  Savonarola  and  the  burning  of
pictures,  etc.,  in  the  square  at  Florence  ;  there  was  an
external  cause — perhaps  a  real  smell  from  the  tarry  coal —
to  suggest  the  smell  of  burning  pictures.  In  the  cases
before  us  there  seems  to  have  been  nothing  to  suggest
the  smell  except  the  "  subject "  of  the  experiment  itself.

On  one  occasion,  what  was  presumably  in  part  at  least
a  sensation  of  soimd,  "  the  feeling  of  something  whizzing
along  at  a  tremendous  speed — aeroplane  or  car  " — introduced
the  percipient's  correct  impression  (a  certain  motor  car
race,  see  Appendix  No.  130),  just  as  an  appropriate
sensation  of  smell  introduced  it  in  the  two  cases  just
mentioned. There  was  no  real  sound  to  suggest  it,  apparently.

We  may  note  in  passing  that,  like  smells,  inarticulate
sounds  seem  to  have  entered  very  little  into  any  part  of
Professor  Murray's  impressions.  I  find  but  three  cases
besides  the  one  just  referred  to  which  suggest  it.  One
is  the  successful  impression  in  No.  7  (p.  215  above),
where  getting  "  the  bursting  of  shells  "  may  have  meant
that  they  were  heard,  though  not  necessarily  so.  In  the
other  two  the  impressions  were  entirely  wrong,  but  may
have  included  sound.  In  No.  35,  September  10,  1916,
the  percipient  got  a  "  sort  of  feeUng  of  a  heavy  hammer


10


lc(


xcn.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  239

in  an  engineering  place  "  when  the  subject  was  "  the  waves
breaking  on  the  breakwater."  And  in  No.  36  on  April
29,  1917,  he  had  a  "  faint  impression  of  an  explosion  or  a
fire  "  when  the  subject  was  "  Mr.  Asquith  being  taken  up
to  the  front  in  a  staff  car  down  at  Verdun."  Only  once,
so  far  as  I  know,  did  an  agent  try  to  impress  an  in-
articulate sound  on  the  percipient — it  was  the  croaking  of
frogs — but  no  impression  was  received  (see  Appendix  No.
60).  It  occurred,  however,  in  the  middle  of  a  series  of
failures.

Returning  to  the  question  of  hyperaesthesia.  Cases  where
the  percipient's  impressions  begin  with  something  associated
.  in  idea  with  the  "  subject  "  of  the  experiment,  but  some-
thing not  alluded  to  by  the  agent  at  all,  must  I  think  be
regarded  as  weighing  against  any  explanation  by  auditory
hyperaesthesia,  for  the  associated  idea  precedes  any  know-
ledge of  the  subject. The  foUowmg  is  a  case  in  point  :

August  17,  1918.

37.  Subject.  Mr.  Basil  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinking  of  the
I  Etruscan  seer  who  during  the  siege  of  Veil  was  captured  by  a

young  Roman  warrior. He  told  them  to  drain  the  Alban  lake

in  order  to  take  Veii."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  don't  thmk  it's  Balaam,  but  it's
something  like — It's  a  prophet  who's  serving  the  wrong
side — not  Hebrew.  I  think  it's  early  Roman — I've  got
the  impression  that  he's  telling  them  to  drain  a  marsh. —
Does  he  come  in  Livy  ?  I  get  an  impression  that  he's
caught  and  made  to  reveal  a  secret."

For  other  examples  see  Appendix  Nos.  77  and  81  and
No.  42  (p.  244  below).  And  perhaps  we  may  class  with
these  the  following  case  (only  partially  successful)  where
an  emotion — that  of  being  frightened,  unmentioned  by  the
agent — appears  to  precede  any  realisation  by  the  percipient
of  facts  which  would  have  justified  it.

May  29,  1919.

38.  Subject. Miss  Agkes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  Don  Juan  eat-
ing cucumber  sandwiches  with  [X.  Y. a  modern  woman]  on

'  Mount  Vesuvius."


240


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


Professok  Mueray.  "  Curious  feeling  of  being  frightened.
It's  quite  clearly  Mount  Vesuvius.  It  isn't  an  eruption.
It  is  some  one  quite  idly  on  the  top,  not  frightened—
picknickmg — simply  my  own  feeling  how  dangerous  it  is  "
("  Can  you  get  who  they  are  ?  ")  "  No — Rosalind.  They
are  eating  their  picnic."

(Mr.  Murray  had  a  feelmg  of  cucumber  at  one  time.)

A  case  which  may  be  compared  with  this  is  No.  78
in  the  Appendix,  where  the  emotion  of  being  afraid  in  a
first  battle  presents  itself  not  inappropriately,  though  the
impression  as  a  whole  is  a  failure.

With  these  cases  of  emotion  may  be  considered  what
Professor  Murray  calls  in  his  Presidential  address,  "  a
sort  of  indeterminate  sense  of  quality  or  atmosphere  "  ^ —
geographical,  literary  or  other — which  often  precedes  any
more  definite  idea  in  his  impression,  and  which  appears
to  him  unlikely  to  be  conveyed  by  the  senses.  There  is,
however,  apt  to  be  some  word  or  phrase  in  the  "  subject  "
given  which,  if  apprehended,  might  suggest  the  atmo-
sphere in  question,  as  there  is,  e.g.  in  the  case  No,  78
just  referred  to.

Another  argument  against  the  source  of  Professor
Murray's  impressions  being  actual  hearing  is  afforded  by
cases  where  the  general  idea  is  manifestly  caught  by  the
percipient  and  the  right  atmosphere,  as  it  were,  given,
yet  no  single  important  word  of  the  subject  is  reproduced
by  the  percipient.  No.  97  in  the  Appendix  is  a  case  in
point.  We  get  there  King  George  "  giving  V.C.'s  and
things  " — or  at  any  rate  "  an  investiture  of  some  sort,"  for
Queen  Victoria  giving  medals  to  the  Crimean  soldiers,
There  is  a  similar  kind  of  transformation  in  No.  84.
where  crowded  Eastern  streets  are  substituted  for  the
bazaar  in  Cairo  ;  but  in  this  case  the  guess  that  follows
is  badly  off  the  track.  >

I  think  there  is  not  much  more  to  be  said  for  or
against  aid  being  received  by  Professor  Murray  through
the senses, or in particular the sense of hearing.  In

1  See  Proceedings,  vol.  xxix.,  p.  60,  and  also  the  extract  from  the
address  quoted  above,  pp.  212,  213.


xcn.]  Experiments  in  ThougM-Transference  241

some  cases  the  evidence  against  it  seems,  as  we  have  seen,
conclusive,  and  I  feel  sure  that  if  hearing,  however  hyper-
aesthetic,  has  operated  at  all,  it  has  done  so  rarely.

I  do  not  propose  to  comment  on  all  the  experiments
before  us,  one  by  one.  But  before  concluding,  there  are
a  few  things  about  the  way  the  impression  comes  to  the
percipient  which  it  may  be  interesting  to  note.  Though
Professor  Murray's  attempts  to  reproduce  the  agent's
subject  are  sometimes  spoken  of  as  guesses,  no  one,  after
reahsing  the  degree  of  success  obtained,  will  imagine  that
mere  guessing  could  have  produced  it.  It  is  evident  that
telepathy,  or  some  other  agency,  has  been  at  work.  At
the  same  time  Professor  Murray  distinguishes  three  things
— namely,  the  impressions  that  come  to  him  from  without,
inferences  from  these  impressions,  and  guesses  to  supple-
ment them.  No  doubt  both  inferences  and  guesses  may
sometimes  really  be  impressions  from  without,  but  they
do  not  appear  so  at  the  time  to  the  percipient.  In  the
following  case  impression,  guess,  and  inference  are  all
exemplified.

December  26,  1921.

39.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of  John
Bright  going  to  speak  in  Birmingham  on  free  trade— so  fright-
ened he  feU  off  his  chair."

Professor  Murray.  "This  is  somebody  all  of  a  tremble-
It's  somebody  with  [a]  sort  of  stage  fright  who  is  going
to  make  a  big  speech— I  think  he  faUs  down— Does  he
faU  off  his  chair  ?  Oh  I'm  merely  guessing— but  I  should
think  it's  John  Bright — oh  well — the  rest  I  can  guess.
I  suppose  he  was  making  [the]  speech  on  free  trade- at
Birmingham."

I  The  percipient  here  gets  an  impression  of  the  scene,
jj  guesses  that  John  Bright  was  the  person  concerned,  and
I  given  these  facts,  infers  that  he  was  making  a  speech  on
1  free  trade  ;  for  I  assume  that  when  Professor  Murray  said
'  "the  rest  I  can  guess,"  he  meant  it  appeared  to  him  a
I  pretty  obvious  inference.

It  is  of  course  the  "impressions,"  as  probable  examples


242


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


of  telepathy,  that  interest  us  ;  and  their  nature  and
quaUty  vary  in  different  ways.  First  they  differ  in  in-
tensity and  clearness — varying  from  strong  to  faint  or
even  very  faint,  and  from  clear  to  blurred.  From  the
remarks  occasionally  made  by  the  percipient  about  the
vividness,  etc.,  of  particular  impressions,  I  should  judge
that  one  which  is  strong  and  clear,  or  which  comes
quickly,  is  usually  right,  but  not  always.^  But,  on  the
other  hand,  the  impressions  may  be  faint  and  dim  or
blurred,  or  slow  in  developing,  in  quite  successful  ex-
periments.

Slow  development  is,  sometimes  at  least,  a  kind  of
groping  after  the  "  subject  "  with  or  without  ultimate
success.  The  feeling,  I  suppose,  is  like  what  we  have
when  we  are  trying  to  recall  something — e.g.  a  name  or
an  address — which  we  know  we  ought  to  remember  and
feel  on  the  verge  of  remembering,  but  which  will  not
emerge  into  consciousness.  Perhaps  indeed  the  attempt  in
both  cases  is  to  raise  into  consciousness  what  is  already
in  our  minds  subconsciously.  A  very  good  instance  of
groping  for  the  right  impression  which  does  not  come  is
No.  47  in  the  Appendix.  See  also  No.  16,  (p.  220
above),  and  Appendix  No.  139.  Successful  groping  is
seen  in  No.  4,  (p.  215  above),  and  in  other  cases  of
gradual  development  (e.g.  Appendix  Nos.  61,  90,  95).
An instance where groping  probably led  to guessing  is

1  In  17  of  the  33  cases  of  failure  (spoken  of  on  p.  220  above)  in
which  Professor  Murray  got  some  impression,  but  a  wholly  wrong  one,
it  is  stated  that  the  impression  was  faint  or  vagxie,  and  in  all  these
but  one  this  statement  about  faintness  was  made  before  anything  was
said  of  what  the  impression  was.  In  the  other  16  cases  nothing  at  all
was  said  about  the  intensity  of  the  impression.  There  is,  however,  a
case  of  mixed  success  and  failure  on  February  24,  1918,  when  the
subject  to  be  transferred  was  an  incident  concerning  a  Mrs.  B.  '  being
silly  '  at  a  cricket  match.  Professor  Murray  described  another  incident
concerning  her  and  then  said,  "  No — it  is  Mrs.  B. — I  don't  expect  I
shall  get  it — because  I  got  that  ]'the  wrong  incident]  quite  clearly."
On  reading  this  report  Professor  Murray  added : — "  But  the  incident,
though  wrong,  was  a  very  characteristic  example  of  the  kind  of
'  silliness  '  implied.  The  mistake  was  perhaps  due  to  my  subconscious
self  over-dramatising  the  vague  expression."  The  principal  agent  in
this  case  was  acting  as  such  for  the  only  time in  the  present  series.


xcn.]


Experhnents  hi  Thought-Transference


243


Appendix  No.  118,  where  the  subject  is  "the  four  riders
of  the  Apocalypse,"  and  the  percipient  having  got  gallop-
ing horses,  and  presumably  some  subconscious  idea  that
there  is  something  unreal  about  them,  thinks  for  a  moment
that  it  is  going  to  be  a  Walkyrie  ride.

In  contrast  to  cases  of  gradual  development  are  those
where  the  impression  comes  instantly,  and  the  percipient
probably  could  not  have  told  us  how  it  came  to  him.
For  instances  of  this  see  Appendix  Nos.  46  and  80,  and
the  following  case  (which  chronologically  followed  80).

November  18,  1917.

40.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  Alice  in  Wonder-
land, falling  down  the  rabbit  hole  and  landing  where  Bill  the
Lizard  is  watching,  and  White  Rabbit  is  going  by  at  the
same  time."

Professor  Murray  (as  he  enters  the  room).  "  I  want  to  say
'  Oh  my  ears  and  whiskers.'  "

[In  the  book,  when  Alice  after  falling  down  the  rabbit  hole
pursues  and  comes  up  with  the  White  Rabbit,  he  is  saying
'  0  my  ears  and  whiskers,  how  late  it's  growing.'  Bill  the
Lizard  does  not  appear  in  this  scene  in  the  book.]

In  this  case  the  impression  takes  the  form  of  a  quotation
so  appropriate  as  to  make  it  certain  that  the  subject  to
be  transferred  has  been  apprehended.  There  are  several
examples  of  this. The  following  is  one  :

Augiist  17,  1918.

41.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of  the
scene  in  Macbeth  when  the  feast  is  beginning  and  Lady  Macbeth
is  sittmg  at  the  head  of  the  table,  and  Macbeth  comes  in  and
won't  sit  down  because  he  sees  the  murdered  ghost."

Professor  Murray.  "  I've  got  this  : — '  Which  of  you  has
done  this  ?  '  It's  Macbeth  when  he  sees  the  ghost  in
the  chair."

[The  quotation  is  Macbetli's  first  remark  when  he  sees  Ban-
quo's  ghost  in  his  chair.]

Compare  with  this  Appendix  Nos.  76,  85,  89,  106,
107. In No. 109 an appropriate quotation  comes  to


244


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


Professor  Murray  at  once,  but  does  not  imply  the  whole
subject,  most  of  which,  however,  is  successfully  developed
afterwards.

In  all  these  cases  where  the  answer  is  given  in  the
form  of  a  quotation,  it  would  seem  probable  that  the
agent's  ideas  reached  the  percipient  first  as  ideas.

In  other  cases,  as  we  have  seen,  the  impression  comes
first  through  a  sensory  mental  channel,  e.g.  smell  in  No.
34,  (p.  237),  sound  in  Appendix  No.  130,  a  visual  image
in  No.  33,  (p.  236).  A  very  clear  case  of  a  visual  image
and  nothing  else  wiU  be  found  in  the  Appendix  No.  101.
The  percipient  recognised  almost  all  the  details  of  the
scene  intended  as  though  he  had  had  the  scene  itself  or
an  actual  picture  of  it  before  his  eyes,  but — as  would
equally  have  been  the  case  with  a  real  picture  unex-
plained— he  failed  to  realise  the  agent's  chief  idea,  which
was  that  the  little  girl  sewing  under  the  apple  trees  was
a  youthful  Joan  of  Arc.  Her  appearance  could  not  inter-
pret itself  as  Rip  Van  Winkle's  could.

Probably  in  most  cases  the  impression  comes  in  a  mixed
way— partly  as  ideas  not,  at  least  to  begin  with,  of  a
sensory  kind,  and  partly  as  visual  or  auditory  images.
Judging  from  the  experience  of  other  percipients  it  seems
Hkely  that  the  different  avenues  used  are  not  always
distinguishable  even  by  the  percipient  himself ;  and  as
between  different  telepathic  percipients,  had  we  others  to
compare  with  Professor  Murray,  we  should  probably  find
that  the  comparative  use  of  the  different  possible  avenues
partly  depended  on  the  make  up  of  the  percipient's  own
mind — on  whether  he  was  a  good  visualiser  and  so  forth.
I  imagine  the  following  case  to  be  a  good  example  of
impressions  coming  in  different  ways  in  the  same  experi-
ment and  gradually  producing  a  comprehensible  whole.

February  24,  1918.

42.  Subject.  Mr.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  Isle  of  Capri,
and  on  it  is  the  old  Master  of  Balliol  [Strachan  Davidson]  and
my  uncle  [Arnold  Toynbee]  and  they  are  reading  the  Bible,
and  my  uncle  says  what  a  good  book  it  is,  and  Strachan
Davidson  is  chuckling."


xcn.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  245


Professor  Mtjrbay. "  I  get  T L on  the  Riviera

being  very  funny  about  the  book  of  Samuel.  [He]
had  never  read  it.  It's  Italy  I  am  sure,  and  it's  some-
body  being  impressed  by  the  Bible  or  talking  about  it  as
though  he  had  never  read  it  before.  I  get  the  manner
of  Strachan  Davidson. — I  should  say  it  was  at  Naples,
or  some  place  with  the  blue  sea  all  about.  Should  say
it  was  Capri. Oh  your  uncle  Arnold  Toynbee."

( [Contemporary  note].  Arnold  had  never  seen  his  uncle  [who
died  in  1883],  and  Mr.  Murray  had  not  known  him.)

Here  an  idea,  at  first  probably  subconscious,  of  the  dis-
cussion on  the  Bible  must  have  introduced  the  irrelevant
recollection  of  a  similar  conversation  on  the  Riviera ;
getting  the  manner  of  Mr.  Strachan  Davidson  seems  to
imply  a  visual  or  auditory  impression  or  both  ;  and  "  the
blue  sea  all  about  "  suggests  a  visual  impression.

There  is  one  case,  Appendix  No.  54,  where  Professor
Murray  gets  almost  all  the  items  of  the  agent's  subject
correctly  in  detail — whether  visually  or  not  we  do  not
know — but  complains  that  he  "  can't  get  it  together.  [He]
only  get[s]  fragments."  Perhaps  this  only  means  that  he
imagined  there  was  some  kind  of  story  connecting  the
items  he  got,  whereas  the  agent  had  not  indicated  any.
Of  course  all  we  know  directly  about  the  percipient's
reception  of  the  subject  set  by  the  agent  is  what  the
former  can  teU  us  about  his  conscious  impressions.  That
subconscious  work  goes  on  in  the  production  of  the  result
is  a  matter  of  inference,  but  I  think  an  inference  fully
justified.  It  can  almost  be  proved  true  in  certain  cases,
and  I  am  inclined  to  think  that  as  a  matter  of  fact
most  of  the  work  in  producing  Professor  Murray's  tele-
pathic impression  is  subconscious.  As  evidence  I  may
first  refer  again  to  the  Doughty  case.  No.  26,  (p.  231
above).  Here,  if  our  interpretation  of  the  case  is  right,
a  name  must  have  been  unconsciously  apprehended  and
unconsciously  associated  with  the  title  of  a  book  ;  this
last  then  emerging  faintly  into  consciousness.  Sensory
images,  with  interpretation  following  (not  preceding)  them,  as
in  33,  (p.  236  above),  strongly  suggest  subconscious  manu-


246


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


facture — indeed  I  think  imply  it.  So  does  emotion  felt
appropriately,  but  without  realised  cause,  as  in  No.  38,
(p.  239  above).  Again,  when  the  impression  comes  to  the
percipient's  consciousness  in  the  form  of  an  appropriate
quotation  which  has  not  been  in  the  agent's  mind  there
must,  it  would  seem,  be  an  idea  behind  it,  prompting  it,
and  that  idea  must  be  subconscious  as  the  percipient  is
not  aware  of  it.

Granting  that  the  subconscious  mind  does  play  so
important  a  part  in  receiving  and  forwarding  the  subject
to  be  transmitted,  we  see  that  error  may  come  in  at
four  stages.  The  subject  may  get  through  from  the  agent
to  the  percipient's  subconscious  mind  in  any  degree  of
incompleteness  ;  ^  it  may  there  be  further  distorted  by  false
associations  and  inferences  ;  loss  may  occur  again  in  emerg-
ing into  consciousness  owing  to  inhibitions  or  otherwise  ;
and  finally,  the  conscious  mind  may  reject  some  ideas  or
images,  and  misinterpret  others.

For  an  example  of  conscious  rejection  of  a  perfectly
correct  impression  see  Appendix  No.  74,  where  Professor
Murray  refuses  to  accept  Lord  Morley  as  part  of  the
"  subject  "  because  he  happened  to  be  reading  his  Re-
collections, and  therefore  imagined  a  normal  origin  for  the
idea  of  him.  I  suspect  the  normal  consciousness  to  have
been  responsible  for  a  hasty  (and  rather  muddled)  mis-
interpretation of  a  visual  image  of  a  haK-naked  Arab
initially  presented  to  it  in  the  following  case  :

February  24,  1918.
43.  Subject. Mrs. Arnold Toynbee (agent)  : "  AUenby.

British  troops  in  Palestine  and  a  sort  of  Arab  man  coming  up

and  standing  half  naked  by  a  well."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  is  the  good  Samaritan  guiding
the  English  troops  into  Jericho.  I  don't  know  that  he
is  the  good  Samaritan.  He  might  be  a  biblical  figure,
coming  up  and  speaking  to  General  AUenby,  and  show-
ing the  way."  ("  Anything  he  is  near  ?  ")  "  Well  a
well. I  got  him  naked  with  no  clothes."

I  It  is  at  this  stage  presumably  that  deficiencies  in  the  agent  as  an
available  source  for  impressions  would  operate  adversely.


xcTi.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  247


[The  impression  here  seems  to  begin  with  a  visual  image  of
the  half  naked  Arab  which  suggested  the  man  that  fell  among
thieves  on  the  way  to  Jericho,  and  thus  the  good  Samaritan
who  helped  him.]

If  telepathic  impressions  usually  come  through  the
subconscious  mind,  which  on  other  grounds  than  the
experiments  under  discussion  seems  to  me  likely,  it  is
possible  that  one  important  quality  in  a  good  telepathic
percipient  may  be  a  power  of  drawing  easily  on  the
contents  of  his  own  subconscious  mind.


APPENDIX  I.

/  quote  here  almost  all  the  cases  counted  as  successes
which  have  not  already  been  quoted  in  the  body  of  the
Report,  and  also  cases  of  partial  success  or  of  failure  which
seem  to  present  points  of  interest.  The  selection  thus  made
does  not  of  course  in  any  way  represent  the  average  propor-
tion of  failure  to  success.

The  experiments  in  this  Appendix  are  in  chronological
order,  but  the  numbers  givefi  thern  relate  to  the  present  paper
only.  The  numbers  1  to  43  are  attached  to  the  cases
quoted  in  the  body  of  the  Report  {which,  however,  are  7iot  in
chronological  order),  so  that  those  in  the  Appendix  begin
with  44. The  first  eight  took  place  before  1916.

The  original  notes  are  printed  verbatim,  remarks  in  round
brackets  being  part  of  them.  Explanatory  additions  and  other
remarks  of  my  own  are  in  square  brackets.  Remarks  or
questions  by  the  agent  in  the  course  of  the  2:)ercipient'' s
statement  are  in  round  brackets  and  inverted  commas.  The
dates  given  are  those  of  the  experiment  to  which  they  are
attached,  and  of  those  which  follow  it,  until  the  next  date
given.

March  10,  1913.

44.  Subject.  IVIks.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of
that  man — Dr.  Leys — in  a  canoe  with  Masai  on  the  river."

Professor  Murray. "  It's  Conrad's  Lord  Jim  with  a  lot  of


248  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwich  [fart

blacks  in  a  boat — Not  sure  if  Lord  Jim — somebody  with
blacks  in  a  boat — It's  not  Hube  [Professor  Murray's
brother,  Judge  Hubert  Murray,  Governor  of  Papua] — is  it
Norman  Leys  ?  "

July  18,  1915.

45.  Subject.  Unnamed  Agent,  probably  Mrs.  Arnold
ToYNBEE  :  "I  think  of  that  chorus  in  the  Hippolytus,  '  I  will
take  me  to  some  cavern  for  my  hiding.'  "

Professor  Murray. "  Again  I  think  this  is  poetry. I  don't
think I shall get  it — I've got that  bird-droves  thing
running  in  my  head."
[The  "  bird  droves  thing  "  is  the  chorus  in  question.  The
bird  droves  chorus  in  the Hippolytus  had  been  chosen  as  a
subject  for  transmission by  Mrs. Toynbee five years  earlier
(see  Mrs.  Verrall's  Report  Proceedings,  vol.  xxix.,  p.  92),  but
on  that  occasion  was  a  failure.  Professor  Murray  only  getting
"something  about  Egjrpt  and  the  NUe."]

46.  Subject.  Mr.  W.  Archer  (agent)  :  "I  think  of  my
brother  walking  off  with  the  Red  Cross  collecting  box."

Professor  Murray  (instantly). "  My  mind  is  full  of  the

pork  pie  incident."  (Right).
[He  took  the  collecting  box  in  mistake  for  a  pork  pie  which
he  had  bought.]

47.  Subject.  Mr.  W.  Archer  (agent)  :  "I  think  of  Nora
dancing  the  tarantella  in  The  Doll's  House  [Ibsen's  play]."

Professor  Murray.  "No.  I  felt  I  was  on  the  verge  of  it,
but  I  can't  get  it. — No — I  got  a  feeling  of  someone  in  a
play.  No,  I  seemed  to  be  groping  at  something  in  an
Ibsen  play  and  could  not  quite  get  it."

August  1,  1915.

48.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of
the  girl  in  the  first  story  of  Gosta  Berling — the  girl  skating."

Professor  Murray  (at  once).  "  This  feels,  generally  speak-
ing, Scandinavian,  presumably  Iceland,^  and  I  feel  as  if
it  was  Miss  Philpotts  skating  in  Iceland,  but  I  don't
think  that's  correct — oh  it's  a  book. I  should  think  it

^  ( [Contemporary  note] :  Had  been  talking  about  Miss  Philpotta  in
Iceland.)


xcn.]


Experiments  in  Thought-Transference


249


was  Tales  from  a  Swedish  Homestead. It's  Selma  Lagerldf
and  it's  a  very  wild  atmosphere — and  there's  a  girl  skat-
ing— and  wild  burly  people."
{Note. — It  was  'Tales  from  a  Swedish  Homestead.' R.  T.  [Mrs.
TojTibee]  had  been  wrong.) (  [Contemporary  remark]  :  Very  good.)

49.  Subject.  Mks.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  This  is  people
going  into  a  sort  of  night-club  and  opium  den,  and  they  go  in
out  of  Piccadilly  Circus  underground,  and  there  are  red  sofas
and  a  person  with  a  skull  cap,  and  people  dancing."

Pkoeessor  Murray.  "  This  is  curious.  I've  got  a  smell  of
some  kind  of  incensy  stuff — I  should  think  it  was  opium
or  hashish — and  it's  like  a  sort  of  opium  den  and  people
coming  into  it — I  can't  get  anything  very  clear.  There
are  sorts  of  settees  or  divans  round  the  room  ("  What
colour  ?  ")  "  Red — I'm  not  getting  it  very  clear.  I
think  I  feel  as  if  it  were  in  London — people  going  down
into  it."  ("  Where  do  you  go  out  ?  ")  "I  should  say
Regent  Circus."

{Note. — Only  got  Red  and  Oxford  Circus  on  being  questioned.)
(  [Contemporary  Remark]  : Very  good,  but  not  complete.)

50.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  This  is  in
Palestine,  and  there  is  a  crucifixion  going  on  ;  and  it  is  not
Christ  being  crucified,  and  there's  a  cart  going  by  with  Christ
on  it,  like  the  Hardy  poem."

Professor Murray. "  There's something worrying  about
this. It  seems  like  the  crucifixion  but,  if  so,  it's  seen
from  the  point  of  view  of  a  person  who  thinks  it's  the
crucifixion  of  a  new  criminal,^  as  Pontius  Pilate  might
have  thought. It's  Christ  seeing  somebody  else  crucified
— in  the  earlier  part  of  his  life — No  I  can't  get  it."
(Was  thuiking  '  Here  the  hangman  stays  his  cart.' [First  Line
of  A.  E.  Housman's  A  Shropshire  Lad,  No.  xlvii.,  an  appro-
priate poem.]) ([Contemporary  Remark]:  Very  good.)

51.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I'm  going  to
think  of  the  i^erson  that  Louis  XI.  put  in  the  cage  for  life,
and  people  are  looking  at  it,  and  the  person's  hanging  up  and
a  baby  with  him — a  baby  monkey."

^  (  [Contemporary  note] :  That's  the  point  of  the  Hardy  poem. )

B


pi


250  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick  [part

Peofessor  Murray. "  I  can't  get  this  a  bit. I  should
think  it  was a  poem — a  faint  impression  of  someone
leanmg  out  of  a  basket — no,  I  don't  think  I  can  get  it."
([Contemporary  remark]:  Failure.)  |
[I  have  included  this  failure  so  as  to  make  the  record  of
experiments  on  this  day  complete.]

April  23,  1916. (  [It  is  stated  on  this  day]  "  Hands  only  taken
where  written.")

52.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  Third  Act
in  [Ibsen's]  The  DolVs  House,  with  the  doctor  and  Nora,  and
doctor  saying  thanks  for  the  light."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  is  Norwegian.  Never  had  a  Nor-
wegian thing  before  [but  see  No.  (47)  above]— I've  got
this.  It's  Ibsen.  Dr.  Rank.  Scene  between  Dr.  Rank
and  Nora,  where  he  says  good-bye  before  he  goes  to  die."
[This  is  the  right  scene.]
(Mr.  Murray  did  not  hold  [Mrs.  Toynbee's]  hand  and  did  not
look  at  her.)

[The  same  subject  was  agaui  selected  by  the  same  agent  on
September  14,  1916,  thus:  .  ,  |

Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee.  "  I  think  of  Dr.  Rank  saying
'  Thanks  for  the  light.'  "
Professor  Murray.  "  It's  somebody  who  thinks  he's  going
to  die.  It's  a  play.  It's  the  man  in  The  DolVs  House—
Dr.  Rank.  Yes,  it's  his  final  scene,  where  he  comes  in
and  says  good-bye  to  them  and  leaves  the  note  in  the
box."

Neither  agent  nor  percipient  appear  to  have  realised  that
the  subject  is  being  repeated.  It  is  rather  curious  that  though
Professor  Murray  on  both  occasions  got  the  scene,  he  on
neither  got  the  sentence  in  it— Dr.  Rank's  last  words— which
characterised  it  for  Mrs.  Toynbee.]

53.  Subject. Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  Scene  at  thellm
beginnmg of Insulted and Injured  where the very  old  maiDf
with  the  dead  dog  dies  on  the  door  step."  I

Professor  Murray.  "  A  book.  I  don't  think  I've  read  it-
got  an  atmosphere  like  Strindberg,  or  it  might  be  Dosto-
[ievsky]  (Holding  hands).  Oh  it's  dreadful — Yes,  I  thint
it's  some  persecuted  weak  old  person  dying  with  a  dead


(I

nit


Pi


xcn.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Trarisference  251

dog — I  think  they're  deserted. I  get  that  sort  of  feel-
ing." ("  Can you get the  name  ?  ") "  The  book,  I
think,  is  Insulted  and  Injured — No,  can't  get  his  name."
("His  name  was  Smith.") (Mr.  Murray  had  not  read  the
book.) (Mr.  Murray  wanted  to  get  another  name  and
[Mrs.  Toynbee]  wanted  to  call  it  Despised  and  Eejected.)
[I  do  not  profess  to  understand  this  last  sentence  of  the
note-taker's,  but  it  evidently  represents  a  discussion  which  may
J I  perhaps  be  of  importance  in  view  of  the  fact  that  the  subject,
]|Or  probably  an  earlier  phase  of  the  incident, ^  was  selected  again
I  by  Mrs.  Toynbee  four  months  later  (see  above  No.  1,  p.  214).
,  The  two  should be compared. As  in  the  DolVs  House  case
neither agent nor percipient seem to have observed  the
repetition.]

54.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  This  [is]  a
scene  in  a  Maupassant  about  a  Frenchman  who  travelled  to
Genoa  and  met  a  funny  Italian  girl  in  the  train,  and  they
had  supper  in  the  hotel."

Professor  Murray. "  I  think  this  is  a  book  too. A  train
on  the Riviera — sort  of  Riviera  atmosphere — somebody
a\vfully  amused. I  think  he  is  a  friend  [?  Frenchman]
being  rather  gallant  and  amused  to a  girl  whom  he
meets  in  the  train — I  think  the  girl  is  Italian — am  sure
I  have  not  read  the  book. I  can't  get  it  at  all  well — •
Is  there  more  I  ought  to  get  ? I  think  he  is  a  French-
man gomg  to  Genoa  ? No  I  can't  get  it  together.  I
only  get  fragments." ("  It  is  all  right.") "  No. I  can't
get  any  more."
(There  was  a  noise  of  clearing  away  in  the  dining-room.)
( [Mrs.  Toynbee] said  the  people  were  amused,  and  it  was
vritten  amusingly.)

55.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent).  (Lady  Mary
Murray  suggested  Do  one  not  in  a  book  now)  :  "I  thought
)f  one  out  of  a  book  by  Anatole  France  about  angels  appear-
ng  in  a  pavilion. Also  stockings."

Professor  Murray. "  [I]  don't  feel  as  if  I  am  going  to  get
this  one. No,  I  get  a  sort  of  absurd  impression  of  a
man  and  woman  in  a  kiosk  seeing  an  angel. No,  the
1  [I  am  not  acquainted  with  the  book. — E.  M.  S.j


(M


252  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgivick  [part

atmosphere  I  think  is  quite  serious — they  are  a  sort  of
hero  and  heroine.  I've  a  slightly  psychical  research
feeling  about  it.  I  can't  get  it."  ("  The  scene  was
perfectly  absurd.")

56.  Subject. Mrs.  Abnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I'll  think  of

the  G C.'s  having  supper  at  the restaurant,  and  we

were  watching  them  from  another  table."

Professor  Murray. "  I  think  it  is  real  life  and  not  a  book.
I  can't  get  it  except  some  people  in  a  restaurant  having
supper." (Taking  [Mrs.  Toynbee 's]  hand)  "  I  think  it  is
Hilda  Lessways— No,  I'm  wrong." ("  Can  you  get  thej™'
sort  of  restaurant  ?  ") "  I  don't  thuik  I  can  get  [more].'^  "
(  [Mrs.  Toynbee]  had  been  reading  Hilda  Lessways,  and  hac
been  thinking  of  [Mrs.  C.]. She  said  she  nearly  always  in-,
vented  things,  and  this  was  real  life.)  t

May  28,  [1916].

57.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I  think  ol
Rupert  and  Shaw  Stewart  ill  in  Egypt,  and  Sir  I.  Hamiltor
coming  to  see  them  under  a  sun  canopy."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  is  Egypt,  people  HI  in  a  hospital
Oh  it's  Rupert  Brooke,  and  I  think  Sir  Ian  Hamiltoi
coming  to  see  him — and  Shaw  Stewart  with  him — ge'
them  in  a  hospital — I  think  a  hospital  near  the  sea."

58.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I  think  [of
a  scene  in  The  Birth  of  a  Nation,  where  a  girl  is  running  awa;;
from  a  negro — ^jumping  over  a  rock."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  is  a  thing  you  have  never  don>
before.  It  is  a  cinema.  The  girl  running  away  fron
somebody  and  jumping  over  a  rock.  Oh  it's  America
It's  a  negro  chasing  a  white  girl.  It  must  be  in  Th
Birth  of  a  Nation."

59.  Subject. Miss  Ethel  Sidgwick  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of  ;
dream  I  had  of  an  airship  which  wasn't  a  ship,  and  a  hero  uJiur
armour  standing  up  in  it,  in  front  of  it."  repo

Professor  Murray.  "This  is  not  a  book,  and  it's  noie
French.  [Miss  Sidgwick  had  been  living  in  France.|r
Oh,  I  think  it's  a  dream — Don't — I  should  say  it  was
Zeppelin,  and  everything  very  shiny  and  people  glittering


[A


Hem
Pi


diij-
[trat

il


sen.]  Exj^er intents  in  Thought-Transference  253

I  seem  to  see  a  person  all  over  shining  armour,  and  he
might  be  Romain  Rolland."
(Miss  Sidgwick  had  the  whole  dream  in  brilliant  sunshine.)

September  10,  1916.

60.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  Frogs  in  the
ake  at  Castle  Howard,  and  coming  up  out  of  the  water.  The
3roaking  of  frogs."

Professor  Murray. "  No."

[I  quote  this,  though  a  complete  failure,  because  I  believe
.t  to  be  the  only  instance  in  the  present  series  of  inarticulate
sound  deliberately  included  in  the  "  subject."  It  occurred  in
;he  middle  of  a  series  of  failures.]

61.  Subject.  Mr.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I'll  [think]  of
Uncle  Remus — of  Terrapin  with  a  rope  in  his  hand  running
iway  from  the  pool."

Professor  Murray.  "  Don't  think  I've  got  this — ^Well  I've
got  an  impression  of  Rosalind  [Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee]
chasing  a  tortoise  in  Jamaica  with  a  lot  of  black  people.
It  is  black  people  and  a  tortoise.  No,  it's  a  turtle
running  away  from  somebody."

[A  Terrapin  is  a  kind  of  Turtle.]

62.  Subject.  Mr.  Mellor  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinking  of  myself
addressing  a  strike  meeting  outside  Balliol  at  the  Martyrs'
VIemorial."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  is  you  yourseli  waving  your
arms  and  maldng  a  speech,  and  I  suppose  it  is  address-
ing a  strike  meeting.  I  suppose  it  is  somewhere — you
have  fixed  it  somewhere.  I  guess  outside  the  mill  at
Chipping  Norton."
(Mr.  MeUor  had  not  said  that  he  had  waved  his  arms — he
lid — but  Lady  Mary  [Murray]  had  waved  her  arms  to  iUus-
trate].)  .  :  •

[Lady  Mary's  action  may  have  been  responsible  for  Professor
ii|yiurray's  impression  of  arm-waving  (c/.  a  case  in  Mrs.  Verrall's
eport  S.P.R.  Proceedings,  vol.  xxix.,  p.  68  footnote). But  on
ihe  other  hand,  the  action  may  have  been  characteristic  of
Mr.  MeUor's  oratory.]

63.  Subject. Mr.  Mellor  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinking  of  myself


254


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


as  taking  my  seat  as  a  Labour  member  in  the  House  of  Com-
mons."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  think  this  is  you  again,  but  in
some  rather  odd  atmosphere.  I  thmk  you  are  in  the
House  of  Commons.  Yes — being  introduced  in  the
House  of  Commons."

(As  Mr  MeKor  had  thought  before.  He  thought  it  was
curious  his  being  there.)

64.  Subject.  Mr.  Basil  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinking  of
the  football  match  last  winter  between  Charterhouse  and  Win-
chester in  which  Winchester  beat  Charterhouse."

Professor  Murray. "  I  think  it  is  a  football  match.  Rather
big swell match. Charterhouse [and] some big  other
school. For  a  guess  I  should  say  Wmchester."
(Mr.  Murray  got  it  at  Charterhouse. It  was  at  Charterhouse.
Basil  thought  of  the  people  looking  on  and  Mr.  Murray  got
the  crowd.)

September  14,  1916.

65.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of
scene  in  Romeo  and  Juliet — '  It  is  the  nightingale  and  not  the
lark.'  "

Professor  Murray.  "  I've  got  this.  It's  '  Go  not,  sweet
love,  it  is  not  yet  near  day.  It  is  the  nightingale  and
not  the  lark.'  "

66.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of
the  monk  in  his  cell,  and  the  boy  in  Tolstoi's  Youth  going  to
confess  to  him."

(Noise.)

Professor  Murray.  "  I've  got  it  blurred — A  sort  of  shot —
I  was  going  to  say  it's  something  in  Gorki's  L'Espion.
I  feel  as  if  it  was  Russian  and  an  unhappy  sort  of  boy
— (takes  hand). I  should  guess  Dostoievsky."

[The  taking  of  the  hand  here  did  not  help.]

67.  Subject.  Mr.  Mellor  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinking  of  Ben
Tillett  addressing  a  meeting  of  strikers  on  Tower  Hill  on  the
occasion  on  which  he  wished  God  to  strike  Lord  Devonport
dead."

Professor  Murray. "  Oh— I  think  it's  the  crowd  of  people


XCII.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  255

praying  that  Lord  Penrhyn— I  think  it  was— might  be
struck  dead. Ben  Tillett's  meeting."

68.  Subject.  Mr.  Mellor  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinking  of  myself
startmg  Jim  Lar kin's  meeting  in  the  Corn  Exchange,  when
;own  and  gown  were  divided,  each  sitting  in  his  appropriate
alace — like  talking  to  a  tomb."

IS  '

1  Professor  Murray. "  I  should  say  this  was  you at  a
meeting,  and  there's  something  funny  about  the  meeting
)i  — as  if  it  was  divided  into  two  bits,  as  if  men  on  one
1-  side  and  women  on  the  other — but  I  don't  think  it  is

men  and  women — I  should  say  a  strike  meeting  in  the
!r  Corn Exchange. I should say that Dublin strike —

T  something  Irish. I  don't  think  I  can  get  it  clearer — I

don't think I was there." ("  Anyone else  ?  ") "  I
s.  should  say  Jim  Lar  kin."

69.  Subject.  Mr.  Mellor  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinking  of  the  men
md  women  on  strike  at  Chipping  Norton  standing  up  as
^ole  and  I  walked  down  their  centre,  singing  the  Red  Flag —

I  n  the  Town  Hall."

J  Professor  Murray  :  "  Another  strike,  I'm  sure  of  that-
Chipping  Norton  strike,  something  or  other  at  Chipping

t  Norton. I  think  it's  a  crowd  partiiig,  as  it  were,  and

J  people  walking  up  between  them — [I]  don't  particularly

get  anything  more— I  don't  know  if  I  ought  to  get  any
people  ?  I  naturally  think  of  people  I  know  coimected
with the meeting." ("  What doing  ?  ") "  Cheering  or

'  i  waving  flags— I  don't  think  there's  any  trick  about  it—
not  Abraham  Lincoln  or  Napoleon,  as  Rosalind  might  say."

70.  Subject. Mr.  Mellor  (agent)  : "  I'm  thinldng  of  C.  D.
peaking  on the suffrage to a very  small meeting  in  the

^  ..L.P.  rooms  at Bristol, standing  on  the platform with  his
lands  raised."

Professor  Murray. "  A  faint  impression  of  a  small  scrubby
meeting — a  little  meeting  in  a  room  somewhere — Well  I
I  get  an  impression  of  a  man  awfully  unlike  Ben  Tillett—

■  a sort of blundering, sUly, yet rather nice person —

Quality  of  man  and  quality  of  meeting,  working  away — ■
at  (raising  hands).  Having  said  that,  I  should  guess
C.  D."


256


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgivick


April  29,  1917.

71.  Subject.  Miss  Aones  Murray  (agent):  "I  think  of
Masefield  in  his  little  hospital  boat  coming  up  to  the  mouth
of  Mudros  harbour — watching  the  troops  go  o£E  to  Gallipoli."

Professor  Murray.  "  Oh  this  is  your  poem  in  The  Nation
about  Masefield — It's  the  scene  of  the  people  setting  out
for  [?  from]  Mudros — Masefield  watching  them."  ]

(No  hands.)  i

72.  Subject. Miss Agnes Murray (agent). "  I think of  '
Denis  sitting  on  the  top  of  the  roof  of  his  hospital,  smoking
cigars  and  teaching  the  night  nurse  to  play  piquet."

Professor  Murray  (pointed  to  Denis's  photograph). "  Denis  \
somehow" — it's  not  anything  in  the  war — sitting  on  the  s
roof  of  a  house  and  laughing — sitting  on  the  roof  of  his
present  hospital — seems  cheery — "

(No  hands.)

73.  Subject. Mr. Tatham (agent)  : "  Xenophon's  soldiers
coming  in  sight  of  the  sea  and  saying  OaXaTra,  etc."

Professor  Murray. "  Not  Xenophon's  people  coming  to  the  a
sea  and  saying  OdXarTu —  ?  "

November  17,  1917.

74.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Mukray  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of
Terence  [Professor  Murray's  nephew]  and  Lord  Morley  sitting
under  a  p3rramid  in  Egypt  discussing  how  long  the  war  will  last."

Professor Murray. "  I've  got  two  sorts  of  impression.  I
One  with  Morley  because  of  the  book  ^ — that  is  wrong.  [
The  other  with  Terence. I  don't  see  particularly  what  (
he  is doing — I should say  he  was  just  sitting  down.
No  I  can't  get  it  clear."

[This  experiment  illustrates  interference  by  the  conscious  self  j
in  deciding  what  is  likely  to  be  right.]

75.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of
Anna  [Karenina]  and  Vronsky  sitting  in  their  drawing-room  at
their  country  house,  being  very  much  bored  with  each  other,
and  waiting  for  a  visitor  to  come  up  the  drive."

l(["The  book"  means]  Lord  MorJeijs  Recollections,  which  [Professor  ^
Murray]  was  reading.)


:xcn.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  257


Professor  Murray. "  I should say  this was  Russian-
people  very  uncomfortable- — a  big,  rich  sort  of  house — •
in  a  book. I  should  say  it  was  Anna  and  Vronsky.  I
have  the  feeling  of  the  sort  of  misery  when  they  are
living  together,  and  she  is  getting  jealous."
[This describes the atmosphere  and  surroundings of  Anna
Karenina  and  Vronsky  at  their  country  house, but  no  such
scene  as  that  given  in  the "  subject "  is, I  think,  actually
described  in  Tolstoy's  book.]

76.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  MtrRRAY  (agent)  :  "I  think  of  King
Arthur  riding  out  on  his  horse  [after]  speaking  to  Guinevere
when  she  is  [looking]  out  of  the  Convent  [window]  and  it  is
snowing  hard."

Professor  Murray. "  I  am  getting  this  as  a  quotation.

'  That  mist  which  ever  since  I  saw
One  crouchmg  in  the  dust  at  Almesbury
Has  (something)  all  the  passes  of  the  world.'  "

[In  Tennyson's  Passing  of  Arthur  :  King  Arthur  to  Bedivere
after  he  has  left  the  Convent  and  before  the  battle  :

Yet  let  us  hence,  and  find  or  feel  a  way
Thro'  this  blind  haze,  which  ever  since  I  saw
One  lying  in  the  dust  at  Almesbury,
Hath  folded  in  the  passes  of  the  world.]

(Agnes  was  thinking  to  herself,  "  All  day  long  the  noise  of
battle  rolled "  [from  the  same  poem].  These  verses  apply  to
[Arthur]  when  he  was  riding  out  with  Bedivere  after  seeing
Guinevere.)

77.  Subject.  Lady  Mary  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I  have  had  in
my  mind  for  some  time  George  Trevelyan  with  his  ambulance
falling  back  in  the  rout  from  the  Bainsizza  plateau."

Professor  Murray. "  I  get  Geoffrey  Young  with  his  leg
off, having  to retreat with George Trevelyan in  the
Italian  retreat."
[Mr. Geoffrey Young did have to retreat under  these
circumstances.]

November  18,  1917.

78.  Subject. Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "I  think  of  Joan


258


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


of  Arc  going  out  to  fight  for  the  first  time,  and  her  watching
her  horse  beiag  saddled."

Professor  Murray. "  I  got  a  dim  feeling  of  being  in  a

battle,  and  being  very  much  afraid. It's  the  first  battle.

— As  a  mere  guess — No — I  was  going  to  say  G  ,  as

we  had  been  talking  about  him."

79.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of  the
scene  in  Sonia  where  they  are  all  sitting  round  in  a  country
house,  and  the  news  comes  that  Violet's  husband  is  killed."

Professor  Murray. "  This  is  a  book. It  seems  to  me
something  commonplace. News  of  somebody  being  killed
comes  to  a  party  of  people  in  a  sort  of  big  house.
Smart  people. Oh  it  must  be — it's  not  a  Russian  book,
and  it's  not  a  good  book — doesn't  make  much  impression
on  me. It's  English.  I  don't  know  if  there  is  such  a
scene  in  Sonia. It's  the  news  of  Loring's  death."
[I  cannot  find  any  such scene  as  the  agent  describes  in
Sonia. The  news  of  the  death  of  Violet's  husband  (Loring)
came  otherwise. But  part  of  the  book,  to  which  Loring  be-
longs, is  in  a  country  house  atmosphere.]  ■

80.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  Lucifer  sitting
in  Pandemonium  and  making  a  speech  to  all  the  fallen  angels,
and  he  is  saying  '  Better  to  reign  in  hell  than  serve  in  heaven.'  "

Professor  Murray  (as  he  walked  into  the  room)  :  "Ye
something  principalities  and  powers.  It's  Milton  and
Lucifer."

[Both  agent  and  percipient  think  of  Milton's  Lucifer  making
a  speech.  The  remark  quoted  by  the  agent  was,  however,
said  in  conversation  with  Beelezebub  ;  and  the  words  attributed
to  him  by  the  percipient  are  not  an  exact  quotation  according
to  the  iiotes.  It  must,  however,  be  remembered  that  the  notes
have  to  be  taken  down  in  long  hand  and  very  quickly,  so
that  quotations  and  names  are  not  always  quite  accurately
recorded.  In  this  case,  for  instance,  Professor  Murray  thinks
he  said  "  Thrones.  Dominations,  Princedoms,  Virtues,  Powers."]

8L  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  l^aXe  /3aAe
Ki)pv\o<;  e'ujv.

Professor  Murray. "  This  is  Hughes  of  New  College,  the


xcn.]


Experiments  in  Thought-Transference


259


man  I  am  doing  B.Litt.  with,  and  he  is  doing  Greek
metres, doing  Alkman. /3«Xe  Slj  /3aXe  K)'ipuXo<;  eltjv.

82.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Mukray  (agent)  :  "  Mr.  Gladstone
visiting  Lloyd  George  at  10  Downing  Street,  and  trying  to
point  out  to  him  the  indiscretion  of  his  Paris  speech."

Professor  Murray.  "  It's  a  dignified  person  severely  re-
proving somebody — giving  them  an  awful  dressing  down.
I  should  think  it  was  Mr.  Gladstone  ;  it's  something
political.  Can't  think  who  Mr.  Gladstone  would  be
likely  to rebuke. Oh he's rebuking  Lloyd  George."

83.  Subject.  Mr.  Maurice  Jacks  (agent)  :  "  The  scene  in
[Sir  Walter  Scott's  novel]  The  Fair  Maid  of  Perth  where  the
great  battle  takes  place,  and  Connacher  swims  the  river  and
runs  away."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  think  this  is  somebody  running
away  in  a  battle,  or  being  frightened.  I  think  it  is  in  a
book.  Certainly  not  present  fighting.  I  get  a  feeling  of
a  Highlander  as  if  it  was  Waverley  or  something  like
that,  but  I  don't  remember  the  scene."

84.  Subject.  Mr.  Hammond  (agent)  :  "I  think  of  the  bazaar
in  Cairo,  and  Indian  and  Persian  merchants,  shop  next  to
shop,  and  selling  their  wares  to  tourists  arriving."

Professor  Murray.  "  Sort  of  crowded  Eastern  streets.  I
should  say  as  a  guess  shopkeepers  in  Jerusalem  shutting
up  their  shops  because  the  English  troops  are  coming."

85.  Subject.  Miss  Beatrice  Rose  (agent)  :  "  Scene  in  Lady
of  [the]  Lake  ;  and  Roderick  Dhu  discovers  himself  and  teUs
Fitz James  he  must  protect  himself  with  his  own  sword."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  believe  I  am  going  to  do  a  quo-
tation. I  don't  think  it  is  right  : —

'  Come  one,  come  aU,  this  rock  shall  fly
From  it's  firm  base  as  soon  as  I.'

What  Roderick  Dhu  says in  his  fight  with  Fitzjames."
[Two  connected  scenes  in  The  Lady  of  the  Lake  are  mixed
up  by  both  agent  and percipient  I  think,  namely,  the  one
where  Roderick  Dhu  reveals  to  Fitzjames  his  identity,  while
showing  him  that  they  are  surrounded  by  his  clansmen,  and


260


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[PABT


the  one  where  shortly  afterwards,  away  from  Roderick's  dis-
trict, he  challenges  Fitzjames  to  single  combat.  The  lines
quoted  by  Professor  Murray  were  uttered  by  Fitzjames  (not
Roderick)  in  the  first  scene  when  surrounded  by  Roderick's
followers.  It  is  perhaps  owing  to  this  confusion  that  the  per-
cipient doubted  if  his  quotation  was  right.] ,  .  .,

86.  Subject.  Mr.  Paton  (agent)  :  "  Lord  Rhonda,  sailing
away  in  a  boat  from  the  Lusitania  and  saying  he  is  going  to
be  equal  with  Satan's  hypocritical  and  canting  chief  of  the
staff."

Professor  Murray. "  Torpedoed  ship — people  getting  away
in boats. Ought I to know who is getting away  ?
Great  big  ship. I'm  trying  to  think  of  anybody  who
escaped  from  the  Lusitania."
[I  quote  this  because  the  percipient  does  not  seem  to  have
grasped  that  the  agent  had  the  Lusitania  in  mind,  although  it
had  been  mentioned,  until  he  inferred  it  from  facts  which  he
divined  though  not  mentioned  by  the  agent — the  facts  that  it
had  been  torpedoed  and  was  a  great  big  ship.]

February  24,  1918.

87.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  A  little
Chinese  person  ui  an  old  Chinese  poem.  Brother  and  sister-in-
law  were  unkind  ;  father  and  mother  were  dead. By  a  river."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  am  either  not  getting  it  at  all,  or
it  is  a  new  sort  of  place.  It  is  not  Russian — don't  think
it  is.  WeU  it's  something  like  [a]  Russian  boy.  It's
something  like  a  small  unliappy  Russian  child  who  has
been  unldndly  treated  like  a  Gorki,  and  I  think  it
beside  the  Volga  like  Gorki.  I  think  it's  Chinese.  I
mix  it  up  with  a  Chinese  girl  crying  because  her  feet
are  being  bent.  Chinese  motherless  or  fatherless  child
being  maltreated  by  her  relations."
(Mr.  Murray  mixed  it  as  to  whether  it  was  a  girl  or  a  boy.

Rosalind  [Mrs.  Toynbee]  and  Lady  Mary  had  discussed  [which

it  was].)

88.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  Oreenmantle
[by  Buchan].  Where  the  German  peasant  woman  takes  them  in
in  a  snow-storm."


xcn.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  261

Professor  Murray.  "  This  is  something  out  of  a  book.  I
don't  think  I  have  read  it.  It's  not  Russian.  It's  got
no  particular  [national]  character.  It's  a  snow-storm.  It's
somebody — I  think  it's  a  peasant  woman — giving  shelter
to  a  spy.  I  think  it's  a  German  peasant  woman.  I'm  not
sure.  I  think  it's  a  German  woman."  ("  What  sort  of
a  spy  ?  ")  "  I  think  he  is  English.  I  think  it  is  a
book  of  adventure."

(In  the  book  he  is  a  spy.)

89.  Subject.  Lady  Mary  Murray  (agent)  :  "  People  in  the
circle  of  Dante's  Inferno  who  are  driven  by  the  wind  all  the
time."

Professor  Murray. "  I've  got  quite  clear  the  Keats  lines  :—

'  Pale  were  the  lips  I  kissed  and  fair  the  form
I  floated  with  about  that  melancholy  storm.'  "

The  sonnet  on  [A  Dream,  after  Reading  Dante's  Episode
of  Paulo  and  Francesca.]
(About  6  back  Lady  Mary  had  got  a  picture  of  [Paolo]  and
Francesca. Mr.  Murray  got  the  picture  of  the  people  being
driven  by  the  storm.)

[The  episode  of  Paolo  and  Francesca  is  of  course  a  very
important  part  of  Dante's  account  in  the  Inferno,  Canto  V,  of
the  '  Circle  '  referred  to  by  Lady  Mary  Murray.]

June  16,  1918.

90.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  Rousseau,
when  he  was  a  servant  in  the  house  in  Turin  and  the  thing
was  stolen."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  get  an  impression — 1st,  that  low
French  newspaper  that  Wade  Gery  was  talking  about.
No,  I  think  I  am  getting  confused  with  your  boys  who
stole.  I  get  it  much  confused.  A  nasty  sort  of  French
person  stealing.  I  don't  think — It's  a  sort  of  artist
educated  person — He's  a  lacquey  of  somebody's.  It's
like  GU  Bias,  but  I  don't  think  it  is  [him].  It's  some-
body of  that  sort  of  date.  Oh  !  it's  Rousseau,  when  he
stole  the  ribbon,  etc."

(Rosalind  had  got  the  impression  of  a  bad  atmosphere.)


262


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgivick


[part


July  14,  1918.

91.  Subject.  Mr.  Penmorlan  Main  (agent)  :  "  Dante  meeting
Beatrice  on  the  bridge  at  Florence."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  isn't  Greek,  but  it's  high  poetry
of  some  sort.  It's  not  Greek — Is  it — It's  Dante  somehow.
Is  it  Dante  meeting  Beatrice  ?  "

92.  Subject.  Mr.  Penmorlan  Main  (agent)  :  "  The  death  of
Hereward  the  Wake,  when  he's  ringed  round  by  his  enemies.
Kills  them  one  by  one."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  isn't  ? — keep  getting — the  death
of  somebody.  No — is  it  a  sort  of — I'm  getting  it  very
confused,  but  I  feel  as  if  it  were  something  early  Saxon
or  Norse — somebody  with  a  battle-axe  against  crowds  of
people."

93.  Subject.  Mr.  Penmorlan  Main  (agent)  :  "  Theseus  and
Heracles,  when  Theseus  is  trying  to  persuade  him  not  to
commit  suicide."

Professor  Murray.  "  Is  this  your  own  thing  ?  I  got  an
impression  of  suggestion.  Greek,  I  think — I  should  think
Heracles  talking  with  Theseus."

94.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  OBlomoff
lying  in  bed,  and  a  lot  of  curious  visitors  coming  to  see  him."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  think  it's  a  legend  or  fairy  story  or
something — It's  like  the  levee  of  a  French  king — but  it's
somebody  in  bed — people  coming  in — streams  of  people —
but  I  think  it's  a  sort  of  legend  or  something  I  don't
know."

(Curious  book — allegory.) [Book  by  Ivan  Goutcharofi.]

95.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinking
of  the  scene  in  Marie  Claire,  where  she  finds  that  nun  Soeur
Marie  Aimee  crying."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  is  a  book — it's  not  English,  not
Russian — It's  rather  a — I  think  there  are  nuns  in  it —
there  are  a  lot  of  people — either  a  school  or  a  laundry —
and  one  of  the  nuns  weeping — I  think  it's  French.  Oh
it's  a  scene  in  Marie  Claire,  near  the  beginning — I  can't
remember  it,  but  it's  something  like  that — it's  in  the


XCII.]


Experiments  in  Thought-Tra7isference


263


place  where  she  goes — one  of  the  nuns  crying — a  double
name — no I can't get the [name] Marie  Therese."

96.  Subject.  Lady  Maey  Murray  (agent)  :  "  A  monastery
that  we  slept  in  the  first  night  in  Peloponese  with  six  beds
round."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  think  this  is  in  Greece.  I  think  it
is  the  place  where  we  were  so  afraid  that  the  arch-priest
meant  to  sleep  with  us."

(Right.)

97.  Subject.  Countess  of  Carlisle  (agent)  :  "  The  Crimean
soldiers  after  their  return  receiving  their  medals  from  Queen
Victoria  at  [the]  Horse  Guards."

Professor  Murray.  "  Is  it  the  King  givmg  V.C.'s  and
things  to  people  ?  Yes  [I]  think  it's  an  investiture  of
some  sort."

98.  Subject.  Countess  of  Carlisle  (agent)  :  "  Sinking  of  the
Lusitania."

Professor  Murray.  "  I've  got  this  violently.  I've  got  an
awful  impression  of  naval  disaster.  I  should  think  it
was  the  torpedoing  of  the  Lusitania."

99.  Subject.  Miss  Wenifred  Roberts  (agent):  "I'm  thinking
of  Caliban  on  Setebos,  [Caliban]  sitting  in  a  cave  thinking  about
things."  :

Professor  Muhray.  "  I  think  it's  a  poem.  Is  it  a  scene  in
a  poem  or  a  whole  poem?"  ("A  scene.")  It's  like
Browning — I  think  it's  Caliban  tearing  the  crabs."

(in  Caliban  on  Setebos.)  [The  agent's  description  applies  to
the  whole  poem,  of  which  the  crabs  incident  is  a  part.]

August  17,  1918.

99a.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I'U  thmk  of
Shelley  nearly  being  drowned,  and  when  he  was  pulled  out  [he]
said,  '  Oh  what  a  pity.  I  wanted  to  see  what  the  next  world
was  like."

(Interruptions,  windows  opened,  also  noise  outside.)

Professor  Murray. "  No,  nothing  at  all."

[This  is  quoted  because  the  same  subject  was  given  by  the
same  agent  in  almost  the  same  words  in  December  1915,  and
students may like to compare. See Mrs. Verrall's  Report,


264  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick  [pab'j

Proceedings,  xxix.,  p.  105.  On  that  occasion  Professor  Murraj
was  successful.]  ^

100.  Subject. Miss Agnes Murray (agent)  : "  I think  c  \
early  in  the  war,  when  the  French  were  tremendously  out
numbered,  and one  soldier stood up and said  '  Debout  les
morts.'  "  11
Professor Murray. "  I don't feel at  aU  clear — but  I
think  the war. French rather  than English, and  it's
something  or  other  said. Is  it  '  Debout  les  morts  '  "


J 11


leiiis
Pei


101.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent):  I  think  of
Joan  of  Arc  when  she  was  a  little  girl,  sitting  in  the  garden
with  aU  the  apple  blossom  and  sewing  with  her  mother."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  comes  to  me  like  a  scene — don't
think  it's  a  picture.  Some  children  sitting  under  apple
trees  in  blossom.  I  should  think  French,  but  I'm  not
sure — not  getting  it  clear.  One  of  them  sewing,  bending
down  over  sewing."
[I  quote  this  as  a  case  of  purely  visual  impression,  like  a
picture,  with  no  interpretation.]

102.  Subject. Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent) :  "  I  think  of  J.  M
A.  H.,  and  B.  and  I  crossing  in  a  little  gondola  from  VUla
Serbelloni  to  Varenna  on  a  very  beautiful  day."

Professor  Murray. "  I  think  it's  Italian. I'm  not  getting
it  clearly. I  think  it's  that  place  on  the  Italian  Lake
that  we stayed  at — a beautiful  hotel  on Como — Vill
Serbelloni  ? No, I  can't  get  anything  very  clear — To
many of them — conjurers — buying umbrellas — crossing
the  lake  in  a  steamer."  |ariai
[I  quote  this  as  an  example  of  the  place  intended  having
been apprehended, small remembered associations with  it
present  themselves. But  the  one  thought  of  by  the  agent  does
not  emerge. Perhaps  it  had  been  normally  forgotten  and  the
telepathic  impression  was  too  weak  to  force  it  forward.]

102a.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "I  think  of
the  boy  in  [Masefield's]  Daffodil  Fields  arriving  in  the  camp  in
America,  finding  them  aU  drinking,  swearing,  gambling,  and
him  being  given  a  beautiful  horse."  ^^^^^

Professor Murray. "  I  think  it's  Masefield — I think  it'Sj^i^.,


;oing
t  wa
Pb(

(Tt


er  Bi


•on.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  265


Masefield  serving  in  the  bar  in  New  York  and  being
surrounded  by  coarse  swearing  people. — No,  I  don't
think  that's  it — not  the  bar  in  New  York,  somewhere
else — I'm  sure  it's  very  nearly  that. I  think  it's  Mase-

I  field  and  I  think  it's  a  boy  and  there's  an  atmosphere

of cursing and swearing and gambling and  someone

[  very  miserable — America."

.  [Here  Professor  Murray  began  by  substituting  an  experience
f  Masefield's  own  life  for  a  similar  experience  of  one  of  his
eroes. Masefield  was  once  bar-tender  in  a  New  York  saloon.  1

fi

1 '  103.  Subject.  I'hss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of
)enis  climbing  a  chimney  in  North  Wales,  and  Whitehouse
t  anging  on  a  rope  fallen  off,  and  Basil  on  the  tip  end  of  aU."
8  Professor  Murray.  "  It's  Denis  and  Whitehouse  climb-
t  ing.  Whitehouse  very  frightened  and  uncomfortable."
I  ("  More  ?  ")  "I  think  that  Denis  is  going  up  a  chimney
and  Whitehouse  danglmg.  Not  Switzerland.  The  Lakes
a or  somewhere  in  England."

104.  Subject. Mr.  Basil  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinldng  of
oing  to  The  Title  with  B.  and  Mr.  Margoliouth  and  Dad,  and
'  was  a  wet  night,  and  I  had  to  go  on  in  front."
Professor  Murray. "  I  get  a  faint  feeling  of  some  sort  of
^ expedition  in  the  wet — Wait — Oh  it's  when  we  went  to
the  Arnold  Bennett  play."
(This  is  right.)

!  105.  Subject.  Mr.  Basel  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinking  of
[arianne  in  [Miss  Austen's]  Sense  and  Sensibility  disputing  with
1 3r  sister  because  her  sister  said  that  she  was  not  practical
it  lough,  and  would  be  no  good  as  a  wife."
s  Professor  Murray.  "  I  think  this  is  a  book — a  sort  of  old-
ie fashioned  domestic  atmosphere.  I  don't  think  it's  the
Irish  Memories — nothing  like  as  breezy — An  argument.
J  I  don't  think  I  shall  get  it."  ("Can  you  give  author?")
' "Might  be  Miss  Austen."

"  . ■  .

^  106.  Subject. Mr. Geoffrey  Curtis  (agent)  : "  I  think  of
hiloctetes  when  his  bow  was  stolen  by  Neoptolemus  on  the
*  lores  of  Lemnos."

s


266  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick  [pari


Professor  Murray. "  This  is  Greek — Well  I  don't  supposj
you  see  it  that  way,  but  I'm  getting  quotations  :

(S  TTup  av  Kfii  irav  Sei/na  koi  Travovpyidg

(Right.)

107.  Subject.  Lady  Mary  Murray  (agent)  :  "  This  is  th
people  in  Dante's  Inferno,  in  Limbo,  walking  about.  The  quie
old  people  of  the  classics,  Virgil  and  others."

Professor  Murray. "  This  is  another  quotation :

'  O  anima  cortese  Mantovana.'  "  i
[The  quotation  is  Beatrice's  address  to  VirgU  in  Limbo  whei
she  goes  to  ask  him  to  guide  Dante. — Inferno,  III.  1.  58.]

March  8,  1919.  ,

108.  Subject. Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  Driving  alon


l[r,


Mill
111


the  road  to  Apremont — nothing  but  ruined  villages  ;  and  seeinyj

a  black  sentry  standing  on  a  heap  of  ruins."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  is  you  driving  a  Limping  Lizzie
It's — I  think  it's  you  driving  a  car  in  France  through
country  that's  been  devastated  by  the  war.  Villages  broke
down.  Oh  yes,  you  stop  and  talk  to  a  French  soldier —
Senegalese  or  a  nigger  of  some  sort.  Ought  I  to  kno^
the  exact  place  ?  I  should  have  said  some  place  on  th
road  to  Metz."
(It  was  on  the  road  to  S.  Mihiel. [Miss  Murray  said] :

meant  an  American  Black — I  thought  of  speaking  to  him  an

asking  the  way.")


109.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I  think  (
President  Wilson  and  Megan  Lloyd  George  in  a  yacht  crui
ing  round  Italy  (said  Italy,  meant  Sicily)  and  being  entertaine
by  Polyphemus."

Professor  Murray. "  This  comes  to  me  quite  straight  as
quotation  from  Theocritus  :

(b  TO  KoXov  TroOopevaa  to  ttoj/  X/0o9,  (3  Kuau6(ppu  l^vfx(pa

It's  Polyphemus  to  Galatea. It's  Polyphemus — oh  it's
made  up  thing — some  modern  girl  going  there  in  a  yachfcl)
and  Polyphemus  speaking  to  her. Ought  I  to  say  wh


Pec


(No


Pir


0

!ficer


esei


on,]


Experiments  in  Thought-Transference


267


she  is  ?  In  a  yacht  cruising  about — I  don't  think  a
character  in  a  book — Oh  Elizabeth  Asquith — Oh  I  don't
know — I  suppose  Miss  Lloyd  George — ."  ("  Person  with
her  ?  ") "  Wade  Gery."

110.  Subject.  Mr.  Basil  Mxirray  (agent):  ''I'm  thinking  of
I.  Wade  Gery  dreaming  that  he's  flying  on  the  back  of  a
hite  guU  into  a  black  cloud — and  when  he  wakes  up  he's  in

hospital  cart  in  Mesopotamia."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  thiak  it's  a  man  in  a  hospital  in
bed,  and  he's  sort  of  sitting  up  in  bed  and  smoothing
his  forehead,  trying  to  recover  a  dream  he's  had — a
dream  [of]  flying  into  some  sudden  great  black  thing —
somehow  rushing  into  a  big  black  cloud  or  something."
("  Who  it  was  ?  ")  "  Oh — well — no — Wade  Gery  comes
into  my  mind,  but  I  don't  .  .  .  ."

(Note. — Professor Murray said [after the  experiment] :  "I

lould  have got the gull — because I got him on a  flying

achine,  but  knew  it  wasn't  that.")

111.  Subject. Miss Beatrice Rose (agent)  : "I think  of
arry  Vardon  practising putting carefully at St.  Andrews,
solving  that  he'U  win  the  championship  a  sixth  time."
Professor Murray. "  Somebody practising goLf — Do  not

think  I  can  get  who  it  is — Should  think  at  St.  Andrews.
Ought  I  to  see  who  it  is  ? The  only  person  I  can  think
of  is  Andrew  Lang."
[Mr.  Andrew  Lang  lived  at  St.  Andrews.]

112.  Subject.  Lady  Mary  Murray  (agent)  :  "  This  is  that
ficer  at  Palermo  who,  when  the  troops  wouldn't  cross  the  big
len  street,  took  a  chair  and  sat  in  the  middle.  Shots  sweep-
5  down  the  street."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  is  quite  different,  it's  Italian."
[The  immediately  preceding  experiment — a  partial  success
— was  concerned  with  Mesopotamia] — Garibaldi — no  it's
the  officer  sitting  in  the  chair  and  smoking  the  cigarette."

ay  29,  1919.

113.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "King  George  V.
itching  a  tennis  match  at  Ranelagh  with  [Mr.]  Asquith  and
meral  Smuts."


268  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwich  [part'

Professor  Murray.  "  I  get  an  impression  of  Maylike  people
I  get  the  King  and  Mr.  Asquith  at  some  function  or
other — awfully  blurred — I  should  think  looking  on  at  a
tennis  match."

114.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  King  Charles
I.  riding  on  a  white  horse  in  red  trappings,  riding  over  thq
border  to  visit  Mary  Queen  of  Scots."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  is  historical.  It's  a  Vandyke
picture  Charles  I.,  or  rather  Charles  as  in  the  Vandyke
picture  riding  somewhere.  Oh  he  is  riding  to  Scotland
to  get  in  the  civil  war."  (Lady  Mary  Murray  :  "  It's
nonsense.")  "  Is  he  going  to  elope  with  Mary  Queen  ol
Scots  ?  "

(Agnes  and  all  the  company  were  thinking  of  the  Vandyke
picture.)

December  3,  1919.

115.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I  think  a
Mr.  Spooner  driving  along  Holywell  in  a  very  high  two-wheelec
buggy."

Professor  Murray.  "  It's  somebody  driving  a,n  Australia!
buggy — sort  of  high  two-wheeled  thing — Driving  on  s
sort  of  muddy,  wet  day,  down  Holywell.  Ought  I  tc
know  who  it  is  ?  I  should  say  a  young  American.  Nc
impression."

([Miss  Murray]  "  thought  of  the  mud,  but  did  not  say  so."

116.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent):  "I  think  o:
Beatrice  and  Dante  walking  along  by  the  Tiber  and  feeding
pigeons."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  think  it's  Italian— I  thmk— What'f
the  book.  I  thmk  it's— Oh  Dante's  book  about  Beat
rice,  a  description  of  his  walking  with  Beatrice  by  th(
Arno."  ("  Not  quite  it.")  "  It's  Dante  walkmg  witl
Beatrice,  and  I  think  it's  by  a  river.  I  can't  get  any
thing  more."

[I  quote  this  as  probably  a  case  of  interference  by  the  '  supra
liminal  consciousness.'  For  if  it  was  a  real  Dante  and  Beatrici
out  of  a  book,  the  only  river  they  could  have  been  walking
by  was  the  Arno.]


in

lis  n


lie  n
'ark


toser


12(1,


121

ik
itioi
Pbo


:cn.]  Experiments  in  ThougU-Transference  269

\X)ecember  20,  1919.

0,  117.  Subject. Miss Agnes Mtjreay (agent)  : "I think  of
J  lie  Grecian  runner  bringing  the  tidings  of  Marathon,  delivering
is  message  and  falling  down  dead."

Professor  Murray,  "—think  not— Oh— yes  it's  somebody
runmng— running  with  news  ;  it  s  a  Greek  thmg— I
should  say  he  was  running  to  Athens  with  news  of  Mara-
thon. Guessing  :  does  he  drop  dead  at  the  end  ?  "

118.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Mtjrray  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of  the
)ur  riders  of  the  Apocalypse  riding  on  their  horses  through
le  night — Death  and  disease and  two  others  riding  towards


■k(


!e(


lai


aris.


Professor  Murray.  "  Is  it  cavalry  galloping  at  night  ?
Funny — I  first  thought  it  was  gomg  to  be  a  Walkyrie
ride,  and  then  I  thmk  of  it  as  French  somehow — I  don't
thmk  I'U  get  it  clearly.  It's  people  riding  hard  at
night,  and  it's  in  France."

ecember  27,  [1919?] ■  , ,  .

119.  Subject. Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent). "  I'll  think  of
'oserpme  plajong  in  a  field  of  flowers  and  Dis  riduig  on  a
ack  horse  and  fetching  her  away  to  the  underworld."
Professor  Murray. "  I  may  say  that  I'm  thinking  strongly

of  the  Homeric  hymn  to  Demeter  about  Persephone
being  carried  away."  ,

120.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I'U  thmk  of
leen  Elizabeth  having  a  tea  party  at  Windsor,  and  they're
I  seated  on  the  ground  eating  sugar  cakes."

^  Professor  Murray.  "  Is  it  somethmg  grotesque  ?  I  should
think  it  was  Queen  Elizabeth  dancing  a  Jaz  or  some-
thing like  that — Having  afternoon  tea  with  a  great
crowd  of  people— Windsor  Castle."  ("  What  eatmg  ?  ")
"  Prawns — don't  know."

121.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "I'll  thmk  of  a  shepherd
ting  with Elizabeth  Asquith on  a  rock  in Sicily  reading

raltronius."

yiRpROFESSOR  Murray. "  I  may  not  get  this. I  get  a  sort  of
ajj feeling of Theocritus, shepherds in Sicily  singing — a
shepherd  with  a  pipe  under  a  rock  in  Sicily— Something


[Tl

pi
12'
affii
id
Pe


270  Mrs.  Henry  SidgioicJc  [PAB#°

absurd  about  it — is  he  reading  a  book — Oh  it's  some-
it's  some  quite  modern  young  woman  with  him — I  don'
know— I  should  say  Elizabeth  Asquith." ("What  read|«
ing  ?  ") "  Trojan  Women."

122.  Subject. Miss  Agnes  Murkay  (agent)  :  "I  think  of
drive  in  my  ambulance  that  I  went  over  devastated  country-
howling  snow-storm. Got  off  and  had  supper  with  Frencl
PoUus."

Professor  Murray.  "  Atmosphere — awful  cold,  storm,  descj
lation- — you  driving  an  ambulance  at  night  in  storm-
not  sure  snow.  Very  stormy  night  in  the  devastate
country. Meeting  some Americans  ?  "

123.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  A  scene  a
the  end  of  the  new  Galsworthy  (Saint's  Progress)  where  Moll
is  binding  sheaves  and  Jemmy  Post  comes  up  and  speaks  t
her."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  should  say  a  book — I  don't  thin
it's  a  book  I've  read  ...  I  should  think  a  sort  of  rusti
scene,  a  girl  in  a  corn-field  and  a  young  man- — I  shoul
like  to  get  at  the  author— No — I  should  say  English  an
modern — I  think  she's  carrying  sheaves  of  corn."

124.  Subject.  Miss  Agnes  Murray  (agent)  :  "  The  Gree
quotation  which  describes  Hector  leaping  over  the  wal
of  Troy  and  his  face  was  like  sudden  night."

Professor  Murray. "  Oh  this  feels  like  Homer —
"EKTwp,  oaae ot  Trupl  XaixireTOwvTi  etKTt]v."
(Wrong  quotation. She  meant  6  S'  epe/nvij  i/ukti  eoiKw).

125.  Subject.  Professor  M'Dougall  (agent)  :  "  I'll  think
a  scene  in  [Hardy's  ]  Tess  of  the  Durbervilles,  where  Tess
driven  violently  down  the  hill  by  that  wretched  man."  n

Professor  Murray.  "  I  should  say  this  is  a  book — I  thir
it's  Hardy — sort  of  tragic — I  should  think  it  was  Tess
can't  get  it— when  she's  in  the  cart  and  the  horse  ir
pales  itself  on  a  pole."

(Wrong  scene.)


}f  a
plays

m,


boat


December  26,  (1921  ?)

126.  Subject. Mr.  Basil  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I'll  think  of  tl


\S  <cu.]


Experiments  in  Thought-Transference


linging  in  The  Wasps,  when  the  Athenian  citizens,  dikasts,
:;ome  and  sing  outside  Bdelycleon's  house,  and  PhUocleon  tries
;o  climb  out  to  them."
Pkofessor  MtTRRAY.  "  I  think  it's  Greek — I  think  it's  Aristo-
phanes— it's  a  chorus  of  Gerontes — the  people  in  The
Wasps."

[The  Gerontes — old  men — were  dikasts.]
ipril  22,  1923.

127.  Subject.  Mr.  Basil  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinking  of
lailing  that  boat  with  T.  Wade  Gery  down  the  Weir  last  term,
md  diving  out  and  swimming  to  the  bank."
Proeessor  MtTRRAY.  "  The  boat  being  caught  in  the  Weir
at  Godstowe  when  you  were  with  Wade  Gery.  I  got
the  boat  being  crashed  up."


lOtt


n


128.  Subject.  Mr.  Basil  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I  am  thinking
)f  a  scene  in  The  Shadow  of  a  Titan,  in  which  a  young  woman
olays  chess  with  a  young  man  to  see  if  he  wUl  marry  her,  and
vhile  he  is  out  of  the  room  she  moves  a  bishop  to  cheat  and
vins."

Professor  Murray.  "  It's  a  thing  in  a  book.  I've  got  at
present ;  I  think  it  is,  the  Arch  of — It  is  a  very  un-
jrej  pleasant  sort  of  book  violent  people  playing  chess  about
something  preposterous.  It's  a  man  and  a  woman
playing  chess  and  they  are  playing  for  a  wager  of
some  kind.  Whether  he  shaU  marry  [her],  and  I  think
he  is  to,  and  he  rushes  away  and  fled  the  country  or
something  like  that.  She  cheats — but  probably  I'm
guessing."  .

129.  Subject.  Mr.  Basil  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinkhig  of
/he  sinking  of  the  Titanic  and  one  of  the  bandsmen  who  was
ilaying  Nearer  my  God  to  Thee  to  nearly  the  end,  and  then  he
lived  off  and  sat  on  his  'cello  until  he  was  picked  up  by  a
)oat."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  is  something  awful — a  big  ship-
wreck. I  suppose  it  is  the  Lusitania.  No  it's  not  the
Lusitania.  It's  the  thing  that  ran  into  the  iceberg —
the  Titanic.  Singing  of  hymns.  Is  there  some  special
incident  1 {"  Yes.") I  feel  as  if  somebody  was  crashing


nk
ess

thin
M
s  in


272


Mrs.  He7iry  Sidgwiclc.


[PAET


a  fiddle  or  a  'cello  or  breaking  up  a  musical  instrument
— people being picked up out of the water — saved.  |
Don't  much  think  I  shall  get  it  clearer  than  that."
(  [Professor  Murray  said  afterwards]  "  I  knew  it  was  Nearer
my  God  to  Thee. I  ought  to  have  said  it.")  i

Maij  26,  1923.

130.  Subject.  Mr.  Denis  Murray  (agent):  "That  Leyland
car  commg  up  the  finishing  straight  at  Brooklands  in  the  last
race."

Professor  Murray. "  I've  got  a  great  feeling  of  something
whizzing  along  at  a  tremendous  speed — aeroplane  or  car
— motor-car  racing,  finishing  up. It's  a  race,  I  suppose, !
at  Brooklands,  and  the  thing's  commg  at  a  tremendous
speed — just  at  the  finish."

November  22,  1923.

131.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of;
William  IV.  driving  round  to  drop  the  German  King  at  his
lodgings  before  attending  dinner."

Professor  Murray.  "  A  sort  of  royal  coach.  Quite  unlike
the  things  you  generally  do.  I  get  a  sort  of  feeling  of
a  Hanoverian  Kong  driving  in  a  coach — I  should  say  it
was  William  IV.  Is  he  driving  to  meet  the  King  of
Prussia — or  something  like that — in Germany  ?  "

132.  Subject.  Lady  Mary  Murray  (agent)  :  "  Poem  I  have
just  read  in  Punch  of  the  dead  men  at  Oudenarde  lying  under
the  earth,  and  hearmg  the  English  coming  tramping  and
singing."

Professor  Murray.  "  It's  Rupert  Brooke  waiting  for  the
English  bugles  coming  and  blowing  up  the  Hellespont.
It's  the  poem — It's  crowds  of  them,  it's  the  English
soldiers — aU  the  English  dea.d  lulled  in  earher  wars
hearmg  the  English  coming  back."

(Masefield's  book  says  it,  and  Agnes  wrote  a  poem.)

133.  Subject.  Mr.  Basil  Murray  (agent)  :  "  Mother  and
Tony  [a  little  grandson]  going  on  the  engine  with  Mr.  Peck  to
pick  up  bluebells  at  Bacton."

Professor  Murray. "  Tony  driving  an  engine. I  get  him
on  an  engine  with  Mr.  Peck,  stopping  and  getting  out


xcn.]


Experiments  in  Thought-Transference


273


[to]  pick  flowers.  I  got  him  first  with  Stephen — Not
Overstrand,  not  North  Walsham — Don't  thmk  I  know
[where]."

January  27,  1924.

134.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of  the  little
Tartar  wrapping  himself  up  by  the  muddy  river."  [In  some
book,  not  recorded.]

Professor  Murray.  "  I  feel  puzzled  about  this — not  ex-
actly Russian,  but  it's  got  that  sort  of  feel.  I  should
say  it  was  Russia  or  some  place  like  that — a  great
muddy  river  and  a  little  man  wrapping  himself  in  a
cloak  by  the  side  of  it."  ("  Anything  more  about  the
little  man  ?  ") "  I  should  say  he  was  a  Tartar."

135.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  ThLs  is  Herr
von  Delius  reading  a  lecture  on  Klopstock  in  his  kitchen."

Professor  Murray. "No,  I  don't  get  that."

Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  :  "Oh  I  thought  you'd  get  this
quite  clear."

[Quoted  for  the  sake  of  the  agent's  impression.]

136.  Subject.  Mrs.  Arnold  Toynbee  (agent)  :  "  I  think  of
A.chilles  running  with  the  birds."  [In  the  Iphigenia  in  Tauris,
134  flf.]  •

Professor  Murray  (long  pause).  "  I  should  say  it  was
ancient  Greek.  I  think  it's  AchiUes  in  a  chariot — or
riding  a  horse — but  he  never  did  ride  on  a  horse.
Is  that  right  ?  "  ("Nearly  right,  not  all  or  quite  right.")
"  I  don't  think  I  shall  get  any  more."

137.  Subject.  Mr.  Basil  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I  thiak  of
Times  correspondent  in.  Palatinate  carrying  djong  Separatist  to
seat  at  side  of  cafe  when  murdered."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  should  get  this.  I've  got  atmo-
sphere quite  strongly.  It's  people  being  shot  in  a  cafe — ■
it's  the — Separatists  in  Palatinate  being  shot"  ("Special
incident  ?  ")  "  Special  incident  ?  I  should  say  it  was
Times  correspondent  in  Palatinate  carrying  the  person
away."

A.pril  6,  1924.

138.  Subject. Mr.  Basil  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinking  of


274


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


the  Atlantic  Fleet  off  Rosyth  entertaining  the  Swedish  squadron
and  firing  a  salute  as  the  Swedish  boats  sailed  under  the  Forth
Bridge."

Professor  Murray.  "  I  should  say  it  was  ships — It's  a
great  fleet  of  ships,  and  I  thmk — they're  certainly  not
fighting  a  battle — I  think  they're  having  some  sort  of
festivity^ — It's  quite  near  land — not  in  the  open  sea."

139.  Subject.  Mr.  Basil  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinking  of
the  scene  in  Conrad's  Chance,  when  the  sailor  comes  to  meet
his  young  woman  at  the  Commercial  Hotel  in  the  London
Docks,  and  goes  in  and  has  a  sort  of  renunciatory  scene  with
her — makes  a  great  storm."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  is  a  thing  in  a  book.  I  can't
get  it  properly,  but  I've  got  a  sort  of  atmosphere  of  the
book.  I  think  it's  the  Conrad  where  that  old  swindler
went  to  sea  in  a  ship."  ("  The  scene  ?  ")  "  I'm  afraid
I  can't,  etc. — I'm  awfully  near  it,  but  I  can't  quite  get
it.  I  think  it  would  be  some  one  commg  up  the  com-
panion." [This  describes  the  right  book  but  the  wrong
scene.]

140.  Subject.  Mr.  Basil  Murray  (agent)  :  "  I'm  thinking  of
Byron  standing  on  the  Island  of  Salamis  and  seeing  an  Ameri-
can film  company  staging  a  battle."

Professor  Murray.  "  This  has  got  something  wrong  in  it,
hasn't  it  ?  Isn't  it  something  absurd  ?  I  don't  know —
I  feel  it  offends  me — but  it  starts  with  [Blank  here —
probably  should  be  The  Isles  of  Greece]  the  Byron  thing
— WeU  I  think  it's  something —  .

The  mountams  look  on  Salamis,
And  Salamis  looks  on  the  sea,  etc.

And then something  wrong — something to do with  a
cinema  or  American  tourists."
[In  the  quotation from  Byron's  Isles  of  Greece  Salamis  is
substituted  for  Marathon.]  ^

1  An  account  of  some  experiments  with  Professor  Murray  of  special
interest,  carried  out  after  this  paper  was  in  print,  but  mentioned  when
it  was  read,  will  be  found  in  Appendix  II,,  on  pp.  336-341  below.


XCII.]


Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years


275


SOME  REMINISCENCES  OF  FIFTY  YEARS'
PSYCHICAL  RESEARCH.!

By  Sm  William  Baekett,  F.R.S.

"  Science  is  bound  by  the  everlasting  law  of  honour  to  face  fearlessly
every  problem  that  can  fairly  be  presented  to  it." — Lord  Kelvin.

Just  fifty  years  ago  this  month  I  first  began  a  serious  and
systematic  investigation  of  psychical  phenomena,  and  was
so  impressed  with  the  supreme  importance  of  the  subject
that  so  far  as  my  time  and  strength  permitted  I  have
continued  the  investigation  to  the  present  time  with
unabated  interest.  Of  course,  other  and  far  abler  men
both  preceded  me  and  worked  contemporaneously  with  me  ;
to  some  of  these  I  wiU  refer  directly.

Early  Psychical  Reseakchees.

By  psychical  research  I  mean  the  critical  investigation,
and,  where  possible,  the  verification  of  alleged  supernormal
phenomena,  or  of  hitherto  unrecognised  human  faculties.

So  far  as  regards  narratives  of  spiritistic  phenomena,
these  of  course  go  back  to  remote  ages,  and  records  are
to  be  found  in  many  different  countries.  Years  ago
Andrew  Lang  had  several  conversations  with  me  on  the
value  of  the  S.P.R.  devoting  some  time  to  historical
research  on  this  subject,  for  he  attached  great  importance
to  the  fact  of  the  wide  diffusion,  both  in  space  and  time,
of  phenomena  similar  to  those  we  are  now  engaged  in
investigating.  2

1  Read  at  a  Private  Meeting  of  the  Society  on  June  17,  1924.

^  The  laborious  and  admii-able  work  by  William  Hewitt,  entitled
History  of  the  Supernatural,  is  well  known  and  should  be  consulted  by
all  who  are  interested  in  the  history  of  psychical  research.  It  made  a
great  impression  on  me  when  I  read  it  some  fifty  years  ago.  The  term
supernatural  should,  however,  have  been  supernormal,  as  all  phenomena —
however  novel  and  inexplicable  they  may  appear  to  be — are  really
natural ;  only  God  is  above  and  beyond  Nature.


276


Sir  William  Barrett


[part


Biblical  references  show  that  Spiritualism  was  rampant
in  the  early  history  of  the  Jews  ;  King  Saul  himself  being
a  notable  spiritualist,  consulting  his  medium  at  Endor.
As  I  have  said  elsewhere,  before  science  had  established  a
universal  reign  of  law  or  of  the  great  world  order,  the
pursuit  of  these  spkitistic  phenomena  was  justly  con-
demned by  the  ancient  prophets  as  hkely  to  lead  to  !
intellectual  and  moral  confusion.  It  seems  probable,  how-
ever, that  many  of  the  prophetic  writings  were  done
automatically,  as  in  the  book  of  Chronicles  David  says
that  the  instructions  he  gave  regarding  the  building  of  the
Temple  were  not  his  own  ideas,  for  "  the  Lord  made  me
understand  in  writing  by  his  hand  upon  me."  ^

One  of  the  first  psychical  researchers  of  whom  I  can
find any report was the learned and famous  German
Jesuit,  Fr.  A.  Kircher. In  his  Latin  foUos,  published  in  j
1640,  he  discusses  the  cause  of  the  motion  of  the  '  pendule
explorateur '  (a  little  ball  or  ring  suspended  by  a  string  j ;
held  by  one  hand)  and  of  the  forked  divining  rod,  both  h
of  which  at  that  time  were  the  subject  of  acute  con-
troversy. Kircher  showed  that  if  the  '  pendule '  or  the  :  i
rod  were  held,  not  by  the  hand,  but  by  a  rigid  support,  ii
no  motion  occurs  under  any  circumstances. He  was  thus  \
led to discover the principle of unconscious muscular  i
action, a  discovery  claimed  two  centuries  later  by  the  |
distinguished  French  chemist,  Chevreul,  and  by  Dr.  W.  B.  |
Carpenter  subsequently.  i

Some  twenty  years  after  Kircher's  work  appeared,  one  i
of  the  founders  of  the  Royal  Society,  the  Hon.  Robert  i
Boyle,  '  the  son  of  the  Earl  of  Cork  and  the  Father  of  s
Chemistry,'  in  his  Philosophical  Works  discusses  the  I
question  of  the  divining  rod,  and  urges  further  experi-  s
ments  to  test  its  value  in  the  discovery  of  mineral  veins,  ]
for  the  evidence  he  collected  was  conflicting.  He  remarks  t
that  eye-witnesses,  who  were  far  from  credulous,  told  him  s
of  the  great  value  of  the  rod,  and  one  gentleman  in  whose
hand  it  moved  when  he  passed  over  a  vein  of  ore,  affirmed  p
"  that  the  motion  of  his  hand  did  not  at  all  contribute
to  the  inclination  of  the  rod,  but  that  sometimes  when

1  See  1  Chron.  xxviii.  19.  ...  .  j


xcn.]


Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years


277


lie  held  it  very  fast  it  would  bend  so  strongly  as  to
break  in  his  hand."  ^

In  one  of  the  first  volumes  of  the  Philosophical  Trans-
actions of  the  Royal  Society  Boyle  asks  the  question  whether
anyone  could  inform  him  "  whether  diggers  do  meet  with
the  subterraneous  demons  which  are  said  to  inhabit  the
lead  mines  of  Somersetshire,  and  in  what  shape  and
manner  they  appear  ?  "  In  a  subsequent  number  the  famous
Dr.  Glanvil,  also  a  Fellow  of  the  Royal  Society,  rephed
that  he  lived  near  the  lead  mines  in  the  Mendips,  and
that  whilst  the  miners  heard  the  knockings  of  the  demons,
and  by  following  the  directions  of  these  knockings  were  led
to  plenty  of  ore,  nevertheless  he  had  not  found  anyone  who
had  actually  seen  the  demons  or  gnomes  themselves,  and
therefore  he  could  not  describe  their  appearance  or  habits.^
A  curious  fact  is  that  these  knockings  are  heard  and  the
gnomes  beheved  in  by  lead  miners  in  various  parts  of
England  and  Ireland.  The  simple  scientific  explanation  of
these  sounds  I  think  I  have  discovered,  but  it  would  take
me  too  far  to  go  into  the  m^atter  here.  The  point  I  want
to  bring  out  is  that  Boyle  and  Glanvil  and  many  of  the
early  Fellows  of  the  Royal  Society  were  true  psychical
researchers  ;  as  Prof,  de  Morgan  has  said,  "  they  set
themselves  to  work  to  prove  aU  things,  that  they  might
hold  fast  to  that  which  was  good  ;  they  bent  themselves
to  the  question  whether  sprats  were  young  herrings  and
whether  a  spider  could  crawl  through  the  powder  of  a
unicorn's  horn."  They  enquired  whether  there  was  any
value  in  magnetical  cures  and  any  good  in  Kenelm  Digby's
sympathetic  powder.  Even  a  century  later  the  great  Sir
Isaac  Newton  describes  in  a  series  of  letters — which  I  have
seen,  as  they  have  been  preserved  by  my  friend,  Mx.
Blayny  Balfour — how  he  spent  much  time  and  money  in
besting  the  value  of  certain  alchemical  powders  which  were
3aid  to  turn  lead  into  gold.

The  early  spiritualists  really  took  the  method  of  these
pioneers  of  physical  science. Though they might  have

1  Boyle's  Philosophical  WorJcs  (1738),  vol.  i.,  p.  172  and  173.
^Phil. Trans.,  No. 19,  Nov. 1666  ; and GlanvU's  reply  is in  Phil.
Trans.,  vol.  iii.,  1668.


278 '  Sir  William  Barrett  [part

been  frequently  too  credulous,  yet  what  they  aimed  at  was
to  collect  facts  however  improbable  they  appeared  to  be,
and  as  De  Morgan  says,  "  The  spiritualists  beyond  a  doubt
are  in  the  track  that  has  led  to  all  advancement  in
physical  science  ;  they  have  the  spirit  and  the  method  of
the  grand  time  when  paths  had  to  be  cut  through  the
uncleared  forests  in  which  it  is  now  the  daily  routine  to
walk.  Their  spirit  was  that  of  universal  examination,
wholly  unchecked  by  fear  of  being  discovered  in  the
investigation  of  nonsense."  ^

One  of  the  earhest  Fellows  of  the  Royal  Society,  to
whom  I  have  aheady  referred,  was  Dr.  Joseph  Glanvil ;
he  was  chaplain  to  Charles  II.  and  a  prebendary  of
Worcester.  The  historian  Lecky  describes  him  as  "  a  man
of  incomparable  abihty."  Speaking  of  one  of  Glanvil's
works,  Lecky  remarks,  "  it  would  be  difficult  to  find  a
work  displaying  less  of  credulity  and  superstition  than  this
treatise."  Glanvil's  Saducismus  Triumpliatus,  pubhshed  at
the  end  of  the  seventeenth  century,  discusses  the  evidence;
concerning  witches  and  apparitions,  and  gives  the  fuUest
report  of  those  remarkable  poltergeist  phenomena  known
as  the  '  Demon  of  Tedworth '  or  the  "  Disturbances  in
Mr.  Mompesson's  house  in  Wiltshire."  Glanvil  truly
remarks  that  "  matters  of  fact  well  proved  ought  not  to
be  denied  because  we  cannot  conceive  how  they  could  be
performed.  Deceit  and  fallacy  will  only  warrant  a  greater
care  and  caution  in  examining."  Glanvil  had  the  warm
support  not  only  of  Robert  Boyle,  but  also  of  the  famous
Henry  More.

In  his  record  of  the  hauntings  of  the  Epworth  parsonage
in  1716,  and  in  his  endeavour  to  get  first-hand  evidence  of
other  supernormal  phenomena,  John  Wesley — as  Mr.  J.
Arthur  Hill  has  said — "  would  have  made  an  excellent
member  of  the  S.P.R.,"  and  it  is  certainly  surprising — as
Mr.  Hill  adds — "  to  find  in  an  earnestly  religious  man  of
that  day,  such  as  John  Wesley,  so  much  critical  interest
in  our  subject."

Coming  to  more  recent  times,  the  memoir  of  the  eleventh
Duke  of  Somerset,  the  great  grandfather  of  our  friend  and

1  Preface  to  From  Matter  to  Spirit,  pp.  18-20.


Exi
hi
frie
ni'


Dr.
Col
abo
per
fac

exc

of

Fre


esp
of
ver
pai


ope


T  xcii.]  Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years  279

s  fellow-worker,  Miss  Ramsden,  shows  that  the  Duke  was
i,  really  a  keen  psychical  researcher,  for  he  critically
t  exammed  several  psychic  cases,  among  others  the  well-
II  known  dream  of  a  Cornish  farmer,  WiUiams,  who  on
if  May  11,  1812,  woke  his  wife  and  told  her  that  he  had
e  dreamt  he  had  seen  a  man  shot  in  the  lobby  of  the  House
0  of  Commons,  and  described  his  appearance,  etc.  The
1,  dream  was  repeated,  and  told  to  several  people  ;  sub-
e  sequently  it  was  found  that  the  details  of  the  dream
exactly  corresponded  with  the  facts connected  with  the

0  assassination  of  Mr.  Percival,  the  Chancellor  of  the
;  Exchequer,  on  the  eleventh  May,  the  very  evening  Williams
)f  had  his  dream. ^  Percival's  descendant— my  venerable
n  friend.  Miss  Percival "  of  Chobham— has  also  given  me  a

1  written  contemporary  record  of  this  remarkable  dream.

a  Among  the  Fellows  of  the  Royal  Society  who  warmly
is  advocated  the  investigation  of  psychical  phenomena,  was
it  Dr.  Mayo,  F.R.S.,  Professor  of  Physiology  in  King's
le  College,  London,  whose  witings  on  the  subject,  pubhshed
it  about  the  middle  of  the  last  century,  are  well  worth
n  perusal,  containing  as  they  do  many  new  and  interesting
a  facts,  which  at  the  present  day  seem  little  known,
y This period was also notable for the great  interest

0  excited  by  mesmeric  phenomena.  The  remarkable  report
le  of  the  committee  appointed  by  the  medical  section  of  the
!!  French  Academy  of  Sciences  on  this  subject,  together  with
n  the  amazmg  phenomena  to  which  they  testify,  excited
IS  widespread interest. Eminent Enghsh physicians  and

surgeons,  such  as  Dr.  EUiotson  of  St.  Thomas'  Hospital
re  and  Dr.  Esdaile,  presidency  surgeon  in  Calcutta,  made
}f  numerous  contributions  to  our  knowledge  on  this  subject,
J.  especially  as  regards  the  therapeutic  and  analgesic  power
it  of  mesmerism.  Esdaile,  as  is  weU  known,  conducted  a
IS  very  large  number  of  major  surgical  operations,  absolutely
i)f  painlessly,  under  the  mesmeric  trance  ; and  if  the  use  of

1  3hloroform as an anaesthetic had not been  discovered
ibout  this  time,  the  value  of  mesmeric  trance  in  surgical

\  aperations  would  have  been  universally  acknowledged.  But

1  See  p. 335  in  Lady  Gwendolen  Ramsden's  Correspondence  of  Two
Brothers  from  1809-1819  (Longmans  &  Co.).


280  Sir  William  Barrett  [part

in  spite  of  the  eminence  of  Dr.  Elliotson  and  others,
mesmerism  was  nevertheless  denounced  by  the  profession
as  a  whole,  and  the  Lancet  called  it  "  an  odious  fraud."
It  was  not  until  Braid  of  Manchester  employed  the  word
hypnotism  instead  of  mesmerism — and  thus  dissociated  the
subject  from  Mesmer,  who  was  more  or  less  of  a  quack —
that  the  medical  profession  began  to  treat  the  subject
with  less  contempt.  Braid  also  gave  a  reasonable  explana-
tion of  the  phenomena,  but  subsequently  this  proved  to  be
inadequate  to  account  for  all  the  facts.  The  valuable
experimental  work  of  the  continental  hypnotists,  and  of
our  own  members,  Edmund  Gurney,  Dr.  Lloyd  Tuckey
and  Dr.  Milne  Bramwell,  have  now  placed  hypnotic  treat-
ment among  the  recognised  therapeutic  agencies  of  the
medical  profession.

Foundation  of  the  Society  eor  Psychical  Research.

Some  twenty-five  years  before  our  Society  was  founded
a  few  of  the  younger  Fellows  of  Trinity  CoUege,  Cam-
bridge, chief  of  whom  was  Mr.  B.  F.  Westcott— afterwards
the  famous  Bishop  of  Durham— started  a  '  Ghost  Society  '
very  much  on  the  lines  of  our  S.P.R.  In  our  Journal  for
April  last  year  I  gave  the  object  and  the  brief  history  of
this  Society,  which  included  among  its  members  several
Cambridge  graduates  who  subsequently  became  eminent,  such
as  Archbishop  Benson,  Prof.  Hem-y  Sidgwick,  and  others.
I  will  hand  over  for  preservation  among  the  archives  of
our  Society  the  original  document  of  the  '  Cambridge
Ghost  Club  '  (as  it  was  called),  given  to  me  by  my  friend
the  Archdeacon  of  Dublin.

As  regards  the  foundation  of  our  own  Society,  I  have
corrected  elsewhere  the  misunderstanding  which  Prof.
Richet  and  others  have  fallen  into  ;  ^  and  also  I  wrote,  by
request,  a  fuller  account  of  the  early  history  of  our
Society. 2  Though  it  is  true  I  happened  to  be  the  chief
instrument  in  the  foundation  of  our  Society  in  1882 — and
of  kindred  societies  in  Canada  and  the  United  States  in

1  See  Journal  oj  the  S.P.R.,  vol.  xxi.,  October  1923,  p.  139,

2  See  Light,  June  21,  1924.


S(


ai

I

Pl
ft

di

lei


xcn.]  Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years  281

1884 — ^yet  the  high  position  and  respect  the  S.P.R.  has
won  is  chiefly  due  to  Sidgwick,  Myers,  and  Gurney,  the
three  great  pillars  upon  which  the  edifice  of  our  Society
was  originally  built.  These  eminent  men  were  unlike  in
many  ways  :  Sidgwick  by  his  adhesion  to  the  S.P.R.
greatly  impressed  the  academic  world,  for  his  influence,
wisdom,  and  caution  were  widely  recognised  ;  Myers  by  his
enthusiasm,  briUiant  talents,  and  profound  intuition,  was
the  corner  stone  of  the  S.P.R.  till  his  death  in  1901  :
Gurney  with  his  industry  and  immense  range  of  knowledge
was  essential  to  the  early  progress  and  stabihty  of  our
Society.

Crookes  was  really  the  first  scientific  man  to  devote  his
experimental skill, from 1870 to 1874, to the  critical
investigation of the physical  phenomena of  spnitualism.
It  is  pitiful  to  think  of  the  scientific  ostracism  to  which  he
was subjected and over which his genius  eventually
triumphed. I  am  not,  however,  surprised  at  the  Royal
Society  refusing  to  publish  his  spiritistic  investigations,  for,
a  few  years  later,  my  modest  paper  read  before  the  British
Association  in  1876  was  refused  pubKcation  by  scientific
ji  societies, of  which  I  was  member, on  the  very  natural
J  ground  that  science  dealt  with  the  evidence  furnished  by
1^  our  recognised  senses,  whereas  my  paper  dealt  either  with
.  phenomena  which  transcended  the  usual  channels  of  sense
or  with  phenomena  that  transcended  the  material  world.


Eaely  Steps  in  Psychical  Research.

Many  friends  have  asked  me  how  I  first  became
interested  in  psychical  research.  Perhaps  I  may  be  for-
given for  relating  an  old  story.  Between  the  years  1862
and  1867  I  was  assistant  to  Professor  Tyndall  at  the
Royal  Institution.  The  atmosphere  surrounding  my  early
years  there  was  entirely  opposed  to  any  belief  in  psychical
phenomena.  Faraday,  to  whom  electrical  engineers  owe
the  source  of  all  their  vast  undertakings — yet  who  Hved  and
died  a  poor  man — Faraday  I  saw  almost  daily,  before  he
left  the  Royal  Institution  and  went  to  Live  at  the  Hampton


282


Sir  William  Barrett


[part;


Court  Cottage  given  to  him  by  the  Prince  Consort.  I  can
never  forget  the  debt  I  owe  that  famous  man  for  his
generous  kindness  and  guidance  to  a  young  ignoramus  Uke
myself.  Faraday  had  pubhshed  about  1855  his  famous
experiment  on  table-turning,  showing  how  imconscious
muscular  effort  accounted  for  what  he  saw.  A  little  later
he  publicly  declined  to  sit  with  the  medium  Home,  saying
he  had  lost  too  much  time  over  such  matters  already.
Tyndall  also  had  denounced  spkitualism  as  an  imposture.
Both  Huxley  and  Herbert  Spencer  were  frequent  visitors
to  the  Royal  Institution  laboratory,  and  both  of  these
eminent  men  treated  all  psychical  phenomena  with  con-
temptuous indiiJerence.  Among  other  frequent  visitors  was
an  Irishman,  Mr.  John  Wilson,  who  invited  me  to  spend
my  vacations  at  his  place  in  County  Westmeath.  For  a
couple  of  years  I  did  so,  and  found  to  my  astonishment
that  Mr.  Wilson  was  a  firm  behever  in— and  experienced
investigator  of — mesmerism,  as  it  was  then  called.  He
showed  me  some  most  extraordinary  experiments  upon  a
sensitive  subject  from  his  estate.  I  was  naturally  in-
credulous and  asked  to  be  allowed  to  repeat  the  experi-
ments myself,  selecting  another  subject.  We  found  a
young  uneducated  Irish  girl,  who  proved  to  be  extremely
sensitive.  In  the  mesmeric  trance — in  spite  of  every  pre-
caution that  I  took  to  prevent  deception — whatever  sensa-
tions I  felt,  whether  of  touch,  taste  or  smell,  were  trans-
ferred to  the  subject,  and,  moreover,  ideas  and  words
which  I  thought  of  were  reproduced  more  or  less  accurately
by  the  hypnotised  subject.  A  brief  account  of  some  of
these  experiments  may  be  found  in  the  first  volume  of  our
Proceedings,  p.  240.

When  I  returned  to  London  I  repeated  these  experi-
ments with  a  couple  of  boys  whom  I  found  susceptible  to
hjrpnosis.  These  experiments  revealed  to  me  the  extra-
ordinary power  of  either  verbal  or  silent  suggestion  upon
the  hypnotised  subject.  For  instance,  placing  a  pan-  of
shoes  upon  the  table,  I  told  one  of  the  lads  that  I  was
going  to  float  round  the  room  and  pointed  to  the  position
I  was  supposed  to  have  reached  near  the  ceiling.  Then,
clapping  my  hands,  I  suggested  that  I  was  safely  back  in.


xcii.]  Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years  283

my shoes on the table. The boy stared at me  with
increduhty and  related afterwards, both to me and  to
others, that  he had  really seen  me floating  round  the
room. A  similar  result  was  obtained  by  me  with  another
subject  when  I  was  on  a  visit  to  America  in  1884.  Hence
I  was  led  to  believe  that  spiritualistic  phenomena,  when
not  fraudulent,  were  really  due  to  the  hallucination  of  the
observer  ; that,  in  fact,  the phenomena,  such as  Home
floating  out  of  the  room  or  putting  his  hands  into  the
fire,  were  really  subjective  and  not  objective. I  had  been
in  correspondence  with  Mr.  Crookes  on  scientific  matters  so
far  back  as  the  year  1864,  when  I  published  in  the  Philo-
sophical  Magazine my first scientific research. In  1870
Crookes  began  his  experiments  with  the  famous  medium
D.  D.  Home  ;  soon  after  this  he  wrote  to  me  (in  a  letter
which  I  have  kept)  as  follows  :  -

''May  14,  1871.

Dear  Mk.  Barkett,

I  must  have  some  conversation  with  you  respecting
these  obscure  phenomena.  If  you  can  help  me  to  form
anything  like  a  physical  theory  I  should  be  delighted.  At
present  all  I  am  quite  certain  about  is  that  they  are
objectively  true.  I  have  had  all  my  wits  about  me  when
at  a  seance,  and  the  only  person  who  appeared  to  be  in
a  state  of  semi-consciousness  is  the  medium  himself.  The
other  evening  I  saw  Home  handling  red-hot  coals  as  if
they  had  been  oranges.  Will  you  favour  me  with  a  visit
one  evening  when  you  are  disengaged.

Very  truly  yours,
;  .  William  Crookes."

I  had  several  interviews  with  Crookes,  but  unfortunately
lad  no  opportunity  of  any  sitting  with  Home,  and  a  year
)r  two  later  I  was  appointed  to  the  Chan-  of  Physics  at
.he  Royal  College  of  Science,  Dubhn.  In  1874  I  made
ny  first  acquaintance  with  the  physical  phenomena  of
piritualism,  and  was  able  to  put  to  the  test  my  pre-
•onceived  theory  of  hallucination,  which  was  gradually
lispelled,  and  I  became  convinced  of  the  objective  reality


284  Sir  William  Barrett  [part

of  the  phenomena.  It  so  happened  that  one  of  the
London  weekly  reviews  had  sent  me  about  this  time  a
number  of  books  on  spiritualism  to  review,  and  in  a
lengthy  review  I  suggested  the  hallucination  hypothesis,
but  in  a  postscript  added  that  this  view  was  open  to
serious  doubt.

The  record  of  my  experiments  in  Ireland  on  the  physical
phenomena  of  spiritualism  was  read  before  the  S.P.R.,  and
wiU  be  found  in  our  Proceedings,  vol.  iv.,  p.  25,  etc.
I  was  singularly  fortunate  in  these  early  experiments  on
physical  phenomena,  as  the  mediums  were  personal  friends,
and  the  experiments  took  place  in  fvll  light  either  in  my
own  house  or  in  that  of  my  friends.  After  this  lapse  of
time  I  think  I  may  mention  without  indiscretion  that  the
name  of  the  young  medium  I  called  Florrie  was  Miss  Clark ;
her  father,  a  leading  London  sohcitor,  had  taken  a  fur-
nished house  near  my  residence  in  Kingstown.  The  house
belonged  to  ]\Ir.  James  Wilson  (brother  of  my  Westmeath
friend),  who  asked  me  to  call  on  ]VIr.  Clark.  Mr.  WUson
was  the  father  of  the  late  Commander-in-Chief,  Henry
Wilson,  an  old  student  of  mine.  My  prolonged  investigation
of  Florrie  Clark,  in  full  daylight,  and  other  experimentsi
with  the  family  of  the  Landers  (one  of  the  leading  photo-
graphers in  Dublin),  so  impressed  me  with  the  supreme
importance  of  the  whole  subject  that  I  determined  to  let
no  opportunity  pass  of  pursuing  these  investigations.
Shortly  afterwards  I  prepared  a  paper  on  the  various
psychical  phenomena  I  had  witnessed  ;  this  was  accepted
by  and  read  before  the  British  Association  in  1876. ^

Verbatim  reports  of  my  paper  were  given  both  in  the
local  and  the  spiritualist  journals  of  Sept.  1876.2  Jt  wil]
be  seen  from  the  reports  of  this  paper  that,  while  some
notable  scientific  men  such  as  Dr.  W.  B.  Carpenter  vigor-
ously opposed  my  paper,  others  still  more  notable  spoke  ir
my  support  ;  such,  for  example,  as  Mr.  (afterwards  Su
William)  Crookes  and  the  late  Lord  Rayleigh  (both  of  whon

1  The  greater  part  of  this  paper  (which  the  British  Association  refusec
to  publish)  will  be  found  in  Proceedings  of  the  S.P.R.,  vol.  i.,  p.  23i
et  seq.  |)j

2  These  are  preserved  in  a  scrap-book,  which  I  still  have.


file


iliii


lat


xcir.]  Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years  285

subsequently  became  Presidents  of  the  Royal  Society),  also
the  president  of  the  Section,  IVIr.  A.  R.  Wallace,  and  the
distinguished  antliropologist  Col.  Lane  Fox,  who  afterwards
became  General  Pitt-Rivers.  I  may  add  that  a  warm
letter  in  support  of  my  paper  was  received  by  me  from
the  famous  astronomer  who  subsequently  became  Sir
Wilham  Huggins,  also  a  President  of  the  Royal
Society.i  The  main  object  of  my  paper  was  a  plea  for  a
scientific  committee  to  examine  the  validity  of  the  evidence
that  I  had  adduced  on  behalf  of  what  appeared  to  be
thought-transference  and  other  supernormal  phenomena,
especially  those  relating  to  spirituahsm.  Unfortunately,  in
the  violent  dispute  which  followed  between  Carpenter  and
Wallace,  my  resolution  was  lost  sight  of.

For  weeks  a  great  controversy  ensued  in  the  London
Times, which, like all  the other newspapers (with  the
exception of the Spectator), poured ridicule upon  my
daring  to bring  such  a  contemptible  subject  before  the
British  Association. Among  other  of  my  vigorous  opponents
in  The  Times  were  Professors  Lankester  and  Donkin  (now
Su-  Ray  and  Sir  Bryan);  both  of  these  distinguished  men
are  still  living  and  have  not  abated  their  hostihty  to  the
subject. Here  it  is  interesting  to  note  that  in 1876  I
ventured  to  state  m  The  Times  that  before  we  could  hope
to  arrive  at  any  definite  conclusion  as  to  the  origm  of
spirituahstic  phenomena,  we  must  first ascertain  whether
such  a  thing  as  the  transfusion  of  thought  between  sitter
and  medium  really  existed  and  its  extent;  and,  secondly,
vvhether  such  a  thing  as  clakvoyance  or  a  transcendental
perceptive power had any foundation in fact  ?  Both
these  questions  have  now  been  answered  in  the  affirmative,
ind  this  renders  the  above  caution  the  more  necessary.

'  Book  tests  '  show  that  Richet's  theory  of  cryptesthesia,
a^hich  seems  to  be  another  name  for  clairvoyance,  needs
serious  consideration.  The  critical  examination  of  Stainton
Closes'  script  by  our  member  Mr.  Trethewy  has  shown
ihat  many  apparently  spirit  communications  are  transcripts

^  It  is  interesting  to  note  that  of  the  few  scientific  men  who  then  had
he  courage  to  support  my  B.A.  paper,  no  less  than  four  received  the
)rder  of  Merit.


286  Sir  William  Barrett  [part

of  some  matter  which  had  been  written  or  printed,  it
may  be  long  ago,  and,  as  a  rule,  only  to  be  found  m
places  inaccessible  to  the  medium.  Nothing  seems  able  to
elude  the  prying  eyes  of  the  transcendental  self,  whether
it  be  incarnate  or  discarnate.  In  many  sittings  of  to-day
the  same  thing  holds  good.^  For  example,  that  exceUent
but  illiterate  medium,  Sloan,  of  Glasgow,  when  m  a  trance
state  will  often  give  details  concerning  a  sitter  whom  he
has  never  seen  before  and  whose  name  even  he  does  not
know,  yet  in  subsequent  investigation  many  of  the  facts
stated  by  the  medium  will  be  found  printed,  either  in
Who's  Who  or  other  books  to  which  the  medium  appears
to  have  had  no  possibility  of  access.

Hence,  with  these  and  other  facts  known  to  us,  we  must
realize  that,  however  trustworthy  may  be  the  evidence  we
obtain  of  supernormal  phenomena,  the  interpretation  of  that
evidence  may  in  time  alter— as  our  experience  grows  wider,
and  our  knowledge  of  human  psychology  more  extensive
and  profound.  Albeit  I  am  personally  convinced  that  the
evidence  we  have  published  decidedly  demonstrates  (1)  the
existence  of  a  spiritual  world,  (2)  survival  after  death,
and  (3)  of  occasional  communications  from  those  who  have
passed  over.

It  will  be  obvious  that  in  the  present  paper  I  cannot
give  even  an  outline  of  the  evidence  that  has  led  me
to  the  foregoing  conclusions.  The  so-caUed  physical
phenomena  afford  striking  evidence  of  amazing  super-
normal power,  but  no  proof  of  the  survival  of  human
personality  can  be  derived  from  them.  In  fact,  many
people  believe  that  they  are  simply  due  to  the  'psychic
force  '  of  the  medium  and  sitters ;  however,  this  is  an
opinion  I  do  not  share.  Even  the  so-called  'ectoplasm,'
which  is  seen  issuing  in  certain  cases  from  the  body  of
the  medium  and  sometimes  taking  human  shape,  may
be  attributed  to  some  mysterious,  unknown,  and  un-,
conscious  power  possessed  by  the  medium.  There  can  be
little  doubt  that  the  source  of  the  ectoplasm  is  m  some
way  derived  from  the  human  organism; but  I  believe

1  The  most  amazing  ilkistration  of  telesthesia,  or  travelling  clairvoyance,
I  have  ever  known  I  hope  to  read  before  the  S.P.R.  shortly.


A


tepc
atM
T

rliii
tie
tti]

i:

H

is


I  at


JiT


ive


^cii.]  Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years  287

an  unseen  and  intelligent  supernormal  agency  external  to
the  medium  causes  this  ectoplasm  to  take  definite  forms
and  apparent  vitality.  I  myself  have  not  had  the  oppor-
tunity of  ever  witnessing  these  ectoplastic  phenomena,
and  therefore  I  defer  to  the  opinion  of  such  experienced
and  critical  observers  as  the  late  Dr.  Geley,  Prof.  Richet,
and  others.


Physical  Phenomena.

As  regards  the  ordinary  physical  phenomena  I  have
had  a  long  series  of  experiments  with  various  mediums,
going  back  to  the  time  of  Dr.  Slade  in  1876.  Slade
always  sat  with  me  in  broad  daylight,  and  though  I
have  little  doubt  that  he  not  unfrequently  resorted  to
trickery,  yet  there  was  also  no  doubt  he  had  genuine
and  remarkable  mediumistic  powers  ;  his  so-called  exposure
by  Prof.  Ray  Lankester  was  quite  inconclusive.  Those
who  are  interested  in  the  matter  will  find  in  Stainton
Moses's  Psydiography,  pp.  104-110,  a  record  of  some  of
my  experiments  with  Slade,  in  part  quoted  from  the
London  Tiines  of  September  1876,  and  also  a  careful
report  written  by  my  friend  Mr.  Conrad  Cook,  who
accompanied  me  to  a  sitting  with  Slade  in  August  1876.

The  only  case  of  '  materiahzation  '  witnessed  by  me,
which  seemed  to  be  inexplicable  by  fraud,  occurred  with
the  medium.  Husk,  many  years  ago.  It  may  be  worth
while  describing  this  experiment  as  it  has  never  been
published.

Mr.  Wm.  de  Morgan  had  kindly  lent  Myers  and  myself
ills  studio  in  Cheyne  Row,  an  almost  bare  room,  furnished
fnth  a  small  deal  table  about  3  feet  by  5  feet,  and  a
:ew  chairs.  After  dinner  Myers  brought  Husk  to  Cheyne
Row  in  a  hansom  cab,  and  we  immediately  sat  round
:he  table.  There  were  six  present  including  the  medium.
^iVilham  de  Morgan  and  his  sister  (being  sceptics),  were
^ijjlaced  in  control  of  the  medium,  whose  feet  were  tied
)0  the  legs  of  the  table,  and  his  hands  were  grasped  by
'he  sitter  on  each  side.  Mrs.  de  Morgan  (their  mother),
at  facing  Myers, and  I  sat  at  the  other  end of  the


288  Sir  William  Barrdt.  [part

table  and  had  control  of  the  light. After  the  wrists  of
all present had been loosely joined together by  silk
thread,  I  blew  out  the  candle  and  phenomena  very  soon
occurred. The  medium  went  into  a  trance, lights,  very
lilte fireflies, were seen darting about over our  heads,
movement  of  some  objects  in  the  room  was  heard,  and
a  deep  guttural  voice  spoke  to  us  calling  himself  'John
King.' In  reply to our request  he  said  he  would  try
and  show  himself. A  violent  convulsion  of  the  medium
occurred,  and  suddenly  right  in  front  of  me  appeared  a
clothed  human  figure  from  the  waist  upwards  : the  lower
part of the body might have been concealed by  the
table. The  face  was  illuminated  by  a  bluish  light  which
seemed  to  issue  from  an  object  held  in  the  hand  of  the
materialized  figure. The  face was undoubtedly  a  living
one,  for  I  saw  its  eyes  open  and  close  and  its  lips  move  ;
I  asked  who  it  was  and  the  guttural  voice  said  "John
King." It was a dark bearded and rather  unpleasant
face, quite unlike that of the medium. I  exclaimed,
"  Do  you  all  see  the  figure  ? I am  going  to  light  the
candle,"  and  immediately  risked  doing  so. The  figure  vanished
the moment the match was struck, and the  medium
was  found  in  deep  trance,  lying  back  in  his  chair  and
groaning  :  when  the medium  had  recovered  he  was  sent
home  in  a  cab. On  comparing  notes,  each  sitter  described
the  face  accordmg  to  the  different  aspects  it  presented
from  his  or  her  position  at  the  table. We  found  upon
experimenting that it was impossible to reproduce  the
figure  by  leaning  over  the  table,  nor  could  the  medium
have  put  on  a  mask,  as  his  hands  were  held  the  whole
time  and  the  tying of  his legs and  wrists were  found
intact. De Morgan asked Myers and myseK to  come
the  next  morning  and  see  if  we  could  in  any  way  imitate
what  we  had  seen. Though  de  Morgan  remained  somewhat
sceptical,  Myers  and  I  both  agreed  that  it  was  extremely
difficult to explain the phenomena by trickery on  the
part of the  medium, who, moreover, was  found  dee^ply
entranced  a  few  seconds  later.  \
With regard to the so-called 'spirit  photographs,'
I have been extremely sceptical of their  genuineness


SCI


tip


1E(


T


xcn.]


Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years


289


until  quite  lately.  Recently,  however,  experiments  con-
ducted by  my  friend  Mr.  de  Brath,  in  one  of  which  he
kindly  allowed  me  to  take  part,  appear  to  afford  in-
dubitable evidence  of  supernormal  psychic  photography.
This  conclusion  confirms  the  opinion  held  by  some  expert
and  critical  experimenters,  who  have  discussed  their
results  with  me.  Of  course  faked  '  spirit  photographs '
abound  and  are  easy  to  produce  ;  whilst  heartless  rascals
exist  who  prey  upon  the  grief  of  a  credulous  sitter.
Healthy  scepticism  has  therefore  been  inevitable  and
wise.  But  we  shall  never  arrive  at  any  knowledge  of
the  conditions  requisite  for  these  and  other  marvellous
psychic  phenomena,  until  hostile  increduhty  becomes  no
longer  possible.  Then,  as  Sir  John  Herschel  says,  "  occur-
rences which,  according  to  received  theories  ought  not  to
e;  happen,  are  the  facts  which  serve  as  clues  to  new  dis-


coveries." ^


These  disputable  subjects  illustrate  the  importance  of  our
society  recognizing  the  fact  that  a  difference  of  opinion —
a  right  and  a  left  wing — will  necessarily  have  to  exist
among  its  different  members.  I  mean  that  there  are  some
who  have  been  convinced  at  first  hand,  from  their  own
i){  experience,  that  the  existence  of  certain  psychical  pheno-
jijimena — especially  those  associated  with  spirituahsm — admit  of


ied


ole


no  doubt  whatever,  and  are  impatient  with  those  who  have
not  had  this  experience  and  are  therefore  more  inclined  to
be  cautious  and  even  sceptical.  The  former  class  of  our
members  wish  to  push  forward  and  perhaps  attach  less
importance  to  conclusive  experimental  evidence  than  they
did  at  first  :  the  latter  class  wish  to  go  much  more  slowly
and  proceed  step  by  step.  This  difference  of  opinion,
though  healthy,  naturally  leads  to  a  divergence  of  interest
in  our  subject,  and  from  time  to  time  threatens  to  break
up  the  solidarity  of  our  society.

Nor  must  we  forget  that  psychical  research,  as  stated
in  the  original  articles  of  our  societj^  embraces  far  more
than  spiritistic  phenomena,  and  I  hope  that  our  research
officers  will  ever  bear  in  mind  the  varied  objects  of  our

^Discourse  on  Natural  Philosophy,  section  5.  ■


290  Sir  William  Barrett  [part

society,  which  will  be  found  printed  in  the  first  volume  of
our  Proceedings.

Personally  I  am  very  anxious  that  earnest  attention
should  be  given  to  the  so-called  '  Reichenbach  Phenomena,'
wherein  certain  sensitives  after  long  immersion  in  complete
darkness  perceive  a  luminosity  emanating  from  the  poles  of
a  magnet  and  also  from  the  human  fingers.  I  have  pub-
lished in  the  Philoso-phical  Magazine,  and  also  in  the  early
volumes  of  our  Proceedings,  the  experiments  which  led  me
to  the  conviction  that  such  phenomena  do  really  occur
under  suitable  conditions.

Another  point,  which  I  hope  will  sooner  or  later  be  the
subject  of  further  experiment,  is  the  question  of  the  old
mesmeric  hypothesis  of  '  effluence,'  for  which  both  Gurney
and  myseK  obtained  what  appeared  to  be  satisfactory
evidence  forty  years  ago,  and  which  Prof.  Alrutz  has  in
recent  years  confirmed.

The  immediate  work  before  us  is  to  convince  scientific
authorities  that  various  types  of  supernormal  phenomenal
do  really  exist,  and  are  capable  of  experimental  proof
I  do  not  think  that  the  indifference  of  official  science  to
our  investigation,  which  has  now  replaced  their  former
hostility,  will  be  affected  by  an  appeal  to  the  emotions,
such  as  the  evidence  obtained  of  survival  after  death.
Science  will  approach  the  supernormal  from  an  entirely
different  angle  ;  it  may  possibly  be  pulled  over  the  line  of
its  present  indifference  by  a  growing  recognition  that
telepathy  does  really  exist.  Unfortunately,  the  difficulty  of
finding  suitable  subjects  both  for  telepathy  and  telesthesia
is  a  great  drawback.  For  this  reason  I  am  led  to  the  con-
viction that  the  first  movement  of  thought  of  official  science
in  our  direction  will  occur  from  the  impossibility  of  finding
any  normal  explanation  of  the  phenomena  of  dowsing.  And
this  subject  is  of  all  others  the  simplest  and  easiest  to
investigate.  It  has  not  only  a  wide  practical  importance,
but  it  raises  no  religious  opposition,  even  from  the  most
timid  of  narrow-minded  people.  Moreover,  the  number  of
efficient  dowsers  can  easily  be  ascertained  and  experi->
mented  with.  Having  devoted  more  than  twenty  years  to
the  critical  investigation  of  this  subject,  I  believe  that  ity


litl


ink
iieD


m
wl
liif
liic
ite

iiti


T


XCII.]


Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years


291


affords  the  easiest  and  most  conclusive  evidence  that  a
supernormal  perceptive  power — akin  to  clairvoyance —
exists  in  certain  persons,  of  either  sex,  of  all  ages  and
all  degrees  of  education.

This  faculty  is  to  be  found  not  only  in  various  races
of  men,  but  appears  to  exist,  as  a  new  and  necessary
sense,  in  many  of  the  lower  types  of  life.  I  am  con-
vinced that  the  mysterious  migration  of  birds,  even  of
very  young  ones,  over  vast  tracts  of  land  and  sea,  and
also  the  homing  instincts  of  many  birds  and  animals,
will  be  found  to  be  akin  to  the  dowsing  faculty  in  man.^

Difference  between  Physical  and  Psychical
Research.

There  is,  of  course,  a  fundamental  difference  between
physical  research  and  psychical  research.  The  former  deals
with  matter  and  energy,  and  the  condition  of  the  mind  of
the  observer,  whether  he  be  sceptical  or  not,  is  of  no
consequence.  The  latter  deals  with  the  phenomena  of  the
subconscious,  and  the  mental  attitude  both  of  the  experi-
menter and  his  subject,  is  of  prime  importance.  An
interesting  illustration  of  the  difference  between  the  mental
states  in  the  two  cases  occurred  to  me  some  time  ago.
[  happened  to  be  staying  in  Edinburgh  with  that  famous
physicist.  Professor  Tait,  when  the  news  of  the  discovery  of
:he  telephone  came  to  us  by  cable.  I  asked  Tait  what  he
thought  of  it.  He  replied,  "  It  is  all  humbug,  for  such  a
iiscovery  is  physically  impossible."  When  I  asked  him
low  it  was  that  well-known  men  had  asserted  that  they
lad  heard  speech  transmitted  a  couple  of  miles  through  a
^e,  Tait  replied  it  was  "  probably  a  case  of  the  con-
iuction  of  sound  by  long  straight  wires."  A  little  later,
;vhen  the  telephone  was  shown  at  the  British  Association
jy  Sir  W.  Thomson  (afterwards  Lord  Kelvin)  and  experi-
nents  with  it  were  successfully  made,  Tait's  obstinate
ncredulity  did  not  interfere  with  the  success  of  the
!xperiment. A  similar  instance  occurred  in  Paris  when  the

1  See  Chapter  Two  of  my  little  book  Creative  Thought,  published  by
Vatkins,  CecU  Court,  London,  W.C.


292  Sir  William  Barrett  [part


I


if,


101

A

ID  (


Abbe  Moigno,  a  well-known  scientific  writer,  first  showed
Edison's  phonograph  to  the  Paris  Academy  of  Sciences  ;  the
Abbe  himself  related  to  me  what  occurred.  All  the
savants  present  declared,  as  Professor  Tait  did,  that  the
reproduction  of  the  human  voice  by  an  hon  disc  was
physically  impossible  owing  to  the  subtle  wave  forms  pro-
duced by  speech,  though  they  admitted  music  might  be  so
transmitted.  The  Abbe  was  even  accused  of  having  a
ventriloquist  concealed  beneath  the  table.  He  left  the
chamber  in  disgust  and  told  them  to  try  the  instrument
themselves — which  they  did  quite  successfully  in  spite  of
their  utter  incredulity.

How  different  is  the  effect  that  is  produced  by  mental
environment  in  psychical  phenomena  is  well  known.  Those
experienced  observers,  Stainton  Moses  and  C.  C.  Massey,
have  said,  "  the  most  unfavourable  disposition  to  take  to
a  medium  is  suspicion,  and  the  most  favourable  is  con-
fidence." Sceptics  may  think  that  this  is  to  deliver  one-
self over  as  a  prey  to  the  deceiver,  and  some  men  do
certainly  get  taken  in,  but  experience  after  a  time  leads
them  to  discover  their  mistake.  In  the  psychical  world
"faith,"  as  Mr.  Massey  says,  "is  a  condition  of  obtaining
evidence,  the  key  to  the  gate  of  the  invisible  world."  By
faith  Massey  means  that  a  sympathetic  state  of  mind
establishes  a  rapport  between  the  observer  and  the  medium.
The  fact  that  we  need  no  sympathy  with  our  instruments,
when  testing  a  physical  or  chemical  discovery,  naturally
leads  the  physicist  or  chemist  to  a  state  of  scornful
amusement,  when  told  that  his  owir  attitude  of  mind  is  of
importance  in  psychical  research.  But  it  appears  to  be  a
fact  that  even  if  at  the  back  of  our  minds  we  entertain
feelings  of  prejudice  and  hostility,  we  can  hope  for  little
success  in  psychic  enquiry,  however  much  we  may  disclaim
the  feeling  of  hostility.  This,  of  course,  does  not  mean  an
attitude  of  creduhty  or  any  relaxation  of  careful  and
critical  observation.

All  psychical  researchers  need  to  bear  in  mind  that
every  sensitive  or  medium  is  a  suggestible  subject ;  if  you  go
expecting  fraud  you  may  possibly  create  the  very  fraud
you  suspect. If  you  make  preparations  beforehand  to  lay^l^


ICI


rail


xcn.]  Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years  293

a  trap  for  the  medium,  it  is  probable  that  both  medium
and  experimenter  will  fall  into  the  trap.

There  is  another  aspect  of  our  enquiry,  known  to  most
of  us — ^that  is,  that  psychical  phenomena  largely  depend
upon  involuntary  and  not  voluntary  effort,  upon  the  sub-
conscious and  not  the  conscious  self.  Even  in  the  simple
phenomena  of  telepathy  it  is  the  subliminal  self  that  is
operative.  Further,  I  believe  that  the  common  practice  of
experimenters  energetically  ivilling  the  idea  to  be  thought
of,  is  of  no  value,  and  may  indeed  be  detrimental  to
success.  In  the  early  experiments  which  Myers,  Gurney,
and  myseK  conducted  with  the  Creery  children  at  Buxton
we  found  tha,t  the  best  results  occurred  when  no  strenuous
efforts  were  made.  In  fact,  when  we  made  the  experi-
ments as  amusing  as  possible,  we  had  the  greatest  success,
though  every  precaution  was  taken  to  prevent  coUusion  or
signalling.

Another  fact  which  seems  to  me  brought  out  very  clearly
in  our  experiments  is  that  psychical  phenomena,  whether
oi  telepathy,  clairvoyance,  or  the  higher  phenomena  of
spiritualism,  are  manifestations  of,  or  through,  the  trans-
cendental self  of  the  subject,  and  are  therefore  independent
3f  the  fundamental  units  of  the  physical  world — matter,
bime,  and  space.  It  is  true  that,  in  the  case  of  telepathy,
he  mental  response  of  the  percipient  to  the  idea  in  the
igent's  mind,  naturally  suggests  the  physical  analogue  of
:he  resonance  of  a  silent  tuning-fork  to  a  sounding  one
ivhich  is  in  perfect  unison  with  it.  Indeed,  I  was  inclined
it  first  to  think  that  telepathy  was  somewhat  similar  to
:his — that  it  was  a  nervous  induction  across  space,  analogous
o  the  weU-kno^TL  facts  of  electric  and  magnetic  induction.
But  whilst  telepathy  has  been  made  more  conceivable,  and
nore  credible  to  the  pubHc  generally,  by  the  discovery  and
ise  of  wireless  telephony,  we  must  remember  that  the  two
phenomena  are  wholly  different.  One  belongs  to  the
physical  order,  the  other  to  the  psychical  order.  The  laws
'egulating  the  transmission  of  energy  across  space  apply  to
ihe  one,  but  not  to  the  other.  Immense  effort  is  neces-
lary  to  transmit  a  wireless  message  across  the  Atlantic,
)ut  apparently  no  effort  at  all  is  required  to  transmit  a


ileri


294  Sir  William  Barrett  [part

telepathic  impact,  of  which  we  have  instances,  from  New
Zealand  to  London.  On  the  contrary,  a  passive  condition
of  both  transmitter  and  receiver  in  telepathy  seems
essential,  so  far  at  least  as  thek  consciousness  is  con-
cerned.

The  word  '  thought-transference '  is  apt  to  be  mis-
leading, as  it  seems  to  suggest  a  transmission  of  ideas
between  two  persons  across  material  space  ;  but,  as  I  said,
space  does  not  seem  to  enter  into  the  question  at  all.
Here  it  may  be  interesting  to  note  that  in  the  first
publication  of  the  discovery  of  this  super-sensuous  faculty,
I  called  it  not  '  thought-transference,'  but  the  transfusion
of  thought.'^  We  are  now  coming  back  to  this  idea,  for
telepathy  is  probably  the  intermingling  of  our  trans-
cendental selves  or  souls.  The  common  and  grossly
materialistic  conception  of  the  soul  is  that  it  is  limited  to
the  confines  and  contour  of  the  body.  This  is  surely  an
erroneous  conception  if,  as  we  believe,  the  soul  is  an
immaterial  entity,  not  simply  a  function  of  the  brain.  For
all  we  know  to  the  contrary,  the  human  soul  may  spread
through  a  vast  orbit  around  the  body,  and  may  inter-
mingle with  other  incarnate  or  discarnate  souls.  Tennyson
speaks  of  a  di'eam  condition,  "  when  the  mortal  limit  of
the  seK  was  loosed,  and  past  into  the  Nameless,  as  the
cloud  melts  into  Heaven."  Moreover  the  intimacy  and
immediacy  of  the  union  between  the  soul  and  God  is  the
fundamental  idea,  not  only  of  the  New  Testament,  but  of
all  great  Christian  thinkers.

CONCLTJSION.

As  evidence  of  the  great  value  which  some  eminent  men
attached  to  our  investigations  at  their  very  outset,  I  will
only  quote  from  a  couple  of  letters  which  I  received  more
than  forty  years  ago.  That  distinguished  scientific  man  of  »
the  last  generation.  Dr.  Angus  Smith,  F.R.S.,  writing  to'^
me  in  1876,  on  the  theoretic  importance  of  thought-trans-
ference, remarked  that  "  the  indications  now  obtained  point

1  See Proceedings, S.P.R., vol. i., p. 48, where will be found  an
extract  from  a  letter  of  mine  to  The  Times  dated  Sept.  1876.


ijcl
late,
«e
Ho;
liri


low
i


'Eic
fell
"pi
Ws


xcn.]  Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years  295

to  some  mighty  truth  more  decidedly  than  even  the
aberrations  of  Uranus  to  the  newest  of  the  great  planets.
If  we  could  prove  the  action  of  mind  at  a  distance  by
constant  experiments  it  would  be  a  discovery  that  would
.make  all  other  discoveries  seem  trifles."  This  was  also  the
s^iew  of  that  eminent  biologist,  Mr.  G.  J.  Romanes,  F.R.S.,
who,  when  writing  to  me  on  the  same  subject  in  1881,
-emarked  "  if  the  alleged  phenomena  are  true  I  hold  it  to
)e  unquestionable  that  they  would  be  of  more  importance
)han  any  other  in  the  science  and  philosophy  of  our
iime."'

Quite  recently  our  former  President,  Professor  W.
iI'Dougall,  F.R.S.,  in  his  presidential  address  to  the
\.merican  S.P.R.  speaks  of  psychical  research  as  the  most
lopeful  barrier  against  the  oncoming  tide  of  materialism,
nd  he  remarks  that  "  a  civilization  which  resigns  itself
holly  to  materialism  lives  upon  and  consumes  its  moral
apital  and  is  incapable  of  renewing  it.  .  .  .  Unless
sychical  research  can  discover  facts  incompatible  with
laterialism,  materialism  will  continue  to  spread  ;  no  other
ower  can  stop  it,  both  revealed  religion  and  metaphysical
hilosophy  are  equally  helpless  before  the  advancing  tide."
.s  regards  religion  being  helpless,  I  cannot,  however,  go
3  far  as  M'Dougall.

Richet's  point  of  view,  which  is  purely  materialistic,
3pears  at  first  to  contradict  M'Dougall's  remarks.  We
low  that  Richet,  with  splendid  courage  and  loyalty  to
uth,  has  avowed  his  belief  in  the  most  incredible  psychical
lenomena,  some  of  which  even  we  may  perhaps  hesitate
I  accept.  But  Richet's  philosophy  compels  him  to  reject
le  spiritualistic  hypothesis  and  to  explain  everything  by
'  modified  psychic  force  theory  ;  a  theory  which  was  once
cepted  by  Crookes  but  subsequently  rejected  by  him.
ichet  attributes  all  the  subjective  phenomena  of  psychical
search  to  '  cryptesthesia,'  and  some  of  the  objective  to
•ragmatic  cryptesthesia.'  i But  these  polysyllables  do  not

■Richet  uses  this  term  instead  of  psychometry  (soul  measurement),
ich  he  rightly  says  is  so  detestable  a  word  that  he  proposes  to  call
"pragmatic  cryptesthesia,  i.e.  cryptesthesia  by  means  of  material
ects."


Be-

unl


296  Sir  William  Barrett  [part,

help  us  any  more  than  the  names  given  by  some  learned
psychologists  who  tell  ns  that  all  psychical  phenomena  are
simply  illustrations  of  the  "  exteriorised  effects  of  uncon-
scious complexes  !  "  One  is  reminded  by  this  formidable
nomenclature  of  the  numerous  and  recondite  hypotheses  by
which  Ptolemaic  astronomers  tried  to  make  their  observa-
tions square  with  the  geocentric  theory  of  the  universe.
To  the  plain  man  it  seems  simpler,  less  improbable  and
more  in  accordance  with  facts,  for  biologists  to  recognise
—what  astronomers  long  since  have  done — that  the  universe
after  all  is  not  explicable  from  the  restricted  view-point
either  of  the  earth  or  of  the  brain.  Nevertheless,  Richet's
views  will  doubtless  form  the  half-way  house  of  manj
savants  who  hold  mechanistic  theories  of  the  universe
However,  I  venture  to  predict  that  neither  they  noi  y
Richet  will  remain  many  years  in  that  convenient  bui
anomalous  resting-place.

Sooner  or  later  psychical  research  will  demonstrate  t(
the  educated  world,  not  only  the  existence  of  a  soul  ii
man,  but  also  the  existence  of  a  soul  in  Nature.  Ou:
biologists  have  hitherto  been  so  largely  wedded  t(
materialistic  views  that  they  have  overlooked  the  vas
importance  of  the  psychic  factor  in  evolution.  The  recog
nition  of  such  a  purposive  and  a  pervasive  factor,  running
throughout  the  whole  realm  of  nature,  will  be  founc
necessary  to  invoke  in  order  to  explain  many  biologica
phenomena  that  now  receive  very  inadequate  solutioi
from  current  theories.  Long  ago  Lord  Kelvin  said,  "  Over
poweringly  strong  proofs  exist  of  intelhgence  and  benevo
lent  design  in  Nature."

At  the  present  day,  when  the  very  foundations  of  religio:
appear  to  be  shaken,  and  men  are  deserting  the  faith  c
their  fathers,  and  the  whole  civihsed  world  is  becomin
more  and  more  materiahstic  in  its  views,  it  is  evident  tha
psychical  research  will  ere  long  be  regarded,  by  ^  a
thoughtful  men,  as  the  most  valuable  handmaid  to  reUgioi
Scarcely  a  week  passes  wdthout  my  receiving  letters  c
visits  from  perplexed  men,  both  among  the  clergy  an
laity,  who  have  found  their  religious  creeds  crumbhn
beneath  their  feet,  and  want  to  know  what  help  the


^cn.J  Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years  297

might obtain from psychical research. Mr.  Gladstone's
opinion  on  this  subject  is  weU  known  and  often  quoted;
and  Frederic  Myers,  as  we  know,  has  eloquently  expressed
his  views. In  his  Human  Persoyiality  again  and  again  he
-eturns  to  this  aspect  of  the subject, and  in  his  last
chapter  remarks,  "We  do  not  seek  to  shape  the  clauses  of
;he  great  Act  of  Faith,  but  merely  to  prove  its  j>reamble.
.  . To  be  able  to  say  to  the  theologian  or  philosopher  :
Thus  and thus we demonstrate that  a  spu-itual  world
exists— a  world  of  independent  and  abiding  realities,  not
^  mere  epi-phenomenon  or  transitory  effect  of  the  material
wrld— but  a  world  of  things,  concrete  and  living,  not  a
Qere  system of abstract ideas and he  adds,
'This  would  indeed,  m  my  view,  be  the  weightiest  service
hat  any  research  could  render  to  the  deep  disquiet  of  our
ime— to the world-old, and world-wide, desire  "  i  of
lankind.

^  Human  Personality,  vol.  ii.,  p.  297.


HI


a


ID

ii


I


298  Una,  Lady  Troubridge  [pari


I  ■]


SOME  FURTHER  CONSIDERATION  OF  THE  MODU^
OPERANDI  IN  MEDIUMISTIC  TRANCE.

By  Una,  Lady  Troubridge.


1C(


tte
iciu
lis
A,
lly


in


Having  read  with  great  interest  Doctor  Sydney  Alrutz'i
comments  on  my  paper  "  The  Modus  Operandi  in  the  so
called  Mediumistic  Trance  {Proc.  S.P.R.,  Vol.  XXXII.
p.  344),  I  feel  that  in  view  of  the  fact  that  that  paper  wa
written  some  years  ago,  and  that  I  have  since  then  sa^
very  constantly  with  Mrs.  Leonard,  it  may  be  of  interest
not  only  to  Doctor  Alrutz  but  to  other  members  of  th
Society  if,  in  addition  to  answering  to  the  best  of  m;
ability  the  questions  which  Doctor  Ahutz  asks  me,
mention  some  further  characteristics  of  Mrs.  Leonard
trance  which  I  have  observed,  especially  durmg  so-calle(
Personal  Control.  These  might  tend  to  confirm  or  modif;;
some  of  the  tentative  conclusions  advanced  by  DoctO:
Ahutz.

I  will  begin  by  deahng  with  the  actual  questions  whicllcli
he  asks  me  in  his  Paper  {Proc.  S.P.R.,  Vol.  XXXIV,  leir
pp.  166-180),  and  by  answering  them  so  far  as  I  am  able  ad

The  first  question  he  addresses  to  me  is  in  Note  1
page  175,  when  referring  to  the  hjrpersesthesia  of  th  i
fingers  observed  when  Mrs.  Leonard  is  under  '  Persona
Control.'  Doctor  Alrutz  asks  :  "  Who  complains  of  th
hyperaesthesia  of  the  fingers  as  being  'actually  distressful'?
The  complaint  has  been  made  repeatedly  by  the  persona
control  known  as  A.V.B.,  and  has  been  insisted  upon  i
various  ways  ;  notably  by  asking  that  the  sitters  wi.
refrain  from  wearing  tweed  clothes  with  a  rough  surface
The  trance  personaHty  A.V.B.,  i.e.  the  medium  whe:
controlled  by  A.V.B.,  who  usually  supports  herself  upo:
the  sitter's  shoulder,  complained  that  the  irregularities  i;
such  material  felt  to  her  fingers  like  great  knots  and  pits


IK


It


299


sen.] Modus  Operaridi  in  Mediumistic  Trance

ind  that  the  loose  hairs  of  the  stuff  felt  hke  prickly
3ristles.  She  said  that  contact  with  such  garments  was
^■ery  unpleasant.

I  have  not  known  any  other  control  make  the  same
omplamt,  although  other  sitters  may  have  met  with  this
)henomenon  during  personal  controls  which  I  have  not
witnessed.  It  would  be  interesting  to  know  whether  this
las  been  the  case.

Dr.  Ah-utz's  next  question  is  of  a  less  simple  nature  and
1  considering  my  reply  to  it,  it  must  be  borne  in  mind
hat  I  am  for  the  moment  treating  the  trance-utterances
t  then-  face  value; acceptmg  the  trance 'drama'  for
'hat  It  purports  to  be. Doctor  Ah-utz  asks  on  page  176
there  is  not ''Some  evidence  of  Feda's  knowing  the
iaontents  of  the  minds  of  the  personal  controls  from  the
-••ircumstance  that  Feda,  at  least  on  the  face  of  it  trans-
'Ms  the  thoughts  of  the  personal  controls,  for  instance
A.V.B.  ?  "

My  answer  is  that  there  is  no  evidence  of  Feda's  know-
■.g  anythmg  of  the  contents  of  the  minds  of  the  Personal
antrols  or  of  entities  purporting  to  communicate  through
3r  agency,  beyond  that  which  they  elect  to  tell  her  or
tow  her  or  in  some  other  way  deliberately  communicate
:  her  either  during  her  control  of  the  medium,  or  at
ich  times  as  she  claims  to  have  'been  with  them'  m
eir  post  mortem surroundmgs. There  is on the  other

It  md  very  strong  evidence,  on  the  face  of  it,  that  Feda
quite  unable,  at  any  time,  to  tap  the  mind  of  a  '  com-

i  unicator  '  at  will.

J  As  I  have  said  before,  A.V.B.  will  very  often,  during
irsonal  Control,  initiate  a  new  topic  by  stating  that  she

'i-s  purposely  not  mentioned  it  "through  Feda,"  as  she
i  not  wish  Feda  to  know  anything  about  it.  '  Or  that
e  would  not  risk  Feda  "  begimnng  to  think  about  it  "

n  d  consequently  colouring  the  facts  with  her  own  su'r-

«  ses.

.eln  corroboration  of  A.V.B.'s  claim  that  Feda  can  be
«pt  m  the  dark  regardmg  Personal  Control  utterances
1  5re  emerges  the  fact  that  I  do  not  think  that  in  eight
It  irs  of  sittings  the  Feda  Control  has  ever  shown  the


!


pen


(vid
lay
of.
ik


300  Una,  Lady  Troubridge  [part

slightest  knowledge  of  any  matter  which  the  A.V.B.
Control  has  claimed  to  keep  from  her,  and  I  cannot  help
thinking  that  some  slip  would  have  occurred  before  now
if  the  claim  of  the  A.V.B.  Control  to  occupy  a  water
tight  compartment  were  purely  fictitious.

Another  thing  that  tends  to  support  this  claim  has
been  of  increasingly  frequent  occurrence  during  recent
years.  As  the  A.V.B.  Control  has  developed  it  has  tended
to  usurp  more  and  more  of  the  sitting,  and  indeed  foi
some  time  past  the  Feda  Control  has  seldom  been  allowec
more  than  a  fleeting  appearance  of  a  few  minutes  duratior  ■
before  making  reluctant,  venj  reluctant  way  indeed,  for  th(
usurper  A.V.B.  The  manner  of  Feda's  routing  is  usually
as  follows  : —

Having  said  "  Good  morning,"  and  made  a  few  u-relevam
remarks, Feda  tries to  gain time  by  seeking  to  obtair
from  A.V.B.  some  really  evidential  matter.  Occasionalb
A.V.B.  will  apparently  humour  her,  and  she  will  be  sue
cessful. She  will  then  retain  the  Control  sometimes  unti
the  topic  initiated  is  exhausted,  and  some  point  of  valujid
made  clear. But  sooner  or  later, generally  sooner,  sh  *
will hesitate, repeat herself, pause, and exhibit  futil
efforts to "get more" from the communicator. The]  i«e
will  begin  the  routine complaints : "She  wants  to  com  t
herself— she won't tell Feda any more— she's not evei  ^
looking  at  Feda— she's  making  it  impossible  for  Feda  t
get  anything  !  .  .  ." Appeals  to  A.V.B.  as  Communicator
"Ladye,  tvonH  you  tell  Feda  some  more  ?— Wouldn't  yo  ij
like  to  give  a  name  for  Feda  to  tell  them?  ..."  FolLV
lowed  by:  "It's  no  use,  Mrs.  Una,  she's  just  shutting  heom
mouth  tight  and  looking  at  somethmg  else  ! Feda'll  hav  fa;
to  go,  and  Feda  did  want  to  talk  more!" Occasionally  lis
in  desperation,  Feda  will  seek  to  evoke  some  other  con  ta
municator. Then  it  will  be:  "Ladye,  couldn't  you  brinice
Mrs.  Twonnie's  father?" Or  she  will  even  attempt  iife
relevant  conversation  with  the  sitters  :— The  medium's  ne-ies
hat,  the  sitter's  new  dress,  a  present  a  sitter  has  promise  ppl
Feda— anything  will  do  in  order  to  retain  control  a  litt.'a'
longer, but information from communicators  obtaineji
against  their  will,  at  any  time,  Feda,  as  far  as  our  e2  '


k
id
As


111


mil
jen
T(


Bl  xcn.] Modus  Operandi  in  Mediumistic  Trance  .  301

B  perience  goes,  cannot  get ;  and  she  is  too  honest  to  pre-
1[  tend  that  she  can  do  so.

)i  Doctor  Akutz  then  asks  another  very  important  ques-
'i  tion. He  wishes  to  know,  on  page  176  :  "Is  there  any

evidence  that  the  thoughts  of  a  certain  Personal  Control,
a:  say  of  A.V.B.,  which  Feda  transmits,  and  the  utterances
Dof  A.V.B.  as  a  Personal  Control,  really  belong  to  each
9  other  or  to  a  common  personal  source  ?  "  And  Doctor
s  Alrutz  adds  :  "If  there  is  such  evidence  would  not  this
9  then  show  that  Feda  at  times  really  does  get  at  the
01  (tninds  of  what  we  call  the  Personal  Controls  1  "
til  Now  the  meaning  of  the  above  paragraph  in  Doctor
U  ,A.hutz's  paper  is  not  quite  clear  to  me,  as  it  appears  to

aae  that  it  might  be  interpreted  in  two  ways.
ID  Does  Doctor  Ah-utz,  when  he  speaks  of  Feda  "at  times  "
li  getting  at  the  minds  of  "What  we  call  Personal  Controls  "
E  nean  that  she  does  so  when  they  are  (supposedly)  con-
;it  <roUing  the  medium,  or  is  he  for  the  moment  referring  to
it  ihe  discarnate  entities  from  whom  both  '  Feda  material '
111  ind  '  Personal  Control  material '  purport  to  emanate  ?

i  As  I  have  already  said,  if  Doctor  Ah-utz  is  basing  any
til  uppositions  upon  the  assumption  that  Feda  has  optional
le  iccess  as  eavesdropper  to  any  Personal  Control  utterances,
Di  >r  can  tap  the  thoughts  of  an  unwilling  '  communicator,'
?e  hen  in  my  opinion  all  the  evidence  is  against  such  being
t  he  case.  But  if  his  question  suggests  that  evidence  of
a  jimilarity  of  character  between  A.V.B.  utterances  retailed
;[  ly  Feda,  and  Personal  Control  utterances  of  the  same
^0  L.V.B.,  would  be  evidence  that  both  had  a  common
\  ource  in  her  surviving  entity  to  whose  thoughts  Feda
ail^as  occasionally  permitted  access  for  purposes  of  trans-
11  {lission  ;  then  my  answer  is  that  such  evidence  of  one
m  haracter  or  personality  running  right  tlxrough  the  utter-

ii  nces  abounds.  It  is  one  of  the  chief  grounds  upon
i  ^hich  one  could  base  a  supposition  that  a  common  source
le  es  behind  the  entire  A.V.B.  phenomena.  The  same
ii(  pphes  to  a  number  of  other  '  Personalities  '  manifesting
tt  uring  Mrs.  Leonard's  trance,  partially  through  the  Feda
Bl  ?ency  and  partially  as  '  Personal  Controls.'

e  To  discuss  at  any  length  the  nature  of  this '  common


302


Una,  Lady  Troubridge


K

h

i


source '  was,  as  I  stated,  distinctly  outside  the  scope  oi
my  former  paper,  and  is  and  probably  will  remain  prema
ture,  so  long  as  the  'modus  operaridi'  of  the  trances  undei
consideration  is  almost  completely  unknown  to  us.  Bui
it  may  possibly  be  of  some  interest  to  say  a  few  words
as  to  what  sources  are  definitely  insufficient  in  themselves  u
as  wholly  accounting  for  the  entire  manifestations  of  th(
'  Leonard  A.V.B.  Personality  '  as  known  to  Miss  Radclyffe^  id
Hall  and  myself  after  eight  years  of  constant  sittings
with  Mrs.  Leonard.

As  was  stated  in  our  joint-paper  on  Mrs.  Leonard'^  tl
phenomena  {Proc.  S.PM.,  Vol.  XXX.,  p.  339  ff.),  both  Mis!|»|
Eadclyffe-Hall  and  I  were  intimately  acquainted  witl
A.V.B.  for  many  years,  up  to  the  actual  time  of  he:
death,  which  took  place  fifteen  months  before  either  of  ui
ever  saw  or  sat  with  Mrs.  Leonard.  We  have  in  tha
paper  given  a  full  accoiuit  of  our  early  investigations  witl
that  medium,  and  gone  at  length  into  our  reasons  fo
beUeving  that  no  normal  knowledge  on  her  part  of  thi
living  A.V.B.  existed,  that  would  account  for  even  th
simpler  early  manifestations.

This  belief  has  been  consistently  strengthened  throughoufcn
the  intervening  years.  Not  only  by  the  corroboration
afforded  by  Mrs.  Leonard's  untarnished  career  of  integrity
and  by  the  results  of  the  investigation  of  her  phenomen
by  the  Society  for  Psychical  Research.  But  by  the  fac  i
that  no  humanly  conceivable  system  of  enquiry,  observa
tion,  deduction,  or  of  all  three  put  together,  could,  in  ov
opinion,  sufiice  for  the  production  of  the  great  mass  c
verifiable  utterances  regarding  matters  known  to  A.V.I
during  her  lifetime,  of  facts  and  incidents  regarding  oui
selves  and  others  that  were  also  known  to  her,  of  coi
temporary  events  and  actions  affecting  us  mentione
during  the  trances,  and  above  all  of  a  salient  and  intense]
characteristic  personality  of  which  the  point  of  view,  senf
of  humour,  judgment,  prejudices  and  partialities,  tl
actual  voice  and  laugh,  in  fine  all  those  traits  and  pecul  M
arities  which  go  to  make  what  we  call  '  Personahty '  a;
so  constantly  characteristic  of  the  living  A.V.B.  as  \
knew her that they could not fail to be  equalfcsi


h

i


1


isei


i  nil


ten.] Modus  Operandi  in  Mediumistic  Trance  303

ecognised  as  such  by  anyone  who  had  really  known
jia-l.er.

It  may  be  objected  that  since  we  ourselves  knew  her
■o  well  it  is  unnecessary  to  seek  beyond  our  minds  for  the
Durce  of  the  phenomena,  assuming  that  Mxs.  Leonard
ossesses  when  in  trance  an  extensive  and  almost  infal-
ible  access  to  the  mind  of  anyone  present.  Undoubtedly
luch  of  what  is  uttered  by  the  Feda  and  Personal  Con-
■ols  might  be  obtained  in  this  way,  provided  that  we
re  justified  in  assuming  an  extent  of  telepathic  faculty  so
,r  hardly  supported,  in  my  opinion,  by  results  obtained  in
i& nought-transference  experiments  between  hving  persons,
ritliy  stretching  our  creduhty  very  far  beyond  our  knowledge
perhaps  quite  as  far  as  would  be  necessary  for  the  ac-
Dptance  of  the  spirit  hypothesis  ?)  we  can  assume  that
nee  we  have  m  past  years  heard  and  known  A.V.B.'s
rati  pice  and  laugh,  and  have  intimately  known  her  character,
since  that  knowledge  must  remain  sub-consciously  in
together  with  an  instinctive  knowledge  of  what  would
'  3  her  comments  on  and  reactions  to  certain  situations  or
imuH,  all  such  useful  content  of  our  minds  can  be  drawn
oon  by  the  entranced  Mrs.  Leonard,  and  selected,  sifted
itioiid  dramatised  for  her  purposes.

jiU  But  I  am  bound  to  say  that  in  absence  of  all  proof  of
Mich possibility, this theory makes my own  personal
faceduhty  feel  rather  like  Alice  in  Wonderland's  neck  after
era, .6  had  sampled  one  side  of  the  toadstool.
1 01 1  That  a  fitful  and  intermittent  telepathy  between  medium

( lid  sitter  does  operate  and  account  for  some  of  the
V.liienomena  produced  I  am  practically  convinced,  and
on  deed  the  fact  is  admitted  by  both  the  Feda  and  A.V.B.
(Oiimtrols  ;  but  I  cannot  bring  myself  to  the  belief  that  it
inaei  as  extensive  as  is  sometimes  suggested  by  those  who
iisele  determined  on  explaining  everything  without  recourse
;eni the  spiritistic  hypothesis. Even  were  I  to  admit  it  as

tl  explanation  of  all  that  occurs  during  the  trance  which
,e(iil  lid  by  this  means  be  obtained  from  the  mind  of  someone

ai  3sent,  this  admission  would  not  dispose  of  the  entire
;  V.B.  phenomena  or  account  for  all  the  evidence  of
pal  rsonality  and  Identity.


304  Una,  Lady  Troubridge  [pai

We  should  still  be  compelled  to  seek  a  source  for  tl
residuum,  and  that  source  is  not  the  medium's  OM^n  norm
knowledge,  judgment  or  personality.

It  cannot  be  too  strongly  emphasised  that  Mrs.  Leonard
normal  self  and  character  do  not  in  any  way  suggest  *
resemble  those  of  A.V.B.  j

Mrs.  Leonard  is  not  without  a  marked  character  ar
personality,  her  opinions  are  definite  as  are  her  approva
and  disapprovals,  and  no  one  knowing  her  at  all  w(
could  call  her  colourless.

A.V.B. was also a very definite personality,  and
many  ways  unusual  and  characteristic.

Had  A.V.B.  and  Mrs.  Leonard  met  in  the  flesh  th(
would  have  liked  and  respected  each  other,  I  do  not  doul
but  I  equally  do  not  doubt  that  had  any  intimate  knoA
ledge  of  each  other  been  possible  they  would  have  differe
on  many  matters  great  and  small,  reacted  very  different
to  identical  stimuli,  and  maintained  contrary  opinions  wii
equal  determination.  I

Therefore  I  declare  that  the  source  of  the  Leonari
A.V.B.  Personality  as  such  is  not  to  be  found  in  a  mere
coincidental  resemblance  to  that  of  Mrs.  Leonard,  ev(
when  we  are  dealing  with  matter  which  necessitates  i
supernormal  knowledge  of  events  or  facts.

Consideration  must  also  be  given  to  utterances  both  l
the  Feda  A.V.B.  and  the  A.V.B.  Personal  Control  ■
subsequently  verified  facts  unknown  at  the  time  of  utte
ance  not  only  to  the  normal  Mrs.  Leonard  but  also  •
anyone  present  at  the  sitting.

It  is  true  that  such  utterances  are  not  of  frequent  occu
rence  ; but  they  do  occur,  and  cannot  be  ignored.

Coincidence  has  been  invoked  and  done  to  death  in  th
connection,  but  anyone  who  has  studied  the  utterances  f(
as  long  as  we  have,  or  anyone  for  that  matter  who  w:
study  in  the  Proceedings  of  the  Society  Mrs.  Henry  Sid]
wick's  Paper  on  Leonard  Book  Tests  {Proc.  S.P.R.,  Vc
XXXI.,  p.  242  ff.)  and  a  later  paper  on  Experimental  Boc
Tests  tabulated  by  Colonel  Baddeley  {Proc.  S.P.R.,  Vc
XXXIII.,  p.  606  f¥.),  and  will  consider  the  relative  averag(
of  success  obtained,  will  not  long  remain  contented  wil


xcii.] Modus  Operandi  in  Mediumistic  Trance  305

the  coincidence  hypothesis  as  an  adequate  explanation  of
everything  that  occurs  in  the  Leonard  trances  which  is
unexplainable  as  emanating  from  either  Mrs.  Leonard's
normal  knowledge  or  from  that  of  anyone  present  at  the
time  of  utterance.

I  am  not  proposing  to  offer  any  explanation,  I  am
merely  stating  observed  facts,  and  I  will  add  that  on  a
number  of  occasions  the  trance-utterances  have  referred
correctly  to  recent  or  almost  contemporaneous  actions  by
persons  some  distance  away.  I  am  unfortunately  unable
to  include  here  any  actual  examples  or  extracts  from
records  of  sittings,  as  I  am  away  from  home  and  have
not  access  to  any  papers  or  books  of  reference.  I  am
therefore  confined  to  dealing  with  the  matter  in  a  general
way,  which,  however,  I  must  ask  my  readers  to  believe,
does  not  flatter  the  phenomena  under  discussion.

In  conclusion,  I  should  like  to  record  here  some  addi-
tional observations  of  the  peculiarities  of  the  trance  which
have  struck  Miss  Radclyffe-Hall  and  myself  since  my  last
paper  was  written.  Since  then  the  A.V.B.  Personal  Con-
trol has  manifested  frequently  and  regularly.  It  has  much
developed  and  strengthened,  and  some  of  my  earlier  com-
ments must  be  modified,  some  reversed.

The  voice  of  the  A.V.B.  Personal  Control  is  now  quite
as  strong  as  Feda's,  at  any  rate  during  the  greater  part
of  the  Control,  which  has  gradually  usurped  nearly  the
entire  sitting.  Feda,  as  stated  above,  seldom  appears  at
our  sittings  in  these  days  save  as  a  very  brief  introduction
to  the  A.V.B.  Control,  and  I  think  that  but  for  our
insistence  she  might  well  have  been  dispensed  with  alto-
gether for  more  than  a  year  past.  When,  however,  her
control  began  to  shrink  to  its  present  proportions,  we
made  a  definite  request  both  to  Feda  herself  and  to  the
A.V.B.  Control  that  Feda  should  always  put  in  a  pre-
liminary appearance,  however  brief.  We  felt  that  any
alteration  of  the  customary  procedure  might  increase  the
strain  on  the  medium's  system,  and  initiate  that  deteriora-
tion in  her  phenomena  which  we  have  observed  in  other
mediums  who  admit  of  frequent,  extended  and  various
Personal  Controls, especially  without  introduction  by  an


30G  Una,  Lady  Troubridge  [part


habitual Control. Moreover,  Feda, as stated above,  is
always anxious to appear  and  reluctant  to  go,  retiring
only  when  the  A.V.B.  Control,  to  all  appearance,  renders  j
her presence impossible. The A.V.B. Personal Control  \
now  therefore  manifests  practically  throughout  the  entire  i
sitting,  but  the  sittings  are  seldom  of  more  than  one  hour's
to  one  and a  half  hour's  duration,  the  Control  collapsing,
usually  quite  abruptly,  within  that  time,  and  giving  evi-
dence of  having  '  held  out '  to  the  very  last  gasp.  There-
fore it  cannot  be  said  that  even  yet  the  A.V.B.  Control
possesses  the  field  with  quite  the  same  facihty  as  Feda,
who  has  been  known  to  chatter  volubly  for  nearly  three
hours  on  end  !

I stated formerly that the percentage of  evidential
matter  given  by  the  A.V.B. Personal  Control  was  much
inferior  to  that  obtained  through  the  Feda  Control,  and
this I think is no longer the case. In these  days
the A.V.B. Control certainly equals Feda in the  ease
with which evidential matter is volunteered and evi-  !
dential  topics  initiated,  and  the  manner of giving  these  !
by the A.V.B. Personal Control being much  more
direct than are Feda's methods, more ground is often  i
covered  in  less  time. Feda  still  retains,  either  by  choice
or  of  necessity,  her  childish  phraseology,  and  her  habit  of  '
elaborately describing an object  which  one  would  think  t
must  be  as  familiar  to  her  as  to  the  sitter. As  it  is  i
invariably  quicker  to  call  a  book  a  book  than  to  describe  «
it  in  the  '  Feda  manner  ' as  "  A  square  thing — no,  not
quite  square, oblong — and  fiat, or nearly  fiat — and  Feda  if
thinks  it's  got  a  hard  outside  of  some  shiny  stuff — wait  it
a  minute,  cloth  ? — And  paper,  yes — paper  inside  with  print-  j  s
ing  on  it — etc.,  etc.,  etc.,"  the  A.V.B.  Personal  Control,  in  tf
the  course of  an  hour's  work  will  easily  outstrip  a  two  6
hours' Feda Control in  the  number of  evidential  points  st
volunteered.

On  the  other  hand,  Feda  holds  the  palm  when  it  comes
to  answering  a  direct  question  put  by  the  sitter. During  »
our  early  experiences  with  Mrs.  Leonard,  a  definite  question,  «
even  when  put  to  Feda,  required  a  world  of  tact  and  judg-
ment on  the  part  of  the  sitter. The  selection  of  the  ft)


xcn.] Modus  Operandi  in  Mediumistic  Trance  307


opportune  moment,  the  manner  of  phrasing  the  enquiry,
the  easy  nonchalant  tone  of  voice,  the  assurance  that  a
reply  was  really  immaterial, all  these  were  necessary  to
obviate an immediate self-consciousness on Feda's  part
which  would  jeopardise  not  only  the  required  answer  but
the  whole  e^ddential  current  of  the  sitting. In  these  days
this difficulty is almost non-existent where Feda  is
concerned. A direct question, simply asked, will  often
<  ehcit  an  equally  dii-ect  answer  or  a  suitable  description.
At  other  times  Feda  will  frankly  express  inability  to  reply,
or  will  promise,  and  in  that  case  generally  give,  a  later
answer. All  this  exactly  as  one  would  do  oneself  in  the
i  course  of  an  ordinary  conversation. But  this  particular
!  increase  of  faciUty  does  not  apply  equally  to  the  A.V.B.
Personal  Control. A  direct  question  will  more  often  than
not  strike  her  literally  dumb,  she  is  seldom  able  to  give
an  immediate  and  direct  answer,  and  indeed  the  injudi-
cious  asking of such a question will  often cause  some
minutes  of  complete  silence,  and  will  only  serve  to  break
the  thread  of  the  voluntary  matter  being  given. This  is
however  not  invariably  the  case,  and  A.V.B. is  decidedly
jj  improving  ; in  fact  only  recently  a question  as  to  the
1|  nature  of  a  new  pet  that  we  had  acquired  was  triumph-
antly  answered by A.V.B., who immediately wrote  the
j  word  '  Parrot  '  in  printed  letters  on  the  back  of  my  hand,
'  naming  each  letter  as she wrote  it. She added,  quite
correctly,  that  it  was  an  unusual  bird  in  its  markings,
:  that  it  was  more  restless  than  any  parrot  she  had  ever
■  seen, constantly moving to and fro  sideways,  and  that
j  it  appeared  to  slip  upon  its  perch,  of  which  it  did  not
seem  able  to  get  a  proper  grip. However,  in  this  matter
of  answering  direct  questions,  the  A.V.B.  Personal  Control
is  still  very  far  behind  Feda,  and  such  a  call  upon  her
self-possession  is  not  usually  successful.

Another  point  mentioned  in  my  paper,  and  to  which
Doctor  Alrutz  refers,  is  the  long  exhalation  of  breath  which
so  often  heralds  the  arrival,  so  to  speak,  of  a  personal
control.

Since  the  further  development  of  the  A.V.B.  Personal
Control another curious feature  connected  with  the  me-


308  Una,  Lady  Trouhridge  [paet


dium's  breathing  has  been  observed  on  several  occasions.
Some  months  ago  the  A.V.B.  Personal  Control  expressed
a  desire  to  learn  to  sit  upright  in  her  chair,  instead  of,  as
heretofore,  lolling  forward  on  the  sitter's  shoulder.  This
upright  position  did  not  appear  materially  to  affect  the
manifestations  of  the  control,  she  spoke  audibly,  coherently
and  evidentially  as  usual.  But  on  several  occasions  the
medium  became  scarlet  in  the  face,  a  series  of  gasps  was
followed  by  moments  of  apparent  asphyxia,  and  finally  the
A.V.B.  Personal  Control  fell  forward  into  the  sitter's  arms
breathing  heavily  and  proffering  the  explanation  that  she
had  nearly  choked  the  medium  because  she  had  "  for-
gotten to  breathe  "  !

The  hypersesthesia  of  hearing  also  mentioned  in  my
paper  as  affecting  Mrs.  Leonard  just  before  a  sitting,  or,
as  Doctor  Alrutz  puts  it,  "When  hypnosis  is  coming  on,"
does  not,  as  Doctor  Alrutz  surmises,  depart  with  the
coming  of  the  deep  trance  condition  and  the  emergence  of
Feda,  or  even  with  that  of  the  A.V.B.  Personal  Control.
There  have  been  signs  of  it  quite  often  when  the  Feda
Control  is  in  full  swing.  Not  only  is  Feda  easily  put  oft
and  annoyed  by  trifling  noises — I  have  heard  her  break  off
from  a  subject  in  hand  in  order  to  compare  the  muffled
sound  of  a  lift  to  the  roaring  of  a  lion — but,  amid  her
own  noisy  chatter,  she  will  notice  and  draw  the  sitter's
attention  to  a  tiny  distant  sound  like  a  church  bell  or  an
aeroplane,  even  though  the  sound  in  question  be  so  faint
as  to  be  almost  inaudible  to  the  sitters  listening  atten-
tively in  the  hushed  seance  room.  As  for  the  A.V.B.
Personal  Control,  on  a  quite  recent  occasion  when  she  was
resting  on  my  shoulder,  she  complained  that  I  was  champ-
ing my  teeth,  and  that  the  sound  I  made  appeared  to
her  like  the  firing  of  cannons  !  ■

I  do  not  know  whether  what  I  have  written  here  con-
cerning the  Leonard-Feda- A.V.B.  Phenomena  will  bring
forth  any  further  interesting  comments  from  Doctor
Alrutz.  I  hope  it  may,  but  in  any  event  I  am  most
grateful  to  him  for  making  me  realise  that  I  had
a  duty  too  long  delayed.  Having  put  forward  in  my
earlier  paper,  for  the  benefit  of  those  interested,  certain


xcn.] Modus  Operandi  in  Mediumistic  Trance  309

aspects  of  Mrs.  Leonard's  trance  and  some  tentative  hypo-
theses based  upon  my  experience  up  to  the  time  of
wTiting,  and  having  urged  others  to  probe  more  deeply
into  the  subject,  it  is  only  right  that  I  should  give  equal
publicity  to  further  experiences  and  observations  which
have  led  me  to  reconsider  and  modify  some  of  my  sup-
positions and  suggestions,  and  which  may  influence  others
to  do  likewise.

And— a  big  AND— I  honestly  do  7iot  beheve  that  if
Doctor  Ahrutz,  having  induced  a  deep  hypnosis  in  a
subject,  were  able  to  restore  to  that  subject  the  "  Vocal
organs,  peripheral  and  central,  and  then  by  the  help  of
telepathy  make  these  restored  parts  of  [the  subject's]
organism  talk  and  give  utterance  to  [his]  thoughts,"  he
would  have  achieved  a  process  that  could  be  compared,
in  any  conclusive  manner,  with  what  takes  place  when
the  Leonard  organism  gives,  via  the  Feda  Control  or  the
A.V.B.  Personal  Control,  a  really  evidential  sitting.

If  Doctor  Akutz  were  able  to  attempt  such  an  experi-
ment with  IVIrs.  Leonard  (and  I  feel  sure  he  agrees  with
me  as  to  the  inadvisabihty  of  subjecting  a  valuable
medium  to  experiments  of  which  it  is  impossible  to  foresee
the  consequences)  he  might  obtain  very  interesting  results.
But  I  should  not  even  then  be  prepared  to  decide  upon
the  source  thereof.  We  should  still  have  to  consider  the
rival  claims  of  :  1.  Dr.  Akutz.  2.  ]\Irs.  Leonard  herself.
3.  The  Feda  Control.  4.  The  A.V.B.  Personal  Control.
And  last  but  not  least,  of  the  Unknown  Quantity.


310


Sir  Oliver  Lodge


[part


THE  LIFE  OF  CROOKES.
By  Sir  Oliver  Lodge,  F.R.S.

The  Life  of  Sir  William  Crookes,  O.M.,  F.R.S.  By  E.  E.
FouRNiEK  D'Albe,  D.Sc,  F.Inst.P.  With  a  Foreword  by
Sm  Oliver  Lodge. Pp.  xix+413.  (T.  Fisher  Unwin,  Ltd.)

Whoever  should  have  undertaken  to  write  the  Life  of  Sir
William  Crookes  must  have  known  that  he  was  undertaking
a  difficult  task.  The  amount  of  material  available  was  enor-
mous :  for  Crookes  was  a  man  who  kept  documents  of  every
kind,  probably  in  a  state  of  orderly  arrangement  but  multi-
farious in  scope,  and  of  very  different  intrinsic  value.  Along
with  papers  of  historical  interest  there  were  things  little  better
than  domestic  memoranda,  such  as  a  list  of  things  packed  for
a  voyage,  or  a  list  of  purchases  made  before  coming  home,  or
memoranda  of  the  fees  obtained  for  professional  services,  or
correspondence  about  what  sort  of  fee  it  would  be  reasonable
to  charge  :  any  number  of  letters  also,  many  of  no  particular
interest,  such  as  acceptances  of  invitations,  or  applications  for
tickets  for  ceremonials, — in  fact,  a  good  deal  of  what  might
legitimately  be  stigmatised  as  "'  rubbish."  Beside  all  this,
however,  there  were  letters  and  controversies  about  the  dis-
covery of  thallium,  attempts  to  deal  with  the  cattle  plague,
correspondence  and  controversy  about  the  radiometer,
speculations  and  predictions  about  wireless  telegraphy,  and
dealings  with  diamond,  gold,  and  radium  ;  some  of  these  being
of  considerable,  some  of  small,  interest.  And  it  must  have
been  very  difficult  to  decide  what  to  include.

One  result,  perhaps  an  unfortunate  result,  of  the  biographer's
decision  to  include  a  large  number  of  trivial  documents  is  that
methods  of  abstracting  gold,  in  one  form  or  another,  loom
rather  large  throughout  the  volume,  and  are  continually  occur-
ring ;  sometimes  in  the  domain  of  chemistry,  sometimes  ap-
proaching the  realm  of  high  finance,  but  rather  frequently  in


xcn.]  The  Life  of  CrooJces  311

the  petty  details  of  business  economy  and  comiiany  specula-
tions. The  biographer's  aim  no  doubt  is  to  produce  a  com-
posite portrait,  and  not  to  slur  over  anything  that  throws
light  upon  the  character  of  his  subject  ;  but  it  may  be  held
that  the  result  is  rather  unfortunate.  Trivial  things  occur  in
the  lives  of  all  men,  but  they  are  usually  taken  for  granted,
not  emphasised  or  given  a  j^ermanent  position  in  biography ;
so  that  when  they  are  emphasised,  or  even  recorded,  these
details  loom  larger  than  they  ought,  and  rather  spoil  the
balance  ;  not  because  they  are  anything  more  than  common-
place, but  just  because  they  are  commonplace.

What  had  to  be  brought  out  was  that  Crookes,  by  his  own
exertions,  did  achieve  a  sufficient  fortune  to  enable  him  to
devote  the  main  part  of  his  life  to  science.  Details  of  the
fees  which  he  received  in  consultation  or  in  legal  procedure,
j  after  he  had  established  his  reputation,  are  utterly  unimportant
and  should  be  out  of  the  picture  ;  they  distract  attention  from
the  real  business  of  life.  Financial  matters  which  lead  to
disaster,  or  which  lead  on  the  other  hand  to  increased  facility
for  work,  are  bound  to  be  included ;  but  unnecessary  details
about  minor  things  of  that  sort  are  abhorrent.

The  main  outlines  of  what  one  would  look  for  in  the  bio-
I  graphy  of  a  man  of  science, after  dates and  parentage  or
i  ancestry  and  educational  opportunities,  are such as these  :—
the  circumstances  which  led  him  to  take  up  science  as  a  pro-
fession or  a  hobby,  some  account  of  his  early  struggles  and
gaining  of  recognition,  and  then  a  vivid  representation,  with
contemporary  documents,  illustrating  the  main  work  of  his  life.
For  the  carrying  out  of  such  a  task  in  the  case  of  William
Crookes  Dr.  Fournier  d'Albe  seemed  eminently  suitable  ;  for  he
had  graduated,  so  to  speak,  either  literally  or  metaphorically,
in  both  physics  and  psychics,  and  was  sufficiently  acquainted
with  chemistry  to  appreciate  the  work  of a great  chemist.
But  in  spite  of  a  brave,  and  no  doubt  earnest,  effort  to  over-
|Come  the  difficulties  of  the  task,  the  result  must  be  regarded
t  as  somewhat  disappointing  :  the  outcome  stril<es  a  reader  who
knew  Crookes  and  his  work  as  rather  less  than  fair  to  his
memory. Superlatives  are  introduced  from  time  to  time,  no
ioubt ;  some  more,  some  less  appropriate  ; but  it  can  in  no
sense  be  called  a  panegyric. Possibly  the  biographer  had  not


312  iS!ir  Oliver  Lodge  [part

much  personal  acquaintance  with  the  subject  of  his  memoir
in  his  study  and  laboratory.  Undoubtedly  it  must  be  very
difficult  to  form  an  estimate  of  a  man  from  a  miscellaneous
array  of  letters  and  documents.  From  that  point  of  view,  the
wonder  is  that  it  has  been  done  so  well.

This  reviewer's  own  personal  estimate  of  Crookes  is  suffi-
ciently indicated  in  the  introduction  which  he  wrote  for  Dr.
Fournier's  book  ;  and  it  is  unnecessary  to  add  to  that.  He
would  only  like  to  testify  of  his  own  knowledge,  what  the
book  perhaps  sufficiently  indicates,  that  the  mutual  devotion
of  Crookes  and  his  wife  can  hardly  be  exaggerated  ;  that  they
lived  to  celebrate  the  sixtieth  anniversary  of  their  union  ;  and
that  when  she  died  he  was  inconsolable  until  he  obtamed
what  he  considered  proof  of  her  continued  companionship.  Ijs


Ml

i
m


Some  remarks  must  now  be  made  concerning  a  few  of  the
chemico-physical  and  psychic  details  recorded  in  this  volume.
On  the  whole  Crookes  was  more  of  a  chemist  than  a  physicist.
His  traming  had  been  that  of  a  chemist ;  and  although  he
made  important  discoveries  in  physics,  he  generally  stated
them  in  such  a  way  as  to  arouse  opposition  and  controversy.
Controversy  indeed  ruled  throughout  his  life,  sometimes  taking
a  painful  form.  One  of  the  most  painful  controversies  must  have
been  that  at  the  Royal  Institution  with  Sir  James  Dewar.  It  is
mentioned  in  this  review  only  to  bring  forward  a  privately  known
proof  of  Crookes's  magnanimity  :  for  when,  soon  afterwards,  it
was  proposed  at  the  Royal  Society  that  its  highest  honour,  the
Copley  Medal,  should  be  given  to  Dewar,  Crookes,  a  previous
recipient  of  that  medal,  came  out  of  his  comparative  retkement
and  earnestly  supported  the  proposition  ;  which,  needless  to  i
say,  was  carried.

The  chief  discoveries  associated  with  Crookes's  name  are  the
new element ThaUium,— discovered spectroscopically and ex-  iti
hibited at the 1862 Exhibition, though even about that  ill
there was much vexatious controversy ; the radiometer, —  la
again  with  much  disagreement  about  its  mode  of  action  ;  the
spinthariscope, — a  useful  and  convenient  and,  as  it  turns  out,  II
important  outcome  of  experiments on  radium  ; and,  chief  of  Id
all, radiant  matter  or  cathode  rays  or  "matter  in  a  fourth
state,"— the  foundation  of  a  whole  new  branch  of  physics,  and


irt


XCII.]


The  Life,  of  Crookes


313


the  early  beginning  of  the  later  discovery  by  others  of  the
j  electron. It will probably be held by posterity that  the
;  electrical work  in  high  vacua,  part  of  which  was  summarised
■  and  demonstrated  in  his discourse to  the  British  Association
at  Sheliield  on  August  22nd,  1879,  marks  the  climax  of  Crookes's

.  lUfe  and  achievement.

I

The  discourse  itself  was  rather  brilliant,  and  passages  from
it  are  quoted  in  this  volume, but  the  experiments  in  high
vacua,  by  which  it  was  illustrated,  were  far  more  brilliant  ;
1  and  it  is difficult to over-estimate their  great  and  epoch-
f  I  making  importance. From  a  sort  of  toy,  exhibited  at  scientific
i  soirees, the  vacuum-tube  rose  to  a  position  of  extraordiaary
i  dignity and usefulness, and may be said to dominate  the
physics  of  the  latter  portion  of  the  nineteenth  and  the  early
part  of  the  twentieth  century.

Members  of  the  S.P.R.  will  be  able  to  form  a  good  estimate
?f  the  main  outlines  of  Crookes's  work  by  reading  the  obituary
lotice  by  a  contemporary  man  of  science.  Sir  William  Barrett,
n  Proceedings,  (Vol.  XXXI.,  pp.  12  to  29),  with  a  portrait
i  ind  with  a  useful  appendix  gi"\T.ng  a  list  of  the  contributions
io  the  S.P.R.  by  Sir  William  Crookes.


ith


So  far,  we  have  said  not  a  word  about  that  paiixful  and
mpopular  episode  or  period  in  Crookes's  life  wherein  he  took
ull  advantage  of  exceptional  opportunities  olfered  him  for  the
xamination  of  supernormal  phenomena,  diiring  the  years  1871
o  1874,  a  period  of  great  importance  to  the  disciples  of
)sycbic  science,  and  one  in  connexion  with  which  they  will
Iwaj^s  hold  Crookes  and  his  pioneering  work  in  high  honour
nd  remembrance.  But,  as  often  happens  to  investigators
ato  unpopular  novelties,  the  work  brought  upon  himself,  as
a,r  as  the  public  were  concerned,  only  ridicule,  painful
ontroversy,  and  condemnation.  He  entered  upon  the  subject
ath  a  light  heart,  he  left  it  \vith  a  heavy  one.  He
nagined  that  by  careful  experimenting,  and  by  frankness,
e  would  disarm  hostility  and  convince  the  scientific  world,
►thers  have  been  under  a  similar  impression,  both  before
nd  since  !  We  now  know,  or  at  least  the  writer  does,  that
rookes  observed  many  things  which,  however  incredible,  were
:ue  ;  and  that,  by  aid  of  the  unusual  powers  of  D.  D.  Home

X


314  Sir  Oliver  Lodge  [pabt

and  Florence  Cook,  he  had  opportunities  for  investigation  denied
to  most  of  us.  But  the  citadel  of  orthodoxy  was  too  strong  ;
Crookes  failed  to  storm  it  ;  it  is  intact  to  this  day,  though
breaches  have  been  made  in  its  wall,  or  at  any  rate  some  o[
the  garrison  have  deserted.  But  for  the  rest  of  his  life
though  he  would  willingly  speak  privately  on  the  subject,  and
though  his  convictions  were  quite  unaltered, — he  no  longer
thought  it  necessary  to  incur  the  odium  and  the  numerous
disabilities  incurred  by  pressing  the  subject  on  his  scientific
confreres.  So,  after  a  vigorous  and  stormy  few  years,  he  went
on  with  M-hat  he  considered  his  scientific  work  proper,  and
therein  achieved  so  much  that,  in  spite  of  the  hostility  he  had
aroused,  scientific  honours  and  medals  flowed  upon  him  ;  and
ultimately  he  was  even  elected,  though  not  without  some
searchings  of  heart,  to  the  Presidency  of  the  Royal  Society.

Undoubtedly  the  researches  of  Crookes  into  psycho-physical
phenomena  must  have  been  among  the  material  which  was  in
the  minds  of  the  founders  of  the  S.P.R.,  when  in  the  late
seventies  and  early  eighties,  Sir  William  Barrett  (the  only
remaining  livmg  founder)  discussed  with  Henry  Sidgwick.
Frederic  Myers,  and  Edmund  Gurney,  together  with  Alfred
Russel  Wallace  and  probably  some  others,  the  prospects  of  a
society  which  might  be  founded  to  take  up  that  large  and
neglected  field  of  investigation  to  the  very  existence  of  which
the  long  established  scientific  societies  were  blind  and  deai
when  not  contemptuous.  Fortunately,  or  so  it  seems,  the
first  fruits  of  the  Society,  and  indeed  of  Barrett's  own  work
on  the  subject,  lay  in  the  comparatively  innocuous  and  less
sensational  direction  of  the  kind  of  thought  transference  to
which  Myers  gave  the  name  "  telepathy."  Crookes  indeed,
later  in  life,  rather  regretted  that  his  good  fortune  had  not  led
him  to  approach  the  subject  from  that  end.  At  the  same
time  the  more  physical  end  seemed  natural  to  an  experimentei
in  chemistry  and  physics  :  and  he  probably  had  too  little
training  in  psychology  and  literature  to  be  able  to  make  the
headway  which  the  co-operators  who  founded  the  Society  did
undoubtedly  make.  Nevertheless,  physical  phenomena  are  among|j|j
those  occurrences  which  had  been  testified  to  again  and  again  ;
and  they  were  by  no  means  excluded  from  the  purview  of  the  ^
new  Society. Indeed  a  special  committee  was  initiated  from


■tien
if.
My


&(
leer
irpi

f88

lan
Ian
as
tos
\

KOI


lOoli


xcii.]  The  Life  of  CrooTces  315

the  first  to  try  to  carry  on  and  complete  the  investigation
begun  by  the  Dialectical  Society  in  the  previous  decade.  And
if  opportunity  had  offered,  they  would  doubtless  have  been
willing  to  continue  and  develop  the  observations  of  Crookes.

Even  telepathy,  however,  would  not  have  been  acceptable  to
the  scientific  magnates  of  that  day.  There  are  still  some  to
whom  it  is  not  acceptable  now.  And  Barrett  encountered
hostility  when,  in  1876,  he  tried  to  read  a  paper  on  the  subject
before  a  scientific  body,  and  offered  to  make  demonstration
of  the  telepathic  powers  possessed  by  members  of  a  family
with  whom  he  himself  had  made  careful  observations.


The  best  known  of  Crookes's  experiments,  and  those  which
3aused the most outcry and derision, were the  remarkable
ieries of experiments in full blown  materiaUsation,— for  a
icientific  treatment  of  Avhich  the  time  was  evidently  not  yet
•ipe. The  Florence  Cook  and  Katie  King  episodes  are  not
ully described  in this volume. A  fuller extract  from  the
ecords  of  the  time  is  given  by  Dr.  Fournier  d'Albe  himself  in  his
)ook,  published  by  Longmans  in 1908,  New  Light  on  Immor-
ality, Chapters  2  and  3  of  Part  III.,— a  book  which  is  well
« rorth  referring  to  ; though  it  contains statements by  Mrs,
'  loss  Church  (Florence  Marryat)  which  cannot  be  credited,  and
0  some  of  which  Crookes  himself  later  gave  unqualified  denial
3ee  Proc.  8.P.R.,  XII.,  p.  268.)
Crookes  was  the  victim  not  so  much  of  controversy  as  of
aeer  denunciation  ;  his  most  voluble  antagonist  being  Dr.  W.  B.
arpenter,  one  of  the  learned  physiologists  of the  time,  who
|as  subsequently  Registrar  of  the  University  of  London,— a
lan  of  weight  and  influence,  but,  as  is  now  seen,  of  far  less
lan  scientific  caution  and  fairmindedness. Another  antagonist
as  the  eminent  man  of  science  Sir  Charles  Wheatstone,  to
hose  inventions  the  early  progress  of  telegraphy  owed  so  much,
n  the  other  hand  there  were  one  or  two  who  had  already
jcome  convinced  of  some  of  the  facts,  not  only  the  famous
ologist,  A.  R.  Wallace,  but  the  well-known  electricians  Crom-
ell,  and  his  brother  S.  A.  Varley ; who  indeed  encouraged
•cokes  to  take  up  the  subject,  and  assisted  him  in  some°of
3  early  experiments  Avith  Home,— making,  among  others,  an
ictrical  test  which,  though  not  really  more  conclusive  than


316  'Sir  Oliver  Lodge  [part


m


im


ffltf
In


mechanical  ones,  might  appear  more  conclusive  to  the  public
mind.  S.  A.  Varley  was  a  man  for  whose  contributions  to
cable  telegraphy  Lord  Kelvin  in  later  life  frequently  asserted
that  he  had  not  received  a  due  meed  of  recognition  and
approbation.  That  by  the  way ;  and  only  as  showing,  to  a
generation  which  has  now  nearly  forgotten  these  workers,  that
their  experimental  ability  was  by  no  means  to  be  despised.

There  were  others,  of  course,  not  so  exactly  in  the  line  oi
scientific  ancestry,  who  countenanced  these  phenomena  and  were
fully  convinced  of  then-  reality.  And  perhaps  it  was  partlj
due  to  association  with  these  that  Crookes— akeady  recognisec
as  a  discoverer — conceived  that  when  he  found  himself  able  tc
add  his  own  first-hand  testimony,  and  utilise  the  exception
ally  favourable  opportunities  which  then  prevailed,  his  wore
would  be  received  and  opposition  would  crumble.  Wisely,  h(
made  selection  of  what  he  thought  would  be  palatable  material
he  did  not  seek  to  interest  the  oificers  of  the  Royal  Society-
chief  among  whom  was  the  world-famous  mathematical  phy
sicist  Sir  George  Gabriel  Stokes— in  any  of  the  strange  anc
ultra-normal  physiological  and  apparitional  phenomena  whicl
he  had  witnessed  ;  but  he  did  seek  to  make  a  demonstratioi
of  the  powers  of  Home,  reduced  to  their  bare  elements,  b\
means  of  a  very  simple  mechanical  arrangement  for  provmg  thi  ^
existence  of  an  unknown  force,  which  he  called  "  psychii
force."  This  experiment  he  begged  both  Stokes  and  Wheat
stone  to  come  to  see  ;  but  they  declined,  saying  that  if  thi
arrangements  were  really  as  he  described  them,  the  thin|
could  not  possibly  work.  To  this  Crookes  replied  that  he  di(
not  say  the  thing  was  possible  or  likely,  but  only  that  i
happened.  He  succeeded  in  getting  Dr.  Huggins,  the  astrono
mer,  to  see  the  apparatus  worldng,  and  also  to  be  presen
while  an  accordion,  held  in  Home's  hand  by  its  dummy  em
in  a  cage,  with  its  keyboard  hanging  down,  moved  about  an(
sounded  its  notes.  But  Sir  William  Huggins  refrained  froE
conspicuously  championing  the  phenomenon,  and  preferred  fo
a  considerable  time  to  remain  anonymous,  at  least  so  far  a
the  public  were  concerned.  He,  however,  was  not  one  of  th
officials  of  the  Royal  Society  at  the  time,  though  subsequentlj
in  due  time,  he  became  its  President. .. -  ■

All this, mth many other details, appears more or  les


m
ft

0


HD(1

«lai
(til
i  f]
ilh


froi

I

Ml


xcii.]  The  Life  of  Crookes  317


clearly  in  Chapter  XII.  of  the  book  under  review, — a  long
chapter  dealing  with  this  phase  in  Crookes's  life, — and  it  is
unnecessary  to  say  more  about  it  here  ;  except  regretfully  to
say  that  the  author's  treatment  in  a  few  particulars  is  not
altogether  fair  to  Crookes's  memory,  and  not  such  as  Crookes
m  his  lifetim-e  would  have  approved.  Certain  metrical  state-
ments by  Crookes  are  stigmatised  as  erroneous,  while  the  still
more  erroneous  statements  of  objectors  are  cited  without  cor-
rection as  if  they  were  true.  There  must  have  been  a  certain
amount  of  carelessness  in  this  part  of  the  book ;  and  the
Genuineness  of  the  whole  affair  appears  to  be  left  under  a
3loud  of  suspicion  which  is  very  far  from  being  justified  by  the
statements  themselves,  and  which  by  no  means  correctly  repre-
sents the  attitude  of  Crookes  hunself  at  any  part  of  his  life.

In  this  review,  therefore,  it  seems  desirable  to  call  attention
io  the  particularly  simple  experiment  above  mentioned,  and
)oint  out  some  of  the  gratuitous  errors  which,  judging  from
-he  text,  were  made  at  that  time  by  critics  of  importance.
Jnimportant  and  anonymous  critics  did  not  hesitate  to  ridicule
he  whole  thing  ;  that  is  only  to  be  expected,  and  is  of  no
noment,  but  what  responsible  scientific  authorities  say,  at  any
)eriod,  is  historically  important,  and,  if  uncorrected,  is  natur-
■  %  taken  as  accurate.  The  foUowuag  remarks,  therefore,  may
erve  as  a  summary  and  supplement  to  this  part  of  the  book.

Crookes  arranged  an  apparatus  of  the  simplest  possible  land
a  order  to  verify  that  an  unknown  force  actually  operated,
nd  in  some  sense  to  record  and  measure  its  amount.  Tor
his  purpose  he  arranged  a  horizontal  mahogany  board  three
3et  long,  8 1  inches  wide,  and  1  inch  thick ;  with  one  edge
upported  on  the  edge  of  a  table,  and  the  other  end  sus-
pended by  a  registering  spring- balance,  hung  from  a  firm
ripod  stand.  The  medium  was  seated  at  the  table  and  his
ands  were  placed  lightly  on  the  fixed  or  fulcrum  end.  The
3sult  was  that  after  a  time  the  board  tilted  down,  and  the
alance  at  the  other  end  indicated  that  its  spiral  spring  had
een  stretched  as  if  loaded  by  a  weight,  sometimes  as  much
s  from  3  to  6  lbs.  He  also  made  a  registering  apparatus,
'ith  smoked  glass  moved  by  clockwork,  so  that  a  trace  should
e  recorded,  indicating  by  objective  and  permanent  record  the
mount  of  the  force  at  different  times. All  this  was  pubhshed


318  Sir  Oliver  Lodge  [paet

in  The  Quarterly  Journal  for  Science  for  July  1871,  and  con-
tinned  in  October  1871,  with  confirmatory  testimony  by  Sir
William  Huggins  and  Serjeant  Cox.  The  testimony  was  later
reiDroduced,  with  an  appendix  of  correspondence  illustrating  the
controversial  reception  the  experiment  met  with,  in  a  book
called  Researches  in  Spiritualism,  which  appears  to  be  now  out
of  print.

These  experiments  are  referred  to  in  the  volume  now  under
review,  page  218  and  thereabouts.  To  avoid  the  suspicion
that  the  medium,  when  touching  the  board,  might  trespass
beyond  the  fulcrum  and  be  surreptitiously  pressing  with  ex-
ceptional violence,  so  as  to  produce  a  force  comparable  to  a
pound  weight  or  more  at  the  far  end  of  the  lever,  Crookes
marked  the  position  of  Home's  fingers  on  the  board,  and
subsequently  placed  on  or  near  the  fulcrum  a  vessel  of  water,
into  which  the  medium  was  to  dip  his  fingers  without  touching
the  board  at  all.  And  to  avoid  accidentally  or  purposely
touching  the  rim  or  sides  of  this  vessel,  he  arranged  above
it  another  water  container,  a  sort  of  copper  bowl,  fixed  to  an
independent  support ;  the  bowl  being  (unfortunately  and
perhaps  unnecessarily)  perforated  at  the  bottom  so  that  water
in  the  bowl  communicated  with  the  water  in  the  vessel  below
and  the  medium  only  dipped  his  fingers  into  this  upper  copper
bowl,  shown  in  an  illustration  on  page  220  of  the  book.
But  stiU  the  spring  balance  at  the  far  end  of  the  lever,  now
untouched  except  through  water,  exhibited  a  force  of  nearly
a  pound.

The  most  absurd  arguments  were  used  agamst  these  experi
ments.  For  instance,  a  writer  in  the  Journal  of  the  Franklin
Institute  says  that,  though  Crookes's  evidence  practically  shows
that  the  board  apparently  weighed  only  6  lbs.,  it  ought,  from
its  size  and  from  the  specific  gravity  of  mahogany,  to  weigh
13  lbs.  ;  he  therefore  indicates  a  suspicion  that  the  board  was
a  trick  board,  supplied  by  the  medium  !  To  which  Crookes,
repHed  that  the  board  had  been  in  his  possession  for  years,
that  it  had  already  formed  part  of  several  previous  pieces  ol
apparatus,  and  that,  whatever  it  ought  to  weigh,  it  did  actually  „(
weigh  only  6  lbs.

Another objection, more responsibly made by  Sir  Charles
Wheatstone,  was  that  a  water  connection  was  no  guarantee  [f(


Is


lio"
so:

MB

«et:
m


h


ItCO


(IB  f

tfrj
rtl
srei
If


xcii.]  The  Life  of  Crookes  319

against the exertion of force, since — so he argues — if  only
3  cubic  inches  of  water  were  displaced  by  the  fingers,  it  would
by  hydrostatic  laws  be  equivalent  to  a  pressure  of  from  12
"to 13 ozs., or  nearly  a pound. This arithmetical error  is
reproduced  on  p.  219  of  The  Life  of  Crookes  without  correction.
As  a  matter  of  fact  the  weight  of  three  cubic  inches  of  water
is only an ounce and threequarters  ! This matter,  though
apparently  trivial,  is  historically  important  because  a  special  effort
"  was  being  made to interest  the  Royal  Society. In  its  early
days the opportunity  for  witnessing such an "absurd"  ex-
periment  would have been  welcomed by the Society ;  but
now,  ui  its  later  dignity  and  immense  loiowledge,  it  is  repelled
by the apparently impossible. Crookes is accused by  his
biographer  of  having, in  this  crucial  instance, made  a  faux
pas, with serious consequences  to Science. It is not  really
so : though m his original description he probably had  a
Ij  momentary  lapse,  and  had  expressed  himself  with less  than
« imeticulous  accuracy. He  was  not  a  professor  of  Physics.  When
"  he  came  to  reply  to  objections,  he  might  have  admitted  the
hydrostatic argument and at the same time attacked  the
erroneous  arithmetic  ; but,  instead,  he  contented  himself  with
a, demonstration that as a matter of fact no  appreciable
iefiexion  of  the  lever  could  normally  be  caused  in  that  way,
3ven when the bowl was not exactly over the  fulcrum.
Brookes  expressly  states  that  dipping  his  whole  hand  to  the
l;  lull  extent  in  the  upper  bowl  of  water  did  not  produce  the
east appreciable action on the balance at the other  end
jf the lever. This is in accordance with common  sense.
The whole weight of a man on the  fulcrum would  not
i^liccoimt  for  the  stretching  of  the  spring. That  the  weight  of
whatever  water  was  displaced  would  give  some  extra  pressure
m  the  fulcrum  is  true  enough,  but  that  this  effect  would  be
'3  rery  small  is  obvious  from  the  picture  of  the  apparatus,  and
lothing  appreciable could  normally  reach  the  far  end  of  the
"lever.

Wheatstone's concluding comment, when this was  pointed
>ut,  was  that  it  appeared  to  him  contrary  to all  analogy  that
-ny  force, acting  according  to  physical  laws,  should  produce
he  forcible  depression  of  a  lever  by  acting  on  its  fulcrum  !
t«  ?o  which  Crookes  replied  that  he  entirely  agreed  ; that  that


320  Sir  Oliver  Lodge  [part

was  the  whole  gist  of  the  experiment,  and  the  only  reason  he
regarded  it  as  worthy  of  attention.  \
The  episode  illustrates  one  of  the  difficulties  which  is  bound
to  be  encountered  by  investigators  of  novel  physical  phenomena.
If  a  new  kind  of  force  is  exerted,  the  experiments  are  almost
bound  to  be  surprising  and,  so  to  speak,  incredible — so  in-
credible that  responsible  leaders  in  science  may  be  unwilling
to  subject  themselves  to  what  they  regard  as  the  farce  of  at-
tempted demonstration.  As  in  Galileo's  time,  they  may  refuse
to  look  through  the  telescope  ;  or,  if  they  do,  may  regard  it  as
a  deceptive  instrument.  Many  Continental  investigators,  and
some  in  this  country,  are  now  inclined  to  suppose  that  the
force  in  these  and  other  more  striking  instances  of  telekinesis
is  due  to  or  is  associated  with  the  mechanical  intervention  or
employment  of  an  invisible  previously  unknown  material,
probably  emanating  from  the  medium,  in  the  form  of  what  we
now  call  ectoplasm, — a  form  of  substance  which  was  then  not
recognised  or  perhaps  suspected  by  anyone.  Nothing  but
direct  observation  and  instrumental  confirmation  can  establish
such  things  as  realities  ;  and  in  the  absence  of  theory  ex-
periment must  always  be  scrutinised  with  exceptional  severity.
A  plausible  theory  need  not  jump  into  existence  at  the  same
time  as  new  facts  are  observed  ;  but  until  there  is  some  guiding
theory  or  clue  the  facts  seem  detached  from  organised  science,
and  are  rebutted  and  disbelieved  on  theoretical  grounds.  Dis-
belief is  only  natural,  and  its  foundation  in  common  sense  is
rather  like  a  modified  version  of  David  Hume's  arguments
against  miracles,  viz.  that  it  is  more  likely  that  a  witness
should  he  than  that  a  miracle  should  happen  ;  because  the  one-
is  consonant  with  human  experience  and  the  other  is  not.
That  is  quite  true  ;  but  if  the  thing  really  does  happen,  and
if  it  can  be  shown  contemporaneously  to  happen,  the
argument  has  no  weight  ;  the  facts,  when  proven,  are  them-
selves an  expansion  of  human  experience  ;  and  they  clearly
establish  the  need  for  overhauliiig  and  enlarging  our  theoretical  jj  h
foundations.  Things  that  are  unlikely  may  nevertheless  be
true.  Our  knowledge  of  nature  is  not  so  extensive  that  we
are  able  to  say  beforehand  what  is  possible  and  what  is  not
possible  in  a  novel  region  of  enquiry.  That  is  where  even
Faraday — that prince of investigators — made, in an  obiter


XCII.]


The,  Life  of  Crookes


321


;  dictmn,  one  of  his  few  mistakes.  The  history  of  science  is  too
much  disfigured  by  the  premature  rejection  and  contempt  with

1  which  novelties  have  often  been  received.  They  are  accepted,
in  the  long  run,  by  some  subsequent  generation  ;  but  the  re-

t sponsible  generation  living  at  the  time  does  not  rise  to  the

■  height  of  its  opportunities.  Contemporary  men  of  science
I unfortunately  write themselves down, not only as  ignorant,

■  which  was  inevitable,  but  as  blind  and  prejudiced  and  sadly
e  bigoted  :  though  it  is  true  that  in  their  lifetime  their  contemp-
s  tuous  attitude  gains  them  credit  for  robust  common  sense  and
1  sanity.  They  are  wise,  therefore,  in  their  day  and  generation,
e  It  is  singular,  and  perhaps  depressing,  that  the  obscurantist
e  attitude  of  theologians  in  the  past  had  been  so  amply  imitated
It  by  the  pontiffs  and  high  priests  of  science  in  the  recent  present.
I,  They  still  oppose  their  admirable  theories  aiid  great  knowledge
e  of  the  universe  to  resist  the  incursion  of  fresh  information  ;
it  they  oppose  observed  facts  on  a  priori  and  utterly  inadequate
it  grounds.  No  one  ought  to  consider  his  knowledge  of  the
i  universe  so  complete  and  final  as  to  be  competent  to  negative
i-  careful  testimony  based  on  critical  and  responsible  experiment
r.  and  observation,  especially  if  the  observer  has  already  proved
le  his  competence  in  more  recognised  branches  of  knowledge,
ij  Explanatory  hypotheses  may  be  criticised  severely,  but  the
e,  facts  demand  attention.

s-  In  the  light  of  our  present  or  subsequent  knowledge,  his-
torical rejections  of  truth,  and  inability  to  recognise  the  value
of  testimony,  or  even  to  accept  a  chance  of  being  convinced
by  actual  experience,  tend  to  arouse  our  impatience  ;  but
there  is  some  excuse.  Most  of  the  orthodox  facts  of  to-day
had  to  encounter  similar  opposition  at  their  entry,  and  were  at
one  time  heterodox.  It  has  been  said  that  even  scientific  fact
is  not  generally  accepted  until  it  becomes  a  habit  ;  and,  as
illustrating  pardonable  and  natural  scientific  scepticism,  it
may  be  instructive  and  helpful  to  quote  here  from  an  old
letter  from  a  scientific  friend  about  Crookes 's  experiments,
preserved  and  cited  with  approbation  by  Crookes  himself  : —

"  Any  intellectual  reply  to  your  facts  I  camiot  see.  Yet  it
is  a  curious  fact  that  even  I,  with  all  my  tendency  and
desire  to  believe  spirituahstically,  and  with  all  my  faith
in  your  poAver  of  observing  and  your  thorough  truthfulness.


322


Sir  Oliver  Lo^ge


[part


feel  as  if  I  wanted  to  see  for  myself  ;  and  it  is  quite
painful  to  me  to  think  how  much  more  proof  I  want.  Painful,
I  say,  because  I  see  that  it  is  not  reason  which  convinces  a
man,  unless  a  fact  is  rej^eated  so  frequently  that  the  impres-
sion becomes  hke  a  habit  of  mind,  an  old  acquaintance,  a
thing  known  so  long  that  it  cannot  be  doubted.  This  is  a
curious  phase  of  man's  mind,  and  it  is  remarkably  strong  in
scientific  men, — stronger  than  in  others,  I  think.  For  this
reason  we  must  not  always  call  a  man  dishonest  because  he
does  not  yield  to  evidence  for  a  long  time.  The  old  wall  of
belief  must  be  broken  down  by  much  battering."

The  fact  that  Crookes  fully  adhered  to  his  exceptional  ex-
periences, throughout  his  life,  is  sufficiently  plain  to  members
of  the  S.P.R.  from  his  "Notes  of  Seances  with  D.  D.  Home,"
written  for  the  Proceedings  of  the  S.P.R.  in  1889  (see  Vol.  VI.,
page  98  et  seq).  Also  from  his  holding  the  Presidential  Chair  of
the  Society  for  three  years,  1896-1899,  and  from  his  Presiden-
tial Address  to  the  Society  in  1897  (see  Proc.  Vol.  XII.,  page
338).

While,  later  still,  in  the  critical  and  quite  unprivileged
atmosphere  of  the  British  Association,  when  he  was  President
of  that  body  at  its  Bristol  meeting  in  September  1898,  the
concluding  portion  of  his  address  speaks  of  "  one  interest  "
which  to  him  was  "  the  weightiest  and  the  farthest  reaching
of  all,"  and  continues  : —

"  Thirty  years  have  passed  since  I  published  an  account  of
experiments  tending  to  show  that  outside  our  scientific  know-
ledge there  exists  a  Force  exercised  by  intelligence  differing
from  the  ordinary  intelligence  common  to  mortals.  .  .  .  To
ignore  the  subject  would  be  an  act  of  cowardice — an  act  of
cowardice  I  feel  no  temptation  to  commit.  .  .  .  There  is
nothing  for  the  investigator  to  do  but  to  go  straight  on.  .  .  .
to  follow  the  light  wherever  it  may  lead.  ...  I  have  nothing
to  retract.  I  adhere  to  my  already  published  statements.
Indeed,  I  might  add  much  thereto.  I  regret  only  a  certain
crudity  in  those  early  expositions  which,  no  doubt  justly,
militated  against  then'  acceptance by  the  scientific  world."

Though  several  letters  about  the  preparation  of  this  Address
are  printed  in  the  volume  under  review,  pp.  353-370,  it  seems


XCII.]


The  Life  of  Crookes


323


legitimate  to  add,  now,  that  while  drafting  the  address  Crookes
was  also  in  correspondence  with  F.  W.  H.  Myers  ;  and  we  may
trace  Myers's  hand  in  its  final  and  ante-penultimate  paragraphs.
I  know  that  Crookes  accepted  these  suggestions  with  joy,  and
rejected  several  other  eloquent  literary  passages  with  regret.
It  is  only  fair  to  his  memory  to  quote  here  the  final  jiara-
graph ;  though  it  is  among  those  quoted  in  the  book,  and
although  Members  of  the  S.P.R..  will  find  the  whole  of  the
psychic  portion  of  this  British  Association  Address  easy  to
refer  to  in  Proc.  XIV.,  pp.  2  to  5.

"  In  old  Egyptian  days  a  well  known  inscription  was  carved
over  the  portal  of  the  temple  of  Isis  :  '  I  am  whatever  hath
been,  is,  or  ever  will  be  ;  and  my  veil  no  man  hath  yet  lifted.'
Not  thus  do  modern  seekers  after  truth  confront  Nature — the
word  that  stands  for  the  baffling  mysteries  of  the  universe.
SteadUy,  unflinchingly,  we  strive  to  pierce  the  inmost  heart  of
Nature,  from  what  she  is  to  re-construct  what  she  has  been,
and  to  prophesy  what  she  yet  shall  be.  Veil  after  veil  we
have  lifted,  and  her  face  grows  more  beautiful,  august,  and
wonderful,  with  every  barrier  that  is  withdrawn."


324


E.  J.  Dingivall


[part


TELEKINETIC  AND  TELEPLASTIC  MEDIUMSHIP.
By  E.  J.  Dingwall.

I.  Experimente  der  Fernbewegung. By  Dk.  A.  Freiherr  von
ScHRENCK-NoTZiNG. (Stuttgart,  1924.)

II.  Die  okkultische  Bewegung  in  der  Oegenwart.  By  Prof.
Karl  Marbe.  {Preussische  Jahrbucher,  Bd.  197  ;  Heft
1  ; Juli,  1924,  pp.  47-59.)

III.  Experimente  zur  Fernbewegung  : eine  Icritische  Erorterung.

By  Dr.  Albert  Hell  wig.  (Literaturblatt  Beilage  zur
Frankfurter  Zeitung,  Juni  20,  1924.)

IV.  Experimente an einem telekinetischen Medium.  Unter-

suchungen  an  einigen  okkultischen  Medien.  By  Prof.
Hans  Henning.  (ZlscJir.  f.  Psychol,  und  Physiol,  1924,
Bd.  94,  Heft  5,  6,  pp.  278-292).

V.  Die  Krise  des  Okkultismus.  By  Prof.  Max  Dessoir.
{Vossische  Zeitung,  Juli  13,  1924.)

VI. Der  Betrug des Mediums Ladislaus Laszlo. By  Dr.  A.
Freiherr  von  Schrenck-Notzing. (Leipzig,  1924.)

The  importance  of  a  new  contribution  to  human  knowledge
can  often  be  estimated  by  a  consideration  of  the  attacks
made  upon  it  by  the  learned  world.  The  scientific  mind  is,
unfortunately,  only  too  often  divided  into  watertight  com-
partments, and  presents  the  strange  spectacle  of  the  true  and
the  false,  the  sublime  and  the  ridiculous,  all  flourishing  under
the  same  mask  of  a  united  personality.  In  the  ordinary
sciences  of  to-day,  religion  has  but  little  influence.  The
biologist  does  not  fear  that  by  presenting  his  work  he  is
encroaching  upon  the  domain  of  the  Almighty,  neither  does
the  geologist  regret  that  his  results  do  not  appear  to  tally
with  the  statements  in  the  Book.  Facts  concerning  natural
phenomena  are  now  only  condemned  for  these  reasons  in  such
places  as  Kentucky  or  the  Kingsway  HaU,  whilst  serious
minded  people  smile  quietly  and  pass  on. But  in  psychical


xcii.] Telekinetic  and  Teleplastic  Mediumship  325


research  the  scientist  joins  the  priest,  and  the  philosopher  the
journalist  in  deriding  phenomena  just  as  real  and  objective  as
the  meteor  or  the  eclipse. As  long  as  reports  were  confined  to
the  novelist  or  to  the  seeker  after  wonders,  the  learned  ^^'o^ld
could  afford  to smUe disdainfully  and  proceed  on  its  way,
but  when  the  facts  were  reported  by  men  of  science  them-
selves  the case assumed quite a different complexion.  The
r more  important  the  record  the  greater  the  attack,  and  the
more  virulent  the  abuse  from  all  quarters. Even  if  in  England
we  have  failed  to  realise  the  importance  of  Dr.  von  Schrenck-
Notzing's  contribution  (I),  in.  Germany  the  attacks  made  upon
it  reflect  great  credit  upon  its  author. For  the  truth  is  that
it  is by  far  the most  important  work  on  telekinesis  since
the  S.P.R.  Report  on  Palladino  or  Dr.  Ochorowicz's  observa-
^ tions  on  Mile  T. Tom  from  the  centre  of  spiritistic  circles
in which he was becoming rapidly hardened through  the
traditions  of  the  tune,  young  WLUy  Schneider  was  taken  by
Dr. von Schrenck  and educated with a view  to a  single
, purpose. That  goal  in  brief  was  to  train  the  mediumistic  faculty
so that  the same  phenomenon  could be  repeated  under  the
same  conditions  at  specified  times  and  before  varying  observers.
It  is  in  the  achievement  of  this  purpose  that  the  importance
of  Dr.  von  Schrenck's  record  may  be  said  principally  to  lie.
The methods of control and the phenomena observed  are
substantially  the  same  as  those  described  in  the  Journal  for
e October, 1922. Control consists broadly in the holding  of
the  medium's  hands  and  wrists  by  two  persons  and  the  out-
lining of  his  body  by  luminous  pins. Phenomena  occur  usually
1  m.  10  cm.  from  the  medium  and  are  not  hindered  by  the
presence  of  an  intervening  gauze  screen. Four  methods  were
used  : (A)  the  medium  within  a  gauze  enclosed  structure  and
the  objects  to  be  moved  upon  a  table  in  front  of  the  observers,
ie (B)  The  medium  sitting  freely  in  a  chair  and  the  objects  enclosed
']3 within  a  gauze  cage  about  1  m.  10  cm.  from  the  medium.  (C)
:S The  medium  and  the  objects  being  1  m.  10  cm.  apart,  the  latter
being  separated  from  the  observers  by  a  four-winged  gauze
screen. (D)  The  medium  and  sitters  being  entirely  cut  off  from
i the  objects  by  a  gauze  enclosure. In  all  these  four  cases  the
]S medium  is  held  by  two  persons  as  described  above. {8ee  I.,
al Abb.  3-6,  p.  43.) -  ....... .  ...=  ..


326  E.J.  Dingivall  [part

Besides  printing  an  account  of  his  own  sittings,  Dr.  von
Schrenck  records  those  held  in  the  Psychological  Institute
of  Munich  University.  The  same  phenomena  were  witnessed
repeatedly  under  the  same  conditions  and,  as  far  as  can  be
gathered  from  the  reports,  no  member  of  the  examining  com-
mission came  to  unfavourable  opinions  as  to  the  authenticity
of  the  phenomena  presented.  The  record  is  mainly  one  of
impressions  and  observations.  Fresh  experiments  were  not
apparently  encouraged  if  we  except  the  tunnel  apparatus
described  on  pp.  11,  12.  In  his  attempt  to  describe  the  pheno-
mena Dr.  von  Schrenck  leans  towards  the  hypothesis  of
teleplastic  structures  proceeding  from  the  medium  (pp.  44,  47,
49),  a  theory  to  which  colour  is  lent  by  the  fact  that  the
mesh  of  the  gauze  is  opened  when  the  objects  are  separated
from  the  medium  (pp.  46,  47).  Similarly  the  experiment
with  tissue  paper  described  on  p.  48  supports  the  same  hypo-
thesis, and  the  observations  printed  on  pp.  14,  16,  23,  46  and
163  will  especially  interest  those  few  amongst  us  who  have
ever  attempted  to  examine  the  physical  phenomena  from  this
point  of  view.

Recognising  the  immense  importance  of  the  book  and  the
unanswerable  character  of  the  records,  German  students  who
had  the  reputation  of  being  hard-headed  sceptics  set  about  to
devise  suitable  replies.  At  least  two  avenues  of  attack  were
open.  One  was  to  declare  that  the  whole  thing  was  ridicu-
lous, a  preposterous  and  futile  farce  which  could  be  left  un-
noticed. Professor  Karl  Marbe  adopted  this  course  and
(incredibile  dictu)  the  Preussische  Jahrbiicher  opened  its  columns
in  hospitality  (II).  Beginning  with  Steiner  he  passes  to  the
sideric  pendulum  and  the  divining  rod,  proceeding  to  teU  us
that  "  up  till  now  there  is  not  the  slightest  proof  of  telepathy  "
(p.  53).  From  telepathy  Professor  Marbe  passes  to  Dr.  von
Schrenck,  but  obviously  cannot  find  any  flaw  in  the  control
or  in  the  results.  He  therefore  resorts  to  ridicule  and  aspersions
concerning  WiUy's  character  and  conduct.  Finally  in  a  burst
of  almost  hysterical  frenzy  he  thus  describes  the  book.  It  is,
he  says,  only  "  ein  Album  der  Blamage,  sondern  auch  als
eine  Publikation,  die  mit  den  wahren  Interessen  des  Volkes
im  Widerspruch  steht  "  (p.  59)  [not  only  a  publication  which
makes the author ridiculous, but also one which  conflicts


I


xcii.] Telekinetic  and  Teleplasfic  Mediumship  327


I  with  the  true  interests  of  the  people].  Dr.  Hellwig  is  calmer
I  than  Professor  Marbe  (III).  He  has  read  the  book  sine  ira
{ et  studio  and  has  made "  hundreds  and  hundreds  of  critical

I  notes," but unfortunately,  he gives  us  no  striking  example
of  them,  contenting  himself  with vague complaints,  such  as

r  the  lack  of  light  and  Willy's  aversion  to  apparatus.  The
[  second  avenue  of  attack  was  adopted  by  Prof.  Henning  (IV).
\  It  consists  essentially  in  the  production  of  a  person  Avho  can
j  present  aU  the  phenomena  of  Willy  Schneider  under  the
.  same  control  conditions  and  yet  manage  to  produce  them
[  I  fraudulently. Professor  Henning  has  accomplished  this  grand

feat.  He  has  discovered  a  Russian  medium  whose  name  he
3  forgets  to  give  us.  This  person,  under  the  full  light  of  three
\  I  half -watt  lamps  of  sixty  candle  power  each,  works  in  the  centre
[  I  of  the  investigators.  Objects,  such  as  a  large  book,  a  tray,
,.  a  china  plate,  a  newspaper  or  a  walking  stick  rise  into  the
J  air  at  a  distance  from  the  medium  and  float  to  any  observer
J  at  command.  A  cigarette  case  opens  itself  and  a  cigarette
s floats  out  of  it  finally  settling  in  the  medium's  mouth.  The

phenomena  are  just  as  good  if  the  medium's  hands  and  feet
g  are  held.  Control  of  the  medium's  person  can  be  insisted
D  upon  not  only  before  and  after  the  sittings  but  at  any  time
Q  during  the  production  of  phenomena.  None  of  the  observers
g  i  could  explain  the  manifestations,  and  no  confederates  were
[.  necessary,  "  nur  zwei  fast  mikroskopische  kleine  Behelfe "  [only
[.  two  almost  microscopic  little  devices]  M^hich  could  be  used
ij  ,  without  the  help  of  hands,  feet  or  head.

u  !  Professor  Henning's  contribution  to  the  Zeitschrift  fiir  Psyclio-
j  logie  may  be  interesting  to  those  engaged  in  the  analysis  of
IJ  dreams  according  to  the  Freudian  interpretation.  But  as  a
■I  practical  contribution  the  story  is  spoilt  by  Professor  Henning

II  revealing  some  of  the  amazing  methods  of  this  modern  Yogi.
„1  The  first  device  is  a  piece  of  thread  on  the  end  of  which  is
J,  a  ball  of  wax  and  the  second  is  a  soup  spoon  in  the  sleeve

for  levitating  a  table — but  we  will  not  continue.  It  will  merely
J  suffice to  add that  this amusing  skit  by  Professor  Henning

has  actually  been  taken  seriously  in  Germany  in  the  same  way
^j  as  Dr.  Mercier's  Spirit  Experiences  was  accepted  in  certain
,|j  quarters  in  England.  Professor  Max  Dessoir  published  a
Ij  laudatory  article  in  the Vossische  Zeitung  (V). He  proposes


328


E.  J .  Dingivall


[part


that  Willy  shall  be  tested  by  Henning's  Russian  medium,  but
we  fear  that  the  latter  is  even  more  shadowy  than  the  phan-
toms produced  by  the  former.  The  fact  alone  of  Henning's
skits  being  treated  seriously  by  such  a  prominent  scholar  as
Professor  Dessoir  indicates  the  amount  of  animosity  prevalent
abroad  on  the  subject  of  Baron  von  Schrenck's  experiments
with  Willy  Schneider.  For  the  experiments  form  a  solid  basis
upon  which  to  work,  and  Baron  von  Schrenck  was  indeed
fortunate  to  obtain  the  help  of  such  a  medium  as  Willy
Schneider.  The  easy  and  at  the  same  time  efficient  methods  of
control  are  typical  of  what  can  be  done  with  a  good  medium
for  telekinesis.

How  different  are  the  problems  presented  by  teleplastic
mediumship  !  In  the  one  case  control  is  simple  if  only  the
medium  can  be  persuaded  to  consent  to  it.  In  the  other
control  is  difficult  even  when  the  medium  offers  himself  ap-
parently unreservedly.  In  my  discussion  of  the  problems
involved  in  the  case  of  Eva  C.^  I  tried  to  point  out  how
difficult  it  is  to  prevent  objects  being  smuggled  into  the
seance  room  despite  the  utmost  vigilance  on  the  part  of  the
controllers,  and  Dr.  von  Schrenck  in  his  turn  criticised  my
objections  in  the  Proceedings  for  1923.  In  the  first  paragraph
of  that  criticism  Dr.  von  Schrenck  compares  his  experiments
with  Eva  C.  with  those  with  WHly  Schneider.  But  the  com-
parison is,  I  think,  invalid,  since  telekinetic  mediumship  differs
entirely  from  teleplastic  mediumship  in  methods  of  control.
In  dealing  with  the  control  of  WUly  Schneider  I  have  said
elsewhere  that  my  objections  to  the  Baron's  control  of  WUl}''
would  be  as  strong  as  those  against  his  control  of  Eva  C.
were  Willy  to  sit  for  telejilasm."^  There  is  no  doubt  whatever
in  my  own  mind  that  Eva  C,  Willy  Schneider,  Jan  Guzik,
Pasquale  Erto,  etc.,  can  bring  objects  into  the  seance  room  in
spite  of  the  control  exercised  in  Munich,  London  or  Paris.
Moreover  the  recent  case  of  Erto  shows  quite  conclusively
that  such  is  the  case  in  at  least  one  instance.  But  the  im-
portant point  to  emphasise  is  not  what  the  mediums  can
bring  in,  but  what  use  they  can  make  of  what  they  do  bring
in.  Willy  no  doubt  can  bring  in  a  telescopic  rod,  but  of  what
use  is  it  to  him  ? None  whatever. With  telekinesis  the  con-

^  Proceedings,  1922,  309-331.  ^Journal,  1922,  p.  370,


r


XCTI.] TeleJcinetic  and  Teleplastic  Mediumship  329


troUers  can  prevent  mediums  using  their  apparatus  presupposing
such  to  be  brought  with  them.  With  teleplastic  mediumship
the  apparatus  is  the  phenomenon.  Judgment  must  not  be
founded  upon  a  sure  control,  although  a  good  deal  can  be
done  in  this  direction.  It  must  seek  a  firmer  basis  upon  the
appearance  and  (above  all)  behaviour  of  the  phenomenon
itself.  A  dummy  hand  swathed  in  cotton  wool  does  not  behave
like  that  described  upon  p.  678  of  Professor  Richet's  Traite
de  Metapsychique  {2"  ed.),  neither  does  a  dummy  head  resemble
that  mentioned-  by  Dr.  Geley  on  p.  13  of  the  Bulletin  of  the
Inst.  Gen. -Psychol.  (Nos.  1-3,  Paris,  1918).  But  since  we
camiot  dictate  as  to  what  supernormal  phenomena  must  or
must  not  resemble,  the  case  becomes  even  more  complicajted .
And  in  this  very  complication  lies  part  of  the  secret  of  the
tragic  and  at  the  same  time  farcical  story  of  Ladislaus  Laszlo
(VI).  Laszlo  was  an  electrical  artisan  and  is  generally  con-
sidered to  be  neuropathic.  lii  December  1921  he  made  the
acquaintance  of  M.  WUhelm  Tordai,  who  was  legally  con-
nected with  the  Finance  Ministry  at  Budapest.  Asking  to
be  investigated,  Laszlo  attracted  the  attention  of  M.  Tordai
who  became  convinced  of  the  authenticity  of  the  phenomena
and  formed  a  circle  for  their  investigation.  The  conditions
were  the  same  as  those  usually  obtaining  at  such  experiments.
Before  the  sitting  Laszlo  changed  his  clothes,  donned  a  bath-
ing costume  and  occasionally  took  a  bath.  The  cabinet  and
surroundings  were  also  said  to  be  carefully  examined.  Dim
white  light  was  used  together  with  red  light  or  sometimes
total  darkness.  Besides  producing  alleged  teleplasm,  luminous
phenomena  were  observed.  In  this  connection  it  is  interesting
and  highly  illuminating  to  read  the  accounts  of  the  observers
before  the  exposure.  I  select  the  following  passages  and
translate  them  verbatim.

'■  Luminous  phenomena  appeared,  at  first  close  to  the
medium's  body  but  latterly  at  a  distance  of  several  metres
from  him.  The  size  of  these  lights  varied  from  that  of  a
pea  to  that  of  a  pigeon's  egg.  At  times  these  lights  moved
in  rapid  zig-zag  lines  resembling  comets.  .  .  ."

"A  trembling  of  the  Avhole  body  then  set  in.  The  hands
and  feet  become  cold.  Saliva  in  abundance  drops  to  the
ground.  After  the  flow  of  saliva  there  emerges  from  the
mouth  a  band  of  plasma  3  cm.  broad  and  20  cm.  long."


330  E.  J.  Dingwall  [pakt


On  April  24th,  1923,  a  special  test  took  place.  The  medium
was  stripped,  searched,  and  taken  to  a  special  room  con-
taining the  minimum  of  furniture.  A  purgative  was  adminis
tered,  the  stomach  j)ump  was  employed  and  he  was  watched  j  |
for  twenty-four  hours  before  being  taken  to  the  seance  room.i*  is
At  the  sitting  four  photographs  were  taken  of  alleged  tele-  :
plasm  emergmg  from  the  mouth.  They  show  a  strip  5  to:  i
6  cm.  broad  and  60  to  70  cms.  long.  At  other  sittings  the  I  [a
medium  wore .  a  veil  as  in  the  case  of  Eva  C.  The  director  k
thus  describes  the  phenomenon.  I  51

"  At  this experiment I had shpped  my  hands under  the
veil,  separating  it  with  forefinger  and thumb  and  keeping  it
as  far  away  from  the  mouth  of  the  medium  as  possible. With  ']
the  surface  of  my  hand  I  controlled  and  guided  involuntarily
the movements of the plasma. This time again, we  could
clearly  observe,  in  the  red  light,  the  withdrawal  of  the  sub- ;  f
stance  through  the  veil  and  afterwards  ascertain  that  the  veili'  la
was  intact  "  (p.  6).  Mi

In  criticising  this  account  Baron  von  Schrenck  compares  the  !
photograph  with  those  taken  with  Eva  C.  and  Stanislawa  P.
He  declares  that  with  Eva  the  mouth  is  wide  open  and
the  veil  is  not  drawn  into  the  cavity  whilst  with  Stanis-
lawa a  small  portion  of  the  substance  is  seen  inside  the
veU.i

How  far  Baron  von  Schrenck  is  correct  in  this  assertion
I  am  not  prepared  to  say. During  the  sittings  with  Eva  in
London  it  was  observed  that  the  veil  was  drawn  into  Eva's
mouth,  and  I  published  a  statement  upon  that  very  point.^i;
Moreover  it  appears  to  me  that  in  Fig.  155  the  veil  is  again  i
drawn  into  Eva's  mouth,  and  I  cannot  think  that  the  case  of  ^
Stanislawa  P.  can  be  called  conclusive  from  the  fact  that  a
portion  of  the  substance  is  seen  behind  the  mesh  apparently
inside  it.

The  apparent  vitality  of  the  substance  was  also  noticed  by
the  Hungarian  observers.  With  red  light  falling  directly  upon
the  plasma  a  piece  was  seen  upon  the  ground  at  a  distance
of  60  cm.  from  the  medium. "  As  if  attached  to  an  invisible  t


•  See  Materialisations-Phaenomene,  2"  Aufl.,  figs.  155,  213.
^Proceedings,  1922,  p.  322.


i

r|  xcn.]  Telekinetic  and  Teleplastic  Mediumship  331


thread,  it  crawled  to  his  feet,  climbing  up  the  body  and  dis-
appeared into  the  mouth."  ^

Upon  other  occasions  the  observers  handled  the  substance.
The  report  reads  :  "A  few  seconds  later,  the  white,  cold  and
foam-like  plasma  which  lay  on  our  hands  withdrew  into  the
medium's  mouth  "  (p.  7).  Upon  hearing  of  the  marvels  Baron
von  Schrenck  visited  Budapest  and  had  four  sittings  with
Laszlo.

In  his  published  accounts  it  is  clear  that  he was  far  from
]  satisfied  with  the  phenomena  and  general  conditions.  Indeed
i  at  the  conclusion  of  the  series,  he  wrote  to  M.  Tordai  expres-
sing  his  uncertainties. He  advised  him  to  so  seize  the  pheno-
menon and ascertain its real nature. M. Tordai,  however,
]y  disregarded  his  advice  and  gave  a  lecture  upon  Laszlo 's  medium-
ship. A  professional  showman  was  present  at  the  lecture,  and,
approaching Laszlo offered him an engagement. To  him
Laszlo confessed  that the whole  thing  was fraudulent,  and
proofs of his guilt were finally established. One of  the
sitters  '  had  assisted  him and examples of the substance  in
the  shape  of  old  pieces  of  muslin  soaked  in  fat,  etc.,  were
discovered.

In  Dr.  von  Schrenck's  pungent  criticism  of  the  case  two
principal  points  are  raised.  His  first  objection  is  that  the
products  were  so  artificial  in  appearance  that  they  had  to  be
regarded  with  extreme  scepticism.  Now  it  is  clear  from  the
passages  I  have  quoted  above  that  the  Hungarian  observers
were  quite  convinced  of  the  authenticity  of  the  phenomena
even  though  they  themselves  may  have  noticed  marks  of
artificiality.  It  is  to  be  remarked  that  they  reported  self-
mobility,  change  of  form  and  the  passage  of  the  substance
through  the  veil.  Indeed  from  their  reports  it  is  difficult  to
understand  how  the  deception  was  carried  on  unless  we  re-
member the  religious  atmosphere  of  the  performances.  Passages
from  the  Bible  were  read  and  the  medium's  guide,  "  Dr.  Grunhut,"
gave salutary advice. The circle had instituted the  best

^  Cf.  Mat.-Phaen.,  Figs.  128  and  130  where  in  the  one  case  the  sub-
stance lies  on  the  medium's  chest  supported  by  a  black  thread  from
the  mouth  and  in  the  other  (the  second  photograph)  the  same  appear-
ance is  seen  suspended  from  the  breasts,  the  black  thread  being  entangled
with  it.


332


E.  J .  Dingioall


[part


I


control  they  could  devise  and  it  can  scarcely  be  contended
that  it  was  not  severe.  It  is  true  that  it  was  totally  in-
efficient, like  that  of  the  medium  Erto,  but  it  was  the  best
these  inexperienced  observers  could  suggest.  In  spite  of
all  the  medium  succeeded  in  smuggling  in  his  apparatus.
Even  the  artificial  appearance  of  the  products  cannot  be
considered  proof  of  their  normal  origin.  Dr.  von  Schrenck
himself  would  scarcely  deny,  I  think,  that  certain  of  the  pro-
ductions of  Eva  C.  and  Stanislawa  P.  suffer  from  the  same
objection. The  answer  to  this  point  Dr.  von  Schrenck  him-
self i^artly  furnishes  when  he  speaks  of  the  control  of  the
hands.  For  if  the  hands  are  held  then  the  arrangement  of
the  products  becomes  a  matter  of  some  difficulty.  Laszlo's
hands  were  sometimes  held  and  sometimes  not.  Often  the
hands  were  free  behind  the  curtains  between  the  appearance
of  different  phenomena. ^  Scrupulous,  though  inefficient,  in
the  bodily  control,  the  Hungarian  enquirers  failed  to  perceive
the  enormous  importance  of  the  hand-control.  It  is  this
inability  to  discriminate  the  important  from  the  unimportant,
not  only  in  actual  sittings  but  in  considering  the  literature
of  the  subject,  that  is  at  the  root  of  many  of  the  difficulties
of  psychical  research.  For  if  observers  camiot  distinguish  the
differences  between,  we  will  say,  the  phenomena  of  WiUy
Schneider  and  those  of  Palladino,  or  of  Laszlo  and  Eva  C,
then  the  results  can  never  be  accepted  by  serious  students
The  history  of  Laszlo  is  not  more  incredible  than  the  amazing
performances  of  Eldred  whose  exploits  were  the  wonder  of
the  spiritualistic  world  for  some  two  years.  A  solid  basis
for  our  work  can  only  be  found  in  such  laborious  series  of
experiments  as  those  conducted  by  Baron  von  Schrenck  with
the  medium  WUly  Schneider.  If  this  series  contrasted  with
the  Laszlo  series  teaches  us  anything,  it  is  the  radical  differences
of  treatment  necessary  in  the  investigation  of  telekinetic  and
teleplastic  mediumship.

iCf.  Mat.-Phaen.,  Figs,  36,  82,  88,  110,  137,  140,  209,  etc.  |

"  Dr.  Gelej'  in  his  account  of  his  sittings  with  Eva  C.  [U Ectojilasmie
et  la  Clairvoyance)  (Paris,  1924)  says  (p.  198): — "  Je  repete  qvie  ses
mains  restaient  toujours  en  vue  et  tennes  [italics  his]  en  dehors  des
rideaiix."  An  examination  of  his  accompanying  photographs  show  that
in  the  only  Jour  which  show  bolh  liands,  in  one  only  is  one  hand  held !


iroi


of


tea
it(

lilt
n
pro

IfC

tec


Jiid
Ike

ate
and
tliei


IT


XCII.]


Review


333


REVIEW.

Supernormal  Faculties  in  Man :  An  Experimental  Study  by
Eugene  Osty.  Translated  from  the  French  by  Stanley
DE  Brath,  M.I.C.E.  (London:  Methuen  &  Co.  1923.
Pp.  xi,  245. 15s.  net.)

Dr.  Osty  is  a  French  medical  man  who  published  in  1913  a
work  on  Lucidity  and  Intuition,  embodying  what  he  had  learnt
by  "  three  years'  experimental  study  of  the  strange  faculty
possessed  by  certain  persons  of  revealing  the  course  of  an
individual  life,  and  that  without  regard  to  the  normal  exercise
of  their  intelligence,  to  information  from  then*  ordinary  senses,
and  to  the  insuperable  obstacles  which  time  and  space  put  in
the  way  of  our  ordinary  perception,"  and  sums  up  his  sub-
sequent researches  in  the  present  book.  These,  he  claims  (p.
vii),  show  that  supernormal  cognition  is  producible  at  will,
independent  of  beliefs  and  faith  in  witnesses,  and  is  susceptible
of  exact  observation  and  indefinitely  repeated  experimentation.

It  can  hardly,  however,  be  maintained  that  he  succeeds  in
making  good  this  very  large  claim.  For,  though  his  book  is
readable  and  full  of  interesting  stories,  and  no  one  after  reading
it  could  doubt  either  his  good  faith,  his  ingenuity,  or  his  en-
enthusiasm,  it  is  disappointing  to  find  that  his  method  of
'  experimenting  '  is  merely  that  of  consulting  the  oracle  of  the
professional  clairvoyants  who  seem  to  abound  in  France,  and
recounting  their  successes  with  a  considerable  display  of
technical  terminology.  This  method  may  be  repeatable  in-
definitely, and  even  ad  nauseam,  but  it  hardly  deserves  to  be
called  '  experiment '  or  even  '  precise  observation,'  and  correct

^  Mr.  de  Brath  translates  "  revealing  the  sequences  of  individual  lives
independently  of  normal  intelligence,  of  normal  sensorial  information,
and  also  of  the  unavoidable  obstacles ".  .  .  ,  a  rendering  which  reveals
the  chief  defect  of  his  translation.  It  is  adequate,  though  not  always
accurate,  in  ordinary  narrative  (as  when  on  p.  234  he  translates  '  gros  '
and  '  wOTce '  by  'big'  and  'small'),  but  tends  to  become  obscure  in
theoretical  passages.


I


334  F.  C.  S.  Schiller  [part

results  are  certainly  not  producible  by  it  at  will.  Dr.  Osty  of
coui'se  knows  this  as  well  as  anyone  ;  but  it  is  only  towards
the  end  of  the  book,  in  a  valuable  chapter  on  '  errors  in
metagnomy  '  that  one  learns  that  errors  abound  and  "  pervade
metagnomic  seances  in  variable  proportions.  .  .  .  Some  seances
contain  scarcely  any,  others  contain  a  few,  others  many "
(p.  205),  and  that  Dr.  Osty,  though  he  has  had  "  ideally  good
seances,"  has  never  come  across  "  an  impeccable  percipient "
(p.  215).  All  are  C3.pable  of  starting  off  on  a  wrong  clue,  and
incapable  of  distinguishing  between  a  genuinely  supernormal
vision,  an  impression  telepathically  imbibed  from  another  mind,
and  a  product  of  the  '  fabulation '  of  their  own  subconscious
imagination.  Moreover,  their  visions  are  always  fragmentary,
and  therefore  frequently  misleading  ;  and  public  seances,  "  or
even  private  seances  at  which  several  persons  are  present  "  are
conducive  to  error  (p.  233).  Yet  it  is  evident  that  private
sittings  at  which  only  one  '  experimenter  '  is  jiresent,  and  has
to  record  all  that  is  said  by  both  parties,  are  liable  to  errors
of  a  different  type  :  they  can  never  inspire  confidence  like  a
sitting  of  which  a  contemporaneous  proces  verbal  is  extant.  If
in  addition  one  recognises  that  every  subject  is  different  and
has  idiosyncrasies  to  be  humoured,  and  that  hardly  a  glimmer
of  a  theoretic  explanation  of  the  facts  alleged  is  in  sight,  it
will  not  seem  extravagant  to  say  that  we  are  still  Yerj  far
from  being  in  a  position  to  call  supernormal  cognition  an
experimental  study  reproducible  at  will.

True  there  remains  a  considerable  body  of  evidence  in  its  t
favour,  which  can  hardly  all  be  explained  away. Nor  need  it  ji
be  denied  that  Dr.  Osty  has  materially  added  to  it. But  its
quaUty  is  unsatisfactory  and  not  always  above  suspicion,  and,  i
so  far  as  it  is  fact, it  is  still  uncomprehended  fact. Only  ^
minute  and  co-operative  study  can  be  expected  to  yield  the  I
clues  that  will  lead  to  explanations  and  to  experimental  con-  jj
trol  over  it. And  for  this  purpose  it  will  be  necessary  to
have  more,  and  more  complete,  accounts  of  the  exact  proceedings  i;
at  the  sittings  at  which  apparently  supernormal  knowledge  is  '
obtained. Dr. Osty (p.  239)  regards  these  demands  as  un-
reasonable, and  never  gives  a  record  of  even  one  of  his  sittings
in  full,  as  a  specimen  of  his  procedure. The  reader  therefore
has  to  take  his  accounts  on  trust,  and  cannot  check  his  in-


ler(


XCII.]


Review


335


ferences.  His  excuse  is  that  the  accumulation  of  mere  obser-
vations without  hypotheses  is  very  slow  work,  and  that  such
records  are  very  dull  reading.  True,  but  the  question  is
whether  they  are  not  scientifically  necessary  in  the  present
state  of  the  inquiry.  They  are  at  any  rate  more  important
than  that  every  investigator  should  start  afresh  with  a  new
terminology  of  his  own,  especially  when  it  is  incorrectly  formed.
For  the  term  '  metagnomy  '  which  Dr.  Osty  has  adopted  from
Boirac  should  mean  not  '  beyond -intelligence  '  but  '  a/ier-judg-
ment '  (or  '  opinion  ').  Lack  of  agreement  about  terminology  is
one  of  the  least  of  the  difficulties  of  psychical  research  ;  but
what  is  siu-prising  is  that  the  French  students  of  these  subjects,
who  are  lacking  neither  in  numbers,  nor  in  enthusiasm,  nor  in
ability  and  scientific  repute,  should  not  band  themselves  to-
gether into  a  Society  like  ours.

F.  C.  S.  ScniLLER.


336


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


APPENDIX II. TO MRS. SIDGWICK'S PAPER  ON
PROFESSOR  MURRAY'S  EXPERIMENTS  IN
THOUGHT-TRANSFERENCE.

The  experiments  made  on  December  6  and  7,  1924,  of
which  the  record  is  given  below,  are  of  interest  for  three
reasons.  In  the  first  place,  only  two  (Mr.  G.  W.  Balfour
and  Mr.  Basil  Murray)  of  the  company  had  been  present
at  any  of  the  previous  experiments  ;  in  the  second  place,
these  are  two  of  the  very  rare  occasions  on  which  experi-
ments have  been  attempted  elsewhere  than  in  Professor
Murray's  own  home  or  home-ckcle  ;  and  in  the  third
place,  three  out  of  the  five  successes  or  partial  successes
on  December  6,  1924,  were  obtained  when  the  subject
had  been  chosen  by  some  one  who  had  never  been  present
before  at  experiments  of  Professor  Murray's.

Mr.  Basil  Murray  was  asked  to  choose  the  subject  of
the  first  three  experiments  on  December  6,  because,  the
surroundings  being  strange,  it  was  thought  that  there
would  be  a  better  chance  of  success  if  a  beginning  were
made  with  an  agent  to  whom  Professor  Murray  was
accustomed.

The  experiments  on  December  7,  1924,  failed, — probably
because  the  conditions  were  unfavourable.  It  should  be
noted  that  in  one  instance  Professor  Murray's  impressions
seem  to  have  been  infiuenced  by  things  that  had  happened
earlier  in  the  day.

December  6,  1924.

FISHERS  HILL,  WOKING

Present — Lady  Betty  Balfouk,  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick,
Miss  Leonora  Piddington,  Messrs.  G.  W.  Balfour,
Basil  Murray,  J.  G.  Piddington,  Lord  Balfour,,
AND  Professor  G.  Murray.

While  the  subject  of  each  experiment  was  being  chosen
anci  recorded  Professor  Murray  waited  in  the  dining-room,


xcii.]  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference  337


the rest of the company being m the  drawing-room.
During  his  absence  the  drawing-room  door  was  shut  on
every occasion, and on the first occasion the  dining-
room door  was  also  shut. On  subsequent  occasions  the
dining-room door was left open. When the subject  of
the experiment had been chosen and recorded,  Mrs.
[ Sidgwick  on  each  occasion  but  one  left  the  drawing-room
; in  order  to  summon  Professor  Murray. The  drawing-room
f  \  is  separated  from  the  dining-room  by  another  room  about
t  I  thirty-six feet in length. While the subject was  being
^  i  chosen  and  recorded  Professor  Murray  was  separated  by
. at  least forty-six feet from the  person nearest  to  the
t drawing-room door. The account of the subject  chosen
]  ,  was  dictated  to  the  recorder  in  a  quiet  tone  of  voice  :
5 in fact in so quiet a tone that more than once  the
t recorder  had  to  ask  for  words  to  be  repeated. On  each
\  I  occasion Professor  Murray  held  the hand of  the  person
I  who  had  chosen  the  subject. J.  G.  Piddington  acted  as
if  j  recorder of all the experiments except the 9th,  which
e was  recorded  by  Basil  Murray.

e  During  two,  if  not  three,  of  the  first  three  experiments —
e  all  of  which  failed — there  was  talking  among  the  experi-
,  '  menters  after  the  subject  had  been  written  down,  it  not
having  been  sufficiently  realised  at  first  that  talking  or
y  other  kind  of  noise  or  disturbance  is  thought  to  diminish
,j the  chances  of  success.

'l  ;  First  Experiment,  9.51

Subject  {chosen  by  Basil  Murray).  "  I'm  thinking  of  Mussolmi
interviewing  a  number  of  Press  correspondents  at  Rome.  They
were  waiting  in  a  large  room,  and  he  was  three-quarters  of
an  hour  late,  and  eventually  arrived  with  eight  Fascisti
walking  backwards  bowing  to  him  as  he  came  m."
^  Professor  Murray.  I  don't  think  I  shall  get  anjd^hing.
I've  a  faint  impression  of  Sir  Basil  Zaharoff."

Second  Experiment,  10.1  p.m.

Subject  {chosen  by  Basil  Murray). "  I'm  thinking  of  David
'0 Copperfield  and  Peggotty  driving  in  the  'bus."
a, Professor  Murray.  "No."


338


Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick


[part


Third  Experiment,  10. 4:  p.m.

Subject  {chosen  by  Basil  Murray).  "I'm  thinking  of  Lord
Cecil  reading  the  Covenant  at  the  CouncU  at  the  last  Assembly,
on  the  occasion  of  the  Corfu  incident,  to  the  Italians  and
Greeks."

Professor  Murray. "  No."

At  this  point  Professor  Murray  said  he  thought  he
would  not  be  successful  and  had  better  stop.  Piddington
asked  him  to  have  one  more  try.

Fourth  Experiment,  10.5  p.m.

Subject  (chosen  by  J.  G.  Piddington,  who,  as  he  records  it,
reads  it  out).  "I'm  thinking  of  Queen  Victoria  when  she
learnt  that  she  was  next  in  succession  to  the  throne  sajong
'  I  wiU  be  good  '."

Professor  Murray.  "  It's  something  in  a  book.  No.  it's
a  picture.  It's  the  news  coming  to  Queen  Victoria  that
she  is  Queen."

Fifth  Experiment,  10.10  p.m.

Subject  {chosen  by  J.  O.  Piddington,  who,  as  he  records  it,
reads  it  out).  "  I'm  thinking  of  Napoleon  on  the  retreat  from
Moscow  with  Murat  riding  by  his  side."

Professor  Murray. "  No  impression."

■Sixth  Experiment,  \0.\2p.m.

Subject  {chosen  by  Basil  Murray).

"'  He  stood  and  heard  the  steeple

Sprinlde  the  quarters  on  the  morning  town  :
'  One,  two,  three,  four.
On  market  place  and  people
It  tossed  them  down.'  "
Professor  Murray. "  This  is  poetry  "  (said  as  he  entered
the  room). (Pause). "  De  dum  de  dum  de  steeple  de
dum de dum  the  town, one two  three  four. Yes,  I
don't  know  the  thing,  but  I  rather  think  it's  something
like  '  He  stood  and  heard  the steeple something  and
something  on  the  dreaming  town something  down.'  "
Note. — These  same  lines  had  been  chosen  several  years  before  for
-an  experiment, and  the  experiment  had partially  succeeded.
See  page  233  above.


XCII.]


Experiments  in  Thought-Transference


339


Seventh  Experiment,  10.20  p.m.  ■  ■

Subject {chosen by Basil Murray). "  I'm thinking of  a

scene  in  Galsworthy's  The  White  Monkey,  where  Soames  Forsyte

is  defying  a  shareholders'  meeting.

Professor  Murray.  "  I  don't  think  I  shall  get  it.  Famt
impression  of  a  line  of  Homer."

Eighth  Experiment,  10.24  p.m.

Subject  (chosen  by  Basil  Murray).  "  I'm  thinldng  of  my
sister  Rosalind  riding  on  a  grey  horse  across  Port  Meadow
with  Rupert  Brooke."

Professor Murray. "  It's  gallopmg — somebody  galloping
on  grass  over — I  should  say  Port  Meadow. It's  (pause)
I  should  think  it  was  Rosalind."
Basil  Murray. "  Yes,  anyone  with  her  ?  "
Professor Murray. "  I should be guessing. Mr. Z.  I

should  say  it  was  a  grey  horse."
Basil  Murray. "  That's  odd, because I  was  thinking  of
Mr.  Z. I  very  nearly  said  that  she  was  riding  a  dead
horse."

Professor  Murray. "  I  very  nearly  said  '  a  dead  horse.'  "
Note. — Mr.  Z.  was  a  horse-dealer  who  sold  a  friend  of  the
Murray s  a  dead  horse.

Ninth  Experiment.

Subject  (chosen  by  J.  O.  Piddington).  "  I'm  thinking  of
Thomas  a  Becket  being  murdered  in  Canterbury  Cathedral."

Professor  Murray.  ■'  This  is  something  rather  horrible  "
(spoken  at  once  on  entering  the  room).  "  Oh  !  (Pause).
It's  some  one  being  murdered  in  a  church  or  something
like  that.  (Pause.)  I  first  thought  it  was  somethmg
in  the  Bolshevist  revolution,  but  I'm  sure  it  isn't
Russian.  Oh  !  I  should  think  it  was  the  murder  of
Thomas  a  Becket.

Note. — When  the  experiment  was  over,  Piddington  said  that
le had thought of including in the subject "  and  saying

'  Into  thy  hands,  O  Lord,  I  commend  my  spirit  '  "  ;  but
:not  being  sure  whether  a  Becket  had  said  these  words,  he
'did  not  include  them  ; but  nevertheless  he  had  thought  of

the  text  during  the  experiment.  Professor  Murray  said  he  had
Jhad  no  impression  of  the  text.


340


M7's.  Henry  Sidgwick


[PART


When  the  ninth  experiment  was  over  Professor  Murray-
suggested  that  Lord  Balfour  should  choose  the  subject  of
the  next  experiment.

Tenth  Experiment,  10.37  p.m.

Subject  {chosen  by  Lord  Balfour). "  I'm  thinldng  of  Robert

Walpole  talldng  Latin  to  George  I."
Professor  Murray  (speaking  as  he  enters  the  room).
"  Something  Eighteenth  Century."  (Here  Lord  Balfour
nodded  assent.)  "  I  don't  think  I  shall  quite  get  it
exactly.  Doctor  Johnson  meeting  George  III.  in  the
King's  Library  ;  but  I'm  sure  he's  talking  Latin  to  him — •
which  he  didn't  do.  I  don"t  think  I  shall  get  it  right.
Wait.  I've  nearly  got  it.  Eighteenth  Century.  Somebody-
talking  Latin  to  a  kmg."

December  7,  1924.
FISHERS  HILL,  WOKING

Present — Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick,  Hon.  Mrs.  G.  Cole,  Misa
L.  PiDDiNGTON,  Messrs.  G.  W.  Balfour,  Basil  Murray,.
J.  G.  PiDDiNGTON,  Lord  Balfour,  and  Professor  G..
Murray.

Conditions  the  same  as  on  December  6,  1924,  except
that  on  every  occasion  the  dining-room  door,  as  -well  as
the  dra-wing-room  door,  -was  shut,  and  that  Professor
Murray  -was  summoned  back  to  the  dra-wing-room  by
Miss  Piddington  instead  of  by  Mrs.  Sidgwick.

When  asked  whether  he  would  be  wiUing  to  try  further
experiments  Professor  Murray  had  said  he  would  be  quite
willing  to  do  so,  but  that  he  anticipated  failure,  as  he
was  not  in  the  tranquil  and  serene  mood  favourable  to-
success.  The  day  had  been  a  disturbing  one  for  the
whole  party,  as  in  the  morning  Lady  Betty  BaKour  had
broken  her  leg.

First  Experiment,  9.32  p.m.  ■  :  ■

Subject  (chosen  by  Basil  Murray).  -
"  I  was  the  man  the  Duke  spoke  to  ;
I  helped  the  Duchess  to  cast  off  his  yoke,  too."

[Browning,  The  Flight  of  the  Duchess.},

f


xcii.]  Experiments  in  Thought -Transference  341


Professor  Murray.  "  Is  it  Basil  ?  I  don't  expect  this  is
right.  The  only  thing  I'm  getting  is  enormous  tropical
forests.

Basil  Murray.  '  I  was  thinking  of  '  Ours  is  a  great  wild
country.'  "  [i.e.  the  first  line  of  the  passage  in  the
poem  which  describes  the  Duke's  country  : — which,
however,  is  not  a  tropical  one.]

Professor  Murray.  I  also  had  the  feeluig  of  a  tree  fall-
ing down."

Note. — Earlier  in  tlie  day  there  had  been  conversation  about
tropical  forests  ;  and  the  accident  to  Ladj^  Betty  Balfour  had
been  in  part  caused  by  the  fall  of  the  rotten  branch  of  a  tree.

Second  Experiment,  9.37  jj.w.

Subject  {chosen  by  Basil  Hurray).  "I'm  thinldng  of  my
sister  throwing  a  ball  to  Jack  Medley  at  a  terrace  at  Alassio,
and  of  him  falling  over  backwards  m  the  attempt  to  catch  it —
over  the  edge  of  the  terrace."

Professor  Murray. "  No. Nothuig  at  all."

Third  Experiment.

Subject  {chosen  by  J.  G.  Piddington).  "  Sir  Waiter  Raleigh
in  a  bad  temper  refusing  to  spread  his  cloak  before  Queen
Mizabeth."

Professor  Murray.  I  thought  for  a  moment  I  should  get
that.  No."

J.  G.  Piddington. "  Did  you  get  anything  ?  "
Professor Murray. "  I got a momentary impression  of
the  Duke  of  Wellington."


FORMER  PRESIDENTS  OF  THE  SOCIETY  FOR  PSYCHICAL  RESEARCH.


Peofessob  Henry  Sidgwiok,  -  1882-84.
i  Pkopessoe  Bauohr  Sibwabt,

F.R.S., 1885-87.

I PEOFESSOK  HENEY  SlDGWICK, -  1888-92.

The  Eael  of  Balfour,  K.G.

O.M.,  P.R.S., - - . -  1893.

Peofbssor  William  James,  -  -  1894-95.
I  8iE William  Crookes,O.M.,F.R.S.,  1896-99.
I  Feederio  W.  H.  Myers,  -  -  1900.

I  8m  Oliver  Lodge,  F.R.S.  -  1901-03.

i  Sm  William  Bakeett,  P.R.S., -  1904.

Peofbssor  Chaeles  Richet,  - -  1905.

The  Right  Hon.  G.  W.  Balfotte,-  190G-0T.
I  Mes.  Heney  Sidgwiok,  - - -  1908-09.

H.  ARTHUR  Smith,  - -  -  1910.


Andrew  Lang,  1911.

Rt.  Rev.  Bishop  W.  Boyd  Cae-

pentee,  d.d., ....  1912.

Professor  Henri  Bergson,  .  .  1913.
P.  C.  S.  Sohiller,  D.Sc,  -  -  1914.
Professor Gilbert  Murray,

LL.D.,  Litt.D.,  -  -  -  1915.16.
L.  P.  Jacks.  LL.D.,  D.D., - -  1917-18.

LORD  RAYLEIQH,  OM.,  P.R.S., -  1919.

W. McDougall, F.R.S.,  M.Sc,

M.B., 1920-21.

T.  W.  Mitchell,  M.D..  -  -  .  1922.
Camille  Plammahion,  -  -  -  1923.
J.G.  PiDDINGTON,  - - - -  1924.


OFFICERS  AND  COUNCIL  FOR  1925.


PRESIDENT.
J.  G.  PiDDINGTON.

VICE-PRESIDENTS.


The  Earl  of  Balfour,  K.G.,  F.R.S.

Rt.  Hon.  G.  W.  Balfoqr.

George  B.  Dorr.

L.  P.  Jacks,  LL.D.,  D.D.

Sir  Lawrence  Jones,  Bart.

Sir  Oliver  Lodge,  F.R.S.,  D.Sc.


Professor  Gilbert  Murray,  LL.D.

Litt.D.
J.  G.  Piddington.
F.  C.  S.  Schiller,  D.Sc.
Sydney  C.  Scott.

Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick,  D.Litt.,LL.D.
Sir  J.  J.  Thomson,  O.M.,  F.R.S.


COUNCIL.


W.  W.  Baggally.

The  Rt.  Hon.  G.  W.  Balfour.

Ernest  N.  Bennett.

W.  R.  Bousfield,  K.C.,  F.R.S.

W.  Brown,  M.D.,  D.Sc.

The  Hon.  Everard  Feilding.

L.  P.  Jacks,  LL.D.,  D.D.

Sir  Lawrence  Jones,  Bart.

G.  W.  Lambert.

Sir  Oliver  Lodge,  F.R.S.

W.  McDougall,  F.R.S.,  M.Sc,  M.B.


T.  W.  Mitchell,  M.D.
Prof.Gilbert  Murray,  LL.D., Litt.D.
J.  G.  Piddington.
W.  H.  Salter.
Mrs.  W.  H.  Salter.
F.  C.  S.  Schiller,  D.Sc.
Sydney  C.  Scott.

Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick,  D.Litt.,LL.D.
W.  Whately  Smith.
V.  J.  Woolley,  M.D.
M.  B.  Wright,  M.D.


HON.  TREASURER.
W.  H.  Salter,  31  Tavistock  Square,  Loudon,  W.C.  1.

HON.  SECRETARIES.
Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick,  Fishers  Hill,  Woking,  Surrey.
W.  H.  Salter,  31  Tavistock  Square,  London,  W.C.  1.

HON.  RESEARCH  OFFICER.
V.  J.  Woolley,  M.D.,  St.  Thoji.vs's  Hospital,  London,  S.E.

HON.  EDITOR.

Mrs.  W.  H.  Salter,  31  Tavistock  Square,  London,  W.C.  1.
RESEARCH  OFFICER.
E.  .J.  Dingwall,  31  Tavistock  St^uare,  London,  W.C.  1.

SECRETARY  AND  LIBRARIAN.
Miss  I.  Newton,  31  Tavistock  Square,  London,  W.C.  1.
AGENTS  FOR  AMERICA.
The  F.  W.  Faxon  Co.,  83  Francis  Street,  Boston,  Mass.,  U.S.A..

Z


344


Members  arid  Associates.


[PAR'i  :cn,


MEMBERS  AND  ASSOCIATES.

June,  1925.
President — J.  G.  Piddington.

Vice-Presidents.

The  Right  Hon.  the  Earl  of  Balfour,  K.G.,  O.M.,  F.Pv.S.,  4  Carltoii

Gardens,  London,  S.W.  1.
The  Right  Hon.  G.  W.  Balfour,  Fishers  Hill,  Woking,  Surrey.
George  B.  Dorr,  18  Commonwealth  Avenue,  Boston,  Mass.,  U.S.i^
L.  P.  Jacks,  LL.D.,  D.D.,  Shotover  Edge,  Headington,  Oxford
Sir  Lawrence  Jones,  Bart.,  39  Harrington  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  7'
Sir  Oliver  Lodge,  F.R.S.,  Normanton,  Lake,  Nr.  Salisbury.
Professor  Gilbert  Murray,  LL.D.,  Litt.D.,  Yatscombe,  Boar's  Hill

Oxford.

J.  G.  Piddington,  Fishers  Hill,  Woking,  Surrey.
F.  C.  S.  Schiller,  D.Sc,  Corpus  Christi  College,  Oxford.
Sydney  C.  Scott,  92  Westbourne  Terrace,  Hyde  Park,  London
W.  2.

Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick,  D.Litt.,  LL.D.,  Fishers  Hill,  Woking,  Surrey
Sir  J.  J.  Thomson,  O.M.,  F.R.S.,  Trinity  Lodge,  Cambridge.


Honorary  Members.

Madame  Curie,  Faculte  des  Sciences  de  Paris,  Laboratoire  dj
Physique  Generale,  12  rue  Cuvier,  Paris.  |
Miss  Alice  Johnson,  111  Grantchester  Meadows,  Cambridge,
Count  Perovsky-Petrovo-Solovovo.  I
Sir  Joseph  J,  Thomson,  O.M.,  F.R.S.,  Trkiity  Lodge,  Cambridge


Pro:


te
lall

h
hi
I,
nil


m


iCi

'an


^'iccii.]


Members  and  Associates.


345


Corresponding  Members.
Professor  A.  Alexander,  Caixa  906,  Rio  Janeiro.
Professor  Henri  Bergson,  32  Rue  Vital,  Paris.

President  Nicholas  M.  Butler,  Columbia  University,  New  York,
U.S.A.

Dr.  Max  Dessoir,  Speyererstrasse  9,  Berlin,  W.
Professor  Dr.  Freud,  Berggasse  19,  Vienna.
Professor  Pierre  Janet,  54  Rue  de  Varenne,  VII'^,  Paris.
Dr.  C.  G.  Jung,  Seestrasse  228,  Kusnacht,  E.  Zurich,  Switzerland.
M. Maurice Maeterlinck, VUla des Abeilles, Avenue  des

Baumettes,  Nice.
Professor  Wm.  Romaine  Newbold,  Ph.D.,  Univ.  of  Pennsylvania,

Philadelphia,  Pa.,  U.S.A.
Professor  T.  K.  Oesterreich,  Nauklerstr.  23,  Tubingen.
Dr.  Eugene  Osty,  89  Avenue  Niel,  Paris.
Dr.  Morton  Prince,  458  Beacon  Street,  Boston,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
Dr.  Walter  F.  Prince,  346  Beacon  Street,  Boston,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
Professor  Charles  Richet,  15  Rue  de  I'Universite,  Paris,
i  Dr.  Freiherr  von  Schrenck-Notzing,  3  Max  Joseph  Strasse,  Munich«
Dr.  Rudolf  Tischner,  Ditlindenstr.,  18,  Munich.
M.  Carl  Vett,  Strandvej  6  Str.,  Copenhagen,  Denmark.

Hi


Honorary  Associates.

3ozzano,  E.,  Via  Genova  N.  47,  ViUa  Rosa,  Savona,  Italy.
|Dallas,  Miss  H.  A.,  Innisfail,  Crawley,  Sussex.
?ryer,  Rev.  A.  T.,  63  Newbridge  Road,  Bath,
^ow,  David,  5  Queen  Square,  Southampton  Row,  London,  W.C.  1.
Jrubb,  Edward,  9  Sollershott  West,  Letchworth,  Herts,
lill,  J.  Arthur,  Claremont,  Thornton,  Bradford,
iluirhead,  Professor  J.  H.,  The  Rowans,  Balsall  Common,  Nr.
Coventry.

lage,  M.,  33  Rue  de  Coulmiers,  XIV^  Arrt.,  Paris.

ItaweU,  Miss  F.  Melian,  45a  Arundel  Gardens,  Ladbroke  Grove,

London,  W.  11.
'uckey,  C.  Lloyd,  M.D.,  21b  Silverdale  Road,  Eastbourne,
an  Eeden,  Frederik,  M.D.,  Walden,  Bussum,  Holland,


[T!


346  Members  and  Associates.  [pi

Membees  and  Associates.

An  asterisk  is  prefixed  to  the  names  of  Members.


Isle
\


Abemethy,  Mrs.,  c/o  National  Provincial  and  Union  Bank

England,  Montpelier,  Cheltenham.
Acland-Hood,  Lady  Helena,  41  Cadogan  Street,  London,  S.W
Adair,  Desmond,  Little  Flixton,  Forest  Road,  Worthing.
Adamson,  T.,  16  Dominion  Buildings,  Edmonton,  Alberta,  Canac
Agelasto,  Michael  A.,  3-C.  Hague  Apt.,  606  Fairfax  Aven

Norfolk,  Va.,  U.S.A.
Aglen,  Su-  Francis  Inspectorate  General  of  Customs,  Peking,  ChiJ
*Ainsworth,  A.  S.,  Thompson  Falls,  Montana,  U.S.A.
Albree,  John,  Swampscott,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
Alexander,  Professor  S.,  Victoria  University,  Manchester.
Allan,  Miss  J.,  Torrance,  East  Kilbride,  Lanarkshire.
Allan,  Percy,  M.D.,  Crogdene,  Croham  Road,  South  Croyd^

Surrey.

Allen,  Professor  H.  J.,  c/o  The  National  Bank  of  India,  26  Bisho

gate,  London,  E.G.  2.
Allen,  William,  M.B.,  20  Sandyford  Place,  Glasgow.
*Allgood,  Guy  H.,  Nunwick,  Humshaugh,  Northumberland.
*Allison,  Mrs.  E.  W.,  Hotel  Warrington,  161  Madison  Aveni

New  York  City,  U.S.A.
*Anderson,  Lady,  Ballydavid,  Waterford,  Ireland.
Anderson,  Mrs.,  Brackenboro',  Bramhall,  Cheshire.
Anderson,  Brig. -General  A.  T.,  R.A.,  Ball  Crreen,  Karuah  Roe

Turramurra,  New  Soxith  Wales.
Anderson,  Mrs.  Henry  C,  20  Hermitage  Drive,  Edinburgh.
Andrews,  Dr.  Marion  B.,  73  Shrubbery  Avenue,  Worcester.
Anstey,  Lieut. -Colonel  E.  C,  R.A.,  c/o  Messrs.  Cox  &  Co.,

Charing  Cross,  London,  S.W.  L
*Appleby,  Joseph,  Farnley,  Great  Crosby,  Liverpool.
*Appleby,  J.  Stanley,  Elton  Manor,  Stockton-on-Tees.
Armstrong,  Charles  W.,  Gran  Via  Prat  de  la  Riba  36,  Sardano

Barcelona,  Spain.
Armstrong,  Miss  M.  M.,  65  Redington  Road,  Hampstead,  Londc
N.W.  3.

Arnold,  Mrs.  A.  E.,  98  Masbro'  Road,  London,  W.  14,
*Arnold-Forst«r,  Mrs.  H.  O.,  Basset  Down,  Swindon,  Wilts.


Ispl


i

'I


Cii.]  Members  and  Associates.  347


Ashcroft,  Mrs.,  Ladies'  Athenaeum  Club,  32  Dover  Street,  London,
W.  L

Ashcroft,  Rev.  Harold,  Smallwood  Manor,  Uttoxeter,  Stafford.
lAspland,  George  D.,  10  Elsworthy  Road,  London,  N.W.  3.
1^  j  Assheton-Smith,  Lady,  30  Queen  Anne's  Gate,  London,  S.W.  L
j  Atcherley,  J.  R.,  219  Elgar  Road,  Mont  Albert,  Victoria.
Atwater,  Horace  G.,  Norfolk,  St.  Lawrence  Co.,  N.Y.,  U.S.A.
Auden,  Harold  A.,  Studley,  Whitehedge  Road,  Garston,  Liverpool.
Austen,  Harold  W.  C,  M.D.,  2  Freeland  Road,  Ealing,  London,
W.  5.

Bacon,  Mrs.  Sewell,  Gate  House,  Northwood,  Middlesex.
'Baggally,  Wortley  W.,  7  Sillwood  Place,  Brighton.
Baggally,  Mrs.  W.  W.,  7  Sillwood  Place,  Brighton.
Baikie,  W.  S.,  Redroof,  Stromness,  Orkney  Islands.
Bailey,  Cyril,  Balliol  College,  Oxford.

Baker,  Alfred  L.,  141  S.  La  Salle  Street,  Chicago,  III,  U.S.A.
'Baker,  Miss  Mabel,  21  Lansdowne  Avenue,  Slough,  Bucks.
'Baldwin,  Mrs.,  1  Gloucester  Place,  London,  W.  1.
],ov 'Balfour,  Miss,  4  Carlton  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  1.

Balfour,  Right  Hon.  the  Earl  of,  K.G.,  O.M.,  F.R.S.,  4  Carlton

Gardens,  London,  S.W.  1.
'Balfour,  Mrs.  E.  W.  S.,  65  Cadogan  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  3.
Balfour,  Right  Hon.  G.  W.,  Fishers  Hill,  Woking,  Surrey.
Banner,  Mrs.,  Bishop's  Court,  Rochester,  Kent.
'Barclay,  Edwyn,  Down  Mere,  Poynings,  Sussex.
'Barclay,  Mrs.  Edwyn,  Down  Mere,  Poynings,  Sussex.
■Barkley,  Dr.  M.,  Box  162,  Carlyle,  111.,  U.S.A.
Barkworth, Mrs., Empress  Club,  35  Dover  Street,  London,
W.  1.

'BarloAV,  Miss  Katharine,  3  Maids  of  Honour  Row,  Richmond,  Surrey.
Barradell-Smith,  Mis.  E.  L.,  Hatfield,  The  Grove,  Slough.
Barrett,  Lady,  M.D.,  31  Devonshire  Place,  London,  W.  1.
'Barrow,  J.  R.,  Spring  Bank,  Uplyme,  Devon.
•Barton,  Glynn,  12  New  Cavendish  Street,  London,  W.  1.
ndll'Barton,  Mrs.  Glynn,  12  New  Cavendish  Street,  London,  W.  1.

ijBaruch,  Edgar,  564  I.  W.  Hellman  Building,  Los  Angeles,  Cal.,
J  U.S.A.

I  Batchelor,  E.,  I.C.S.,  23  Hogarth  Road,  London,  S.W.  5.
I 'Bates,  J.  Edwin,  M.B.,  55  Murray  Road,  Wimbledon,  London,
S.W.  19.


348


Members  and  Associates.


[PAE


*Batten,  Mrs.  Mount,  Mornington  Lodge,  West  Kensing-ton,  Londoi
W.  14.  I

*Battersea,  The  Lady,  Aston  Clinton,  Tring,  Herts.  !

*Bayley,  Weston  D.,  M.D.,  1724  Spruce  Street,  Philadelphia,  Pa

U.S.A.
Bayfield,  L.  Arthur.

*Bazett,  Miss  L.  Margery,  The  Firs,  RedhiU,  Surrey.  i
*Bazin,  E.  E.,  81  Kingston  Lane,  Teddington,  Middlesex.
*Beadon,  Mrs.,  at  11  Cheyne  Walk,  Chelsea,  London,  S.W.  3.
*Beattie,  Ivor  Hamilton.

*Beddard,  Miss  Margaret  W.,  8  Fourth  Avenue,  Hove,  Sussex.
*Beeby,  W.  T.,  M.D.,  84  Philbeach  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  5.
*Behrens,  Captain  Clive,  Swinton  Grange,  Malton,  Yorks.
Behrens,  Noel  Edward.
*Benedict,  Professor  H.  Y.,  3401  Guada  Cupe  Street,  Austin,  Texas
U.S.A.

Bennett,  Colin  N.,  Escot,  Penzance,  Cornwall.
*Bennett,  E.  N.,  12  Prince  Arthur  Road,  HamiDstead,  Londor
N.W.  3.

Benson,  Miss  A.  M.,  M.D.,  c/o  Messrs.  H.  S.  King  &  Co.,  65  Cornhil]
London,  E.C.  3.

Benson,  Arthur  C,  C.V.O.,  The  Old  Lodge,  Magdalene  College
Cambridge.

*Benson,  E.  F.,  25  Brompton  Square,  London,  S.W.  3.  !
*Bentley,  W.  P.,  4214  Swiss  Avenue,  Dallas,  Texas,  U.S.A.
Benton,  Dr.  J.  R.,  1436  West  University  Avenue,  Gainesvilk

Florida,  U.S.A.
*Berens,  Mrs.,  30  Chester  Square,  London,  S.W.  1
*Beresford,  J.  D.,  c/o  Messrs.  Collins,  48  Pall  Mall,  London,  S.W.  1
Berrington,  Rev.  Leslie  G.,  Churchover  Rectory,  Rugby.
♦Berry,  Mrs.  F.  M.  Dickinson,  M.D.,  21  Wimpole  Street,  London
W.  1.

*Bertie,  L.  W.  H.,  M.A.,  The  Nook,  110  Woodstock  Road,  Oxford.

*Best,  C.  S.,  13  Queen  Square,  Leeds.

*Besterman,  T.,  63  Boundary  Road,  London,  N.W.  8.

Betton,  C.  Steuart,  28  The  Drive,  West  Worthing,  Sussex.

Bevan,  Arthur  0.,  Townsend  House,  Nantwich,  Cheshire.

Bevan,  Mrs.  Robert,  131  Gloucester  Road,  London,  S.W.  7,

Bevan,  Hon.  Mrs.  R.  Yorke,  9  Rutland  Gate,  London,  S.W.  7.

Bidder,  George  P.,  Cavendish  Corner,  Hills  Road,  Cambridge.


I


Members  and  Associates.


349


*Bigg,  Miss  Louisa,  18  Acacia  Eoad,  St.  John's  Wood,  London,
N.W.  8.

♦Bird,  Mrs.  Francis  William,  East  Walpole,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
Blacklock,  Miss  C,  Lewie,  Ditchling,  Hassocks,  Sussex.
Blane,  Miss  Edith  H.,  22  Albion  Road,  Hampstead,  London,
N.W.  6.

*Blatchford,  Robert,  The  Firs,  Horsham,  Sussex.
Blathwayt,  W.,  Eagle  House,  Batheaston,  Bath.
Bligh,  Stanley  M.,  28  Grosvenor  Road,  London,  S.W.  L
Bloemfontein,  The  Right  Rev.  the  Lord  Bishop  of,  Bishop's  Lodge,

Bloemfontem,  O.R.C.,  S.  Africa.
Bois,  H.  G.,  c/o  Messrs.  Robertson  Bois  &  Co.,  12  Fenchurch
Street,  London,  E.G.  3.
*Bolam,  J.  G.,  125  Westbourne  Avenue,  Gateshead,  Durham.
sasf*Bolton,  Edward  J.,  Rossett  Hall,  Nr.  Wrexham.
*Bond,  F.  Bhgh,  F.R.I.B.A.,  44  Stratford  Road,  Kensington,
London,  W.  8.

Bond,  Major  W.  C.,  O.B.E.,  Shalesbrook,  Forest  Row,  Sussex.
Bond,  Mrs.  W.  C.,  Shalesbrook,  Forest  Row,  Sussex.
*Bonus,  A.  R.,  Oxford  and  Cambridge  Club,  Pall  Mall,  London,
S.W.  1.

Bosanquet,  Miss  Theodora,  38  Cheyne  Walk,  London,  S.W.  3.
*Bousfield,  W.  R.,  K.C.,  F.R.S.,  St.  Swithins,  Northwood,  Middx.
•Boustead,  Mrs.  J.  M.,  c/o  Messrs.  Boustead  Bros.,  5  Fenchurch

Street,  London,  E.G.
Bouwens,  B.  G.,  Old  Manor  House,  Littleton,  Shepperton,  Middlesex.
Bowden-Smith,  Mrs.,  Careys,  Brockenhurst,  Hants.
Bowen,  Miss  Anna  C,  210  E.  Main  Street,  Batavia,  N.Y.,  U.S.A.
*Bowen,  0.  H.,  M.R.C.S.,  L.R.C.P.,  Stanmore,  10  Foxley  Lane,
Purley,  Surrey.
Bower,  James  Garton,  Earlham  House,  Norwich.
•Bowyer,  Lieut-Colonel  W.  G.,  Weston  Manor,  Olney,  Bucks.
Boxer,  Miss  Cecile  F.,  Firwood,  Alum  Chine,  West  Bournemouth.
Boxer,  Major  H.  C,  Firwood,  Alum  Chine,  West  Bournemouth,
Brabrook,  Sir  Edward  W.,  C.B.,  Langham  House,  Wallington.
*Bracht,  Federico,  Cangallo  466,  Buenos  Aires,  Argentine  Republic.
♦Bradley,  Miss  A.  A.,  Bradley  Hill,  Hmgham,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
Bradley,  Professor  A.  C,  54  Scarsdale  Villas,  Kensington,  London,
W.  8.

*Bradley,  H.  Dennis,  Dorincourt,  Kingston  Vale,  London,  S.W.  15.


350


Member 5  and  Associates.


[part


♦Braithwaite,  Lieut.-General  Sir  Walter  P.,  K.C.B.,  c/o  Messrs.

Cox  &  Co.,  16  Charing  Cross,  London,  S.W.  1.
♦Brandt,  Rudolph  E.,  4  Fenchurch  Avenue,  London,  E.G.  3.

Bray,  F.  E.,  21  Evelyn  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  7.
^Breaker,  Geo.  H.,  312  Union  National  Bank,  Houston,  Texas,
U.S.A.  I

Brewster,  Bertram,  59  Madeley  Road,  Ealing,  London,  W.  5.

Bridges,  Mrs.,  Greatbridge  House,  Romsey,  Hants.
*Brinton,  R.  S.,  Croft  House,  Kidderminster.

Bristowe,  The  Hon.  L.  S.,  Mahogany  Hall,  Chipperfield,  Herts.
*Broad,  C.  D.,  Litt.D.,  Trinity  College,  Cambridge.
*Brock,  Mrs.  E.  A.  P.,  66  Queen's  Gardens,  London,  W.  2.

Bromberg,  Frederick  G.,  Mobile,  Alabama,  U.S.A.

Brooke,  Colonel  C.  K.,  Army  and  Navy  Club,  Pall  Mall,  London,
S.W.  1.

Brooke,  E.  G.  de  C,  Brushford,  Dulverton,  Devonshire.
*Brooke,  Mrs.  Hastings,  28  Collingham  Place,  London,  S.W.  5.
*Brooks,  R.  Birkett,  R.N.,  Glendale,  49  Surrey  Road,  Bournemouth.
*Brotherton,  M.,  Ph.D.,  19  Beechcroft  Avenue,  Golders  Green,
London,  N.W.  11.
Brown,  Captain  A.  D.  Burnett,  M.C.,  Greenhurst,  Beaconsfield,
Bucks.

♦Brown,  Miss  A.  M.,  13  Beaufort  Road,  Clifton,  Bristol.

*Brown,  B.  G.,  10  St.  Paul's  Road,  Cambridge.

*Brown,  B.  H.  Inness,  120  Broadway,  New  York,  N.Y.,  U.S.A.

Brown,  Charles,  M.B.,  Tinto  Bank,  Kirkcaldy.

Brown,  Mrs.  Frank  Clifton,  Stanford  Place,  Faringdon,  Berks.
*Brown,  Haydn,  L.R.C.P.,  30  Cavendish  Square,  London,  W.  1.
*Brown,  Wm.,  M.A.,  M.D.,  D.Sc,  M.R.C.P.,  88  Harley  Street,
London,  W.  1.

*Brown,  W.  Forster,  The  Grove  House,  Caversham,  Reading,  Berks.
Browne,  Professor  Edward  G.,  M.B.,  Pembroke  College,  Cambridge.
*Browne,  O.  H.,  Hyderabad,  Deccan,  India.

*Bruce,  Rev.  F.  D.,  The  Vicarage,  Penryn,  Cornwall.  |

*Bryans,  G.

*Bubb,  Henry,  J. P.,  Ullenwood,  near  Cheltenliam.
*Bui8t,  Mrs.,  Stratton  Hall,  Northamptonshire.

Bullard,  Dr.  W.  N.,  89  Marlborough  Street,  Boston,  Mass.,  U.S.A.

Buller,  Professor  A.  H.  Reginald,  University  of  Manitoba,  Winnipeg,
Canada.


XCII.]


Members  and  Associates.


351


♦Bulley,  IVIrs.  Arthur,  Ness,  Neston,  Cheshire.

Burnett,  Miss  Ethel,  Crathes  Castle,  Crathes,  N.B.

Burnham,  Mrs.,  23  Church  Road,  Southbourne,  Hants.

Burns,  Nesbitt,  M.B.,  The  Lodge,  High  bridge,  Somerset.

Burrard,  Mrs.  Charles,  c/o  Lloyds  Bank,  Knightsbridge  Branch,

Brompton  Road,  London,  S.  W.  L
*Burt,  Mrs.  William  G.,  1501  Asbury  Avenue,  Evanston,  111.,  U.S.A.

Burton,  Mrs.  Harry,  25  via  dei  Bardi,  Florence,  Italy.
♦Bury,  Henry,  The  Gate  House,  Alumdale  Road,  Bournemouth.

Bury,  Mrs.  Henry,  The  Gate  House,  Alumdale  Road,  Bournemouth.
*Bush,  E.,  Willsill,  Pateley,  Harrogate,  Yorks.

Bushell,  Miss  S.  D.,  The  Hermitage,  Harrow-on-the-Hill.
*Busk,  Mrs.,  6  Wadliam  Gardens,  London,  N.W.  3.

Butler,  :VIrs.  Charles,  Airlie  Farm,  Bedford,  N.Y.,  U.S.A.
♦Butt,  Lady,  c/o  London  Jomt  City  and  Midland  Bank,  South
Kensington  Branch,  Gloucester  Road,  London,  S.W.  7.

Buttemer,  Robert  Wm.,  St.  Mary's,  Godalmmg,  Surrey.

Butterworth,  Miss  A.  M.,  9  Huskisson  Street,  Liverpool.

Cadell,  Mrs.  Lewis,  Brae  Lodge,  Murrayfield,  Eduaburgh.

Caii'd,  Mrs.  Henryson,  34  Woronzow  Road,  St.  John's  Wood,
London,  N.W.  8.

Cairns,  Rev.  David  S.,  D.D.,  62  Hamilton  Place,  Aberdeen.
♦Campbell,  Mrs.,  Arduame,  Lochgilphead,  N.B.

Campbell,  Colin  E.,  9  Lower  Belgrave  Street,  London,  S.W.  1.
♦Campbell,  Mrs.  E.  Kenneth,  Millfield,  Wittersham,  Kent.

Campbell,  Rev.  R.  J.,  75  Marine  Parade,  Brighton,  Sussex.
♦Campbell-Lang,  Miss,  CVaig  Lora,  Connel,  Argyllshire.

Candler,  H.  A.  W.,  37  Commercial  Road  East,  London,  E.  1.

Candler,  Miss  M.  I.,  37  Commercial  Road  East,  London,  E.  I.
♦Garden,  W.  A.,  M.R.C.S.,  Bothaville,  O.F.S.,  S.  Africa.
♦Carleton,  Mrs.  F.  M.,  Westmeads,  Butler's  Marston,  Kineton.
♦Carpenter,  Mrs.,  Withleigh,  West  Heath  Road,  London,  N.W.  3.

Carrington,  Hereward,  Ph.D.,  504  West  111th  Street,  New  York
City,  U.S.A.

Carruthers,  Mrs  W.,  c/o  Bank  of  Montreal,  9  Waterloo  Place,  Pall

Mall,  London,  S.W.  1.
♦Carter,  Mrs.  H.  A.,  Mena  House,  St.  Erth,  Hayle,  Cornwall.
Case,  Miss  A.  J.,  35 Elm  Bank Mansions,  Barnes,  London,
S.W.  13.

Cathels,  Rev.  David,  The  Manse,  Hawick,  Scotland.


352


Members  and  Associates.


[PABT


*Cave,  Charles  J.  P.,  Stoner  Hill,  Petersfield,  Hants.
Chadwick,  Mrs.  Ellis,  St.  Moritz,  Parkstone,  Dorset.
•Chambers,  John,  Mokopeka,  Hastings,  Hawkes  Bay,  New  Zealand.
*Chance,  Colonel  H.,  Army  and  Navy  Club,  Pall  Mall,  London,
S.W.I.

♦Chapman,  C.  F.,  Sussex  Lodge,  Kingston  Hill,  Surrey.

Chapman,  E.  G.,  Belsize,  Friern  Watch  Avenue,  N.  Finchley,
London,  N.  12.
*Chapman,  Captain  R.  V.

Charles,  Clifford  P.,  M.R.C.S.,  L.R.C.P.

Chattock,  Arthur  P.,  D.Sc.
*Cheers-Chaloner,  G.,  18,  The  Vale,  Golders  Green,  London,  N.W.  11.

Childe-Pemberton,  Miss  A.  H.,  Orchard  Cottage,  Kinlet,  Bewdley.
*Childs,  Mrs.,  13  Croftdown  Road,  London,  N.W.  5.

Chitty,  Hubert,  M.S.,  M.B.,  46  Pembroke  Road,  Clifton,  Bristol.

Chubb,  Mrs.  C.  A.,  Longforgan,  The  Ridgway,  Wimbledon,  London,
S.W.  19.

Clapham,  J.  H.,  King's  College,  Cambridge.
•Clark,  Captain  C.  C,  Kilrie,  North  Berwick,  N.B.

Clark,  Rev.  F.  H.  H.,  Magdalene  College,  Cambridge.
•Clark,  Major  Stanley,  80  Bishopsgate,  London,  E.C.  2.
•Clarke,  Eno  E.,  3  Prince's  Gardens,  Ealing,  London,  W.  5.

Clarke,  Ronald  Stanley,  The  Ship  Hotel,  Crediton,  Devon.

Clarkson,  Mrs.  St.  John,  8  Milner  Street,  Cadogan  Square.  London,
S.W.  1.

Clay,  The  Hon.  Mrs.,  11  Tite  Street,  Chelsea,  London,  S.W.  3.

Closson,  Miss  Olivia  T.,  206  The  Shawmut,  2200  Nineteenth  Street,

N.W.,  Washington,  D.C.,  U.S.A.
•Clwyd,  Lady,  Bryngwenallt,  Abergele,  N.  Wales.

Cockle,  Rev.  Francis  T.,  The  Rectory,  Swinford,  Co.  Mayo,  Ireland.
•Coggin,  Rev.  F.  E.,  White  Lodge,  Meads,  Eastbourne.

Collins,  Miss  M.,  29  Glenluce  Road,  Blackheath,  London,  S.E.  3.

Colquhoun,  Daniel,  M.D.,  1  Holland  Villas  Road,  London,  W.  14.

Compton,  Henry,  1709  Sills  Street,  Fort  William,  Ontario,  Canada.
•Conn,  Emmett  Higbee,  M.D.,  807  North  Mariposa  Avenue,  Los

Angeles,  Cal,  U.S.A.
♦Constable,  F.  C,  Grenville,  Lansdown,  Bath.

Conway,  Lady,  47  Romney  Street,  London,  S.W.  1.
•Cook,  A.  G.  H.,  The  Villa,  Washington,  Co.  Durham.

Cooper,  Rev.  F.  W.,  Prestwich  Rectory,  Manchester.


XCII.]


Members  and  Associates.


353


Cooper,  Mrs.  P.  H.,  283  South  Street,  Morristown,  N.J.,  U.S.A.
*Coplestone-Boughey,  Mrs.,  Richmond  Hill,  Chester.
Comford,  Rev.  Bruce,  43  Havelock  Road,  Portsmouth.
Cornish,  J.  Easton,  The  Water  Works,  Alexandria,  Egypt.
*Corry,  Miss  Lucy,  13  ArgyU  Road,  Campden  Hill,  London,  W.  8.
Cort  van  der  Linden,  P.  W.  A.,  Minister  of  State,  59  Koning-

innegracht.  The  Hague.
Cotesworth,  Miss  Lilias  E.,  45  Westminster  Mansions,  Great  Smith
Street,  London,  S.W.  1.
*Cotton,  Dr.  T.  F.,  6  Sloane  Square,  London,  S.W.  1.
*Courage,  Mrs.,  The  Mount,  Ifield,  Crawley,  Sussex.
*Cowan,  Sir  W.  H.,  M.P.,  The  Crow's  Nest,  Fairwarp,  Uckfield,
Sussex.

*Cox,  Lady,  25  Carlyle  Square,  London,  S.W.  3.
Cox,  Mrs.  Rowland,  310  West  7th  Street,  Plainfield,  N.J.,  U.S.A.
Coxe,  Hemy  R.  H.,  c/o  Grindlay  &  Co,  54  Parliament  Street,
London,  S.W.  1.

*Crandon,  L.  R.  G.,  M.D.,  366  Commonwealth  Avenue,  Boston,
Mass.,  U.S.A.

*Craufurd,  Commander  Quentin  C.  A.,  R.N.,  North  View,  Lydd,  Kent.
*Craven,  Arthur  H.,  Brogxieswood,  Biddenden,  Kent.
*Creasy,  Mrs.  L.,  144  Gloucester  Terrace,  Hyde  Park,  London,  W.  2.
*Creasy,  Mrs.,  23  Pembridge  Mansions,  Moscow  Road,  London,
W.  2.

*Cromer,  Katharine,  Countess  of,  29  Marlborough  Place,  London,
N.W.  8.

Crook,  A.  H.,  156,  The  Peak,  Hong  Kong.
*Crosfield,  Miss  M.  C,  Undercroft,  Reigate,  Surrey.

Crouch,  H.  N.,  Summerfield,  Weston  Park,  Bath.
*Curnow,  W.  Leslie,  Hampden  Club,  London,  N.W.  1.
*Ciirrie,  Mrs.,  c/o  Messrs.  Grindlay  &  Co.,  54  Parliament  Street,
London,  S.W.  1.

*Curtois,  Miss  Margaret  A.,  53  Romney  Street,  Westminster,  London,
S.W.  1.

Dale,  J.  Gilbert,  68  Holland  Park,  Kensington,  London,  W.  11.

Daniell,  Mrs.  Averell.
*Danson,  Sir  F.  C,  74  Bidston  Road,  Birkenhead.
•D'Arcy,  Rev.  G.  J.  A.,  The  Vicarage,  Worksop,  Notts.
*Davies,  Benjamin,  Llysteg,  Pont-rhyd-feudigaid,  Ystrad  Meurig
S.  0.,  Cardiganshire.


354


Members  and  Associates.


[part


*Davies,  D.  Berrington  G.,  J. P.,  Parcygors,  Llechryd,  Cardiganshire.
Davies,  Mrs.  G.  R.,  Glenlaggan,  Parton,  N.B.
*Davies,  Vincent,  9  Mervyn  Road,  West  Ealing,  London,  W.  13.
*Davis,  Mrs.  J.  R.,  28  Norfolk  Road,  St.  John's  Wood,  London,

N.W.  8.
*  Davis,  Mrs.  Kennard.

Davis,  Romney  R.,  Old  Grove  House,  The  Grove,  Hampstead,

London,  N.W.  3.
*Davison,  Miss  R.,  Branton,  BoUin  Hill,  Wilmslow,  Manchester.
Davys,  Lieut. -Colonel  G.  I.,  O.B.E.,  I.M.S.,  c/o  Messrs.  Grindlay

&  Co.,  Hornby  Road,  Bombay,  India.
Dawson,  Lt.-Colonel  Henry  P.,  Hartlington  Hall,  Skipton.
Day,  Miss  Mabel  K.,  15  Elgin  Court,  Elgin  Avenue,  London,  W.  9.
Dearmer,  Rev.  Dr.  Percy,  9  Embankment  Gardens,  Chelsea,  London,

S.W.  3.

*Deeping,  G.  Warwick,  Eastlands,  Weybridge,  Surrey.
*De  Gravelles,  C.  C,  M.D.,  Belanger  Building,  Morgan  City,  La,,
U.S.A.

Deichmann,  Baroness,  42  Tedworth  Square,  London,  S.W.  3.

De  Jong,  Dr.  K.  H.  E.,  Beeklaar,  356,  The  Hague.
♦De  Koven,  Mrs.  Anna  F.,  1025  Park  Avenue,  New  York  City,  U.S.A.

Deland,  Mrs.  Lorin  F.,  Kennebunkport,  Maine,  U.S.A.

Delap,  Alfred  D.,  Priorsland,  Carrickmines,  Co.  Dublin,  Ireland.

De  Trafford,  Mrs.  Galfrid.
*Dewar,  Lady,  The  Capite,  West  Grinstead,  Sussex.
*Dewar,  Rev.  Peter,  The  Manse,  North  Bute,  Rothesay,  Scotland.
*Dewey,  Rev.  Stanley  D.,  The  Rectory,  Moretonhampstead,  Devon.

De  Wyckoff,  Joseph,  Arlena  Towers,  Ramsey,  N.J.,  U.S.A.
*de  Zoysa  Wickramasalne,  G.  A.,  8  Manson  Place,  Queen's  Gate,
London,  S.W.  7.

*Dick,  Lieut-Colonel  Maxwell,  M.R.C.S.,  L.R.C.P.,  5  Royal  Crescent,

87  Marine  Parade,  Brighton.
Dickie,  H.  Elford,  British  Consulate-General,  Lourenco  Marques,

Portuguese  East  Africa.
Dickinson,  Miss,  Trebrea  Lodge,  Tintagel,  Cornwall.
Dickinson,  Miss  A.  J.,Stolarska  Skola,Travnik,  Bosnia,  Yugoslavia.
Dickinson,  G.  Lowes,  King's  College,  Cambridge.
Dicksee,  Sir  Frank,  R.A.,  3  Greville  Place,  London,  N.W.  6.
Dingwall,  E.  J.,  73  Corringham  Road,  Hampstead  Garden  Suburb

London,  N.W.  11.


XCII.]


Members  and  Associates.


355


*Dingwall,  Mrs.  E.  J.,  73  Corringham  Road,  Hampstead  Garden

Suburb,  London,  N.W.  11.
*Dingwall,  IVIiss  E.,  5  Trewartha  Park,  Weston-super-Mare.
*Diver,  Mi's.,  Dashwood,  Selby  Road,  Anerley,  London,  S.E.  20.
*Dixon,  Edward  T.

Dixon,  Hugh  N.,  17  St.  Matthew's  Parade,  Northampton.
*  Dixon,  Professor  W.  Macneile,  LL.B.,  Litt.D.,  2  South  Park
Terrace,  Hillhead,  Glasgow,  W.
i Doane,  Mrs.  W.  E.,  Burlington,  New  Jersey,  U.S.A.
*Dodds,  Professor  E.  R.,  12  George  Road,  Edgbaston,  Birmingham.
Doe,  George  M.,  Enfield,  Great  Torrington,  N.  Devon.
Donne,  Mrs.,  c/o  Messrs.  Holt  &  Co.,  3  Whitehall  Place,  London,

r s.w.  1.

Douglas,  Rev.  Dr.  G.  W.,  5  East  88th  Street,  New  York,  N.Y.,  U.S.A.
*Dove,  J.  S.,  R.N.,  Hale  House,  Ockley,  Surrey.

Dowson,  Mrs.,  Landhurst  Wood,  Hartfield,  Sussex.
*Doyle,  Sir  A.  Conan,  M.D.,  Windlesham,  Crowborough,  Sussex.

Drew,  Ringrose  C,  Tampin,  Negri  SembHan,  Federated  Malay
States.

Drewry,  Mrs.  George,  4  Calverley  Park,  Tunbridge  Wells.

Driesch,  Professor  Dr.  Hans,  Zollnerstrasse  1,  Leipzig.
*Du£f,  J.  R.  K.,  100  Sunningfields,  Hendon,  London,  N.W.  9.
*Duncan,  Harold  M.,  The  Chestnuts  House,  Parkside,  Wimbledon

Common,  London,  S.W.  19.
*Duncan,  Mrs.,  Earlston,  Epsom  Road,  Guildford,  Surrey.

Dunne,  D.  P.,  Yetholme,  Liverpool  Road,  Birkdale,  Southport.
*Dutton,  Miss  A.,  Somerdon,  Sidmouth,  Devon.
*Earle,  Arthur  B.,  Puddington,  Birkenhead.

*Earle,  Hon.  Mrs.  Maxwell,  24  Lower  Sloane  Street,  London,
|l  S.W.  1.

♦Eckstein,  Mrs.,  18  Park  Lane,  London,  W.  1.
Edelsten,  Colonel  John  A.,  C.B.  Beach  Lawn,  Waterloo,  Nr.
Liverpool.

Edie,  H.  S.  Ker,  c/o  Messrs.  Thos.  Cook  &  Son,  Ludgate  Circus,

London,  E.C.  4.
*Elder,  Frederick,  21  Essex  Villas,  Kensington,  London,  W.  8.
Elliot,  Miss  A.  I.  M.,  Women's  University  Settlement,  44  Nelson

Square,  Blackfriars  Road,  London,  S.E.  1.
Elliot,  iVIrs.  Gilbert,  10  Regent's  Park  Terrace,  London,  N.W.  1.
Engall,  John  S.,  62  Goldsmith  Avenue,  Acton,  London,  W.  3.


356


Members  and  Associates.


[part


*Engelbregt,  P.  A.  L.,  c/o  Shell  Co.  of  California,  200  Bush  Street,
San  Francisco,  Cal.,  U.vS.A.

Eno,  H.  L.,  Princeton,  New  Jersey,  U.S.A.

Entee,  Professor  B.  A.,  Samaldas  College,  Bhavnagar,  India.
*Enthoven,  Mrs.  F.  V.,  33  Cambridge  Square,  London,  W.  2.
*Enthoven,  Mrs.  Gabrielle,  97  Cadogan  Gardens,  London,  S.W.
*Erickson,  Ralph  W.,  1701  Lo wry  Avenue  N.E.,  Minneapolis,  U.S.A.
*Fairfax,  Mrs.,  2  Weymouth  Street,  Portland  Place,  London,  W.  1.
*Farrer,  The  Dowager  Lady,  Idlerocks,  Stone,  StafEordshire.
*Farrer,  H.  M.,  81  Eaton  Terrace,  London,  S.W.  1.

Faulkner,  W.  B.,  52  South  Molton  Street,  London,  W.  1.
*Faustinus,  F.,  Sondre  Fasanvej  97",  Valby,  Copenhagen,  Den-
mark.

*Peilding,  Hon.  Everard,  5n  Montagu  Mansions,  York  Street,

London,  W.  1.
Felkin,  Mrs.,  119  Grosvenor  Road,  London,  S.W.  1.
*Ferguson,  Mrs.  Wm.  C,  37  Atlantic  Avenue,  Hampstead,  N.Y.,

U.S.A.

Fergusson,  Rev.  A.  W.,  The  Manse,  Dundee.
*Fermor-Hesketh,  Sir  Thomas,  Bart.,  Easton  Neston,  Towcester,

Northamptonshire .
*Femald,  Mrs.  C.  B.,  4  Marlborough  Road,  London,  N.W.  8.
*Findlay,  J.  Arthur,  Stansted  Hall,  Stansted,  Essex.
*Fisher,  Mrs.  C.  D.  Corbett,  8  Heathgate,  London,  N.W.  11.
*Fisk,  George  W.,  c/o  The  Kailan  Mining  Administration,  Tientsin,
N.  China.

*Fitch,  Hugh  B.,  31  Campden  Grove,  Kensington,  London,  W.  8.
*Fleetwood-Hesketh,  Major  C.  H.,  Stocken  Hall,  Stretton,  Oakham,
Rutlandshire.

*Fietcher,  L.  S.,  3  Dr.  Johnson's  Buildings,  Temple,  London,  E.C.  4.
*Flint,  Mrs.,  Baynards,  Watford,  Herts.

Fliigel,  J.  C,  11  Albert  Road,  Regent's  Park,  London,  N.W.  1.
Footner,  Mrs.,  187  Ebury  Street,  London,  S.W.  1.

Forman,  Josef.

Forman,  Colonel  R.  H.,  36  Fitzjohn's  Avenue,  Hampstead,  London,
N.W.  3.

Fortescue,  Miss  Frances,  13  London  Road,  Canterbury.
*Foster,  Nevile,  134  Wigmore  Street,  Portman  Square,  London,  W.  1.

Fotheringham,  W.  B.,  17  Upper  High  Street,  Worthing.
*Foulger,  Howson  R.,  19  Palace  Gardens  Terrace,  London,  W.  8.


XCII.]


Members  and  Associates.


357


*Francis,  Mrs.  Francis.

Franks,  Mrs.,  51  Dacre  Hill,  Rock  Ferry,  Birkenhead.

Freeman,  Miss  Adelaide  C,  Queen  Anne's  Mansions,  London,  S.W.  1.
*Freeman,  Canon,  Bentley,  Clifton  Hill,  Bristol.
*French, Major  Alexander  W.,  T.D.,  M.R.C.S.,  Senior  Medical
Officer's  House,  H.  M.  Prison,  Wormwood  Scrubs,  London,  W.
*Frith,  Mrs.,  19  Philbeach  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  5.

Frost,  Lowell  C,  M.D.,  Tujunga,  Cal.,  U.S.A.

*Fro8tick,  J.  A.,  C.B.E.,  381  Papanui  Road,  Christchurch,  New
Zealand.

*Fry,  Miss  Agnes,  FaUand  House,  Failand,  near  Bristol.
*Fry,  Lewis  George,  Stonycroft,  Limpsfield,  Surrey.

Fryer,  Mrs.  F.,  9  St.  Peter's  Grove,  York.
♦Fulton,  Mrs.  Hamilton,  35  The  Close,  Salisbury.

Gage,  Lyman  J.,  Point  Loma,  Cal.,  U.S.A.

Gantz,  Mrs.,  13  Oakley  Street,  London,  S.W.  3.

Gardiner,  Professor  H.  N.,  187  Mam  Street,  Northampton,  Mass.,
U.S.A.

♦Gaskell,  Mrs.  J.  B.,  Roseleigh,  Woolton,  Liverpool.
*Gatliff,  H.  E.  C,  The  Treasury,  Whitehall,  London,  S.W.  1.

Gay,  The  Hon.  Mrs.,  26  Eaton  Square,  London,  S.W.  1.

Gellert,  J.  W.,  c/o  Box  396,  G.P.O.,  Adelaide,  S.  Australia.
*George,  Mrs.,  23  West  Cromwell  Road,  Earls  Court,  London,  S.W.  5.
♦George,  H.  Trevelyan,  M.R.C.S.,  L.R.C.P.,  33  Ampthill  Square,

London,  N.W.  1.
*Gibbes,  Miss  Beatrice,  170  Brompton  Road,  London,  S.W.  3.
*Gibbms,  Mrs.  C.  E.,  39  Clarence  Square,  Brighton.

Giles,  Mrs.,  19  Highfield  Road,  Edgbaston,  Birmingham.
*Gillett,  J.  A.,  Woodgreen,  Banbury.

Gilson,  R.  Gary,  King  Edward's  School,  Birmingham.
•Girdlestone,  Mrs.  Frank,  3  St.  Margaret's  Road,  Oxford.

Girod,  Madame,  4  Avenue  Hoche,  Paris.

•Glasgow  Society  for  Psychical  Research,  58  Renfield  Street,
Glasgow.

Glasson,  J.  W.,  I.C.S.,  Binivasi,  SoUer  de  Mallorca,  Baleares,  Spain.
Gledstone,  Miss  May,  73  Gleneldon  Road,  Streatham,  London,
S.W.  16.

Glenny,  Mrs.  G.  C,  Old  Croft,  Stanwix,  Carlisle.
Glover,  Cedric  H.,  35  Albert  Road,  Regent's  Park,  London,
N.W.  8.


358


Members  and  Associates.


[part


*Goddard,  Mrs.  Samuel  P.,  6441  Cecil  Avenue,  St.  Louis,  Mo.,  U.S.A.
Goedhart,  P.,  Van  Imhoffplein  8,  The  Hague.

*Gold8chmidt,  Mrs.  Beni  de,  Clarefield,  Pinkney's  Green,  Maiden-
head,  Berks.

Gooch,  G.  P.,  South  Villa,  Campden  Hill  Road,  London,  W.  8.
*Goodden,  Mrs.  Robert,  5  Kingsgate  Street,  Winchester.
*Goossens,  Mrs.  F.  W.,  291  Clifton  Avenue,  Montreal,  Canada.
^Gordon,  Dr.  Mary,  c/o  National  Provincial  and  Union  Bank  of
England,  55  High  Street,  Kensington,  London,  W.  8.
Gough,  A.  B.,  Ph.D.,  23  Bazham  Road,  Sevenoaks,  Kent.
*Gould,  Miss  v.,  54  Chepstow  Villas,  London,  W.  11.
*Goulden-Bach, Mrs., 2 Elsham Road, Kensington,  London,
W.  14.

*Gouldsmith,  Mrs.  The  Bungalow,  Shanklin,  I.  of  W.
*Gover,  J.  M.,  K.C.,  LL.D.,  5  New  Square,  Lincoln's  Inn,  London,
W.C.  2.

*Gowan,  Commander  C.  H.  B.,  R.N.,  Brackenwood,  Ivy  Hatch,
Nr.  Sevenoaks.
Graham,  J.  W.,  Woodbrooke,  Selly  Oak,  Bnmingham.
Grahame,  Miss  Helen,  c/o  British  Consulate,  Gracanicka  17,

Belgrade,  Serbia.
*Granger,  E.  P.,  Kenora,  Ontario,  Canada.

*Grant-Suttie,  Major  H.  F.,  R.A.,  H.Q.  Lowland  Area,  10  Lyndock
Place,  Glasgow.
Green,  Mrs.  Alan  B.,  Acton  Castle,  Marazion,  Cornwall.
Green,  Mrs.,  Northcott,  Chesham  Bois,  Bucks.
*Greenwood,  L.  H.  G.,  Emmanuel  College,  Cambridge.

Grew,  J.  C,  Dept.  of  State,  Washington,  D.C.,  U.S.A.
*Grey  of  Falloden,  Viscountess,  4  Buckingham  Street,  London,
S.W.  1.

*Griffith,  Mrs.,  19  Cheyne  Walk,  Chelsea,  London,  S.W.  3.

Grignon,  Miss  A.  E.,  41  Filton  Avenue,  Horfield,  Bristol.
*GrinUng,  Mrs.  A.  G.,  Fairfield,  Harrow  Weald,  Middx.  I
^■!=Grinling,  D.  G.,  Fairfield,  Harrow  Weald,  Middx.

Grottendieck,  W.  G.,  Charlotte  de  Bourbon  Str.  8,  The  Hague.
*Grubbe,  Hubert  H.,  Southwold,  Suffolk.

*Gunnell,  A.  Mortimer,  F.R.A.I.,  F.R.Met.Soc,  Broomfield  Park

College,  New  Southgate,  London,  N.  11.
'*Guttwoch,  Charles,  c/o  Ewing  House,  Chiswell  Street,  London,

E.G.  1.


xcn.]


Members  and  Associates.


359


*Gwyn,  W.  J.,  8  Netherhall  Gardens,  South  Hampstead,  London,
N.W.  3.

*Hadfield,  Dr.  J.  A.,  9  Harley  Street,  London,  W.  L

Haldar,  Professor  Hiralal,  10  Preonath  Banerji  Street,  Calcutta.
*Hall,  Alexander  F.,  Tettenliall  College,  Staffs.
*Han,  Captain  Basil,  R.N.,  28  Cheyne  Walk,  London,  S.W.  3.

Hall,  Wilfred,  9  Priors  Terrace,  Tynemouth,  Northumberland.

Hambro,  Lady,  4  Norfolk  Street,  Park  Lane,  London,  W.  1.
*Hamilton  and  Brandon,  The  Duchess  of,  Hamilton  Palace,  Lanark-
shire.

Hamilton,  J.  J.

Hamilton,  W.  Bernard.

Hammond,  ]\Iiss  Winifred  B.,  386  East  51st  Street,  Portland,

Oregon,  U.S.A.
*Hanbury,  D.,  Castle  Malwood,  Lyndhurst,  Hants.
Hannes,  Mrs.,  48  Bedford  Gardens,  Kensington,  London,  W.  8.
Hanson,  Mrs.,  Pleasaunce  Cottage,  Dormans  Park,  Surrey.
*Hare,  Dr.  A.  W.,  59  York  Road,  Birkdale,  Lanes.
Harper,  Miss  E.  K.,  The  Apple  Gate,  Coombe  Hill  Farm,  Nr.

Kingston-on-Thames,  Surrey.
Harriman,  T.  G.,  M.D.,  3596  American  Avenue,  Long  Beach,  Calif.

U.S.A.

*Harrington,  E.  J.,  Greensand,  Heath  Road,  Petersfield,  Hants.
Harris,  Alan  C,  c/o  Messrs.  Morgan,  Harjes  &  Co.,  14  Place  Vendome,
Paris.

•Harris,  Lady,  98  Gloucester  Terrace,  London,  W.  2.

Harris,  Mrs.  W.  F.,  The  Willows,  Westboiirne  Avenue,  Hull.

Harrison,  William,  17  Tirlemont  Road,  Croydon,  Surrey.
•Hart,  Mrs.  H.  Burcham,  Eshott,  Eastbury  Road,  Northwood,
Middlesex.

Hart,  Mrs.  H.  H.,  H.B.  "  Zephyr,"  Srinigar,  Kashmir,  India.
Hart,  General  Su-  Reginald  Clare,  V.C.,  K.C.B.,  K.C.V.O.,  39  West
Cliff  Road,  Bournemouth.
*Harverson,  Mrs.,  79 Fitzjohn's  Avenue,  Hampstead,  London,
N.W.  3.

Harvey,  G.  H.,  P.O.  Box  254,  Quebec,  Canada.
*Ha8lam,  Oliver  H.,Cairngill, Nr.  Dalbeattie,  Kirkcudbrightshire,  N.B.
Hastings,  Rev.  J.  H.,  The  Manor  House,  Halton,  Lancashire.
Hauxhurst,  Mrs.  W.,  Hotel  Schuyler,  59  West  45th  Street,  New
York  City,  U.S.A.

2a


I


360


Members  and  Associates.


[part


Hayes,  Rev.  Joseph  W.,  Towerville,  Dalcot  Crescent,  Loughton,
Essex.

*Hayley,  Guy  W.,  17  Cleveland  Square,  London,  W.  2.

Head,  Miss  Alice  L.,  30  Chepstow  Place,  London,  W.  2.

Heard,  G.  H.,  11  Lawrie  Park  Road,  Sydenham,  London,  S.E.  26,

Heath,  George  H.,  7  St.  Philip's  Road,  Surbiton,  Svirrey.

Heaton,  Guy,  51  Westcliff  Road,  Bournemouth.

Hedley,  Dr.  E.  P.,  c/o  H.  L.  HaU  &  Sons,  Ltd.,  Tomango,  E.

Transvaal,  S.  Africa.
*Heijer,  Dr.  J.  C,  61  Stadhouderskade,  Amsterdam,  Holland.

Heller,  Rabbi  James  G.,  3634  Reading  Road,  Cincinnati,  Ohio,
U.S.A.

Hemenway,  Mrs.  Augustus,  Readville,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
Henderson,  J.  J.,  811  President  Street,  Brooklyn,  N.Y.,  U.S.A.
Henderson,  Miss  Lilian,  The  Sesame  Club,  29  Dover  Street,  London,
W.  1.

Hemioi,  Jacob,  201-203  Chestnut  Street,  Meadviile,  Pa.,  U.S.A.
Henry,  Miss  Eva,  1  Argyll  Villas,  Cheltenliam.

*Herberstein,  Count  J.  Henry  of,  10  Kecskemeti  utcza,  Budapest,
Himgary.

Herriot,  Miss  E.  2  Sunningdale  Gardens,  Kensmgton,  London,
W.  8.

♦Herrmann,  Oscar,  215  West  90th  Street,  New  York  City,  U.S.A.
Hesketh,  Thomas,  42  Castle  Hill  Avenue,  Folkestone,  Kent.
♦Hichens,  Mrs.  Cyril,  The  Almners,  Lyne,  Chertsey,  Surrey.
♦Hichens,  Mrs.  W.  Lionel,  15  Buckingham  Palace  Gardens,  London,
S.W.  1.

♦Hicka,  Rev.  F.  E.,  St.  Aime's  Vicarage,  Birkenhead.
Hildyard,  F.  W.,  14  Lambridge,  Bath.

Hillman,  E.  Haviland,  Haus-am-Mulilbach,  Wettersteinstrasse,
Partenkirchen,  Germany.  ■

Hoare,  Fred  H.,  37  Fleet  Street,  London,  E.C.  4.

Hoare,  Mrs.  Henry,  20  Montagu  Street,  Portman  Square,  London,
W.  1.

♦Hobson,  Walter  D.,  Tan-y-Bryn,  Bangor,  N.  Wales.
•Hockliffe,  Mrs.  Ernest,  15  Ridgmount  Gardens,  London,  W.C.  1
Hodding,  Miss,  28  The  Close,  Salisbury.

♦Hodson,  L.  J.,  LL.B.,  The  Mill  House,  Robertsbridge,  Sussex.
Hoernle,  Professor  R.  F.  Alfred,  The  University  of  the  Witwater-
sand,  Johannesburg,  S.  Africa.


XCII.]


Members  and  Associates.


361


Hoggan,  Mrs.  Frances,  M.D.,  23  Eaton  Place,  Brighton.
*Hole,  Rev.  Donald,  St.  James'  Lodge,  Fulliam  Palace  Road,  London,
S.W.  6.

Holder,  Henry  L.,  Monkbarns,  Wheatlands  Road,  Harrogate.

Holland,  Miss,  1a  Holland  Park,  London,  W.  11.

Hollander.  Bernard,  M.D.,  57  Wimpole  Street,  London,  W.  L
*Hollick,  Captain  A.  J.,  Kelsall  Lodge,  Sunninghill,  Ascot,  Berks.
*Hollick,  Mi's.  A.  J.,  Kelsall  Lodge,  Sunninghill,  Ascot,  Berks.

Hollins,  Mrs.  A.  E.,  Dunsfold  Rectory,  Godalming,  Surrey.

Holme,  Strachan,  28  Kenihvorth  Court,  Putney,  London,  S.W.  15.

Holmes,  Miss  Lilian,  Critchfleld,  Bosham,  Sussex.
*Ho]myard,  R.,  5  Hedgerow  Lane,  Clifton,  Cincinnati,  Ohio,  U.S.A.
*Holt,  Hemy,  57  East  72nd  Street,  New  York  City,  U.S.A.
*Ho]t,  Miss  M.  D.,  Bryans'  Ground,  Presteign,  Radnorshire.

Homan,  C.  H.,  12  Sogaden,  Oslo,  Norway.

Home,  Miss  Georgina,  Halcyon  Club,  13/14  Cork  Street,  London,
W.  1.

Home,  Miss  Mary  M.,  34  Victoria  Road,  London,  W.  8.

Hookham,  Philip,  Shottery  Cottage,  Shottery,  Stratford-on-Avon.

Hopkinson,  Mrs.,  l^Uerslie,  Adams  Road,  Cambridge.

Hoppin,  J.  C,  26  Central  Street,  Boston,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
*Horan,  Rev.  F.  S.,  11  Earls  Court  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  5.
*Hornberger,  J.  B.  L.,  5413  Stanton  Avenue,  Pittsburgh,  Pa.  U.S.A.

Horridge,  Miss  J.  G.,  43  Alexandra  Road,  Southport.
*Horsfield,  H.,  108  Everton  Road,  Chorlton-on-Medlock,  Man-
Chester.

*Horwood,  C.  Baring,  D.Sc,  F.C.S.,  Royal  Automobile  Club,  Pall
Mall,  London,  S.W.  1.

*Hoseason,  A.  G.,  The  Bungalow,  Tan  worth -in- Arden,  Nr.  Bir-
mingham.

Hotblack,  Frank  A.,  Kaslo,  3  Burton  Villas,  Hove,  Sussex.
HoAvden,  Mrs.,  11  Eton  Terrace,  Edinburgh.
*Howe]l,  Mrs.,  Ethy,  Lostwithiel,  Cornwall.

*Howell,  Mrs.  Philip,  5  Carlyle  Square,  Chelsea,  London,  S.W.  3.

Howgrave-Graham,  Captain  A.  H.,  Randiontein,  Transvaal.

Hubbard,  Mrs.  Cyril,  New  Lodge,  Coleman's  Hatch,  Sussex.

Hudson,  Miss  Alice,  Meads  Court,  Eastbourne.

Hudson,  Miss  Katie  E.,  Campden  House  Chambers,  Sheffield

Terrace,  London,  W.  8.
*Hudson,  Morris,  St.  Cuthbert's,  Bathampton,  Somerset.


362  Members  and  Associates.  [part

Hughes,  Professor  Alfred,  Eastnor  House,  Malvern  Link.
Hume-Roth ery,  J.  H.,  Mendip  House,  Headington  Hill,  Oxford.
Humphreys,  E.  Noel,  Y  Fron,  Gogarth,  Llandudno.  j
Humphreys,  T.  H.  A.

Hunkin,  Rev.  J.  W.,  C.F.,  126  Huntingdon  Road,  Cambridge.
Hurwitz,  W.  A.,  PhD.,  Cornell  University,  Ithaca,  N.Y.,  U.S.A.  |
Hutchinson,  F.  W.  H.,  Grove  Lawns,  St.  Albans,  Herts.  ;

*Hutchinson,  W.  D.,  Chesa  Rocco,  Celerina,  Engadine,  Switzerland.

*Hyland,  C.  W.,  Ph.C,  300  Commissioner  Street,  Johannesburg
East,  Transvaal.

*Hy8lop,  George  H.,  M.D.,  163-24th  Street,  Jackson  Heights,  Long

Island,  New  York,  U.S.A.
Imamura,  Prof.  Shinkichi,  Clinic  for  Psychiatry,  Imperial  Univer-
sity, Kioto,  Japan.
Ince,  Miss  Gladys,  c/o  Miss  Ince,  52  Lower  Sloane  Street,  London,
S.W.  L

*Ingham,  Charles  B.,  Moira  House,  Eastbourne.

Innes,  C.  E.,  31  Randolph  Crescent,  London,  W.  9.  '

Innes,  Miss  H.  K.,  4  Greycoat  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  1.
*Irving,  Rev.  W.  S.,  Oxenhall  Vicarage,  Newent,  Glos.
*Israel,  Mrs.,  7  HohenzoUern  Strasse,  Berlin,  W.

Jacks,  L.  P.,  LL.D.,  D.D.,  Shotover  Edge,  Headington,  Oxford.

James,  Brig.-General  C.  H.  L.,  C.B.,  United  Service  Club,  London,
S.W.  1.  I
*James,  Major.  E.  A.  H.,  British  MiHtary  Headquarters,  Tientsin,
N.  China.

James,  Henry,  10  East  10th  Street,  New  York,  U.S.A.

James,  Mrs.  Joseph,  Southwood,  Bamt  Green,  Bii'mingham.
*James,  Miss  S.  Boucher,  2  Whitehall  Court,  London,  S.W.I.
♦Jameson,  David,  New  Castle,  Pa.,  U.S.A.

*Janson,  E.  W.,  11  Eaton  Mansions,  Eaton  Square,  London,  S.W.  1.

Jaye,  WUliam  R.,  Moray  House,  Ryde,  I.W.
*Jeboult,  F.  M.,  9  Walbrook,  London,  E.C.  4.
*Jekyll,  Miss  D.,  Sunnybank,  San  Remo,  Italy.
*Jenkins,  Mrs.  N.  S.,  12  Battle  Road,  Princeton,  N.J.,  U.S.A.  ;

Jenkinson,  W.  E.,  Lower  Willow  Hall,  Sowerby  Bridge,  Yorks.

Jennings-Bramly,  Mrs.,  Hampton  Court  Palace,  Middlesex.
*Jennings,  Mrs.  Walton,  76  Kimbolton  Road,  Bedford.
*Jephson,  Miss  S.,  72  Eaton  Terrace,  London,  S.W.  1.  ;
*Jeschke,  H.,  North  Shore  Road,  Benton  Harbour,  Michigan,  U.S.A.  !


XCII.]


Members  and  Associates.


363


*Joekes,  Dr.  Theodore,  86  Brook  Street,  Grosvenor  Square,  London,
W.  1.

Johnson,  Charles  R.,  340  Main  Street,  Worcester,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
Johnson,  Miss  F.  C,  25  York  Street  Chambers,  Bryanston  Square,
London,  W.  L

*  Johnstone,  Hon.  Gilbert,  43  Wilton  Crescent,  London,  S.W.  L
Johnston,  R.  F.,  The  Forbidden  City,  Peking,  China.

*Johnston,  Dr.  William  B.,  Giverny,  par  Vernon,  Eure,  France.
*Johnston,  Mrs.  W.  B.,  Giverny,  par  Vernon,  Eure,  France.
Jones,  J.  Herbert,  Wallasey  Villa,  Mount  Street,  Menai  Bridge,
Anglesea.

*  Jones,  Sir  Lawrence  J.,  Bart.^  39  Harrington  Gardens,  London,

S.W.  7.

*Jones,  Lawrence  E.,  15  Cleveland  Gardens,  London,  W.  2.

*  Jordan-Smith,  Benjamin,  Orchardlea,  Grosvenor  Road,  Caversham,

Reading.
*Judah,  Noble  B.

Judd,  Mrs.  Sylvestre  Dwight,  4  Bloomfield  Road,  Lexington,  Mass.,
U.S.A.

*Kellett,  Mrs.  Kelsall,  Hurst,  Burwash,  Sussex.
*Kellogg,  Mrs.  Branton,  45  Carlton  Street,  Brookline,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
♦Kellogg,  F.  R.,  120  Broadway,  New  York  City,  U.S.A.
Kelly,  Miss  Eleanor  B.,  Kebars,  The  Lookout,  Peacehaven,  Sussex.
*Kenneth,  H.,  Lindley,  BycuUah  Park,  Enfield,  Middlesex.
*Kennion,  T.  Alfred,  The  Maples,  Hoddesdon,  Herts.
Kenway,  Mrs.,  Mendip  View,  Winscombe,  Somerset.
*Kerans,  Lieut. -Colonel  G.  C.  L.,  St.  Kilda,  Birr,  Ireland.
Kerr-Clark,  Lady,  Moore  Abbey,  Monasterevan,  L:eland.
Kershaw,  Mrs.  Ronald  H.,  Seacom-t,  Hayling  Island,  Hants.
*Kimber,  J.  F.  C,  The  Gate  House,  Eashing,  Godalming,  Surrey.
*King,  H.  F.  Locke,  J. P.,  Brooklands,  Weybridge,  Surrey.
*King,  Dr.  W.  A.  D.,  1  Bishop's  Place,  Paignton,  Devon.
*Kmgsford,  Miss  S.  M.,  Esher  Cottage,  Rickett's  Hill,  Tatsfield,
Westerham,  Kent.
^•Kingsley,  Mrs.,  14  Belsize  Avenue,  London,  N.W.  3.
•  *Ku-kham,  T.  A.,  38  Bedford  Row,  London,  W.C.  1.
Kittermaster,  Rev.  Digby  B.,  Dame  Armstrong  House,  Harrow-
on-the-Hiir,  Middlesex.
/  *Klinckowstroem,  Count  Carl,  Hohenzollern  130,  Munich.
Knight,  Charles  N.,  7  Marlborough  Buildings,  Bath.


364


Members  and  Associates.


[part


*Konig,  Mrs.  F.  A.,  44  Rutland  Gate,  London,  S.W.  7.
*Korenchevsky, Professor  V., M.D., Lister  Institute,  Chelsea

Gardens,  London,  S.W.  L
Laing,  R.  M.,  "  Ogilvie,"  Cashmere  Hills,  Christchurch,  New

Zealand.

Lamb,  Charles  George,  D.Sc.,  65  Glisson  Road,  Cambridge.
*Lambert,  G.  W.,  86  Chester  Square,  London,  S.W.  1.
*Lambert,  Mrs.  Helen  C,  520  West  114th  Street,  New  York,  U.S.A.
*Lambert,  Rudolf,  Werastrasse  2,  Degerloch  bei  Stuttgart,  Germany.
*Lang,  Mrs.  J.  D.,  Quest,  Salcombe  Regis,  Nr.  Sidmouth,  Devon.
*Langelaan,  H.  H.,  Honiton,  Devon.

*Langford,  J.  C.  C,  St.  Bartholomew's  Hospital,  London,  E.G.  L
*Larken,  E.  P.,  98  Warwick  Gardens,  Kensington,  London,  W.  14,

Latshaw,  Allen,  Berwyn,  Penn,  U.S.A.

Leaf,  Arthur  H.,  Woodcroft,  Oxted,  Surrey.

Leaf,  Mrs.  A.  H.,  Woodcroft,  Oxted,  Surrey.  |
Leaf,  Miss  E. M., 4 Barton  Street,  Westminster,  London,
S.W.  1.

*Leaf,  F.  A.,  Lincoln  House,  Harrow-on-the-Hill,  Middlesex.
*Leaf,  Walter,  Litt.D.,  6  Sussex  Place,  Regent's  Park,  London,
N.W.  1.

*Leaning,  Mrs.  S.,  Elmstead,  Epsom  Lane,  Tadworth,  Surrey.
*Le-Apsley,  James  H.  M.,  M.D.,  43  N.  El.  Molino  Ave.,  Pasadena,
Cal.,  U.S.A.

*Leconfield,  The  Lady,  Petworth  House,  Petworth,  Sussex.

Ledyard,  Mrs.  R.  F.  H.,  Cazenovia,  N.Y.,  U.S.A.

Lee,  Blewett,  25  Broad  Street,  New  York,  U.S.A.
*Lee,  Dr.  H.  D.  C,  Technical  College,  Huddersfield.
*Lees,  Norman  D.,  A.I.C,  Norton  Hall,  Norton-on-Tees,  Co.  Durham.
*Legg,  W.  A.,  14  Victoria  Street,  Westminster,  London,  S.W.  1.
*Leigh,  Lord,  Stoneleigh  Abbey,  Kenilworth,  Warwickshire.
*Leigh-Bennett, Mrs. Pendarves, 7 Logan Place,  Kensington,
London,  W.  8.

Lenon,  J.  W.,  Wellington  Club,  Grosvenor  Place,  London,  S.W.  L
Leon,  IVIrs.  Philip,  4m  Montagu  Mansions,  Portman  Square,  London,
W.  1.

*Leonard,  Miss  Margaret,  Oakley  House,  Bromley  Common,  Kent.jj  ]
Leonard,  Thomas,  223  W.  School  Lane,  Germantown,  Philadelphia,;
Pa.,  U.S.A.

Le  Patourel,  Miss  M.  L.,  26  Walpole  Street,  Chelsea,  London,  S.W.  3.


xcn.]


Memhers  and  Associates.


365


Leslie,  Rev.  G.  Lindsay,  The  Manse,  Eddleston,  Peeblesshire.
Lewin,  Rev.  C.  H.,  St.  John's  Parsonage,  Keswick.
*Lewis,  David  J.,  United  States  Tariff  Commission,  Washington,

D.  C.,  U.S.A.

*Lewthwaite,  Mrs.,  St.  Paul's  Vicarage,  Goswell  Road,  London,

E.  G.  L

Librarian,  Public  Library  of  Adelaide,  Australia.
Librarian,  Adelbert  College  of  Western  Reserve  University,  Cleve-
land, Ohio,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Amsterdam  Free  Library,  Amsterdam,  New  York,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Binghamton  Public  Library,  Binghamton,  New  York,
U.S.A.

Librarian,  Birmingham  Public  Libraries,  Reference  Department,

Ratcliff  Place,  Birmingham.
Librarian,  Boston  Athenaeum,  10|  Beacon  Street,  Boston,  Mass.,

U.S.A.

Librarian,  Bowdoin  College  Library,  Brunswick,  Maine,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Public  Library,  etc.,  Chiirch  Street,  Brighton.
Librarian,  Public  Library  of  the  District  of  Columbia,  Washington,
D.C.,  U.S.A.

Librarian,  Library  of  Congress,  Washington,  D.C.,  U.S.A.
Librarian  (Hon.)  of  the  Constitutional  Club,  Northumberland

Avenue,  London,  W.C.  2.
Librarian,.  The  John  Crerar  Library,  Chicago,  111.,  U.S.A.
^Librarian,  Dutch  Society  for  Psychical  Research,  Amsterdam.
Librarian,  Enoch  Pratt  Free  Library  of  Baltimore  City,  Baltimore,

Md.,  U.S.A.

"^Librarian,  General  Theological  Seminary,  Chelsea  Square,  New
York,  U.S.A.

Librarian,  The  Grosvenor  Library,  Buffalo,  N.Y.,  U.S.A. . -  •

Librarian,  Guildhall  Library,  London,  E.C.  2.

Librarian,  Harvard  College  Library,  Cambridge,  Mass.,  U.S.A.

Librarian,  Imperial  Library,  Metcalfe  Hall,  Calcutta,  India.
■*Librarian,  Iowa  State  Library,  Des  Moines,  Iowa,  U.S.A.
'*Librarian,  James  Jez'ome  Hill  Reference  Library,  St.  Paul,  Minne-
sota, U.S.A.

Librarian,  Jamsetjee  Nesserwanjee  Petit  Institute,  Hornby  Road,
Bombay.

Librarian,  Free  Public  Library  of  Jersey  Citj^,  New  Jersey,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Leeds  Library,  Commercial  Street,  Leeds.


366


Members  and  Associates.


[part


Librarian,  Leland  Stanford  Junior  University,  Calif.,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Library  Association,  Portland,  Oregon,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Meadville  Theological  School,  Meadville,  Pa.,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Mercantile  Library,  St.  Louis,  Mo.,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Minneapolis  Athenaeum,  Minneapolis,  Minn.,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Natal  Society  and  Central  Library,  Pietermaritzburg,
Natal,  S.  Africa.

Librarian,  Literary  and  Philosophical  Society,  Newcastle-upon-
Tyne.

Librarian,  Public  Library,  New  Bridge  Street,  Newcastle-upon-
Tyne.

Librarian,  New  Hampshire  State  Library,  Concord,  N.H.,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Public  Library  of  New  South  Wales,  Sydney,  Australia.
Librarian,  New  York  Public  Library,  New  York,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Ohio  State  Library,  Columbus,  Ohio,  U.S.A.

*  Librarian,  Omaha  Public  Library  and  Museum,  19  and  Harvey

Streets,  Omaha,  Nebraska,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Pennsylvania  State  Library,  Harrisburg,  Pa.,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Public  Library,  Salt  Lake  City,  Utah,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Seattle  Public  Library,  Seattle,  Washington,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Norsk  Selskap  for  psykisk  Forskning,  Munkedamsv

78,  Oslo,  Norway.
Librarian,  Selskabet  for  psykisk  Forskning,  Graabrodretorv  7>

Copenhagen,  Denmark.
Librarian,  Theological  Seminary,  Rochester,  N.Y.,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Theosophical  Society,  23  Bedford  Square,  London,.

W.C.  1.

*Librarian,  Legislative  Library,  Toronto,  Canada.

Librarian,  The  University,  Aberdeen.
♦Librarian,  The  University  Library,  Bristol.

Librarian,  General  Libraiy  of  the  University  of  Chicago,  Chicago,
111.,  U.S.A.

Librarian,  University  Library,  Glasgow.

*  Librarian,  University  of  Iceland,  Reykjavik,  Iceland.
Librarian,  University  of  Minnesota  Library,  Minneapolis,  Minne-
sota, U.S.A.

Librarian,  University  of  Sydney,  New  South  Wales,  Australia.
Librarian,  Victoria  Public  Library,  Melbourne,  Australia.
Librarian,  Wellesley  College,  Wellesley,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
Librarian,  Dr.  Williams'  Library,  Gordon  Square,  London,  W.C.  1.


XCII.]


Members  and  Associates. . ^  367


Librarian,  Yale  University  Library,  New  Haven,  Conn.,  U.S.A.
*Llewel]in,  Mrs.  W.,  Upton  House,  Nr.  Poole,  Dorset.
*Lloyd,  Miss  Edyth  M.,  10  Francis  Road,  Edgbaston,  Birmingham.

Lloyd,  Judge  Frank  T.,  MerchantviUe,  N.J.,  U.S.A.

Lloyd,  Miss  Julia,  Hillside,  Berkswell,  Nr.  Coventry.
*Loder,  J.  de  V.,  31  Lennox  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  1.

Lodge,  Miss  E.  C,  Westfield  College,  Hampstead,  London,  N.W.  3.
*Lodge,  Sir  Oliver,  F.R.S.,  Normanton,  Lake,  Nr.  Salisbury.

Lodge,  Robert,  Compton  Wood,  28  Carlisle  Road,  Eastbourne.

Lubbock,  Mrs.  Geoffrey,  Glenconner,  North  Berwick.
*Lumsden,  Mrs.  W.  F.,  43  Curzon  Street,  London,  W.  1.

Lunn,  Arnold,  Palace  Hotel,  Montana,  Siir  Sierre,  Switzerland.

Lyall,  Mrs.,  16  York  Street  Chambers,  Bryanston  Square,  London,
W.  1.

*Lyall,  Major  Edward,  D.S.O.,  19  Victoria  Road,  Darlington.
Lyell,  Major  A.  G.,  68  Upper  Richmond  Road,  London,  S.W.  15.
Lyttelton,  Hon.  Mrs.  Alfred,  16  Great  College  Street,  Westminster,
London,  S.W.  1.

Macdonald,  Prof.  Duncan  Black,  Hartford  Theological  Seminary,

Hartford,  Conn.,  U.S.A.
Macdonald,  Miss  Isabelle  M.,  M.B.,  47  Seymour  Street,  Portman

Square,  London,  W.  1.
*Macfarlane,  Mrs.  Scott  B.,  c/o  Lieut. -Comdr.  S.  B.  Macfarlane,

U.S.S.  Camden,  c/o  Postmaster,  New  York,  U.S.A.
*Machin,  Mrs.  H.  A.  C,  Kenora,  Ontario,  Canada.
Mackay,  N.  Douglas,  M.D.,  Dall-Avon,  Aberfeldy,  Perth.
Mackenzie,  Lady  Muir,  25  Pelham  Place,  Thurloe  Square,  London,

S.W\  7.

♦Mackenzie,  Mrs.  H.  M.,  56  Bassett  Road,  London,  W.  10.
*Meickenzie,  Mrs.,  Dal  French,  Longhope,  Central  Provinces,  S.
Africa.

*Mackeson,  Mrs.  Peyton,  1  Eldon  Road,  Kensington,  London,  W.  8.

Macklin,  Miss  Helen  E.,  141  Inverness  Terrace,  London,  W.  2.
*Mactavish,  Mrs.  A.  M.  E.,  Moray  Park,  Island  Bank  Road,  Inverness.

Madders,  Mrs.  H.  F.,  87  Hampstead  Way,  London,  N.W.  4.
♦Maffei,  Comtesse  A.  L.,  33a  Gloucester  Road,  S.  Kensington,
London,  S.W.

♦Magrane,  Mrs.  Victor,  28  Fitzjames  Avenue,  London,  W.  14.
Mahler,  Mrs.  John,  Bronj'^garth,  Oswestry,  Salop.
Mainwaring,  Mrs.,  11  Wilton  Crescent,  London,  S.W.  1.


368


Members  and  Associates.


[part


*Malmesbury,  Susan,  Countess  of,  34  Wilton  Place,  London,  S.W.  1.

Mander,  Geoffrey  Le  Mesurier,  Wightwick  Manor,  Wolverlianipton.
■*Mann,  Rev.  Frederic,  Coombe  Dale,  Coombe  Road,  South  Croydon,
Surrey.

*Manning,  Miss  H.  T.,  102  Central  Avenue,  Plainfield,  New  Jersey,
U.S.A.

Mansell,  Andrew  Evans,  331  Holebrook  Place,  Hobart,  Tasmania.
Mantell,  Colonel  A.  M.,  10  Sion  Hill,  Bath.
Marriott,  Mrs.

*Marsden-Smedley,  Mrs.,  Lea  Green,  Matlock,  Derbyshire.
Marsden,  E.,  12  EUerdale  Road,  HamiDstead,  London,  N.W.  3.
Marsh,  Edward  H.,  5  Raymond  Buildings,  Gray's  Inn,  London,
W.C.  1.

Marston,  Charles,  J.P.,  Afcot,  Comjjton,  Nr.  Wolverhampton.

Marten,  Miss  A.  R.,  Osbornes,  Liphook,  Hants.  '
^Marten,  Rev.  G.  H.,  St.  Mark's  Vicarage,  Surbiton,  Surrey.
*Martin,  Charles  E.,  22  Preston  Street,  Brighton,  Sussex.

Martin,  Mrs.  J.  Biddulph,  Norton  Park,  Bredon's  Norton,  Nr.
Tewkesbury.

^Martin,  T.  B.,  Woodlands,  Snaresbrook,  London,  E.  18
*Martindale,  Miss  B.,  4  Piazza  Paganica,  Rome,  Italy.

Martmeau,  Alfred  Edward,  22  Racecourse  Road,  Lahoi'e,  India.
*Mason,  Miss,  211  Commonwealth  Avenue,  Boston,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
Mason,  Miss  M.  H.,  5  Vincent  Square  Mansions,  Westminster,

London,  S.W.  1.
*Mason,  Miss  Ida  M.,  1  Walnut  Street,  Boston,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
*Mather,  Rev.  Herbert,  Royal  Automobile  Club,  Pall  Mall,  London,
S.W.  1.

^Mathews,  Dr.  F.,  Vv'^elsh  Row  House,  Nantwich.

Maxwell,  Dr.  Joseph,  37  rue  Thiac,  Bordeaux,  France.
*Maxwell,  Sir  John  Stirling,  Bart.,  Pollok  House,  Pollokshaws,  N.B.

Mayor,  R.  G.,  11  Campden  Hill  Square,  Kensmgton,  London,  W.  8.

M'Alpine,  Sir  Robert,  Knott  Park,  Oxshott,  Surrey.
^McCarthy,  Justin  Huntly,  19  Elm  Park  Mansions,  Park  Walk,

Chelsea,  London,  S.W.  10.
-*M'Cart,hy,  Mrs.,  22  De  Pary's  Avenue,  Bedford.
^M'Connel,  D.  R.,  M.A.,  115  Santa  Cruz  Avenue,  Menlo  Park,  Cali-
fornia, U.S.A.

M'Connel,  H.  W.,  M.B.,  M.R.C.S.,  Matlaske  Hall,  NorM'ich.
M'Connel,  Mrs.,  Matlaske  Hall,  Norwich.


^^■]  Members  and  Associates.  369

*M'Dermott,  Captain  F.,  Tlie  Old  Mi]],  Tregoose,  St.  Columb,
Cornwall.

M'Dougall,  William,  F.R.S.,  M.Sc,  M.B.,  Emerson  Hall,  Cambridae

Mass.,  U.S.A.
M'Gusty,  G.  A.,  Granville,  Broadstone,  Dorset.
M'Keever,  Buell,  The  Chicago  Club,  Michigan  Ave.  and  Van  Buren

Street,  Chicago,  III,  U.S.A.
*M'Kinley,  Norman  R.,  39  Radnor  Drive,  Wallasey,  Cheshire.
M'Lauchlan,  G.  M.,  Ravenswood,  West  Linton,  Peeblesshire.
Mead,  G.  R.  S.,  27  ClarevUle  Grove,  S.  Kensington,  London,  S.W.  7
Meek,  Maxhnilian  de,  2  rue  des  Lilas,  Monte  Carlo  (Monaco).
Meebold,  Alfred,  Heidenheim,  Wurtemberg.
Megson,  Albert,  Fern  Villa,  Headlands,  Ossett,  Yorks.
Mehrji,  Munchershaw  Hormusji,  M.D.,  3  Batlivala  Villa,  Sleater

Road,  Bombay,  India.

*Menon,  Dr.  M.  P.  K.,  St.  Winifred's,  7  Church  Street,  Edmonton,
London,  N.  9.

*Merton, Gerald, 40 Vanbrugh Fields, Blacldieath,  Loudon
S.E.  3.

*Micklethwait,  Richard  K.

*Mikuska,  Professor  Viktor,  Masarykova  303,  Pardubice,  Czechoslav
Republic.

MUburn,  Rev.  R.  Gordon,  Black  Bridge,  Beaulieu,  Hants.
*Miles,  Miss,  59  Egerton  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  3.
*Millard,  Mrs.  Almka  B.,  c/o  The  F.  W.  Faxon  Co.,  83  Francis  Street

Boston,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
*Mills,  J.  P.,  I.C.S.,  c/o  Kmg,  Hamilton  &  Co.,  4  and  5  Koila  Ghat

Street,  Calcutta,  India.
*Mitchell,  T.  W.,  M.D.,  Hoath  Cottage,  Hadlow,  Nr.  Tonbridge
*Moncrieff,  Captam  M.  M.,  The  Cliflfs,  Nelson,  New  Zealand
*Montague,  Mrs.,  Penton,  Cirediton,  Devon.
*Montgomerie,  C.  W.,  Woodleigh,  Aldershot  Road,  Fleet,  Hants

Monypenny,  IVIrs.  A.  E.  G.,  5  Talbot  Square,  London,  W.  2.
*Moore,  His  Honour  Judge,  22  North  Bailey,  Durham'.
*Moreau,  G.,  241  Rue  de  Noyer,  Brussels,  Belgium.
*Morris,  Mrs.  Alfred,  4  Cadogan  Square,  London,  S.W.  1.

Morris,  Mrs.,  Corner  House,  Laleham-on-Thames,  Mddlesex
*Morris,  Mrs.  Talwyn,  13  Croftdown  Road,  Highgate  Road,  London
N.W.  5.

Morton,  Miss  Mary,  12  TankerviUe  Terrace,  Newcastle-on-Tyne.


370


Members  and  Associates.


[part


Moses,  E.  J.,  c/o  Messrs.  E.  D.  Sassoon  &  Co.,  4  Mission  Row^
Calcutta.

*Muir,  Mrs.  W.  E.,  Rowallan,  Haslemere,  Surrey.
*Mullens,  Lady,  6  Belgrave  Square,  London,  S.W.  1.
*Mullins,  Colonel  W.  B.,  Ambersham  House,  Midhurst,  Sussex.
*Munro,  Mrs.  William  B.,  268  Bellefontaine  Street,  Pasadena,  Cal.,^
U.S.A.

Murphy, Gardner, Ph.D., Dept. of Psychology,  Columbia

University,  N.Y.,  U.S.A.
Murray,  Professor  Gilbert,  LL.D.,  Litt.D.,  Yatscombe,  Boar's  Hill,

Oxford.

Murton,  Miss  Josephine,  Critchfield,  Bosham,  Sussex,
*Musgrave,  Geoffrey,  Selukwe,  S.  Rhodesia,  S.  Africa.
*Myers,  Mrs.  F.  W.  H.,  12  Cleveland  Row,  St  James's,  London,
S.W.  L

*Myers,  L.  H.,  Twyford  Lodge,  East  Grinstead.
*Nash,  Miss  Diana,  Tryon,  N.  Carolina,  U.S.A.
*Nation,  Major  C.  F.,  R.E.,  27  Lexham  Gardens,  Kensington,
London,  W.  8.

*Naylor,  M.  C,  35  Priory  Road,  Bedford  Park,  London,  W.  4.

Neustadter,  Louis  W.,  6845  Odin  Street,  Hollywood,  Cal.,  U.S.A.
*Newcastle,  The  Duke  of,  Clumber,  Worksop,  Notts.

Newton,  Miss  F.  E.

Newton,  Heber,  Oamaru,  New  Zealand.
Newton,  Miss  I.,  31  Tavistock  Square,  London,  W.C.  L
Nicholson,  Lady,  6  Kensington  Court,  London,  S.W.  7.
*Nicoll,  Mrs.  DeLancey.

*Nicolls,  Brig.-General  E.  G.,  C.B.,  Fir  View,  13  Culverden  Park

Road,  Tunbridge  Wells,  Kent.
*Nisbet,  E.  T.,  Birnieknowes,  Cullercoats,  Northumberland.
Noel,  Miss  Frances,  Becket  House,  Thaxted,  Nr.  Dunmow,  Essex.
Noel-Cox,  H.  L.,  M.D.,  F.R.A.S.,  2  Clifton  Gardens,  Warwick

Avenue,  London,  W.  9.
Nutter,  Miss  H.  G.,  6  Acacia  Road,  Norbury,  London,  S.W.  16.
*0'Dell,  A.  E.,  10  Knight's  Park,  Kingston-on-Thames,  Surrey.
*Ogden,  James  R.,  38  James  Street,  Harrogate,  Yorks.
Ogilvie,  Mrs.  Robert,  c/o  R.  G.  Ross,  Esq.,  11  St.  Colme  Street,

Edinburgh.  '  .

Ogle,  Colonel  N.,  6  Earl's  Terrace,  Kensington  Road,  London,  W.  8.
*Ohlhaver,  Hinrich,  Alsterdamm  16-19,  Hamburg.


xcn.]


Members  and  Associates.


371


*01dfield,  Miss  F.,  24  Grimthorpe  Street,  Ash  Road,  Headingley,
Leeds.

*0]dham,  Mrs.,  Parkhurst,  High  Hurstwood,  Nr.  Buxted.

Osborne,  Miss  H.,  2  Northcote  Mansions,  Heath  Street,  Hampstead,
London,  N.W.  3.
*Osmaston,  Mrs.,  Beacon  Crag,  Porthleven,  Cornwall.
*Owen,  A.  S.,  Keble  College,  Oxford.

Oxenham,  Mrs.,  3  Baring  Crescent,  Exeter.

Pack-Beresford,  Denis  R.,  J.P.,  Fenagh  House,  Bagenalstown,  Co.
Carlo  w.

Pagan,  Mrs,  G.  L.,  5  Belgrave  Place,  Edinburgh.
*Pagensteoher,  G.,  M.D.,  12a  Monterrey  214,  Mexico  City,  Mexico,
D.F.

Paget,  Su-  Richard,  74  Strand,  London,  W.C.  2.
*Pa.ley,  G.  A.,  Melton  Wold,  Victoria  West,  CP.,  S.  Africa.
*Palmer,  C.  G.,  CLE.,  Duncan,  Vancouver  Island,  British  Columbia.
*Palmer,  Mark,  B.A.,

*Parish,  Mrs.  Francis,  2  The  Boltons,  London,  S.W.  10.
*Parkin,  John,  Blaithwaite,  Carlisle.

*Parr,  F.  C,  Wilberforce  House,  Denmark  Place,  Hastings.

Parsons,  Ambrose,  Said  House,  Chiswick  Mall,  London,  W.  4.

Parsons,  Karl,  Speedwell,  Northwood,  Middlesex.
*Parsons,  Miss  Llewellyn,  525  Park  Avenue,  New  York,  U.S.A.

Parsons,  N.  M.,  64  Chelsea  Park  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  3.

Patel,  F.  J.,  L.R.CP.,  4  New  Queen's  Road,  Bombay.

Paul,  J.  Rodman,  505  Chestnut  Street,  Philadelphia,  Pa.,  U.S.A.
*Peake,  C.  W.,  Masonsbridge  House,  Earlswood,  Surrey.

Pease,  Mrs.  J.  R.,  Sesame  Club,  29  Dover  Street,  London,  W.  1.
*Peck,  Miss  Charlotte  L.,  Maidencombe  House,  St.  Mary  Church,
S.  Devon.

Peckham,  Orville,  1320  N.  New  Jersey  Street,  Indianopolis,  Ind.,
U.S.A.

*Pennington,  Mrs.  Henry,  279  Trinity  Road,  Wandsworth  Common,

London,  S.W.  12.
Perceval,  Hon.  Mrs.  Dudley,  153  Church  Street,  Chelsea.  London,
S.W.  3.

*Perdicaris,  Ion,  The  Manor  House,  Chislehm-st,  Kent.
Perkms,  Miss  S.  R.,  c/o  Dr.  Perkms,  57  Harley  Street,  London,
W.  1.

Perrott,  F.  D.,  The  White  House,  Battle,  Sussex.


372


Members  and  Associates.


[part


Perry,  Sir  E.  Cooper,  M.D.,  3  Albert  Court,  Kensington  Gore>

London,  S.W.  7.
Perry,  T.  S.,  312  Marlborough  Street,  Boston,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
Perry,  Mrs.  T.  S.,  312  Marlborough  Street,  Boston,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
Pfau,  A.  R.,  Junr.,  Mankato,  Minnesota,  U.S.A.
*Phillimore,  Hon.  Mrs.,  Kendals  Hall,  Radlett,  Herts.
*Piddmgton,  J.  G.,  Fishers  Hill,  Woking,  Surrey.
*Piercy,  Major  B.  H.,  94  Piccadilly,  London,  W.  1.
Pigou,  Professor  Arthur  Cecil,  King's  College,  Cambridge.
*Pilcher,  Giles  T.,  Treen,  Frith  Hill,  Godalming,  Surrey.
Piper,  John  E.,  LL.B.,  10  Herondale  Avenue,  Wandsworth  Common^

London,  S.W.  18.
Pithapuram,  The  Maharajah  of,  Pithapuram,  Godavari  Dist.,

Madi'as  Presidency,  India.
Place,  Rev.  C.  A.,  Lancaster,  Mass.,  LT.S.A.
Plowden,  Mrs.,  6  Westcliffe,  St.  John's  Road,  Eastbourne.
*Pollock,  A.  N.,  M.B.,  Malton  House,  Barlow  Moor  Road,  Chorlton-

cum- Hardy,  Lanes.
*Pontifex,  Dudley  D.,  73  AUeyn  Park,  West  Dulwich,  London,
S.E.  21.

*Poore,  Mrs.  J.  B.,  17  Rosemount  Road,  Bournemouth  West.
*Portal,  Mrs.  Spencer,  Bere  Hill,  Whitchurch,  Hants.
Portsmouth,  The  Countess  of,  Hurstbourne  Park,  Whitchurch,
Hants.

*Potter,  John  Wilson,  63  Catherine  Street,  Westminster,  London,
S.W.  1.

Powell,  C.  Berkeley,  J.P.,  283  Metcalfe  Street,  Ottawa,  Canada.
*Powell,  Mrs.,  30  Campden  House  Court,  Kensington,  London,  W.  8.

Powles,  Lewis  Charles,  Rother  Cliff,  Rye,  Sussex.
*Prebble,  Mrs.,  Fairhaven,  Upper  Strickland  Avenue,  Hobart,
Tasmania.

*Preedy,  Kenelm,  77  Warwick  Road,  London,  S.W.  5.
*  Preston,  E.  M.,  The  Warren,  Hayes,  Kent.

*Price,  H.,  Roj^al  Societies'  Club,  63  St.  James's  Street,  London,
S.W.  1.

*Proctor,  Major  G.  Norman,  c/o  Messrs.  Cox  &  Co.,  16  Charing  Cros8»

London,  S.W.  1
*Pugh,  H.  W.,  38  Bedford  Square,  London,  W.C.  1.
*Pumphrey,  Mrs.,  Hindley  Hall,  Stockfield-on-Tyne.
*Putman,  Miss  Irene,  328  Walnut  Avenue,  San  Diego,  Cal.,  U.S.A.


XCII.]


Members  and  Associates.


37S


Pye,  W.  A.,  Priest  Hill,  Liinpsfield,  Surrey.
*Quinby,  Rev.  John  W.,  East  Bridgewater,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
*Racine,  F.  J.,  6  Rosenthorpe  Road,  Nunhead,  London,  S.E.  15.
*Radeliffe-Whitehead,  Ralph,  Woodstock,  Ulster  Co.,  N.Y.,  U.S.A.
*Radelyffe-Hall,  MissM.,  37  HollandStreet,  Kensington,  London,  W.8,

Rae,  J.  Burnett,  M.B.,  61  Harley  Street,  London,  W.  1.
*Rafferty,  Fred,  Santa  Ana,  California,  U.S.A.

Raikes,  Mrs.,  The  Mill  House,  Burford,  Oxon.
*Rampling-Rose,  Major  W.,  Llyndtr  Hall,  Rossett,  Nr.  Wrexham.

Ramsden,  Miss,  16  Incognito  Gade,  Oslo.
*Raud,  Waldron  H.,  Jr.,  139  Gibbs  Street,  Newton  Center,  Mass.,
U.S.A.

*Randell,  Rev.  J.  ]VIickley,  197  Wulfston  Street,  London,  W.  12.
*  Ransom,  Francis,  Newlands,  Hitch  in,  Herts.
*Rashleigh,  John  C.  S.,  M.D.,  Tlirowleigh,  Okehampton,  Devon.
*Rawsthorn,  Mrs.,  7  East  Chff,  Preston.

*Rayleigh,  The  Dowager  Lady,  65  Cadogan  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  3.

Reade,  Herbert  V.,  C.B.,  Ipsden,  Wallingford.

Ready,  Miss  E.  A.,  74  Regent  Road,  Leicester.
*Reeves,  Mrs.  M.  S.,  31  Pembroke  Square,  London,  W.  8.

Regina  Madre,  S.  M.  La,  Palazzo  Margherita,  Rome.

Reid,  Mrs.,  Crescent  House,  Effingham  Road,  Surbiton.

Rendall,  Rev.  Dr.  G.  H.,  Dedham  House,  Dedham,  Essex.
*Rhondda,  Sybil  Viscountess,  Llanwern,  Newport,  Mon.

Richardson,  Frederick  W.,  County  Analyst's  Office,  Hustlergate,
Bradford.

Richmond,  Kenneth,  Wittersham  House,  Wittersham,  Kent.
*Rickman,  John,  M.B.,  11  Kent  Terrace,  London,  N.W.  1.
*Riddle,  Mrs.,  Hillstead,  Farmington,  Conn.,  U.S.A.
♦Ridley,  Henry  N.,  F.R.S.,  C.M.G.,  7  Cumberland  Road,  Kew,
Surrey.

Ridley,  M.  Roy,  11  Percival  Road,  Clifton,  Bristol.
*Ritchie,  A.  J.,  Oriental  Club,  Hanover  Square,  London,  W.  1.
*Rivett,  Miss  D.  Mary,  M'Intosh  Street,  Gordon,  Sydney,  New  South
Wales.

Riviere,  Mrs.  Evelyn,  10  Nottmgham  Terrace,  York  Gate,  London^
N.W.  1.

Rix,  Rev.  A.  H.,  37  St.  Paul's  Road,  Manningham,  Bradford.
*Roach,  O.  A.,  401  Cedar  Street,  San  Antonio,  Texas,  U.S.A.
♦Robertson,  Mrs.  J.  G.,  90  Regent's  Park  Road,  London,  N.W.  1.


374


Members  and  Associates.


[part


Robinson,  George  R.,  25  Water  Street,  Liverpool.

Rogers,  George  F.,  M.D.,  4  King's  Parade,  Cambridge.
^Rogers,  Miss  F.  I.,  Southdown  Lawn,  Crownhill,  S.  Devon.

Rogers,  T.  Percival,  Friezewood,  Rudgeway,  Bristol.

Ross,  Samuel,  68  Willis  Street,  New  Bedford,  Mass.,  U.S.A.
*Rothschild,  Mrs. S., 20  York Buildings, Adelphi,  London,
W.C.  2.

♦Russell,  Mrs.,  c/o  Barclay's  Bank  Ltd.,  The  Broadway,  Ealing,
London,  W.  5.

*Russell,  Mrs.  E.  S.,  Bryans'  Ground,  Presteign,  Radnorshire.
*Rust,  Dr.  Montague,  Boyndie,  West  Newport,  Fife.
*Ryan,  Mrs.  E.,  Infirmiere,  a  Zaghouan,  Tunisia,  N.  Africa.

Ryder,  Miss  M.  L.,  Little  House,  Bristol  Street,  Brighton.

Ryves,  Miss  Evangeline,  Damory  Cottage,  Walton-on-the-Hill.

St.  Hill,  Mrs.,  Thimble,  Littlewick  Green,  Berks.
*St.  John,  Brig.-General  G.  F.  W.,  C.B.,  Picton  House,  Llandowror,

St.  Clears,  Carmarthenshire.
*Sagendorph,  Mrs.  George  A.,  476  Heath  Street,  Chestnut  Hill,

Mass.,  U.S.A.
*  Salter,  F.  R.,  Magdalene  College,  Cambridge.
♦Salter,  W.  H.,  Tlie  Crown  House,  Newport,  Essex.
♦Salter,  Mrs.  W.  H.,  The  Crown  House,  Newport,  Essex.
*Saltmarsh,  H.  P.,  Woodcote,  Lynton,  N.  Devon.

Samaldas,  Hon.  Lalubhai,  99  Apollo  Street,  Fort,  Bombay,  India.
*Sassoon,  Mrs.  Alfred,  Weirleigh,  Matfield  Green,  Kent.
*Saunders,  Canon  T.  B.  A.,  The  Abbey,  Carlisle.

Savill,  Mrs.,  M.D.,  7  Devonshire  Place,  London,  W.  1.
*Scatcherd,  Miss  F.  R.,  14  Park  Square,  Regents  Park,  London,
N.W.  1.

Schaaf,  Albert  E.,  2034  East  83rd  Street,  Cleveland,  Ohio,  U.S.A.
♦Schiller,  F.  C.  S.,  D.Sc,  Corpus  Christi  College,  Oxford.

Schofield,  Mrs.,  30  Argyll  Road,  Kensington,  London,  W.  8.
*Schoff,  Wilfred  H.,  110  Montgomery  Avenue,  Cynwyd,  Pa.,  U.S.A.

Scott,  Miss  A.  D.,  60  Hornsey  Lane,  Highgate,  London,  N.  6.
♦Scott,  Arthur  P.,  Faculty  Exchange,  University  of  Chicago,  Chicago,
111.,  U.S.A.

Scott,  Rev.  D.  D.,  C.F.,  The  Manse,  Onehimga,  Auckland,  New
Zealand.

Scott,  Captain  J.  E.,  39  Albany  Mansions,  Albert  Bridge  Road,
London,  S.W.  11.


xcn.]


Members  and  Associates.


376


*Scott,  Sydney  C,  92  Westbourne  Terrace.  Hyde  Park,  London,
W.  2.

*Scott,  Mrs.  W.  E.,  &  Millington  Road,  Cambridge.

Sedgwick,  Mrs.  H.  D.,  120  E.  22nd  Street,  New  York  City,  U.S.A.
*Selbome,  The  Earl  of,  K.G.,  Blackmoor,  Liss,  Hants.

Sellers,  IVIiss  R.  A.,  Wellesley  Girls'  High  School.  Naini  Tal,  India.

Seton-Karr,  Captain  H.  W.,  8  St.  Paul's  Mansions,  London,  W.  6.
*Sewell,  Mrs.  C.  H.,  Towerhm-st,  Leigh  Woods,  Bristol.
*Seymom%  Miss  E.  F.,  21  St.  George's  Square,  London,  S.W.  1.

Shackleford,  Hon.  Tliomas  M.,  1215-17  Tribune  Building,  Tampa,
Florida,  U.S.A.

*ShadweU,  Mrs.  Walter  H.  L.,  Cobb's  Well,  Fowey,  CornwaU.
*Shafto,  Miss  W.  A.,  Normanhurst,  Minnis  Bay,  Birchington,  Kent.

Shakespear,  Mrs.,  34  Abmgdon  Court,  Kensington,  London,  W.  8.

Shand,  Alexander  F.,  1  Edwardes  Place,  Kensington,  London,  W.  8.

Shastri,  B.  G.,  State  Council,  Udaipur  (Mewar),  Lidia.
*Shaw,  Mrs.  Bernard,  10  Adelphi  Ten-ace,  Strand,  London,  W.C.  2.

Sheldon,  Miss  M.,  122  Carlton  Street,  Winnipeg.
*Shewan,  R.  G.,  c/o  Shewan,  Tomes  &  Co.,  Hong  Kong.
*Shove,  Miss  E.,  M.B.,  30  York  Street  Chambers,  Bryanston  Square,
London,  W.  1.

♦Sibly,  F.  Arthur,  LL.D.,  Flook  House,  Taunton,  Somerset.
*Sidgwick,  Mrs.  Henry,  Fishers  Hill,  Woking,  Surrey.
Silver,  Mrs.  Kingston,  33  Marsham  Street,  Westminster,  London,
SW.  1.

*Sime,  J.  Boyd,  Dean  Mills,  Hawick,  N.B.

*Simmonds.  Miss  C.  E.,  33  Clarence  Gate  Gardeixs,  London,  N.W.  1.
Simpson,  Miss  Price,  Beech  Barns,  Alton,  Hants.
♦Sinclau-,  Miss  May,  1  Blenheim  Road,  St.  John's  Wood,  London,
N.W.  8.

Singh,  Amar,  Hoshiarpur,  Punjab,  Lidia.

Sloggett,  Lieut.-General  Sir  Arthur.  K.C.M.G.,  K.C.B.,  63  Bicken-

hall  Mansions,  London,  W.  1.
Smith,  Adolphe,  12  Crookham  Road,  Fulham,  London,  S.W.  6.
Smith,  Miss  Beatrice  E.,  Lea,  Grange-over-Sands..  Lancashire.
Smith,  G.  Albert,  Rosedene,  7  MelviUe  Road,  Hove.
♦Smith,  Harrison  B.,  c/o  The  George  Washington  Life  Insurance  Co.,.

Charleston,  W.  Va.,  U.S.A.
Smith,  J.  Hoyle,  Spring  Bank,  Eccles,  Lancashire.
Smith,  Rev.  Sidney  M.,  Holy  Trinity  Vicarage,  Halifax,  Yorkshire.

2  b


376


Members  and  Associates.


[part


Smith,  Rev.  William  J.,  St.  Marnock's  Manse,  Kilmarnock.
*Smith,  W.  S.  Montgomery,  138  Sloane  Street,  London,  S.W.  1.
*Smith,  W.  Wliately,  The  Turtons,  Hayes  Common,  Hayes,  Kent.
*Smithson,  Mrs.,  42  TUehouse  Street,  Hitchin,  Herts.
*Soal,  S.  G.,  Scratton  Lodge,  Brook  Road,  Prittlewell,  Essex.

Soley,  Mrs.,  66  Holbein  House,  Sloane  Square,  London,  S.W.  L

Southern,  H.,  24  Carholme  Road,  Forest  Hill,  London,  S.E.  23.
*Spankie,  W.  M.,  40  Lombard  Street,  London,  E.G.  3.
*Sparrow,  J.,  34  Hamilton  Square,  Birkenhead.

Spens,  William,  Gorpus  Ghristi  GoUege,  Cambridge.
*Spranger,  John  A.,  4  Via  Micheli,  Florence,  Italy.

Stacey,  F.  G.,  5  Fulready  Road,  Leyton,  London,  E.  10.

Stanton,  Rev.  Horace  G,  Ph.D.,  D.D.,  1818  Arch  Street,  Phila-
delphia, Pa.,  U.S.A.
*Steane,  G.  A.,  10a  Hay  Lane,  Coventry.
*Steel,  Mrs.,  Beaufort,  Marie  Hill,  Cheltenham.

Stephens,  Mrs.,  41  Harrington  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  7.

Stephens,  W.  F.,  Mahe,  Sejrchelles,  Indian  Ocean.
*Stephenson,  F.  W.,  Winter  Field,  Melbury  Abbas,  Shaftesbmy,
Dorset.

*SterIing,  Miss  F.  M.,  Home  Wood,  Hartfield,  Essex.
Stevenson, A. Creery, Streeve, Church Circle,  Farnborough,
Hants.

♦Stevenson,  lbs.  A.  F.  G.,  280  Bloor  Street,  Toronto,  Canada.
Stewart,  Mrs.  C.  A.,  Larghan,  Coupar  Angus,  N.B.
Stewart,  Miss  M.  A.,  Queen  Anne's  Mansions,  London,  S.W.  1.
*Stobart,  Mrs.  St.  Giair,  7  Turner's  Wood,  Hampstead  Garden

Suburb,  London,  N.W.  4.
Stoehr,  Miss,  Hotel  Belvedere,  Bordighera,  Italy.
Stout,  Professor  George  F.,  Graigard,  St.  Andrews,  N.B.
*Strachey,  John  St.  Loe,  Spectator  Office,  13  York  Street,  London,
W.G.  2.

Stratton,  F.  J.  M.,  Gonville  and  Gains  College,  Cambridge.
Streatfcild,  W.  H.  R.,  M.R.C.S.,  L.R.C.P.,  42  Ovington  Square,
London,  S.W.  3.

♦Strong,  Rev.  Charles,  D.D.,  Concord,  Barnato  Grove,  Armadale,
Melbourne,  Australia.
Strutt,  Captain  Hon.  A.  G,  R.N.,  Terlmg  Place,  Witham,  Essex.
*Strutt,  Hon.  Richard,  Rayleigh  House,  Chelsea,  London,  S.W.
*Stuart,  Lady,  10  Cleveland  Gardens,  Hyde  Park,  London,  W.  2.


xcn.]


Members  and  Associates.


377


*Sturdy,  Edward  T.,  Norburton,  Burton  Bradstock,  Bridport,
Dorset.

*Summerson,  F.  C,  Whiteways,  Meath  Green  Lane,  Horley,  Surrey.
*SuTingar,  Dr.  J.  Valckenier,  Wageningen,  Holland.
*Sutton,  Mrs.  C.  W.,  4002  Montrose  Avenue,  Westmount,  Montreal,
Canada.

Swainson,  Mis.s  F.  J.,  29  Trevor  Square,  Kniglits bridge,  London,
S.W.  7.

*Swainson,  Miss  M.,  23  Warrington  Crescent,  London,  W.  1>.

Swinburne,  Mi's.,  The  Manor  House,  Southwick,  Sussex.
♦Symington,  Howard  W.,  The  Paddocks,  Market  Harborough.

Tait,  Mrs.,  9  Aberdeen  Court,  Maida  Vale,  London,  W.  9.

Tait,  Mrs.  W.  J.,  Lismullen,  Oriental  Soad,  Woking,  Surrey.
*Talbot,  Mj.'s.  Hugh,  23  Elm  Park  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  10.
*Talbot,  P.  Amaury,  Bishopton,  Stratford-on-Avon.
*Tarpey,  Mrs.  Kiiigsley,  33  Biicldngham  Mansions,  Hampstead,

London,  N.W.  6.
*Tartaruga,  U.,  Gentzgasse  L32,  Wien,  XVIII,  Austria.
*Tatham,  A.  T.,  Mountain  Rise,  Pietermaritzburg,  S.  Africa.

Tatham,  Hon.  Justice  F.  S.,  D.S.O.,  Parkside,  Alexandra  Road,
Pieterraaritzhurg,  S.  Africa.
*Taylor,  Miss  E.  Waring,  23  Warrington  Crescent,  London,  W.  9.
*Taylor,  George  A.,  20  Loftus  Street,  Sydney,  Australia.
*Taylor,  Mrs.  Lewis  S.,  11  Belle  Vue  Road,  Exmouth,  De%'on.
*Te]ling,  W.  H.  Max^^ell,  M.D.,  29  Park  Square,  Leeds.

Temple,  Reginald  Vv^

*Thaw,  A.  Blair.,  3255  North  Street,  Washington,  D.C.,  U.S.A.
*Thesiger,  Mrs.  Ernest,  6  Montpelier  Terrace,  London,  S.W.  7.
*Thomas,  Rev.  C.  D.,  South  Hill  Lodge,  Bromley,  Kent.
*Thomas,  Mrs.  C.  _D.,  South  Hill  Lodge,  Bromley,  Kent.
*Thomas,  Norman,  1917  Club,  4  Gerrard  Street,  London,  W.  1.

Thomas,  Miss  Edith  J.,  Mynydd  Ednyfed,  Criccieth,  N.  Wales.

Thomas,  Ernest  Seymour,  Quiimey's,  Shottery,  Stratford-on-Avon,
*Thomas,  Miss  S.  E.,  368  Alexandra  Park  Road,  Wood  Green,
London,  N.  22.

Thompson,  Sir  Matthew  W.,  Bart.,  39  Steeles  Road,  Haverstock

Hill,  London,  N.W.  3.
*Thompson,  Owen,  K.C.,  4  New  Court.  Lincoln's  Inn,  London,
W.C.  2.

♦Thomson,  Edward  J.,  6  Windsor  Terrace  West,  Kelvinside,  Glasgow.


378


Members  and  Associates.


[PABT


*Thomson,  Rev.  H.  Byerley,  St.  Maiy's  Vicarage,  Stamford  Brook,
London,  W.  6.
Tliorp,  Richard,  Colenso  Avenue,  Napier,  New  Zealand.
Thrupp,  T.  C,  Lyndhurst,  27  Upper  Bridge  Road,  Redhill,  Surrey.
*Thurn  and  Taxis,  H.I.H.  The  Princess  Mary  of,  Loucen,  Nymburk,
Czecho-Slovaljia.

Thurston,  Rev.  Herbert,  S.J.,  114  Mount  Street,  Grosvenor  Square,

London,  W.  1.
Tipping,  Miss  K.,  7  Lansdowne  Circus,  Leamington.
*Todd,  Miss  C.  E.,  Down  Cottage,  Magham  Down,  HaUsham,  Sussex.
Torkildsen,  Vilhelm,  Bergen,  Norway.
*To8sizza,  Baron  M.  A.,  56  Plage  du  Prado,  Marseilles.
Tottenham,  Miss  Mary  T.  A.,  Ballycurry,  Ashford,  Co.  Wicklow,
Ireland.

*Tretheviry',  A.  W.,  Artillery  Mansions,  Victoria  Street,  Loudon,
S.W.  1.

Trevor,  The  Lady  Juliet,  16  Upper  Brook  Street,  London,  W.  1.
*Trimble,  W.  Copeland,  J. P.,  Century  House,  EnniskOlen,  Ulster.
*Ti'otter,  Mrs.,  Lansdown  Hotel,  Cheltenham.

*Troubridge,  (Una)  Lady,  37  Holland  Street,  Kensington,  London,
W.  8.

*Tubby,  mss  G.  Ogden,  514  West  114th  Street,  New  York  City,
U.S.A.

Tudor,  Owen  S.,  Fernhurst,  Haslemere,  Surrey.
*Tugwell,  Mrs.  Arthur,  Lanherne,  Frant  Road,  Tunbridge  WeUs.
•Turner,  Miss  J.,  B.A.,  14  Endsleigh  Street,  London,  W.C.  L
♦Turner,  Miss  M.  E.,  6  Clifton  Road,  Crouch  End,  London,  N.  8.

Tuson,  K.  H.,  Lieut.,  R.E.,  c/o  C.  B.  Tuson  Esq.,  35  New  Broad
Street,  London,  E.C.  2.
•Tyrone,  The  O'Neill  de,  59  rua  das  Flores,  Lisbon,  Portugal.
•TjTTell,  G.  N.,  Quince  House,  Bishops  Nympton,  Barnstaple.
•Tyrwhitt,  Rev.  H.  M.,  19  Tlie  Glebe,  Blackheath,  London,  S.E.  3.

Ulman,  Mrs.  Jacob  A.,  Brooklandville,  Baltimore  County,  Md.,
U.S.A.

*Van  Dyk,  H.  M.,  Staalkade  7,  Amsterdam,  Holland.

Van  Renterghem,  A.  W.,  M.D.,  1  Van  Breestraat,  Amsterdam.
*Vatcher,  Mi-s.,  21  St.  Leonard's  Road,  Ealing,  London,  W.  13.
*Verney-Cave,  Hon.  Mrs.,  Stanford-on-Avon,  Rugby.

Verrall,  Miss  M.  E.,  St.  Hilda's,  Bethnal  Green  East,  London,  E.C.
•Vincent,  Miss  G.  H.  M.  M.,  Carisbrooke  Road,  Leicester.


cxn,]


Members  and  Associates.


379


*Vmen,  Northcote  H.,  8  Park  Mansions,  Sydenham,  London,  S.E.  26.
Vyvyan,  Mrs.  T.  C,  Poldhu,  Richmond,  Natal,  South  Africa.
*Wah,  See  Tiong,  J.P.,  11  Amber  Road,  Singapore.
*Wales,  Hubert,  Homewood  Heath,  Hindhead,  Surrey.
*Waley,  S.  D.,  18  The  Green,  Kew,  Surrey.

Walker,  Mrs.  Claude,  12  Southwood  Court,  Hampstead  Garden

Suburb,  London,  N.W.  4.
•Walker,  Mrs.  J.  F.,  26  St.  Andrew's  Mansions,  Dorset  Street,
London,  W.  1.

Walker,  Miss  Madeline  J.,  107  Queen's  Gate,  London,  S.W.  7.
Walker,  Miss  May  C,  National  Provincial  Bank,  Piccadilly,  London,
W.  1.

*  Walker,  Miss  Nea,  13  York  Road,  Edgbaston,  Birmingham.
•Walker,  Lieut. -Colonel  P.  L.  E.,  Great  House,  Chipping  Sodbury,
Glos.

Walker-Munro,  Mrs.,  Rhinefield,  Brockenhurst,  Hants.
♦Wallace,  Abraham,  M.D.,  Wendela,  Harrow-on-the-Hill,  Middlesex.

Walsh,  Correa  M.,  Belleport,  Long  Island,  N.Y.,  U.S.A.

Wanderley,  F.  M.,  Corumba,  Matto  Grosso,  BrazU.

Wang,  C.  Y.,  21  Rue  de  Paris  Extension,  Hankow,  China.

Ward,  Hon.  Kathleen,  Moorings,  Menai  Bridge,  N.  Wales.
•Warner,  Mrs.  W.  W.,  56  Onslow  Gardens,  London,  S.W.  7.

Warren,  ]\Irs.  Fiske,  8  Mount  Vernon  Place,  Boston,  Mass.,  U.S.A.

Warrender,  Mss  Margaret,  50  WUton  Crescent,  London,  S.W.  1.
•Warrick,  F.  W.,  6  Raymond  Buildings,  Gray's  Lxn,  London,  W.C.  1.

Wastell,  Mrs.,  The  Rowans,  Crowborough,  Sussex.

Watson,  Mrs.  Milne,  73  Eccleston  Square,  London,  S.W.  1.

Watson-Taylor,  Mrs.

Webster,  Mrs.  Julia  C,  204  Pearl  Street,  Burlington,  Vermont,
U.S.A.

*WegueUn,  Mrs.  Arthui-,  C.B.E.,  20  Carlyle  Square,  London,  S.W.  3.

Weinberg,  Dr.  A.  A.,  Helperoostsingel  2,  Groningen,  Holland.
•Weldon,  Arthur,  27  Arlington  Road,  Eastboiu:ne,  Sussex.
*Wells,  Mrs.  Thos.  E.,  Green  Bay  Road,  Lake  Forest,  111.,  U.S.A.
•Wellesley,  Victor  A.  A.  H.,  C.B.,  20  St.  Loo  Mansions,  St.  Loo
Avenue,  Chelsea,  London,  S.W.  3.

Wemyss,  Countess  of,  62  Cadogan  Square,  London,  S.W.  1.

Western,  F.  J.,  Cambridge  Mission,  Delhi,  India.
•Westray,  Mrs.,  25  Cavendish  Road  West,  St.  John's  Wood,  London,
N.W.  8.


380


Members  and  Associates.


[part


*Wetterstad,  Dr.  S.,  Bondernes  hus,  Oslo,  Norway.

Whitaker,  Joseph  J.  S.,  Villa  Malfitano,  Palermo,  Sicily.
*White,  Mrs.  Digby,  Boxfield,  Little  Kimble,  Bucks.
*Whiteliead,  Miss  Mercia  D.,  St.  Mary's,  Trumpington,  Cambridge.
*mitfield,  A.  Stanton,  F.R.Hist.S.,  Bentley  Moor,  Walsall,  Staffs.
*Whitmee,  A.  C,  Homelands,  Fortis  Green,  London,  N.  2.
*Widdup,  Mrs.,  12  Merlin  Road,  Blackburn.
*Wigan,  Mis.  C.  Rookliurst,  22  Che-sham  Place,  London,  S.W.  L

Wigan,  W.  L.,  Clare  Cottage,  East  Mailing,  Maidstone,  Kent.

WUd,  Miss  Ida,  Old  Larkshayes,  Dalwood,  KUmington,  S.  Devon.

Wilkins,  Mrs.,  12  Braemar  Avenue,  Thornton  Heath,  London,  S.W.

Wilkins,  C.  F.,  c/o  Messrs.  H.  S.  King  &  Co.,  9  Pall  Mall,  London,
S.W.  1.

*Wilkins,  Rev.  H.  J.,  D.D.,  Redland  Green,  Bristol,  Glos.

Willtinson,  Miss  Marian  S.,  9  St.  Peter's  Grove,  York.
*Wilkinson,  Miss  Milisent  A.,  c/o  The  Australian  Bank  of  Commerce,
37  Threadneedle  Street,  London,  E.G.

Willett,  Miss  Cicely,  at  42  Drayton  Gardens,  London,  S.W.

Williams,  Mrs.  Glynne,  7  Berkeley  House,  Hay  Hill,  London,  W.  I.
*Williams,  H.  G.,  22  Guilford  Street,  London,  V^^.C.  1.
*WiUiams,  T.  G.  D.,  Elsenliam,  Seacroft,  Skegness,  Lines.

Williamson,  Mrs.,  The  Copse,  Brook,  Godalmrng,  Surrey.
*Williamson,  John,  M.D.,  Heathfield,  18  College  Road,  Epsom.
*Williamson,  The  Very  Rev.  Dr.  Wallace,  44  Palmerston  Place,
Edinburgh .

William^^-Walker,  Dr.  A.,  5  Yardley  Wood  Road,  Moseley,  Birraing-
ham.

Willis,  Grant  B.,  718  Renkert  Building,  Canton,  Ohio,  U.S.A.
*WiUock,  Mrs.  C.  J.,  The  Old  Gard  Farm,  Ditchling,  Sussex.
♦Wills,  Mss  Mary  Tappan,  c/o  Brown,  Shipley  &  Co.,  123  Pall  Mall,

London,  S.W.  1.
*Wilson,  Colonel  C.  E.,  Longcross  House,  Chertsey,  Sui'rey.
*Wilson,  Mrs.  C.  Stuart,  36  Sharia  Falaki,  Cairo,  Egypt.
Wilson,  Mrs.  H.  J.,  Braemar  Royal,  West  Southbourne,  Bourne-
mouth.

*Wilson,  J.  S.,  24  Chapel  Street,  London,  S.W.  1.

*Wilson,  Mrs.  Orme,  3  East  64th  Street,  New  York,  U.S.A.

Wilson,  Percy,  48  Clarendon  Road,  Putney,  London,  S.W.  15.
*Winchilsea  and  Nottingham.  Dowager  Countess  of.  Dower  House,
Ewerby,  Sleaford,  Lines.


xcn.]


31  embers  aud  Associatea.


381


Wingham,  T. H., 174  Aberdeen  Avenue,  Hamilton,  Ontario,
Canada.

Witherby,  Arthur  George,  Newtown,  Newbury,  Berks.
*Wodehouse,  The  Lady  Isabel,  Kimberley  House,  Wymondham.
*Wood,  Rev.  James  L.,  912  South  48th  Street,  Philadelphia,  Penn.,
U.S.A.

*Wood,  Richard,  Coolculitha,  Innishannon,  Co.  Cork.
*Wood,  T.  Eugene,  Redcliffe,  14  Chine  Crescent  Road,  Bom-nemouth.
*Woodhouse,  Mrs.  R.,  48  Antrim  Mansions,  Haverstock  Hill,  London,
N.W.  3.

Woodhull,  Miss  Zula  M.,  Norton  Park,  Bredon's  Norton,  near

Tewkesbury,  Gloucestershire.
Woods,  Miss  Alice,  St.  Ives,  Radlett,  Herts.

Woods,  Miss  C.  E.,  13  Cowley  Street,  Westmmster,  London,  S.W.  1.
Woollett,  Lieut.-Colonel  W.  Charles,  F.S.A.,  4  The  Ridges,  Farn-
boro',  Hants.

*Woolley,  Mrs.  Cornell,  950  Park  Avenue,  New  York,  U.S.A.

WooUey,  V.  J.,  M.D.,  18  Freta  Road,  Bexley  Heath,  Kent.
*Worsfold,  Mrs.  Basil,  3  Plowden  Buildings,  Temple,  London,  E.G.  4.

Wrangham,  W.  H.,  78  Barmouth  Road,  Wandsworth,  London,
S.W.  18.

*Wriford,  Mrs..  21  Bullingham  Mansions,  Kensington,  London,  W.
*Wright,  Dr.  A.  F.,  Trent  Valley  House,  Lichfield.
*Wright,  G.  E.,  10,  The  Paragon,  Blackheath,  London,  S.E.  3.
*Wright,  Maurice  B.,  M.D.,  86  Brook  Street,  London,  W.  1.

Wynn,  John,  Widney,  Solihull,  Warwickshire.

Yaroschenko,  Madame,  La  Cava,  Bordighera,  Italy.
*Yardley,  R.  B.,  Tlie  Birches,  London  Road,  Worcester  Park,
Surrey.

Yeats.  W.  B.,  82  Merrion  Square,  Dublin.

*Yeoman,  Mrs.,  Hampden  House,  Highgate  Hill,  London,  N.  6.
*Yeoman,  Miss  I.  V.,  Hampden  House,  Highgate  Hill,  London,  N.  6.
*Yerburgh,  Rev.  W.  H.  B.,  The  Rectory,  Bredon,  Tewkesbury.

Younghuaband,  Sir  Francis,  Currant  Hill,  Westerham,  Kent.

Zeehandelaar,  Dr.  I.,  39  Sarphatistraat,  Amsterdam,  Holland.
*ZeUer,  Dr.  Gustave,  Lutherstr.,  29,  Harburg  near  Hamburg.


PROCEEDINGS


OF  THE


Society  for  Psychical  Research

INDEX  TO  VOL.  XXXIV
(PARTS  LXXXIX-XCII)


A.

A.  V.  B. See  Leonard,  Mrs.  Osborne  :  Persojial  Controls.
Alrutz,  Dr.  Sydney,  The  Mechanism  of  the  So-called  Mediumistic

Trance  jgg
Reply  to,  by  (Una)  Lady  Troubridge - -  298
„ The  Psychological  Importance  of  Hyjynotism,  reference  to  169
American  Branch  of  the  Society  for  Psychical  Research,  Ques-
tionnaire regarding  Hxrman  Sentiment  as  to  a  Future  Life,
reference  to  jgg
A  New  Message  from  Oscar  Wilde,  Review  of - - . -  186

Automatic  Scripts  (Messages)  186-196

" Handwriting  in,  resemblance  to  i^urporting

communicator's - - - 188,  190,  191

B.

Balfovir,  The  Rt.  Hon.  G.  W.,  On  Pluralism,  reference  to  -  195-196
Present  at  experiments  in  thought-transference  with

Professor  Gilbert  Murray - - 213-217,  336,  340

Barrett,  Sir  William  -  -  -  2,  5,  7,  9,  10,  21-22,  23,  313,  314,  315
Experiments  with  the  Creery  children,  reference  to  -  89-90
Some  Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years'  Psychical  Research  -  275

Beauchamp  Case,  Reference  to  I75  (footnote)


384


Index  to  Vol.  XXXIV.


[parts


Benson,  Archbishop,  Script  references  to.  See  Eliu^idation  of
Two  points  in  the  "  One-Horse  Dawn  "  Scripts  :  The  Herb
Moly.

Bergson,  Henri,  Reference  to ------ -  138

Biological  and  Metapsychical  analogies . . . .  203-206

Blackbin"n,  Douglas  (and  G.  A.  Smith),  Experiments  with  -  -  88-89
Brighton  Experiments,  References  to 29  (footnote),  37,  38,  39,

43,  49  (footnote),  50,  62,  63-64

C.

Callaway,  Hugh  G.,  References  to  experiences  of  -  -  170-172
Charcot,  Dr.,  Hypnotic  experiments  of,  references  to  - 167,  168-169

Child  prodigies.  On  92,  101

Clairvoyance,  On  the  evidence  for - - - - - -  133

„  ,, phenomenon  of - - 75,  125,  126,  127

,,  See  also  Cryptesthesia.

Coincidences  in  Tests  with  Playing  Cards,  A  method  of  scoring -  181
Communication  from  the  Dead,  On  the  question  of-

Difficulties  of  communicating,  Script  simile  to  express -  29
On  the  confused  quality  of  the  "  messages." See  Mrs.
Sidgwick's  On  Hindrances  and  Complications  in  Tele-
pathic Communication.
On  trivial  recollections  as  evidence .....  98-99

Communicator :  Myers .......  146-147

Control,  Personal :  A.  Y.  B. See  Leonard,  Mrs.  Osborne.

Controls,  Personal 173-177,  298-309

Creery  children,  On  the  experiments  in  thought-transference

with  the  89-90

C'rookes,  Sir  William,  Apparatus  and  experiments  devised  by,  for

proving  the  existence  of  "  psychic  force  " 316,  317-320
,, Work  of,  in  psychical  research,  references  to 3,  5,  23,

70,  208,  281,  283,  284-285,  295
Crookes,  Sir  Willia^n,  The  Life  of.  By  E.  E.  Fournier  d'Albe,

Review  of  - - - . . - . - . .  310
Cross -Correspondences,  Misconception  of  the  meaning  of - -  84-85
,,  ,,  Reference  to  - - - - -  149-150

Cryptesthesia 74,  75,  76-78,  91,  109-110

Cushman,  A.,  Reference  to  a  "  psychic  "'  photograph  obtained  by  112

D.

d'Albe,  E.  E.  Fournier,  The  Life  of  Sir  William  Crookes  -  ■  310
De  U  Inconscient  au  Conscient,  Reference  to  -  -  -  202,  204
Dessoir,  Professor  Max,  Die  Krise  des  Okkultismus  -  324,  327-328
Dickmson,  G.  Lowes,  Review  of  Dr.  Schiller's  Problems  of  Belief  196


Lxxxix.-xcii.] Index  to  Vol.  XXXIV.


385


Die  Krise  des  OkkuUismus 324,  327-328

Die  Okkultische  Beweguyig  in  der  Gegenwart  -  -  324,  326-327
Dingwall,  E.  J.,  Telekinetic  and  Teleplastic  Mediumship  -  -  324
Discours  Presidentiel,  by  Camille  Flammarion  -  -  -  -  1
Divining  Rod,  Early  discission  of  the  question  of  the,  reference

to - - 276-277

Dowsing,  On  the  phenomenon  of  -  -  -  -  -  290-291
Doyle,  Sir  A.  Conan,  Pulse-rate  in  Trance,  reference  to  -  -  177
Dream-TraveUing,  Experimental  .  .  .  .  .  170-171
Dynamo  psychism,  Doctrine  of  - - - - - - -  203

E.

Echolalia  166-168

Ectoplasm,  On  -  -  74,  94,  111-112,  202,  204-205,  209,  286,  328-331
Elucidation  of  Two  Points  in  the  "  One-Horse  Dawn  Scripts  "  -  153
Ermacora,  Dr.  G.  B.,  Dreams  telepathicaUy  induced,  reference  to  63
Ether,  Sir  Oliver  Lodge's  hypothesis  of  the,  in  regard  to  discarnate

personalities 119-122,  199-200

"  Eva  C."  - - 328,  330,  332

Experimente  an  einem  telekinetischen  Medium  -  -  -  324,  327
Experimente  der  Fernbewegung,  by  Dr.  A.  Freiherr  von  Schrenck-

Notzing  324

Experimente  zur  Fernbewegung,  by  Dr.  Albert  Hellwig - 324,  327

F.

Fisher,  R.  A.,  A  Method  of  Scoring  Coincidences  in  Tests  with

Playing  Cards  181

Flammarion,  Camille,  Discours  Presidentiel . - .  .  i

Florentine,  Abraham,  Reference  to  the  case  of  - - -  -  87

For  and  Against  Survival  -------  107-129

Fox,  Ohver. See  Callaway,  H.  G.

Fviture  Life,  The  American  Branch  of  the  S.P.R.'s  Questionnaire

on  Human  Sentiment  with  regard  to  a - - -  -  199

G.

Geley,  Gustave —

De  L'  Inconscient  au  Conscient ----- 202,  204

In  Memoriam ---------  201

L'  Ectoplasmie  et  la  Clairvoyance  ------  209

V  Etre  Subconscient -------  203-204

Les  Preuves  du  Transformisme ------  203

Views  and  Doctrines 203-206

2C2


386


Index  to  Vol.  XXXIV.


[parts


Green,  Mrs.,  Reference  to  case  contributed  by  -  -  -  -  85
Gurney,  Edmund,  Hypnotic  researches  of,  references  to  -  -  30-32
Guthrie,  M.,  Experiments  in  Telepathy  by,  References  to

36,  38-39,  40,  41,  42,  43,  44,  54,  56-57,  60-61


Ha\mtings  74

Head-snaps  170-171

Hellwig,  Dr.  Albert,  Experimente  zur  Fernbewegung - - 324,  327

Heknholtz,  On  Telepathy  7

Henning,  Professor  Hans,  Experimente  an  einem  telekinetischen

Medium 324,  327

Herdman,  Dr.,  Experiments  in  Telepathy,  reference  to  -  -  40,  41
Hill,  J.  Arthur,  On  the  hypothesis  of  cryptesthesia  in  regard  to

communications  from  the  Dead  ------  78-79

Hindrances  and  Complications  in  Telepathic  Communication -  28
"  Holland,"  Mrs.,  Script  of,  reference  to - - - - 29,  149

Hugo,  Victor,  Experiments  carried  out  by  - - - - -  24-25

Husk,  C,  Mediumship  of 287-288

Hypnotic  experiments  furnishing  examples  of  distortion  and  cur-
tailment of  ideas  emerging  from  a  subliminal
stratimi --------  30-35

„  phenomena  and  mediimiistic  trance  -  -  -  166,  298
Hypnotism,  Tlie  Psychological  Importance  of,  reference  to - -  169

I.

In  Memoriam — Gustave  Geley .......  201

Institut  Metapsychique  Internationale,  Formation  of  -  -  24,  206
Irving,  Rev.  W.  S.,  On  Personal  Controls  in  medivimistic  trance,

references  to - - - - - - 173,  174  (footnote)

J.

Janet,  Dr.  Pierre,  Hypnotic  experiments  of,  references  to  - 167,  169


K.

Kirk,  Joseph,  Experiment  in  telepathy,  I'eference  to  -  -  -  87
Kluski,  Franek,  Mediumship  of  208

L.

Laplace  quoted  7-8
Lazlo,  Ladislaus,  On  the  exposure  of  - - - - -  329-332


Lxxxix.-xcii.] Index  to  Vol.  XXXIV.


387


Leonard,  IVIrs.  Osborne,  Trance  Phenomena  of —

A.  V.  B.  PersonaUty,  On  the  source  of - - -  302-304

Analgesia  172-173

Controls —

Feda's  knowledge  of  Personal-control  material  and  vice-
versa  ... -  173,  175,  176,  299-301
relation  to  Personal  Controls 173,  176,  299-301,  305

Personal  Controls 173-177,298-309

A.  V.  B. 176,  298-309

Contrasted  with  Feda-control - 173,  305-307

Development 305-307

„ Medium's  breathing  - - - 173,  307-308
Hyperaesthesia  of  hearing  ----- 172-173,  308
touch - . - 175  (footnote),  298-299
Telepathy  between  sitter  and  medium .....  303
Trance  viewed  in  the  light  of  hypnotic  phenomena

172-177.  298-309

Levitations,  Alleged  Phenomena  of. See  Telekinesis.
Lodge,  Sir  Oliver —

Ether,  Hypothesis  of  the 118-122,  199-200

- In  Memoriam — Gustave  Geley ......  201

Making  of  Man  199

Possibility  of  Survival  from  the  Scientific  Point  of  View  - -  113
Review  of  The  Life  of  Sir  William  Crookes  - - - -  310
,, Traite  de  Metapsychique - - - - -  70

Telepathy,  Experunental 38-39,  40,  42

„ On  22

M.

Mabire,  J.  E.,  Experiments  in  telepathy  by,  references  to  37,  58-59
MacGregor,  Miss  Helen,  and  Mr.  V.'s  "  Oscar  Wilde  "  scripts

188  (footnote),  189

Making  of  Man,  Review  of  199
Marbe,  Professor  Karl,  Die  okkuUische  Bewegung  in  der  Gegen-

wart 324,  326-327

Materialization,  Alleged  phenomena  of - - -  74,  75,  94

M'DougaU,  Professor  William  -  -  195-196,  226  (footnote),  270,  295
Mediumistic  Trance,  The  MecJmnism  of  the  So-called  -  -  -  166
Mediumistic  Trance,  The  "  Modus  Operandi  "  in.  Some  Further

Consideration  of  - - - - - - - - -  298

Memoiy  and  Matter  -  80,  108-109

Metapsychics,  A  Text-book  of -------  70

Method  of  Scoring  Coincidences  in  Tests  with  Playing  Cards -  181
Meyer,  Jean,  References  to ----- 24,  206,  211

Milton's  Comus,  On  the  Script  reference  to - 154,  155,  156,  159


388


Index  to  Vol.  XXXIV.


[PABTS


Mind  and  Body,  Interaction  of 203-206

Miirray,  Professor  GUbert,  Experiments  in  thought-transference,
references  to  the  First  Report  on 37,  41,  45,  60,

61-62,  65-66,  67-68,  87
,, Fiirther Experiments. See Thought- Transfere^ice,
Further  Experiments  in.

Myers-Control 29,  146-147

Myers,  F.  W.  H. 2,  5,  10,  70  (footnote),  82,  97,  137,  202,  281,

287-288,  297,  314,  323
Hypnotic  Experiments  of,  references  to  - - 30-31,  32-35

N.

Newnham,  Rev.  P.  H.,  and  Mrs.,  Experiments  in  telepathy  by,

references  to 37,  41,  44-45,  46-49


O.

Ochorowicz,  Dr.  J.,  Hypnotic  Experiments  of,  references  to  167,  168
"  Old  Man  in  White  "  -  -  -  153-154,  155,  157-158,  160,  163
On  Hifidrances  and  Complications  in  Telepathic  Com?nunication  -  28
"  One-Horse  Dawn  "  Scripts,  Elucidation  of  two  Poiats  in -  153

"  Oscar  Wilde  "  Script  186

Osty,  Dr.  Eugene,  Supernormal  Faculties  in  Man,  reference  to -  127
.,  ,,  ,,  Review  of -  333

P.

Palladino,  Eusapia 93-94,  325

Phantasms  of  the  Living,  by  Gvimey,  Myers  and  Podmore,  re-
ferences to 85,  86,  89-90

Physical  phenomena 133,  283-285,  287-291

See  also  Telekinetic  and  Teleplastic  Mediumship.
Piddington,  J.  G. —

Elucidation  of  Two  Points  in  the  "  One-Horse  Dawn  "  Scripts  :

The  Precocious  Olive - - - - - - - -  159

Experiments  in  thought-transference  with  Professor  Gilbert

Murray 338,  339,  341

Presidential  Address - - - - - - - -  131

Piper,  Mrs.,  On  the  Trance  psychology  of  - - - -  166-172

Presidential  Address,  Camille  Flammarion  -----  1

J.  G.  Piddington  131

Prevision  01,  111,  127-129

See  also  Cryptesthesia.
Problems  of  Belief,  Review  of - - - - - - -  196

Psychic  Messages  from,  Oscar  Wilde,  Review  of  - - - -  186


Lxxxix.-xcii.] Index  to  Vol.  XXXIV.


389


Psychical  Research,  Attitude  of  orthodox  Science  to 70-71,  106,

281,  282,  284-285,  313,  315-316,  319-320


Early  psychical  researchers - - -  275

„ steps  in ----- -  281

Foundation  of  the  Society  for - - -  280

in  France 23-24


„  Materialistic  explanation  of  the  phenomena.

See  Review  of  Richet's  Traite  de  Mita-
psychique,  and  of  Osty's  Supernormal
Faculties.

.,  On  the  easy siinulability and  imcertain

character  of  the  phenomena  135-137
.,  ,, growing  complexity  of - -  149-151

,,  ,, need  for  precision  in  evidence  - -  85,  90

See  also  Society  for  Psychical  Research.
Psychical  Research,  Some  Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years',  by  Sir

William  Barrett  275

Psychometry  - - - - 91,  127

Pulse-Rate  in  Trance,  Reference  to - - - - 177  (footnote)

R.

Rawson,  H.  G.,  Experunents  m  telepathy  by,  references  to  37,  58,  64-65
Reading  of  Sealed  Envelopes,  On  the  ...  109,  126-127
Report  on  Further  Experiments  in  Thought-Transference,  carried

out  by  Professor  Gilbert  Murray - - . . . 212,  336

Re\news  70,  18C,  196,  199,  310,  324,  333

Richet,  Professor  Charles,  The  Difficulty  of  Survival  from  the

Scientific  Point  of  View  - - - - - -  107

,, Traiti  de  Metapsychique,  Review  of - - - -  70,  97

Misconceptions,  and  errors  in  evidence - - -  84-90
TeiTTiinology  - - - - - - - -  91-92

Riviere,  Mrs.,  Table-tilting  experiment  with  Mrs.  Verrall,  re-
ference to - - - ----- - -  40-41

S.

Salter,  W.  H.,  Elucidation  of  Two  Points  in  the  One-Horse

Dawn  "  Scripts  :  The  Herb  Moly  153

Schiller,  F.  C.  S.,  D.Sc  ,  Problems  of  Belief,  Review  of  -  -  196
Review  of  Dr.  Osty's  Supernormal  Factdties  in  Man  -  333
SchmoU,  Anton,  Expermients  in  telepathy  by,  references  to  37,  58-59
Schneider,  Willi,  Medivmaship  of  ....  325-328,  332
Schrenck-Notzing,  Dr.  von,  Der  Betrug  des  Mediums  Ladislaus

Laszlo  324

„  Experimente  der  Pernbewegung ■ 324,  325-326

„  Experiments  in  telepathy,  references  to 37,  57,  67


390


Index  to  Vol.  XXXIV.


Scientific  Scepticism 104-105,  320-322:

Sidgwick,  Henry 1,  5,  89,  93,  207,  281,  314

Sidgwick,  Mrs.  Henry —

On  Hindrances  and  Complications  in  Telepathic  Communica-
tion 28
Report  on Further Experiments  in  Thought-Transference

carried  out  by  Professor  Gilbert  Murray  - - - 212,  336

Review  of  the  "  Oscar  Wilde  "  Script  186

Study  of  the  Psychology  of  Mrs.  Piper's  Trance  Phenomena,

References  to 166,  168,  169,  170,  171

Signatm-es  and  Handwritings  in  Script - - - 188,  190,  191
Slade,  Henry,  Medimnship  of ------ -  287

Smith,  Cr.  A.,  On  the  experiments  in  thought-transference  with

D.  Blackbm-n  88-89

,, See  also  Brighton  Experiments.
Smith,  Mrs.  Travers.  Psychic  Messages  from  Oscar  Wilde,  Edited

by  186

Smith,  Vs.  Whately,  A  Suggested  New  Method  of  Research,  re-
ference to  178-180

,, Review  of  Making  of  Man . . .  ...  199

Society  for  Psychical  Research,  On  the  work  of —

Difficulties 135-137,  151-152,  199

Evidence,  Need  for  fresh  141-144
,,  ,, maintaining  a  high  standard  of -  144-147

Increasing  complexity  of  psychical  research - -  147-151
On  the  progress  made .... 131,  132-135,  151-152

Contrasted  with  that  in  physical  science - -  134-137
Uncertainty  characterizing  the  phenomena  - -  135-137,151-152
Some  Further  Consideration  of  the  "  Modus  Operandi  "  in  Medium-

istic  Trance .......  .  298

Some  Reminiscences  of  Fifty  Years'  Psychical  Research - -  275
Subconscious  mind,  On  the  rmtrustworthiness  of - - -  47-49
Supernormal  Faculties  in  Man,  Review  of  - - - - -  333

Surmgar,  Dr.  .J.  Valckenier,  Case  contributed  by,  reference  to  136-137
Sixrvival.  On  the  question  of 18-23,  75-76,  78-79,  84-85,  98-103,

133-134,  149-150,  152,  199
Survival,  The  Difficulty  of ,  from  the  Scientific  Point  of  View  -  107
Survival,  The  Possibility  of,  from  the  Scientific  Point  of  View -  113

T.

Telekinesis,  Phenomena  of  ....  74,  75,  93-94,  324
Telekinetic  and  Teleplastic  Mediumship  .....  324
Telepathic  Cotnmunication,  On  Hindrances  and  Complicatio7is  in  28
Telepathic  messages  from  the  dead.  Difference  in  the  evidence

jjossible  for,  and  similar  messages  from  the  living - -  36


liXXXix.-xcu.] Index  to  Vol.  XXXIV.


391


Telepathy,  The  Phenomena  of —

Agent's  part  in  the  transmission  - - - 39-45,  225-229,  245
„ possibly  subliminal  . - - -  41-42,  245

Activity  and  voluntary  effort.  Question  of  the  efficacy  of  40-41
Apparent  aids  to  transmission  ....  43-44,  45
Cases  illustrating  sources  of  error  in  transmission  40-43,  226-228
Impulsive  quality.  Apparent  lack  of  -  -  -  -  38-39
Kaiids  of  transference  attempted  -  -  -  -  44-45,  223
Commimication  a  subliminal  process  -

30,  35,  41-42,  46,  54,  245-247
Contact  experiments,  A  drawback  in  -  -  -  -  225-226
Emergence  of  the  impression. See  Gradual  development ;

a7id  also  Percipient's  part  in  the  transmission.
Error  in  transmission,  On  the  intmsion  of

30,  34-35,  46,  53-54,  68,  246
,, Cases  illustrating. See  Agent's,  and  Percipient's,  part
in  the  transmission.
Experimental. See  Mrs.  Henry  Sidgwick's  On  Hindrances
and  Complications  in  Telepathic  Communication,  and
Report  on  Further  Experiments  carried  out  by  Professor
Gilbert  Murray.

General  references - - 22-23,  77-78,  79-81,  132-133,  293-295
Gradual  development  of  the  impression  affords  greater

possibilities  of  misinterpretation  50,  54-68
„  ,, a  groping  for  the  idea - -  242-243

„  ,, Cases  of. See  above.  Experimental.

Instant  apprehension  of  the  idea,  Cases  of  - - 243,  248,  258
On  the  interpretation  of  mental  images . . . .  54.56

,,  subconscious  processes  in  their  bearing  on  unperfection

of  transmission .......  30-35

Percipient's  part  in  the  transmission - - - . 30,  45-68
Activity  and  effort.  Cases  showing ....  40-41

Emergence  of  the  impression.  On  the  intrusion  of  error

in  the  process  of  - - - - 30-35,  46

„ Apparent  aids  to .....  64-67

„ Cases  illustrating  the  intrusion  of  error

46-49,  50-57,  59-63,  246
„ External  fact  or  occurrence  seeming  to  stimu-
late 64-66

„ Incompleteness  of - - - - 65-68,  229

Modes  of  46

Impressions developing  differently
according to the method  em-
ployed 53-54
Mental  images  or  ideas - 54-68,  243-244


392  Index  to  Vol  XXXIV.  [pabts

Telepathy,  The  Phenomena  of—

Percipient's  part  in  the  transmission —

Emergence  of  the  impression,  Modes  of—

Motor  or  sensory  automatism -  -

Automatic  ^vriting,  Advantage  of  -  49-50
Two  methods  tried  experimentally -  53
Feelings  sometimes  accompanying  the  impressions -  38-39

Expectation  of  success,  Influence  of - ,  -
Idea  of  the  object  apprehended -  "'g'^gg  67  68

Image  "  "

On  the  way  the  impressions  come^^  ^^^^  ^^^^^^^  ^^^^  ^^^^^^^

77  78

Regarded  as  a  particular  form  of  lucidity - - " "  ^^"^^

physical  process - - ■ ' '  .
„ subliminal  process. 6'ee  above,  Conunumca-


Spa^ial  relation  between  Agent  and  Percipient,  Influence  of  29-30.  38
Unreliability  of  telepathic  coixaiiunication  - -  -

The  Life  of  Sir  William  Crookes,  Review  oi ■ - "  '  .aa

The  Mechanism  of  the  So-called  Mediumistic  Trance " "  '

Thirtv  Years  of  Psychical  Research,  Review  of - -  -
T^gjI-TraJfereL,  Report  on  Further  Experiments  ^n,  canned
out  by  Professor  Gilbert  Murray - - "  '

Agents —  217
Balfour.  The  Eight  Hon.  G.  W. - - •  '

.  Srw"^  ■  226-228,  232,  258-265

■  Murra;,  Miss  Agnes 213,  215,  2,6,  223  226  (— ),

22S  (footnote,.  239-240,  241,  243,  25«^2^=^%|f '  „.2,„

„„„a„  Basil  ^^  213,  224,  22,,  m^^,  2^^,^^^^^

IZZ:  S?Ma;. 213,  21,,  210,  22,.  25^,  26,.^^r  ^

23^

Murray,  Patrick  - - -  . .  23'

Murray,  Stephen  -  -  -  "  "  '  338,339,34:
Piddington,  J.  G.  -  -  227,236,244-241
l°^Z:  r'Lolcl  ' 2,3,  2,4-215  216  2,9  220

222,  225,  22,,  22S.  233,  -S6r2,2.  2,

Various  other  agen*, 220.  22,,  226  (footnote),  22,

23,,  236.  248,  252-253,  256,  259,  260,^262,^263,^^^^^^^^


Lxxxix.-xcii.] Index  to  Vol.  XXXIV.


393


Thought-Transference —

General  conditions  and  classification  -  -  -  .  217-225
Method  of  Procedure  -  -  .  .  212-214,  225-226,  336-337
Nature  and  quality  of  the  impressions  -  -  -  241-242
Percipient's  part  in  the  transmission —

Hyperaesthesia,  Question  of  -  -  -  217,  229-241
Percipient's  view  of  the  way  the  impressions  come  to

him 229,  241

Subject  of  experiment  taken  from  books  which  the  percipient

had  not  read - - 214,  217,  222,  234-235,  236,  250-251
Tipping,  Misses  K.  and  L.,  Experiments  in  telepathy  with,

references  to - - - 37,  45,  55  (footnote),  59-60,  62-63

Tordai,  Wilhelm  329

Traits  de  MUapsychique,  Review  of  70

Criticism  7g

of  detail  83-90

Deductions  94-96
Materialisation  94
Nature  and  scope  70-76
Physical  and  Physiological  Phenomena - - - -  93-94

Terminology  91.93

„ Sequel  to  the  Review  of  - •  97

Trance  Phenomena —

nv,Qr,ep,s  in  reflates  and  in  the  sensibility  of  the  medium
„  , -  177,  178-179

- -  167-168

Head-snaps -  170-171

Hyperaesthesia  -  -  .  .  .  172-173,178,298-299,308
Modus  Operandi  of  mediximistic  trance  -  -  .  I66,  298
Psycho -Galvanic  reflex  method  -  -  .  .  .  178-180
Respiration  of  the  medium  - - .  168,  173,  178.  307-308

Viewed  m  the  light  of  hypnotic  phenomena - - -  166
See  also  Mrs.  Leonard's  trance  phenomena.
JjTroubridge,  (Una)^  Lady,  Some Further Consideration of  the

"  Modus  Operandi  "  in  Mediumisiic  Trance -  298
The  "  Modus  Operandi  "  in  So-called  Mediwmistic

Tmnce,  reference  to - - . .  172-176


V.

Mr.,  "  Oscar  Wilde  "  scripts,  tlirough  ....  186-196
A  Critique  by  the  brother  of - , . 186,  189-193
2'l^erraU,  Dr.  A.  W.,  Telepathic  Experiment  {the  ''One-Horse

Dawn  "),  reference  to  153


394


Index  to  Vol.  XXXIV .  [parts  lxxxix.-xcii.


Verrall,  Mrs.  A.  W.,  On  telepathic  processes ....  66-6'5
„ Report  on  a  Series  of  Experiments  in  "  Guessing,"  Re-
ferences to 212-213,  217,  218,  220,  221-222,  223,

224,  225,  228,  231  (footnote),  233,  248,  253,  263-264
„ Table-tilting  experiment  with  Mrs.  Riviere,  reference  to  40-41
„ Scripts  of,  reference  to . . . . . 149- 15(
See  also  Elucidation  oj  Two  Points  in  the  "  One-
Horse  Dawn  Scripts.''

W.

Wales,  Hubert,  Report  on  Cases  of  Thought-Transferenee  without

Conscious  Agency,  reference  to  - - - - - -  40
